 5 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Chaotic Cloud World, Cangyun Continent. Here, the martial way reached the peak and turned immortals into emperors. It opened up the Dantian to absorb the spiritual energy of heaven and earth, merging it with the treasure trove of the physical body. If an immortal being broke through the void, they would get the title of Emperor Immortal. The Cangyun Continent was divided into nine levels. These were, the foundation establishment level, the aurous core level, the nascent soul level, the soul formation level, the void refining level, the form synthesis level, the tribulation transcending level, and the Mahayana level. Each level was further divided into the initial phase, the middle phase, and the late phase. Every phase would have a qualitative change, especially the late stage. After completing the Mahayana level, an immortal being would become an Emperor Immortal. With the newly gained powers, they could change the color of the sky and the earth. However, the Emperor Immortal realm only existed on the Cangyun Continent. This continent had not been discovered for close to ten thousand years. It was a vast realm that was divided into five major regions: The Eastern Region, The Western Region, The Southern Region, The Northern Region, and The Central Region. Each region seemed to have no end and was incomparably far away. The Jiuxiao Sect was located in the southern mountain range of The Eastern Region. The southern mountain range had sharp peaks that shot straight into the clouds, while countless waterfalls flowed through the mountains like a silver dragon meandering through a fairyland. Within the mountains was the residence of the outer Jiuxiao Sect disciples. In a simple room, a white-robed man was lying on a bed. His eyes were tightly shut, and he seemed to be in a deep sleep. Suddenly, a child pushed open the door and popped his head into the room. “Senior Lin An, the inner sect disciple assessment ceremony is about to begin. Master has asked me to pass on a message to you. Please go over and accept the assessment immediately!” The child just stood at the door and shouted loudly. He didn’t care if the person lying on the bed heard him or not. After that, he slammed the door and left. Lin An rubbed his sleepy eyes and sat up in surprise. He looked around at the unfamiliar environment and mumbled, “What’s going on? Where is this place? What inner sect disciple test?” While in his confused state, Lin An felt a sharp pain in his head, and he had an epiphany. “I woke up, and I actually transmigrated to an Oriental Xianxia World!” He was originally just an ordinary young man living in the 21st century. However, after he got drunk at a porn bar in New York, his eyes went black, and he transmigrated to this world. He was now Lin An, an outer sect disciple of the Jiuxiao Sect. And he was about to face the assessment of the inner disciples of the sect! This assessment was very important. In a world where the strong ruled, only through continuous cultivation and promotion could he survive in this dangerous world. Otherwise, he would be eliminated! Lin An had already failed his first two assessments. If he failed this assessment, he would be expelled from the Jiuxiao Sect. An outer sect disciple with no future would naturally not attract the attention of any other sect, and he would have to give up on the path of cultivation. The fact that Lin An’s talent was ordinary was not a secret in the Jiuxiao Sect. Everyone in the sect knew that he was just going through the motions. All the other outer sect disciples had gathered together for the assessment, apart from Lin An. That was why an elder had sent the child over to ask Lin An to rush to the test site. However, even an outer sect errand boy was unwilling to look Lin An in the eye. In a world where strength was respected, every member of the outer sect detested the slightest sign of weakness. Lin An stood up and carefully examined his body as he put on his clothes. His body’s natural spirit veins were blocked, and he looked unathletic. It was no wonder that after three years in the sect; he was still a basic outer sect disciple. The strongest disciples who had joined the sect alongside Lin An had already become the personal disciples to the sect master. However, since he had come to this world, Lin An was determined to face it. Even if he couldn’t be a powerful person, he still had to live his life in style in order to survive. Lin An casually twisted his neck and walked towards the door. However, when he held the doorknob, a crisp voice rang in his head. [Congratulations, host for successfully activating the Success Rate System. You will now have access to the final success rate of every task before you complete it.] Abruptly, a string of characters flashed before Lin An’s eyes. As he stared at the wooden door in front of him, the strange voice in his head continued, [Wooden door, made of gold-threaded Nanmu. It is 4,500 years old and has the effect of repelling insects. Your success rate of opening the wooden door is 100%!] Lin An took a few steps back in shock before turning around and looking at a chair beside the table. However, no information appeared in his eyes. He walked slowly towards the chair and hesitated. Suddenly, another string of characters appeared in his eyes. [Chair, made of red acid wood. The tree is 430 years old and has no effect. Your success rate of sitting down is 100%!] Lin An finally understood. The system was giving him the success rate to every task before he attempted it. After he thought it through, the crisp sound in his head rang out again. [Ding! Congratulations for grasping the system’s usage method. You are rewarded with a novice treasure chest. Do you wish to receive it?] Lin An immediately became excited. He could now see the success rate to anything he intended to do. No matter what he did in the future, he would have a success rate to refer to. He could choose to take on the task based on the system’s success rate! This was equivalent to the system giving him the right path! After thinking it through, Lin An chose to receive the novice gift bag. [Congratulations, you have received a Silver Treasure Chest!] [Do you wish to open the Silver Treasure Chest?] <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL After Lin An accepted the beginner’s reward, a treasure chest appeared in the system’s space. Lin An discovered that he could store and retrieve items in the system at any time. He chose to open the treasure chest, and a foundation establishment pill appeared in the space. A string of characters formed in front of his eyes as the increasingly familiar voice rang out, [This foundation establishment pill is made from ice-thorn grass, a lava crystal core, and over ten types of herbs, specially refined by the system. If you combine it with a suitable cultivation method, the chances of successfully utilizing the foundation establishment pill will be increased! Your current success rate if you choose to ingest the pill is 0%.] After finding out the success rate, Lin An relaxed and put the foundation establishment pill back into the treasure chest. He knew that he would have to find a cultivation method in order to consume the pill. Once he accomplished the task, he could utilize the treasure chest. After taking some time to digest his new reality, Lin An pushed open the door and left. ...; Jiuxiao Sect, Heaven’s Secret Square. More than a hundred youths stood solemnly on the square. They were secretly excited as they awaited the assessment to begin, but they couldn’t display their vigor due to the dozens of elders standing in front of them. The oldest master in the group had a kind face, but his long hair and his white beard gave him an authoritative look. He was the Red Cloud Spiritual Master, and he was in charge of the assessment. When he saw that Lin An had finally joined the group, the Red Cloud Spiritual Master gave them a stern look and then said in a loud voice, “Today is an important day for you all. It will determine whether you have the qualifications to be inner sect disciples! No matter the challenges, cultivators should always clear their minds and cultivate diligently. Only then will they be able to slay demons and defend the human world!” The young men promptly bowed their heads and chanted in unison, “Your disciples respectfully obey your teachings!” “Good! The assessment ceremony will officially begin!” Master Chi Xiao nodded his head in satisfaction and beckoned for all the examinees to carry a pile of old books onto the stage. The assessment ceremony was very simple. The Elder Council on the stage would provide dozens of low-level cultivation techniques for the disciples to learn on the spot. If one wanted to enter the inner sect, they had to learn cultivation techniques. As long as they used the abilities in the cultivation techniques and unleashed the power of the foundation establishment level, they would be considered to have passed the inner sect assessment! It was equivalent to testing the comprehension ability of the disciples. The elders started to read out the names on the stage, and the young men quickly lined up in a row and began to try out the required cultivation techniques. The presiding elder eventually called out Lin An’s name, and he immediately ascended onto the stage. When they saw that it was Lin An’s turn, the disciples below the stage all let out sighs. “He won’t choose the ice heart mantra again, right?” “Lin An chose the ice heart mantra during his first two tests, but his comprehension ability is too low. He can’t even execute the easiest cultivation technique!” Even though Lin An was a senior disciple in the sect, his peers did not respect him since he had failed the assessment on two separate occasions. Lin An ignored the disciples and went on to pick a cultivation technique. A string of characters flashed across his eyes, and he calmly listened to the system’s instructions. [Ice heart mantra: This is a low-level human-rank cultivation technique. Once you successfully execute it, you will be able to manipulate ice. You can at most cultivate to the early stage of the golden core stage. The final success rate is 25%! When combined with the foundation establishment pill, the success rate is 100%. To correctly execute the technique, you start with the descending dragon fiery palm, a high-grade human rank technique. After cultivating it, you can release the fiery palm. At most, you can cultivate it to the middle Jindan stage. The final success rate is 55%. When combined with the foundation establishment pill, the success rate is 100%!] Cultivation techniques were divided into three levels, heaven, earth, and man. Each level was divided into the upper, middle, and lower stages. The cultivation technique used for the foundation establishment level would accompany the cultivator for the rest of his life! Therefore, the higher the level of the cultivation technique, the higher the upper limit! After listening to the system, Lin An instantly understood. As long as he cultivated with the foundation establishment pill, regardless of which cultivation technique he chose, he would have a 100% success rate in the foundation establishment assessment test and obtain the qualification to proceed to the next level. Additionally, Lin An now knew why he had failed his previous assessment tests. He had chosen a cultivation method that was not suitable for him. However, with the supplementary medicinal pill in his treasure chest, he would be able to obtain a 100% success rate! Lin An would only have to choose the most suitable cultivation technique for the assessment. Before he concluded his thought process, two disciples suddenly appeared in front of him and blocked his path Lin An scoffed when he identified the young men who had accosted him. Xiao Muran was the most promising prospect in the Jiuxiao Sect. Due to his unique talents, he had been ranked first among the disciples ever since he joined the sect. However, he was arrogant, and he looked down on those with low talent. Li Mubai also stood alongside Xiao Muran, and they glaringly stared at Li An. Xiao Muran opened his mouth slowly and sneered, “Yo, isn’t this senior brother Lin An? Do you still want to choose the ice heart technique this year? You haven’t had any success with it in the past. Why don’t you try the dragon subduing inferno palm! This is a human-rank high-grade technique!” However, Li Mubai immediately interjected, “Brother Muran, can a good-for-nothing like Lin An execute such a high-grade cultivation technique?” Xiao Muran rubbed his chin and turned towards Li Mubai. “That’s true. I was too rude! He obviously can’t do it!!” Lin An felt disgusted after he heard the two disciples taunting him with their sarcastic remarks. However, he decided to ignore them and focused his efforts on choosing a cultivation technique. Lin An pushed them aside and made his way towards the center stage. Suddenly, a thick block of text appeared in front of his eyes. A system notification popped up, and a hollow voice read out the contents of the message. [Inceptive scripture: three pages to help you navigate from the foundation establishment level to the Emperor Immortal level. Your foundation establishment success rate is 0.0001%! Your aurous core stage success rate is 0.0001%! Your nascent soul stage success rate is 0.0001%! Your success at the soul formation stage is currently 30%! The void training stage success rate is currently 40%! Your form synthesis stage success rate is currently 50%! While your success rate at the tribulation stage success rate is 60%. At the Mahayana stage, your success rate will be 80%! However, your chances of reaching the Emperor Immortal stage are currently 0.000001%! Combined with the foundation establishment pill given by the system, the host’s foundation establishment rate has increased to 100%!”] Lin An’s heart raced faster once the system finished reading out the message. Although the proposed cultivation technique did not have any specific strength, it could be cultivated all the way to the Emperor Immortal Realm! As an ordinary cultivator, having an earth cultivation method to build a foundation on was enough to make everyone envious! But an earth-rank cultivation method could only be cultivated to the late stage of the Jindan Stage! Lin An had the chance to join the supreme realm of the Emperor Immortal! With the foundation establishment pill given by the system, he had a 100% chance of breaking through the first level! He finally had a supreme cultivation technique, and he was tempted to use it. <sup>1</sup> <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An picked up the scripture of no beginning and prepared to walk to the training ground at the side. Suddenly, Lin An’s hand was quickly pressed down by an old withered hand. Elder Li Mulin stared at him in surprise and said, “Lin An, the scripture of no beginning is an incomplete copy! Ever since the dawn of time, no one has been able to master it! That is the consensus of the entire continent. I advise you to give up!” Elder Li Mulin had a confident look on his face as he gazed at Lin An. The cultivation technique that he had chosen was famous in all the regions on the continent. This was because the success rate of mastering the ‘Wu Shi Jing’ was so low. The Juixiao Sect did not have any record of a disciple who had successfully mastered the cultivation technique. There had always been some outstanding students who had tried to cultivate the “Wu Shi Jing.” Some had succeeded in building their foundation, but only one peerless genius had successfully broken through to the foundation establishment stage and formed his Jindan. At that time, he arrogantly declared that the “Wu Shi Jing” was the only Emperor Immortal scripture in the world! It was the path to becoming an Emperor Immortal! Unfortunately, anyone who successfully used the ‘No Beginning Scripture’ to break through the foundation establishment stage had eventually died. This was because the probability of cultivating to the foundation establishment stage was already 0.0001%! And the difficulty of cultivating to the golden core stage was a hundred times that of the Foundation Establishment Stage! As for the nascent soul stage. The difficulty of cultivating could be described as a thousand times or ten thousand times! This was simply a cultivation technique that no one could cultivate! No matter how powerful a genius was, they wouldn’t be able to master it successfully! And if Lin an announced the success rate now, everyone would probably have no idea at all! Relying on a genius to break through to the foundation establishment stage, but by that time, it would be too late. Once the foundation establishment stage was formed, it would no longer be able to change the basic technique! So. To the world, the “Scripture of no beginning”was a path of no return! Elder Li shook his head in denial, and the strength of his hand that was holding Lin an increased by a few degrees. Suddenly, a wave of pressure came over. Lin an pulled out his hand and said calmly, “I’ve already decided to use it. I won’t choose any other cultivation method.” Elder Li Glared at Lin An with a dissatisfied gaze and said, “You’re making a mistake!” For this ‘no beginning scripture’to appear in the cultivation method for the inner sect assessment, it was simply ruining one’s future! It was entirely elder Li’s work mistake that caused this cultivation technique to appear at the assessment venue. If the sect master were to discover it, elder Li would definitely be reprimanded. Seeing that Lin an had chosen the “Scripture of no beginning”, elder Li instantly became dissatisfied. However, Lin an’s firm gaze told him that it was impossible for him to change the cultivation technique, so he didn’t stop him at that moment. In any case, Lin an was just a marginal figure. It was better for him to choose the scripture of no beginning than other disciples with potential! If it was another disciple with potential who chose it, he would be willing to take the risk and stop them, even if he had to pay the price! At this moment. The people next to him immediately looked at him strangely. “Lin an chose the scripture of no beginning? Is he here to make a joke?” “Speaking of which, there have been too many versions of the ‘Wu Shi Jing’in the Cangyun continent! It’s said that the last immortal emperor used the ‘Wu Shi Jing’to build his foundation hundreds of thousands of years ago!” “You believe this? This is just a story made up by the storyteller. I only know that whoever chooses this cultivation technique to build his foundation will be finished!” “Lin an chose the ‘Wu Shi Jing’to show his face. In any case, he will soon be expelled from the Jiuxiao sect!” The origins of the scripture of no beginning were too great, and everyone avoided it! And Lin An, as an outer sect disciple, was actually trying to cultivate it now? In everyone’s eyes, it was something that would make them laugh their heads off! As expected. Xiao Muran saw that Lin an had chosen the scripture of changes, and his interest was immediately piqued. He shook the middle-grade earth rank cultivation technique that he had already chosen in his hand. Following that, Xiao Muran said in a strange tone, “Eldest senior brother! There are so many cultivation techniques on the table, and no one is competing with you. Why must you choose the scripture of No Beginning?” Looking at the cultivation technique in Xiao Muran’s hand, Lin an gave him a gloating look and almost laughed out loud. Because the system once again gave him a string of characters. [ Netherworld Thousand Hands: Earth rank middle-grade demonic technique. After cultivating it, you can release the Indestructible Netherworld mysterious hands. At most, you can cultivate it to the advanced stage of the Golden Core Stage. This is a demonic technique. The success rate is 100% ! ] This was a demonic technique that could cause one to go berserk! Anyone who cultivated it would have a success rate of 100% ! And the result would be that the demonic technique would be completed, and the person would also go berserk! Immediately. Lin An didn’t intend to remind him, and let Xiao Muran fend for himself. Lin an smiled. “Junior brother, if you want to learn it, senior brother is willing to give it to you. Use the technique in your hands to exchange for it. I can forget about giving you this ‘no beginning scripture’!” Using an earth-rank cultivation technique to exchange for a useless cultivation technique that he couldn’t cultivate? Lin An was certain that Xiao Muran wouldn’t. Thus, he was very willing to mock Xiao Muran. As expected, after hearing Lin an’s words, Xiao Muran’s expression immediately turned ugly, and his gaze became fierce. Lin an smiled disdainfully, turned around, and walked towards a quiet place. The next step was to use this tattered “Wu Shi Jing”to build his foundation! Not long after, Lin an sat down. As the Foundation Establishment Pill entered his mouth, a warm current instantly flowed through his stomach, and before long, it gathered in Lin An’s mind. At this moment, Lin An’s brain felt as if it had a fever, and it immediately became extremely hot. However, this feeling didn’t make him feel uncomfortable. Instead, he felt a sense of clarity. At that moment, lin an looked at the “Wushi Sutra”and immediately became lively. Many characters began to rearrange themselves, and each character floated up and began to float into his mind. A set of cultivation technique named “Wushi Dharmakaya”appeared in his mind. At that moment, Lin an felt that the entire space had stopped moving. The wushi dharmakaya that came with the “Wushi Sutra”was practiced in Lin An’s mind over and over again. Instantly, as if it was a memory, it was deeply engraved in Lin An’s bones. The hundredth time! In an instant, thick spiritual energy and mixed fog began to gather in the Jiuxiao sect square. Seeing such a strange phenomenon, everyone was shocked! This was the sign of a successful foundation establishment. It was just that this time, it was too fierce. No one present had ever seen such an intense heaven and earth phenomenon! “What kind of heaven and Earth anomaly is this? I wonder which genius has successfully built a foundation! This is definitely a peerless genius!” The elders began to look at the foundation establishment disciples on the stage and immediately shook their heads. This might just be a normal heaven and earth anomaly, and it didn’t seem like it was created by the disciples of the Jiuxiao sect. On the stage, Lin an still sat there quietly, turning a deaf ear to everything. The practice went on for the thousandth time! ! The sky instantly darkened. A second later, the sky suddenly became vast again! Slowly, auspicious clouds gathered on the square and began to turn colorful. Auspicious signs began to change. Just like pictures, the mountains and rivers changed and history changed. Finally, it slowly turned into a whirlpool that covered the heaven and earth, and it grew bigger and bigger! At this moment, everyone present was completely in shock. They couldn’t even say a single word. This kind of abnormal phenomenon was enough to change the color of the sky and earth! Just what kind of Almighty was able to stir up the wind and clouds like this! It wasn’t just everyone present who was shocked. Even the various elders of the Jiuxiao sect who were in seclusion, the sect master, and the peak masters who had gone into seclusion, all began to cast their gazes over. They even personally came over. Lin An was still sitting in the square, and his expression didn’t change at all. Because, at this moment, he had already rehearsed the “Wu Shi Jing”ten thousand times in his mind! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL In the time it takes for half an incense stick to burn, tens of thousands of years seemed to have passed by Lin an! Finally, the practice of the incomplete page of the uninitiated foundation establishment reached a million times! At this moment. The strange phenomenon in the sky seemed to release a pressure that made everyone hold their breaths. Their eyes widened as they watched the changes in the wind and clouds in front of them. The auspicious phenomenon in the sky was like a vortex that rapidly converged and blotted out the sky and the Sun. Then, it rapidly descended from the sky. It instantly smashed into the Crimson Sky Square! Rumble! At the same time, all the spiritual energy within a radius of a hundred Li was instantly sucked out. All living creatures felt that the weight of their bodies had changed, as if it had become lighter! Even their consciousness had become blurry for a moment. In the square, there were even some disciples who had just entered the sect and had very low cultivation bases. At this moment, they felt a headache coming on because of the heaven and earth phenomenon. They almost half-knelt on the ground. Some of the outer sect elders even felt a sense of dizziness. However, after a few seconds, everything disappeared. It was as if nothing had happened! The entire process was completed in an instant! For cultivators, every time they broke through to the next realm, there would be an anomaly. However, some of the anomalies would only affect a small area around them, and some of them were so weak that no one could detect them. However, for some almighty cultivators, when they broke through to the next realm, they would stir up the heavens and earth. Without a doubt, the anomaly that Lin an caused this time was even stronger than the anomaly that ordinary almighty cultivators created when they broke through. It had already exceeded the scope of everyone’s understanding. At this moment. Everyone in the square revealed a look of fear on their faces. Slowly, they began to regain their senses. Everything that had happened previously had undoubtedly deeply shocked everyone present! The elders who were taking the test were also at a loss at this moment. Each and every one of them frowned. There were people who had never seen a heaven and earth phenomenon of this level in their entire lives. Moreover, it was just a small area like the Jiuxiao sect. More than ten elders looked at each other and saw confusion in each other’s eyes. “Could it be that a mighty figure in the sect broke through and caused this heaven and earth phenomenon?” “It can’t be, could it be that the ancestor had an epiphany?” “It’s also possible that a mighty figure borrowed the spiritual vein of our Jiuxiao Mountain and broke through here, causing this phenomenon!” “This kind of phenomenon requires at least the nascent soul stage! Could it be the soul formation stage?” The disciples below the stage were also puzzled. However, compared to the elders, these disciples didn’t have a clear understanding of the phenomenon because of their experience. Although they were very shocked, they didn’t guess too far away. “I think it should be senior brother Xiao Muran!” “Right? He is the number one genius this year. The person who can trigger the phenomenon must be him!” “The phenomenon has ended, which means that someone has already succeeded in building their foundation! Let’s see who stands up first and find out!” And then there was Lin An. As a large amount of spiritual energy poured in, Lin an successfully broke through to the foundation establishment stage. The temperature in his head began to dissipate, and the effects of the foundation establishment pill were completely digested. The Foundation Establishment Pill was a reward pill given by the system. It was simply not something that could be refined in this world. Its effects were beyond the understanding of this world. Therefore, the foundation establishment pill allowed Lin an to easily learn the foundation establishment cultivation method of the “No beginning scripture”. He had already successfully cultivated the foundation establishment chapter of the “No beginning scripture”! The foundation establishment chapter of the “No beginning scripture”only had one content, and that was the “No beginning Dharmic body”! At this moment, Lin An was sitting on the stage. He could feel the spiritual energy circulating in his body. Upon careful observation, Lin an was dressed in white. He looked ethereal and ethereal. His aura was ethereal, and he had the demeanor of an immortal cultivator. Lin an closed his eyes and let out a long sigh of relief. Just the formation of the uninitiated spell body of the foundation establishment stage had attracted such a heaven and earth phenomenon. Now, a burst of energy instantly filled his entire body. Lin an knew that his physical body was already incomparably powerful. He had already gotten rid of his mortal body. Even if he was facing an aurous core stage powerhouse, he could still fight him with just his physical body. Furthermore, the uninitiated spell body would increase as the battle progressed! The stronger he fought, the stronger he became! This was the foundation establishment effect of the uninitiated scripture! It allowed the cultivator’s physical body to become extremely powerful. At the same time, the uninitiated spell body could also improve one’s physique. Just like the blocked spiritual vein on Lin An’s body, it was now completely opened up. Even the internal injuries that he had accumulated previously were completely healed at this moment. It was no longer mediocre. Lin An was simply a monster now! Lin An sat on the stage, not moving at all. He was as calm as ever. What he needed to do now was to detect the changes in every part of his body. After the time it takes for an incense stick to burn. Waves of light appeared on Xiao Muran’s body, who was also on the stage. Then, he stood up with an excited look on his face. Instantly, as his body stretched out, the spiritual power in his body circulated once, and the aura on Xiao Muran’s body changed! This was the foundation establishment realm! Under normal circumstances, with Xiao Muran’s talent level, it would take at least three incense sticks’time for him to reach the foundation establishment realm by practicing a low-level middle-grade cultivation technique! But now, the time for one incense stick’s time had not yet arrived! Xiao Muran had already succeeded in reaching the foundation establishment realm! Right now, Xiao Muran’s face was full of pride, and he was even more certain that he was that one in ten thousand genius! “Hahahahaha! ! !” Immediately, he burst out laughing on the stage! Lin an laughed to himself. Xiao Muran cultivated demonic arts. If it were anyone else, their success rate would be 100% . As long as they succeeded in building their foundation, they would have already fallen into the demonic path. However, a genius was indeed a genius. The speed at which they entered the demonic path was also so fast! Seeing that Xiao Muran was the first to stand up, his temperament also changed. Everyone already knew that Xiao Muran had already succeeded in building his foundation! As if thinking of something, everyone below the stage widened their eyes. Building his foundation caused a heaven and earth phenomenon! The first person to stand up should be the person who caused the heaven and earth phenomenon! The disciples below the stage started guessing and whispering among themselves. “Xiao Muran? As expected, he’s the first to stand up!” “A genius is always a genius. He can always be one step ahead of others!” “After all, he’s the most talented person in our sect. It’s normal for him to cause abnormal phenomena in heaven and earth!” Slowly. On the square, disciples began to stand up one after another. With waves of fluctuations, the disciples on the stage seemed to have changed into a group of people. Everyone’s aura became even stronger! At this moment, in the middle of the crowd, there were also outer sect disciples who hadn’t reached the foundation establishment stage for a year. Some of them lowered their heads and sighed. However, it didn’t matter. Even if they failed in the first year, they still had a chance in the next two years. Very quickly, only one person remained on the stage who hadn’t stood up. Lin An! At this moment, everyone’s gaze was cast over. Even many people’s eyes were cast with disdain! From the looks of it, the foundation establishment stage had failed? 8 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An was still sitting on the futon, and his aura didn’t change at all! Elder Li, who was at the side, revealed a smile. “I’ve already said it before, it’s impossible to cultivate the no beginning scripture!” “This disciple named Lin an has a good attitude towards cultivation. Unfortunately, his talent is mediocre, and he’s destined to not be able to go far on the path of cultivation!” “The path of cultivation is 90% based on talent. This disciple is not suitable to stay in our Jiuxiao sect!” The elders looked at Lin an who was sitting on the cushion and sighed. Some of the disciples on the stage who had already stood up revealed excited expressions. As they looked at Lin an, a sense of pride rose within them. Talent was always talent. It was not enough for someone like Lin an to work hard. Three years! It was not as good as the new disciples who had just entered! Some of the disciples were frowning. They looked at Lin an and shook their heads and sighed. They still had two years to break through to the foundation establishment stage, but this big senior brother Lin an was not so lucky. Below the stage. The group of disciples who had the attitude of watching the show were full of disdain. Lin An’s aura did not change at all. It seemed that he could already be declared a failure. “For a person like Lin an who doesn’t have any talent, who gave him the courage to go on stage and embarrass himself again and again?” “This senior brother is really trash! It’s been three years, but he still hasn’t succeeded in building his foundation!” “Looks like he’s going to be expelled from the sect!” “Haha, who said that? Isn’t he still allowed to be a part-time disciple?” On the stage. Lin an had already explored every part of his body. After the baptism of the scripture of no beginning, the spiritual veins in his body were no longer blocked. Moreover, his five senses had been greatly enhanced. The whispers around him naturally fell into his ears clearly. At this moment, Lin an smiled slightly. He suddenly opened his eyes and slowly stood up. In just an instant, a violent aura was instantly released from his body! This was the aura of the Foundation Establishment Stage! A stream of light slowly flowed around Lin an’s body like a stream of golden silk. It surrounded his body, and it was instantly filled with light and color. After the foundation establishment improvement of the Scripture of no beginning, Lin An’s physique and demeanor had endless dao charm. His temperament could be said to be unrivaled! His height had also increased by half a head at this moment, and his gaze had become even sharper. It was as if there was a starry sky hidden in his eyes! What a male immortal! He saw the huge changes on Lin An’s body. All the disciples were instantly stunned. The way they opened their mouths to speak was very comical, and they stuttered as they discussed. “This...; Lin an...; could it be that he really succeeded in building his foundation?” “No way, why do I feel that he’s different from before!” At the same time. On the various main peaks of the Jiuxiao sect, the various peak masters had already used their spiritual senses to probe over and instantly enveloped the square. Everything that happened was clearly transmitted into the eyes of the various peak masters. However, none of them knew who caused the heaven and earth phenomenon. It was very likely that a mighty figure had appeared. They hoped that there was no hostility towards the Jiuxiao sect. This matter was of great importance, so they had to go and check it out. At this moment, the peak masters quickly flew towards the Crimson Sky Square. The Jiuxiao sect was divided into one main peak and eight secondary peaks. The nine peaks combined into one to form the Jiuxiao sect! And every divine peak had its own characteristics. Just like the Crimson Sky Peak where Lin an and the others were at, its main function was to nurture new disciples. The Crimson Sky Peak served as an outer sect while the other eight peaks were all inner sects. One divine peak only had a small number of inner sect disciples, yet they controlled the vast majority of the resources within the nine clouds sect. At this moment, on green clouds peak. The Green Sky Peak was one of the nine clouds. The entire mountain forest of the nine clouds mountain was filled with immortal qi and buildings. Only the green sky peak was very different from the other divine peaks. As far as the eye could see, there were no luxurious palaces here. The immortal trees that had not been taken care of had already fallen to the side and turned into withered trees. The ground was overgrown with weeds. There was not even any human habitation here. The entire mountain was filled with lush grass! However. As long as one observed carefully, one would be able to see that this place was extraordinary. As long as one casually flipped open the wild grass, one would be able to find a thousand-year-old spirit herb among it. The reason why the immortal tree had been knocked down was completely man-made. In the shadow of the tree, rare lingzhi mushrooms could be seen everywhere. In the Jiuxiao sect, the medicinal herbs that required a lot of contribution points to exchange for were like wild vegetables on Bixiao Peak. They were casually planted among the various weeds and did not look like a medicinal field at all. It was simply a miracle that these spirit herbs could grow and grow so well! At this moment. A lazy snort was heard. Not far away, a very ordinary thatched cottage could be seen standing in the middle of the mountain stream. The surroundings of the thatched cottage were filled with mountain stream bamboo forests. The streams were flowing with a Ding Dong Sound, making it appear secluded and elegant. Compared to the entire desolate Bixiao Peak, this small private world was like a Fairyland on Earth! In a room in the thatched cottage. A woman was half-lying on a bed made of bamboo. Her posture was graceful and luxurious. Her every movement revealed a lazy state. Colorful silk and satin covered her body, even though most of her soft breasts were exposed in the air, she was too lazy to cover them. Her pair of straight legs were like white jade carvings, lazily resting on the bed. With a light snort, she casually grabbed the wine gourd by her pillow. Raising her hand, she saw that she raised her head and slightly opened her mouth. The wine was poured into her mouth, and the smell of wine instantly filled the air. HMPH! Her eyes widened, as if she had seen something extraordinary. She instantly got off the bed and stood up. Silk and satin fell from her body onto the ground. She did not mind at all. The entire room was filled with a sensual scene! In the direction of Crimson Sky Peak, her mouth began to mutter. “This aura is so familiar...; it’s exactly the same as the thousand-year-old one...; !” In just a moment, she disappeared into the room! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The plaza was now filled with the sound of small discussions. At this moment, several powerful auras instantly enveloped the plaza. In just an instant. A few figures appeared on the plaza. They were shockingly the strongest existences in the Jiuxiao sect! The leaders were the peak masters of the eight divine peaks and the various inner sect elders! Even the sect master of the Jiuxiao sect, Dugu Xin, had personally arrived at this moment! These strongest experts of the Jiuxiao sect swept their eyes across the stage as if they were searching for something? Dugu Xin frowned when he saw Xiao Muran. However, Dugu Xin’s eyes did not stop on Xiao Muran for even a second. Immediately after, he turned his head to look at the other disciples. Disappointment began to appear in his eyes. This year’s batch of disciples weren’t very talented, and none of them surprised Dugu Xin! In fact, even the so-called number one genius didn’t dare to look at the sect leader in the eye! The other disciples were like chickens, all in a state of nervousness. In the arena, only Lin an looked at Dugu Xin indifferently. He didn’t even blink or show any expression. A trace of surprise flashed through Dugu Xin’s heart, but he then shook his head and shifted his gaze away. The current Lin an had gone through the purification of the foundation establishment of the non-beginnings Sutra and had become an absolute genius. However, only Lin an himself could observe the phenomenon in his body. Therefore, in Dugu Xin’s eyes, Lin an was still just an outer sect disciple with average talent. After seeing all the disciples, Dugu Xin sighed slightly. The glimmer of hope that originally existed instantly vanished. The person who caused the heaven and earth phenomenon wasn’t among this group of disciples! Seeing this scene. The entire square instantly fell silent. It was also the first time the disciples below the stage had seen such a situation, and they didn’t know what would happen. In the past, at this time, only the inner sect elders would personally come. Now, almost all the experts of the sect had come. The pressure brought by the experts was not just for show. What on Earth was going on? Even the sect master had come personally? This was the question in the hearts of every disciple. ...; Within the Jiuxiao sect. The sect master was the person in charge. Dugu Xin was in charge of the affairs of the Nine Peaks. He possessed the most unfathomable strength and had already reached the advanced stage of the Soul Formation realm! At the same time, Dugu Xin controlled the golden firmament peak, which was also the most powerful main peak of the nine firmament sect! It was the first choice for all the disciples to enter the inner sect. After that, it was the peak masters of the other eight peaks, which was equivalent to the person in charge of the main peak. After that, it was the inner sect elders of each divine peak who did the work to assist the peak masters. After the outer disciples and inner disciples passed the assessment, the inner elders would be in charge of teaching and the outer disciples would complete the transfer to the inner sect. Only those true geniuses would become the personal disciples of the peak masters. The identity of a personal disciple was the noblest among all the disciples! At this moment. Seeing that all the peak masters had arrived, the discussions below the stage started again. “What’s going on? Doesn’t our Jiuxiao sect have nine main peaks? Why are there only eight peak masters?” “Haven’t you heard? The peak master of Bixiao Peak is a woman, but she hasn’t appeared for a hundred years. Her mind isn’t on cultivation at all, and she has never taken in a disciple!” “I’ve heard the elders mention that this peak master is a drunkard! That bad temper isn’t to be trifled with!” “In that case, I won’t choose Green Cloud Peak!” The peak master of Green Cloud Peak that this group of disciples spoke of. She was the woman in the thatched cottage in Green Cloud Peak. She had come to the nine cloud sect a thousand years ago, and since then, she had dominated Green Cloud Peak. In these thousand years, she had never taken in a single disciple! After she came to Green Cloud Peak, she was the only one left! Because she rarely appeared in front of everyone, only a few people had heard of her name. — Qian Yi! This was a completely legendary figure! Without a doubt, those who had seen her by chance would be amazed by her perfect appearance! Qian Yi was absolutely a peerless beauty in the world, and no one could deny it! At first glance, one would even feel that she was a saintess from some great Holy Land! At the same time. What made her famous was that she was famous for being lazy. She never wore shoes when she went out, and she never let go of her wine gourd. No matter how outstanding her appearance was, no one would dare to disturb such an immortal cultivator! There was no time for gossip. But Lin an at this moment. After successfully building his foundation, the current Lin an already had the qualifications to join the inner sect. At this moment, he was thinking about which sect to join. At this moment. An outer sect elder standing at the side said loudly, “Disciples who haven’t reached the foundation establishment stage, step down from the stage now! Cultivate well in the future and strive to obtain the qualifications to enter the inner sect next year!” “At the same time, those disciples who remain on the stage, report their age, cultivation level, and cultivation techniques!” In the Jiuxiao sect, it was said that they would join the inner sect, but in fact, they would also choose each other. The disciples would choose instructors to teach. And the instructors would also choose disciples with outstanding talent. Each sect had its own characteristics, and the resources they would allocate were also different. There was no perfect sect, nor was there a perfect disciple. It was a situation where one could not have it both ways. Just like the Golden Cloud Peak where Dugu Xin was located, it mainly focused on fire-type cultivation techniques. If a disciple chose to use a water-type cultivation technique as a foundation establishment, their chances of joining would be very slim. Standing beside Dugu Xin was the Golden Cloud Peak’s inner sect head elder. The two of them had a gold and a silver symbol on their lapels. The difference in status was very easy to see. It was also at this moment. The system’s success rate symbol appeared once again! [ host’s chance of becoming a personal disciple of Dugu Xin of golden firmament peak is 0% ! ] [ host’s chance of becoming an inner disciple of a managing elder of golden firmament peak is 0% ! ] Seeing this, Lin an frowned. A wave of Aura came from afar. Before long, the smell of alcohol came first. Then, a peerlessly beautiful woman appeared in the square. This was the peak master of Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi! At this point, all nine peak masters of Jiuxiao sect had arrived. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL There was no time to waste. The elders began to get busy. They began to stand in different positions. They waited for the disciples to start reporting their names, ages, cultivation bases, and cultivation techniques. The inner sect recruitment ceremony was like an auction. The general procedure was that after the outer sect disciples reported their information, they would then explain what their intentions were. And if the disciples’intentions were the same as the inner sect’s intentions...; They could instantly decide which inner sect forces their disciples would join! And if there were some unusual circumstances, such as meeting a genius student, the various main peaks would also offer superior conditions, using all sorts of methods to attract the disciples to change their minds. At this moment, a man walked up to the elders and reported his information. “Li Mubai! 17 years old! Dragon subduing inferno palm, human rank high-grade cultivation technique! Early Foundation Establishment Stage! His first wish is to join the inner sect of golden firmament peak!” After saying this, Li Mubai glanced at Xiao Muran and nodded. As Xiao Muran’s lackey, he naturally sought his boss’opinion. Xiao Muran had already mentioned this matter to the elders of golden firmament peak, so it was natural for Li Mubai to join golden firmament peak. Li Mubai’s talent was moderate, so the other god peaks weren’t interested in him. As for the foundation establishment technique, it was also a fire-type technique. Without anyone fighting for it, as long as the elders nodded, he could successfully join the inner sect. Soon, after Li Mubai accepted the ability test, he successfully joined Golden Firmament Peak. At this time. Xiao Muran proudly walked out of the crowd with a smile on his face. “Xiao Muran! 17 years old! Netherworld thousand hands, earth rank mid-grade cultivation technique! Mid-stage Foundation establishment! The first wish to join Golden Firmament Peak’s inner sect!” Hearing this, the disciples below the stage sucked in a breath of cold air. Earth rank mid-grade cultivation technique! mid-stage Foundation establishment! Both of these two items were unreachable to these people! If Xiao Muran was a disciple who had entered the sect for three years, then this wouldn’t be surprising at all. However, he had only entered the sect for one year! “The second son is extremely talented!” “Our golden firmament peak will definitely take this disciple!” The inner sect master and elder of Golden Firmament Peak commented. After saying that, the inner sect master glanced at Dugu Xin. It could be said that it was meaningful. Because golden firmament peak was the sect master’s disciple, and the inner sect master had made it so obvious. Because of this, the other peak masters also understood the ways of the world and did not come out to compete. Seeing that Xiao Muran had successfully joined the strongest Golden Cloud Peak. The group of female disciples below the stage looked at Xiao Muran affectionately, their eyes filled with admiration. If Xiao Muran was willing, these women would all be his! The inner sect assessment continued. Every time a disciple with good results appeared, there would be gasps of surprise. There wasn’t much to talk about. Lin An’s eyes swept past the elders one by one. A string of characters also appeared in his eyes. [ the success rate of the host becoming an inner disciple of the Crimson Nimbus Peak’s managing elder is 17% ! ] [ the success rate of the host becoming an inner disciple of the clear Nimbus Peak’s managing elder is 21% ! ] [ the success rate of the host becoming an inner disciple of the Purple Nimbus Peak’s managing elder is 13% ! ] ...; Seeing this scene, Lin An’s heart rippled. These factions were completely people from some factions, people who were trying to curry favor. Their taste was indeed not that good! And his face was expressionless. If he didn’t have an inner disciple of the main peak to join, even if he had to humbly beg to join one of the inner disciples. If he encountered such a situation, Lin an would choose to turn around and leave. If he didn’t stay here, he would have his own place to stay! He had the system, an existence that transcended everything, so why would he care about a force like the Nine Heavens Sect? It was just that he had just entered the immortal sect, so he was weak! Time passed. Each and every outer sect disciple had already found a corresponding force of the main peak. On the high platform, the atmosphere of the inner sect assessment was also high. Unknowingly, Lin an was the only outer sect disciple standing on the platform. He was alone. He was unusually eye-catching. The disciples below the platform surrounded Xiao Muran and were all looking at Lin an on the platform, waiting for him to make a fool of himself. Lin an clenched his fists. He no longer had any good feelings towards these forces. To him, rather than lowering his head under someone else’s roof, it was better to walk out on his own. Just as Lin an was thinking, the elder’s words interrupted him. The elder in charge of the outer sect paused for a moment and said loudly to Lin an, “State your name, age, cultivation level, and cultivation method!” “Lin an, 18 years old! Cultivation method, no beginning scripture, Middle Stage of foundation establishment! Intention, doesn’t matter.” Hearing Lin an’s reply, the crowd was first shocked! Then, the audience burst into laughter. Actually, the reason was very simple. Lin an had actually succeeded in building his foundation with the [ no beginning scripture ] . This was the most surprising thing. However, Lin An’s intention to join the inner sect next made people feel a little stunned. Lin an actually said that joining any main peak was so-so? For an outer sect disciple to be able to join the inner sect was already not bad. It was okay? Everyone instantly felt that this was very ridiculous! Therefore, this made people immediately change their attitudes without thinking and directly began to question Lin an! “What did I hear? This senior brother really doesn’t know how to Lie!” “Maybe! Since he’s going to be expelled from the sect today, why not do something outrageous to give everyone an impression! hahaha!” “That’s right, the scripture of no beginning is not suitable for cultivation at all. Foundation establishment? Lin an must be crazy!” The inner sect elders on the stage were all staring with their eyes wide open. It could be said that such a disciple had not appeared in a hundred years. He actually said that he had successfully used the scripture of no beginning in front of so many elders and had even reached the middle stage of foundation establishment! What was the scripture of no beginning? Not to mention the cultivators present, even the children on the streets in the city would know about it! This cultivation technique was too famous, but it was definitely derogatory! No one recognized the value of the scripture of no beginning! Moreover, he even said that it didn’t matter to the inner sect that he was about to join! Such a despicable disciple made all the elders begin to despise him. One by one, angry voices rang out on the field. “You’ve cultivated the Scripture of no beginning? And you’ve even succeeded in building your foundation, this is simply a fantasy! ! !” “How dare you rebel! You’re simply disrespecting your elders by saying such words! !” “Lin An, right? I feel that this arrogant attitude of yours is no longer suitable for cultivation!” All the elders on the stage started to scold loudly. The crowd below the stage instantly fell silent. Everyone knew that Lin an would soon be expelled from the sect! Such a situation! Even if a God came, it would be difficult to save him! Lin an smiled indifferently and jumped off the high platform. It seemed that today was the day he would leave the Jiuxiao sect! Because a string of characters had already appeared in his eyes. [ host’s success rate of becoming an inner disciple of the Crimson Sky Peak’s managing elder is 0% ! ] [ host’s success rate of becoming an inner disciple of the Azure Nimbus Peak’s managing elder is 0% ! ] [ host’s success rate of becoming an inner disciple of the Purple Nimbus Peak’s managing elder is 0% ! ] ...; In an instant. A total of eight messages flashed past his eyes! All the success rates of joining the inner sect instantly dropped to zero! “The nine Nimbus sect is only so-so. I merely said a single sentence of the truth!” No one could successfully cultivate the incipient sutra, but Lin an was different from the others. Lin An had always believed in his heart that as long as he handled it properly, with the help of the system’s success rate, it was not impossible to obtain a 100% success rate! This was the Jiuxiao sect? It was fine if he didn’t stay in such a sect! Just as he was about to leave, the aroma of wine filled the entire place. In the next moment. A stunning woman with waist-length hair and a perfect body was standing in front of Lin an barefoot. She was dressed neatly in silk and a wine gourd hung on her waist. All the filth on the ground couldn’t even get close to this woman. It was the peak master of Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi! It was also at this moment. Lin An’s eyes couldn’t leave this beautiful woman in front of him anymore. It wasn’t because of the woman’s appearance, but because at this moment, a string of success rate characters appeared in front of Lin An’s eyes! [ host’s success rate of becoming a personal disciple of Bi Xiao Peak’s Qian Yi is 100% ! ] [ host’s success rate of becoming a grade seven alchemist under Qian Yi’s guidance is 100% ! Success rate of becoming a grade eight alchemist is 94% ! Success rate of becoming a Supreme Grade Alchemist is 87% ! ] [ the success rate of becoming a tier 7 array master under Qian Yi’s tutelage is 100% ! The success rate of becoming a Tier 8 array master is 86% ! The success rate of becoming a pinnacle array master is 76% ! ] [ the success rate of becoming a tier 7 armament master under Qian Yi’s tutelage is 100% ! The success rate of becoming a Tier 8 armament master is 88% ! The success rate of becoming a pinnacle armament master is 84% ! ] [ the host’s success rate of obtaining all the resources of Green Cloud Peak is 100% ! ] [ the host’s success rate of becoming dao companions with Qian Yi is 80% ! ] Lin An was completely stunned when he saw this! Who exactly was this woman called Qian Yi? ! ! ! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL At this moment, it was as if the entire sky was filled with the fragrance of wine. It made one feel intoxicated. The woman in front of him was dressed in silk and silk, ethereal and otherworldly. She was so beautiful that it was impossible to describe. She was like an empress who had descended to the mortal world. The wine gourd hanging on her waist was actually a different kind of amorous feeling. At this moment, she was standing in front of Lin An, blocking his path. When this scene fell into Lin An’s eyes, he was instantly shocked. Now, he no longer had time to exclaim that this woman’s looks were extraordinary. Instead...; The string of success rate runes caused an endless wave of shock to rise in Lin An’s heart. This was enough to shock people! The peak master of Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi! Lin An’s success rate of becoming a personal disciple under her name was 100% ! What was even more terrifying was that Qian Yi had multiple identities as an alchemist, array master, and armament master. Moreover, the seventh rank was enough to be called a grandmaster! She was enough to be called a rare all-rounder in the Cangyun continent! Such a powerful woman actually appeared in such a small sect like the Jiuxiao sect. This made Lin an feel that it was somewhat inconceivable. Everything seemed extremely surreal! Ever since Qian Yi suddenly appeared here and stood in front of him, Lin An’s eyes had never left her! This woman brought all sorts of surprises. Without a doubt, if he could become a disciple under her name, Lin an could quickly become a powerhouse! What made Lin an even more confused was that the success rate of him and Qian Yi becoming dao companions was 80% ! This was a little unbelievable. According to common sense, in this world where strength reigned supreme, the difference in strength and status would prevent the two immortal cultivators from becoming Dao Companions. But now, the probability of him and this absolute-eyed woman becoming dao companions was actually so high. This couldn’t help but cause Lin an’s mind to run wild. At this moment. Seeing the sudden appearance of this beautiful woman, everyone instantly sucked in a breath of cold air. This woman’s beautiful appearance was truly rare! In everyone’s eyes, this was the first time they had seen such a peerless beauty. However, what was extremely incompatible with her overall temperament was the gourd that emitted a strong wine fragrance from her waist. At the same time, her bare feet were also spotless. Just as everyone was curious about who the newcomer was...; Just as Lin an was racking his brain to enter Qian Yi’s tutelage...; Qian Yi smiled. “What’s Your Name? Do you want to enter my tutelage?” As Qian Yi said this, everyone present was shocked! Could it be that this beautiful woman was here to take in a disciple? The people who were taking in disciples in the Jiuxiao sect were definitely the inner sect elders of the Jiuxiao sect, or the peak master. Along with the rumors among the disciples earlier on. It must be the peak master of Bixiao Peak who had not appeared for thousands of years! The fragrance of wine filled the air. Qian Yi stood proudly on the square barefoot and stretched out her jade-like hand to block Lin An’s path. If this person wasn’t the peak master of Bixiao Peak, who else could it be? The disciples who were still in shock started to come back to their senses and were immediately curious. Initially, all the inner disciples of God Peak did not accept Lin an and were only short of announcing that they were expelled from the sect. Furthermore, Lin an himself wanted to leave. Now, a beautiful immigrant woman suddenly appeared and said that she wanted to accept Lin an as her disciple. However. No one was envious of Lin An. In fact, they were even gloating in their hearts! Not to mention anything else, it was only because the peak master of Bixiao Peak was too infamous! In the past thousand years, she had never occupied a peak and had never taken in a single disciple. There was no one else in Bixiao peak other than the peak master! It could be said that the divine peak had lost! From the fragrance of the wine, it could be seen that Qian Yi was the legendary drunkard. Beneath her beautiful appearance, she had a terrible temper! What kind of bright future could bixiao peak have? At this moment. All the disciples had already calmed down the shock in their hearts and turned to gloat. However, no one actually dared to show it. No matter what, Qian Yi was still the peak master of Bixiao Peak and had a high status. Such a new disciple didn’t dare to show any disrespect at all. With the difference in status, no one was allowed to mock her on the surface! But in their hearts, it wasn’t the case. It was also at this moment. There were already other peak masters who came before the two of them. “Qian Yi, what brings you here? What a surprise! It seems like you’re here to take in a disciple?” “I see that your bixiao peak is overgrown with weeds. If there’s no one to take care of it, you really need a servant disciple!” “An inner disciple? Forget it!” Qian Yi’s gaze didn’t shift away from Lin An. She didn’t care about who it was at all. She only said indifferently, “I, Qian Yi, don’t need others to ask me about my work!” Qian Yi’s words had already left her mouth, and the way she looked at Lin an became unquestionable. Hearing this. The expressions of all the peak masters at the side instantly became ugly. This Woman’s hot temper hadn’t changed for so many years! All the peak masters shook their heads. Lin An was only at the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage, and there wasn’t any cultivation technique on him to build his foundation. Perhaps it was an unknown low-level cultivation technique. As a faction that was famous throughout the entire Jiuxiao sect. It was fine if he didn’t want such an dishonest disciple, but now the peak master of Bixiao Peak actually wanted to take in a disciple? All the peak masters instantly felt ashamed. It was also at this moment that the sect master of the Jiuxiao sect, Dugu Xin, appeared in front of them in an instant. “Qian Yi, are you sure you want to take this person in as a disciple?” Qian Yi didn’t reply to the sect master Dugu Xin’s words, and just like how she treated the other peak masters, she still didn’t turn her gaze away from Lin An’s face. “Of course! You haven’t answered my question yet.” Qian Yi smiled gently, looking extremely charming. She couldn’t hide her charm. From her point of view. There was a familiar aura in Lin an’s body. She had only seen this aura once in her life, but it had remained in Qian Yi’s heart forever. A thousand years ago, Qian Yi was only at the golden core stage. During one of the trials, she met a young girl who was also at the Golden Core Stage. However, she could not win even after a hundred battles! After that, Qian Yi became friends with that young girl. After a short period of traveling together, Qian Yi discovered something that she did not understand. That was, even though they were both in the aurous core stage, she had no chance of winning! Qian Yi could not find any reason to do so! This left a deep impression in Qian Yi’s heart, and it could even be said that it had been engraved in her heart. From then on. Qian Yi’s potential was completely unleashed, and her cultivation level rose without limit. There were already very few opponents now! And Qian Yi finally understood that it was that extremely unique aura within the young girl’s body that had directly crushed all opponents of the same cultivation level! And after many investigations and gathering information, Qian Yi had also confirmed the final source of this unique aura. That was the scripture of no beginning! That young lady didn’t know where she was right now. Was she alive or dead? If she was alive, what realm would she be at now? Until today, she once again felt that extremely familiar aura. It was on the body of this young man in front of her! Lin an had already deeply attracted her. She had to have this person! Therefore, Qian Yi had to take Lin an in as a disciple and use this to find out the secret of the scripture of no beginning in her future life. However, there was no doubt that Qian Yi had no ill intentions towards Lin An. She only wanted to know the truth. “The success rate of becoming Dao companions with her is 80% !” “The probability of her becoming my dao companion is 100% !” “The probability of becoming a great grandmaster is 100% !” The success rate given by the system was absolutely correct! Although he didn’t know why this beautiful woman chose her, it wouldn’t do him any harm! Lin an calmed down and looked at Qian Yi with certainty. A clean smile appeared on his face. “My Name Is Lin An. It’s not impossible for me to enter your sect, but I’m not interested in miscellaneous disciples!” 2 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Hearing Lin An’s words. The scene was filled with shock. No one could understand why an outer sect disciple who was about to be expelled from the sect was about to disappear from the cultivation world. Now, he actually had the intention to negotiate conditions? In the Jiuxiao sect, being a part-time disciple was completely acceptable to a person with average talent! At the very least, he hadn’t left the Jiuxiao sect. Perhaps he would still have the opportunity to cultivate in the future. Now, Lin an actually still wanted to negotiate terms? Was he worthy? However, even though the disciples below the stage started to feel disdain in their hearts and thought that Lin an was arrogant and conceited, no one dared to show it. As the other peak masters of the Jiuxiao sect, even though they didn’t know why such a situation would occur, they could definitely step forward if they had any dissatisfaction. After all, their status was there! “A peak master who never accepts disciples, an outer sect disciple that the sect wants, Hehe...;” At this moment, a burst of aura erupted from Qian Yi’s body, and a terrifying aura was released in an instant, immediately interrupting the peak master’s words. Seeing this woman’s attitude, the peak master also wanted to say something, but he hesitated and didn’t continue. Qian Yi looked over with an ice-cold gaze. “I’ll say it one more time. No one else needs to get their hands on My Bixiao Peak!” In the next instant, the aura turned into nothingness and dissipated. Everyone present seemed to heave a sigh of relief. This Woman’s aura was too terrifying! After the aura dissipated, Qian Yi regained her calm once again. Her gaze towards Lin an also became a little meaningful. “Tell me what you want.” Lin an smiled and said, “I want to become your personal disciple. I want to eat and live with you and be taught by you personally. I have the right to mobilize all the resources of Bixiao Peak!” Because of the success rate given by the system, the probability of Qian Yi accepting him as her personal disciple was 100% ! Lin An had nothing to fear at this moment! Whoosh! As soon as these words were said, the entire place fell silent. The air seemed to have frozen, and time seemed to have stopped at this moment! What was going on with this lin an? This was completely an expression of ignorance! For a person with Lin An’s aptitude to come to a place like this, a part-time disciple was already not bad, but an inner sect disciple was already considered to have reached the heavens! And now, he, Lin An, actually said that he wanted to become bi Xiao Peak’s Qian Yi’s personal disciple! What was a personal disciple? In order for a disciple to grow as quickly as possible, as the teacher of a personal disciple, he had to put in all his effort to nurture him. It wouldn’t be an exaggeration to say that he wanted to eat and live together under the same roof. It was one thing to eat and live together, but Lin an actually wanted to mobilize all the cultivation resources of Bi Xiao Peak. Who did he think he was! ! ! He was just an outer sect disciple who was about to be expelled from the sect! To put it bluntly, Lin an was a piece of trash that the sect did not recognize! “How dare you! ! !” At this time, the peak master of Crimson Sky Peak was so angry that he was about to explode. Even his beard was about to blow up. He did not stop and started to complain loudly. His voice was like thunder as it rang out on the scene. “A master who has never accepted a disciple! An outer sect disciple who has never accepted a master! What kind of place does he think our nine clouds peak is! ! !” After the peak master of Crimson Sky Peak finished speaking, his expression instantly became ugly. The Lin an in front of him was just a trash that no one wanted! He still wants to negotiate conditions in my nine clouds sect? Even if a peerless genius came to the nine clouds sect, he still had to know the rules! At this moment, a sharp sword qi was emitted from Qian Yi’s body. The peak master who was thinking of speaking rushed over. The peak master of Crimson Sky Peak reacted and immediately clenched his fists. He crossed his hands in front of his chest and immediately began to defend himself. Even so, under the powerful sword Qi, the peak master of Crimson Sky Peak was still forced back more than ten steps before he finally stopped. The peak master of Crimson Sky Peak said angrily, “You...; !” Just when everyone thought that the peak master of Crimson Sky Peak was fine and was about to fly into a rage...; Suddenly, a trace of blood flowed out from the corner of the peak master’s mouth! The words that he was about to say were forcefully cut off Qian Yi picked up the wine gourd by her waist and gulped down a mouthful of strong wine. Looking at all the peak masters present, her gaze also became cold. This cold gaze made one have no choice but to believe that this bi Xiao Peak master, Qian Yi, was serious! The peak master of Crimson Sky Peak did not dare to speak anymore. This woman’s actions were too overbearing and completely unreasonable. In addition, her strength was bottomless. Even the sect master of nine clouds sect could not do anything to her! “HMPH!” The peak master of Crimson Sky Peak wiped the blood from the corner of her mouth and snorted coldly before saying nothing more. Seeing this scene. The other peak masters who wanted to stop him also stopped in their tracks and immediately admitted defeat. Meanwhile, the disciples on the scene were filled with fear and didn’t even dare to breathe loudly! This Peak Master of Green Sky Peak was actually able to injure the other peak master and even make him swallow his anger. Just what kind of strength did he have? Without paying attention to the others, Qian Yi took a few steps forward and arrived in front of Lin An. At this moment, the two of them were at most one step away! Qian Yi did not restrain her cold killing intent. She leaned her head slightly closer to Lin An, and even her smile became strange. “Do you think I will accept you as my personal disciple?” Seeing that this peerlessly beautiful face was so close to him that even her breathing could be heard, and a wave of fragrance passed by, Lin an felt a wave of intoxication in his heart. This woman was naturally charming! Even her aura could make people lose their minds. Lin an calmed himself down and returned to his senses. He shrugged his shoulders indifferently. “You will!” Soon. Qian Yi used her jade finger to scratch Lin an’s high nose. A gentle voice was heard. “Little guy, I like you very much. I agree to all the conditions you mentioned!” Lin An didn’t argue and immediately expressed his gratitude. “Yes! Your Disciple’s name is Lin An. Thank you, master, for helping me!” The scene that appeared now. Exceeded everyone’s understanding. One was the peak master of Bixiao Peak who guarded the thousand-year-old divine peak alone, while the other was an outer sect disciple who was about to be expelled from the sect. Now, the two of them actually became master and disciple! Moreover, the peak master of Bixiao Peak didn’t hesitate at all about all of Lin An’s conditions. Lin an became Qian Yi’s only personal disciple! This result was something that no one present had expected. It was completely beyond their understanding! There was no reason. It was established just like that! “Qian Yi, you’re looking down on the sect! You’re messing around! ! ! !” At this moment, the peak master of Zixiao Peak couldn’t take it anymore and immediately started to question and scold loudly! “Right, that’s right. Even if you want to take in disciples, you have to get the approval of the sect!” “I absolutely won’t allow Lin an to exist in the nine clouds sect!” The few peak masters at the scene gathered together and their arrogance instantly soared. They even seemed to be on the verge of becoming more and more aggressive. Meanwhile, the peak master of Red Clouds Peak had already secretly hidden to one side. Qian Yi had just released that sword Qi. Even though she had used all her strength to defend, she was still forced back more than ten meters. She was completely aware of her own body’s condition. Although she wouldn’t be seriously injured, a casual sword qi could injure her. What kind of method was this! This woman was definitely not someone she could afford to provoke. She was quick-witted and quickly moved away from this troublesome place. As expected. In just an instant. An even more powerful sword qi was slashed out by Qian Yi with a wave of her hand. It was even sharper than the previous sword Qi! It was even more overbearing than the previous sword qi! At this moment, cold sweat dripped down the foreheads of the peak masters who were speaking. A wave of death aura came over, and everyone felt their hearts turn cold. This woman really wanted to kill someone! It was also at this moment. Suddenly, another aura came out from the main peak. The two auras collided between Qian Yi and the group of peak masters and instantly exploded. In just an instant, huge waves were stirred up on the scene! Immediately after. A voice came from afar, “Qian Yi! Enough!” After hearing this voice, Qian Yi revealed a disdainful look and snorted lightly, “This old fart is really meddling in other people’s business!” Qian Yi’s complaints were clearly heard by Lin an beside her. This made him unable to help but take care of this overbearing little woman. After muttering. Qian Yi didn’t hesitate anymore. She grabbed Lin an’s hand and the two of them flew away. Only the stunned crowd was left behind. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Looking at the figures of the two people floating away. The pressure also gradually dissipated. Everyone in the square immediately felt a little more relaxed and finally let out a sigh of relief. Qian Yi gave people a feeling that she was too overbearing! With her presence, everyone’s arrogance was instantly extinguished! When everyone saw her figure disappear and the scene fell silent for a moment, the people on the stage finally had the courage to start discussing. The people below the stage looked at each other. Chattering voices could be heard. There were too many questions in everyone’s hearts, and they had to spit them out. “Is this the peak master of Bixiao Peak? Just where did she come from? Such a person simply doesn’t fit in with Jiuxiao sect!” “This peak master is really too powerful. It seems that the other peak masters don’t dare to provoke her! Could it be that I chose the wrong sect?” “How could I have chosen the wrong sect? Even if the peak master of Bixiao Peak is very strong, as a disciple, I would definitely not choose Bixiao Peak!” “She has never appeared on normal days. Today, she suddenly came here and conveniently took in a personal disciple?” “Also, I didn’t expect that there was a peerless mighty figure hidden in our Jiuxiao sect. He was able to disperse Qian Yi’s sword Qi with an aura from so far away. He must be at the Void Training Stage!” “That’s right, he should be an old monster who has secluded himself from the world!” At this moment. All the disciples present couldn’t leave. No one had expected this. Today’s inner sect disciple assessment had such a situation! In the previous inner sect assessment, there hadn’t been such a situation like today for hundreds of years. All of this was because of the appearance of those two people! Lin An and Qian Yi! The various peak masters were also stunned. The scene from before was still lingering in their minds. The Sword Qi was swung out from Qian Yi’s hand. That instant’s aura made them feel the aura of death. If Grand Elder, who was in seclusion at the main peak, had not made a move, they might have died here. After all, an expert’s perception of danger was extremely strong. If they made a move, they definitely would not be able to block that sword qi! At this moment, the peak masters on the field felt as if they had just passed through the gates of hell! While their hearts were palpitating, the peak masters also rejoiced. They looked at each other and smiled bitterly. “Fortunately, Grand Elder made a move. However, everything is fine now.” “That Madman Qian Yi suddenly made a move on us. There has never been any respect in her eyes. After all, we are the peak masters!” “Don’t provoke this crazy woman in the future. She doesn’t have any qualms about doing things!” “That’s right, she’s definitely a lunatic!” However, while they were talking, they felt a surge of emotions in their bodies at the same time. Immediately after, a tingling pain spread throughout their bodies. They stood on the spot and instantly started to Twitch. A chill spread through their bodies, and their foreheads were covered with fine beads of sweat. In an instant. These peak masters shouted at the same time and spat out a large mouthful of blood! In an instant, their bodies seemed to have lost the support of their spiritual power, and they began to sway unconsciously. If it weren’t for the several hundred years of cultivation, if it were an ordinary inner and outer sect elder, they would definitely have collapsed and fainted at this time. And as peak masters, under the gaze of everyone present, they spat out blood, and they couldn’t even stand steadily. Such a thing was simply driving them crazy! This was undoubtedly a shameful matter! The faces of the peak masters immediately flushed red, and their emotions quickly collapsed. A sense of humiliation filled their hearts. And the changes that occurred at the scene caused all the disciples to be greatly alarmed. They originally thought that the matter would be over once the sword Qi was blocked by the mysterious aura. Now, even if the sword Qi was blocked, the aftershocks of the Sword Qi had also shaken the group of peak masters until they spat out blood. They had actually suffered internal injuries! Just how powerful was this strength to be able to achieve such a degree? Could it be that Bixiao Peak was the strongest existence in the Jiuxiao sect? Or was it just because the peak master of Bixiao Peak was a madman who had no scruples? The peak master of Zixiao Peak wiped off the remaining blood on his mouth. His eyes revealed a fierce expression as he muttered, “In ten days, there will be a competition between inner sect disciples! On the battle stage, I will definitely make Qian Yi lose all her face!” “Today’s humiliation will be washed away with the results of teaching disciples!” “Qian Yi has never taught a disciple before. Moreover, Lin an is a piece of trash that no one wants. What kind of results can such a disciple achieve with such a Master!” “That’s right. When the time comes, we will target her together and make sure that she will never be able to leave the stage!” After the peak masters adjusted themselves, they looked at each other and smiled. It was as if they had already seen the day that Qian Yi and Lin an would fail. After an inner sect disciple entered the sect, they would have ten days of focused cultivation time. During this time, the Master could activate the talent in the disciple’s body according to the actual situation of the disciple and then determine the path of cultivation in the future. And after ten days, the Jiuxiao sect would organize another assessment. However, this time, it was no longer to let the disciple stay in the inner sect. Instead, it was to tilt the resources in the sect according to the actual results of the competition. This was because cultivating an outstanding disciple required too many resources. Only a talented disciple was worthy of receiving more resources! And for the inner sect of the Divine Peak, the benefit of an outstanding disciple was to receive the entire sect’s tilt in resources. Just like the genius Lu Bixiu who became a personal disciple a few years ago, because his performance in the inner sect competition was too amazing. After that, Lu Bixiu alone received 10% of the sect’s resources! One had to know that there were at least a few thousand people in the entire sect. And Lu Bixiu alone took 10% ! This was enough to prove the strength of others, and also to prove that in the sect, true geniuses were the focus of attention. Therefore, the more outstanding a disciple was, the more they would be fought over between the main peaks! Everything was for the sake of long-term development! And now. A already down and out Bixiao Peak, coupled with a peak master Qian Yi who had no teaching results, and a useless disciple that all the other divine peaks didn’t need. This kind of arrangement had offended almost all the peak masters today. The inner sect competition became a target. As long as they came to the inner sect competition stage, Bixiao Peak would be targeted by all the main peaks, and Lin an would be surrounded and attacked by other disciples. The final result was that Bixiao Peak would not get a single cent of the resources, and they would even be liquidated for dragging down the sect. “All Disciples, listen up. In ten days, the inner sect competition of the sect will be held!” “This will be a real battle, and it will be the sect’s first test before you enter the inner sect!” “In the next ten days, your teacher will begin targeted cultivation. You must seize this opportunity and speed up your cultivation. At that time, fight for your sect!” An elder who was in charge of the outer sect announced. The peak masters of the main peaks on the stage all looked at the group of disciples. There was no expression on their faces, but there was a stern look in their eyes. The meaning was too obvious. When the disciples present saw the look in their peak masters’eyes, they understood what they were going to do in ten days! Today, their peak masters had lost face in front of everyone. In ten days, they would definitely earn back what they had earned. All the reasons were on Green Cloud Peak. As long as he seized the opportunity to attack Green Cloud Peak, he would be able to gain the attention of the peak master. Then, on his path of cultivation, he would be able to tie up the Great Tree of the peak master and ascend to the heavens in one go! And everyone’s target was Lin an! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Jiuxiao sect, Bixiao Peak, inside the thatched cottage. Lin An sat on a chair, his curious eyes constantly sizing up his surroundings. This was a thatched cottage made of bamboo. There were bamboo-made appliances everywhere, from tables, chairs, benches, and even teacups. They were all made of bamboo. The light-colored chiffon was gently blown up by the breeze, and the fragrance of bamboo could be felt everywhere. The clothes of the colorful women were casually placed on the bamboo bed at the side. Everything was very natural and didn’t seem messy. At the same time, even though the windows were open everywhere in the thatched cottage, and the air circulated frequently. However, the pleasant smell couldn’t be blown away, and waves of fragrance entered Lin an’s nostrils. Lin an knew clearly in his heart that this was a special fragrance that only belonged to women. This was the only building on Bixiao Peak. It was so simple that there wasn’t even a hall. The bed and chairs were all in an empty room. Naturally, this could be considered Qian Yi’s boudoir. A woman had lived here for too long, and her scent was everywhere in the air. Seeing this scene, and based on the rumors from before,. Lin an could guess that he was the first man to come here, as the leader of a peak, his residence was so simple. This made Lin an a little surprised. The rumors must be true. On Bixiao Peak, only Qian Yi lived here. Before this, Lin an thought that there would be a grand hall like the one on Jinxiao Peak. However, after flying all the way here, he didn’t see anyone else on Green Cloud Peak. It was full of weeds. It was likely that the almighty aura that stopped his master was on another main peak. The nine cloud sect still had a certain foundation. Seeing Lin an’s curious expression. Qian Yi already knew what Lin an was thinking. She wanted to answer Lin An’s question first. “From now on, you are my direct disciple. If you have any questions, you can ask me anytime!” Lin An was deep in thought. What was Qian Yi’s motive for taking in a disciple? Who was the almighty who had just attacked? According to his understanding of Qian Yi, his master’s strength had long surpassed that of the peak masters. There was only one reason, and that was the abnormal phenomenon brought about by the no beginning scripture. Master knew that it was me! Just as Lin an was deep in thought, a string of characters appeared once again. [ ask Qian Yi about her motivation to take in a disciple. The probability of Qian Yi giving a true answer is 100% ! ] Seeing this success rate, Lin an completely believed that this powerful woman in front of him had no ill intentions towards him. To be able to give a 100% true answer to his question already showed that Qian Yi had no ill intentions. Since that was the case, there was no need to ask anymore. There was no need to probe anymore! At this moment, Qian Yi smiled and directly said to Lin an, “The one who attacked just now was an old man at the Mahayana stage. His cultivation level was indeed a little lacking.” Hearing Qian Yi’s words, Lin an was certain that his master was not simple, but she did not care about powerhouses at the Mahayana stage at all. Immediately, she blurted out, “Still lacking at the Mahayana stage? Then Master...;” Qian yi raised her hand, “Do you really think that after breaking through to the Mahayana stage, you’ll become an immortal emperor?” Speaking up to this point, Qian Yi smiled sweetly. Then, she didn’t continue this topic. Seeing that her master had skipped this topic, she didn’t have any intention of continuing. Lin An didn’t ask anymore. At this moment, Qian Yi Ruo looked at Lin an and said, “The inner sect competition is in ten days. I request that you ride the dust!” “Yes!”Lin an nodded. It was as if all of this was a small matter. Seeing this scene, Qian Yiruo also smiled slightly. “Then master, where should I Live?” Lin an asked a little embarrassedly. This was obviously Qian Yiruo’s residence. The bed in the distance was still emitting her unique body fragrance. Although they might become dao companions in the future, it was obviously not the time to live together now. And if they lived together and couldn’t do anything, wouldn’t it be suffocating? ! So, where would lin an live in the future? Seeing Lin an’s expression, Qian Yi already knew what Lin an was thinking. Lin An was only a young man in his twenties who was full of vigor and vitality. It seemed that this was also the first time he had come to a room where a woman lived. It was normal for his heart to throb a little. Although Qian Yi was already over a thousand years old, in this world, as long as one’s cultivation level was raised to the corresponding realm, one’s lifespan could be said to be endless. As for the problem of the deterioration of one’s appearance, it didn’t exist at all. Therefore, from the beginning to the end, Qian Yi maintained her 25-year-old appearance. This was the state that she was most satisfied with! As a woman who had already cultivated to the dao, Qian Yi was in a relaxed state regarding everything. However, Lin an in front of her was the first man to enter her room. Without a doubt, this caused her thoughts to waver. Instantly, a thought appeared in her mind. Since Lin an had already become her personal disciple, she would naturally put in all her effort to nurture him. And in her future life, she would inevitably have contact with Lin An. Now, it was better to train his temperament! Qian yi smiled gently, “You are my personal disciple. Master will participate in all your matters. From now on, you will live in this house!” Hearing this, Lin An’s face instantly turned red. “Wait...; Master is saying that we will live together? In the same room?” “Of course, since we are personal disciples, master will naturally eat and live with you!” Seeing Lin an’s red face, Qian Yi confirmed that this disciple of hers also had a shy side. Immediately, she revealed a curious expression, “Why? You Don’t want to?” “AH, isn’t this a little too fast?” Before this, Lin an had already obtained the success rate given by the system. In the future, this master of his had an 80% chance of being a dao partner with him! This probability was already very high! Therefore, in Lin An’s subconscious mind, he already regarded Qian Yi as his future dao partner. What Lin an didn’t expect was that. Qian Yi was so anxious now. This progress was too fast! “Could it be that master wants to sleep with me today?” “She took me in as her personal disciple just for the sake of coveting my body?” But thinking back, there was nothing to reject! Master was so beautiful. Just looking at her made one’s imagination run wild! At this moment. Lin An’s face was so red that it reached his neck! Seeing Lin an’s expression, Qian Yi couldn’t help but laugh. It seemed that this disciple’s temperament towards women was still a little lacking. Her choice was the right one, and he was already starting to fantasize about her. Following that, Qian Yi smiled charmingly and raised her hand. A bamboo bed appeared beside the bed she was sleeping on. A bamboo pole and a thin gauze passed through, and the two beds were quickly separated. “HMM, I think the current situation is not bad!” “You’re cultivating here now, I’ll wait for you to ride the dust during the competition!”! “I’ll Go Out Now!” After saying that, he left. Lin an looked at the piece of gauze. What was the difference between this and air! What was this master of his thinking! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL A moment later. Lin An was already meditating on his bed, and his mind couldn’t help but feel a little sluggish. After all, Qian Yi’s bed was just a veil away. The female clothing on it was filled with the scent of the opposite sex, and he could clearly see it. Moreover, this was his master’s bed, and Lin an had cultivated the scripture of no beginning. His five senses had reached a certain level, and the fragrance of a woman was even more obvious! It was inevitable that Lin an couldn’t help but let his imagination run wild. At this moment, a string of characters appeared in front of Lin an again. [ Qian Yi is a virgin, the host’s success rate for sleeping on this bed is currently 0% ! ] Looking at the success rate here. Lin An was momentarily stunned again! Didn’t they say that there was an 80% success rate for dual cultivation between Dao Partners? Why did the current success rate become 0% ! Did I miss out on something? Could it be. This was a test given to me by my master? In an instant, an epiphany appeared in Lin An’s heart. It must be so! If he didn’t have this system, if he rashly attacked my master, it would be a huge mistake! However, as long as he took a look at it every day in the future, when the success rate reached 100% , it would be the time to get into this bed! His desire to conquer his master seemed to be even stronger! After thinking it through. Lin an revealed a smile. Then, Lin an stopped thinking about it. His heart immediately sank and he began to meditate and cultivate. Not long after, Lin An’s consciousness began to sink into his mind. A wave of spiritual energy began to gather around Lin an’s body and was slowly absorbed. Previously, in the square, although Lin an had already checked his body’s condition, he was afraid of causing any changes, so he only dabbled in the surface. After reaching the foundation establishment stage, he hadn’t used the heaven-revolving scripture. Now, Lin an was completely immersed in it. Very quickly, a wave of warmth came from his abdomen. At his dantian. A whirlpool was forming. It was like an entire galaxy, circulating in the universe within his body. In the middle of the whirlpool, there was a little golden man standing in the middle. At a glance, upon careful inspection, this little golden man looked exactly the same as Lin An. Even the mole on its cheek did not change in position. And this little golden man stood in the middle of the whirlpool, as if it was watching the wind and clouds flow. As the whirlpool spun, countless spiritual energy turned into starlight spots, gathered together, and condensed into water droplets. The little golden man bathed under the water droplets condensed from spiritual energy. It was as if it was being drenched in a rain of spiritual energy! As the drizzle fell, the golden light emitted by the little gold statue became even more obvious after it absorbed the spiritual energy. In other words, as long as Lin an circulated the minor heavenly cycle, a rain of spiritual energy would form between his dantian. The little gold statue would become more and more substantial, and his strength would also become stronger and stronger! 150 Li southeast of Bixiao Peak. Qian Yi stood in front of a grave, holding a wine gourd in her hand. She poured three circles on the gravestone. This was a barren grave. A stone tablet had been standing there for many years and had been eroded by wind and rain. There was no name or written information on the gravestone. The surroundings of this barren grave were all barren, and this was the only grave that had been cleaned up. Presumably, Qian Yi would often come over to take care of it. This was the previous peak master of Bixiao Peak. A thousand years ago, she had once saved Qian Yi’s life here. In the end, because of this, she died here. After that, Qian Yi inherited Bixiao Peak and became the peak master of Bixiao Peak. During this period, she imagined that Bixiao Peak would flourish. However, Qian Yi was originally not a person from this small world. Because of her gratitude, she chose to stay in the Jiuxiao sect. Most of the disciples here had average talent and were not as good as Qian Yi. Because of this, ever since she was sealed, Qian Yi had never recruited any disciples. Lin An was the first! Moreover, because of the restrictions, it seemed impossible to return to Qian Yi’s hometown. Because of this, Qian Yi did not choose to leave the Jiuxiao sect. She was drunk every day. With a raise of her hand. The wine from the wine gourd poured into Qian Yi’s mouth...; ...; Time passed and it was already evening. The night fell quietly. In the Bamboo House, Lin an had already completed 100 small cycles. This was also the upper limit of his training for the day. He stood up and relaxed a little. At this time, Qian Yi’s face was red. She pushed the door open and staggered in. She was already drunk. The old wine gourd hanging on her waist seemed to have lost its weight. For cultivators, refining alcohol was the most normal thing. In terms of alcohol tolerance, it was a thousand times better than getting drunk. The reason why Qian Yi could get drunk was because she didn’t use her cultivation to refine alcohol. Secondly, there was another reason. The alcohol she brewed was a thousand times stronger than the usual alcohol! This was something that she enjoyed alone. And the wine gourd on her waist had something else going on inside it! The wine contained far more than what was on the surface! At this moment, Lin an immediately went over to support Qian Yi who was already drunk. A soft voice sounded, “Master, you’re drunk!” Seeing Lin an, Qian Yi didn’t realize that she had accepted a disciple today. Then, she looked at the five baht herb in her hand and remembered that she still had something that she hadn’t dealt with today. That was to refine pills for her disciple, Lin An, to help him cultivate faster. Qian Yi was already a little more sober and could already distinguish between black and white. This time, it wasn’t a big deal if she didn’t experience the drunken incident that she had experienced countless times before. The only difference was that. This time, someone was supporting her! No matter how drunk Qian Yi was, she didn’t need someone to support her. The reason why she didn’t refuse was because of Lin An’s concern. A warm feeling instantly entered her heart and made her freeze on the spot. This kind of experience had never happened in the past thousand years! At this moment, Lin an’s voice sounded again. “Master, let me help you to bed to rest!” To Lin an, he wasn’t surprised that a cultivator was drunk. So, what he needed to do now was to send his master to bed to rest. Qian Yi stood unsteadily on the spot. The feeling of being cared for made her feel wonderful. She wanted to continue on. If Lin an could continue to care for her like this in the future, then she would give up the last bit of sobriety and get completely drunk! At this moment, Qian Yi already had her own plans in her mind amidst her confused footsteps. Did Lin an really care about her? Or was it because she was his master? Or was it just a pretense. Qian Yi didn’t think that a system like Lin an could distinguish many things. When they were in the square, Qian Yi had already observed Lin An. However, people who cultivated the no beginning Scripture wouldn’t let others see through them easily. After that, in Qian Yi’s impression, Lin an wasn’t a bad person. As she was thinking, Qian Yi’s bare feet trembled and she fell down. And...; Very soon. Lin an reacted and instantly hugged her. Only then could his master not fall down. Meanwhile, Qian Yi very naturally fell into Lin An’s arms. She didn’t refuse. Qian Qian’s arms had already wrapped around Lin An’s neck and she let out a light snort. Looking at his master getting so drunk, Lin fan shook his head helplessly. “What kind of wine can make you get so drunk?” “Isn’t it supposed to be taken care of by Master? Since when is it my turn to take care of Master?” Without hesitation, Lin an immediately adjusted his position to make her feel more comfortable in his arms. Step by step, he walked towards Qian Yi’s bedside. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin an carried Qian Yi to the bedside. He gently placed Qian Yi on the bed. Turning his head to look at Qian Yi’s close-fitting clothes, lin an muttered helplessly, “Why didn’t you tidy up my clothes? What kind of master did I end up with?” After muttering to himself. Lin an picked up Qian Yi’s underwear, folded it, and placed it on the side of the bed. Then, he lay down on his bed. Looking at the bamboo strips on the roof, Lin an instantly fell silent. He had completed the 100 small cycles of the scripture of no beginning today. Even if he stopped cultivating now, the spiritual energy vortex in his Dantian was still spinning, and the spiritual energy rain was still pouring down in his body. In other words, as long as he circulated the minor cycles, the little gold figurine in his dantian would continue to cultivate. It wouldn’t be long before he would be facing a breakthrough! Upon discovering this, Lin an was pleasantly surprised! Now that he was at the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage, he could definitely try to break through to the late stage of the foundation establishment stage within ten days! When that time came, it would be the inner sect competition, and there would be an extra layer of assurance. Everything was within his grasp! Because he had just completed his foundation establishment today, coupled with the fact that he had cultivated 100 small cycles, Lin An’s mental strength had already been exhausted, and he urgently needed to rest. Not long after, Lin an completely fell into a deep sleep. ...; It was ten in the middle of the night. Everything fell silent. In the bamboo forest, only the sound of the stream could be heard. After Qian Yi was drunk, she woke up from a deep sleep. This time, she slept very soundly and didn’t lose any sleep because of Lin An. A veil away, Qian Yi saw that Lin an was sleeping soundly. He looked very cute. “This silly kid is too much. He didn’t even take advantage of me. Isn’t he beautiful?” “Then I’ll let you off easy this time. Who asked you to be my first disciple!” Although she said that, Qian Yi wasn’t someone who would lose her mind. If Lin an wanted to take advantage of her while she was drunk, he would definitely be punished. Fortunately, Lin an didn’t make any unnecessary movements after he put her on the bed. However, his personal clothes were held in this kid’s hand, repeatedly teased, and even folded neatly. This made Qian Yi laugh in her heart. Immediately, with a wave of Qian Yi’s hand, these undergarments were kept into her storage ring. Rings with spatial abilities like these were not rare in the Cang Yun continent. The reason why she didn’t keep her undergarments properly was entirely due to Qian Yi’s carelessness. She really didn’t expect to pick up a disciple who had cultivated the scripture of no beginnings! He pulled away the veil. Lin An’s face was completely exposed in front of Qian Yi. He was currently sleeping soundly. Very soon. Qian Yi pulled away Lin an’s blanket and then peeled off his clothes. Lin An’s abdomen was completely exposed in front of Qian Yi. Qian Yi carefully examined it, deep in thought. At this moment, Lin an was in a deep sleep due to the exhaustion of his spiritual power. He didn’t notice anything that his master had done. A moment later. Qian Yi’s jade-like hand pressed on Lin an’s lower abdomen. Instantly, the temperature of Lin an’s abdomen was transmitted into Qian Yi’s palm. This made her blush instantly. She didn’t expect that the first time she was intimate with a man was actually her disciple. Very quickly, Qian Yi mobilized the spiritual energy in her body and transmitted it to Lin an’s dantian through her palm. In Lin An’s sleep. As Qian Yi transferred her spiritual energy, Lin an felt a warm current slowly flowing into his body. It made him feel very comfortable and he seemed to sleep even deeper. This feeling was as if he was bathed in sunlight, and the warm feeling instantly spread throughout his entire body. The vortex of spiritual energy in the Dantian in his stomach spun even faster. A light breeze and drizzle blew, and the little gold figurine also became more solid. Qian Yi’s consciousness entered and soon arrived at Lin An’s Dantian. She only saw. The huge vortex floating in Lin An’s Dantian. It had to be said that the foundation establishment vortex of a person who cultivated the no beginning scripture was much larger than that of an ordinary foundation establishment cultivator. Just like Qian Yi herself, because of her constitution. When she reached the foundation establishment stage a thousand years ago, she was several times larger than an ordinary cultivator! The cyclone in Lin An’s body was five times larger than his own! He had a life-level divine body! In this world, there were all kinds of special divine bodies! Those who could possess a divine body were favored by the heavens. Just like Qian Yi’s life-level divine body, it was ranked in the top five among all divine bodies! There were many benefits to a divine body, and one of the benefits of a life-level divine body was dual cultivation. And the so-called dual cultivation of a life-level divine body was not the type of cultivation where a man and woman could obtain new power through merging. Instead, it was the dual cultivation of a life-level divine body and the spiritual power of another person. In other words, as long as Qian Yi and Lin An’s spiritual power were merged. After that, as long as Lin an obtained spiritual power or Qian Yi obtained spiritual power, the other party would be able to enjoy a portion of the new spiritual power of the other person and would not lose their own spiritual power! This was basically a win-win divine physique. It was a pity that after so many years, Qian Yi had not found a single person she liked. She was not willing to allow others to touch her, even if it was just spiritual power! She did not expect that this disciple of hers would benefit from this. Otherwise, Qian Yi would only be much stronger than she was now! “On account of you taking care of me today, I’ll let you off easy today!” As Qian Yi poured in a large amount of spiritual energy, the spiritual energy of the two of them instantly fused together and revolved along with the spiritual energy vortex in Lin An’s body until they merged into one. Very soon, after the vortex had gathered, it turned into waves of light spots and revolved around the little gold figurine. Not long after, Qian Yi’s forehead was covered with fine sweat. The vortex in Lin An’s body accelerated and even began to absorb Qian Yi’s spiritual energy. At this point, she didn’t plan to continue. Her disciple’s physique was mediocre, but because she had successfully cultivated the non-beginnings scripture, the spiritual power vortex in her body was more than five times bigger than when she was at the life-level Divine Body Foundation establishment stage. The amount of spiritual power required was too much. It could be described as a huge amount! This was like a wooden bucket. If the bucket was big enough, it could hold even more water! The legendary ancient cultivation method of the non-beginnings scripture was indeed extraordinary! At this moment, Qian Yi had to admit that as long as Lin an could continue to use the [ Wu Shi scripture ] to break through, his future achievements would be limitless! Perhaps she would be able to gain some benefits from her disciple! After she stopped. Qian Yi helped Lin an cover himself with the blanket and left the bamboo house. “Next, let’s prepare the pills that my disciple will be cultivating!” “I haven’t refined pills for hundreds of years, I wonder if I’m Rusty...;” What she didn’t know was that the little golden figure in Lin An’s body opened its eyes after she left...; <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The next day. The sun shone brightly. Lin an rubbed his sleepy eyes, sat up, and stretched lazily. This night was simply too wonderful! Ever since he could remember, he had never slept as comfortably as he did last night. It was like having a beautiful dream that made one not want to wake up. Lin an turned his head to look at his master. He realized that his master had already woken up and was nowhere to be found. Moreover, his master’s blanket had already been folded properly. “The lazy master who didn’t even want to keep his clothes seems to care about his image now?” At this moment. Another string of characters appeared in Lin An’s eyes. This shocked him. He had never expected that his first thought after waking up would actually be when he would sleep on his master’s bed! For a moment. Lin an felt a little embarrassed facing the empty bed. No matter how he put it, it was possible that his master was too beautiful. Unconsciously, he had already made sleeping on his master’s bed his top priority when he woke up! It was just that. This time, the symbol in his eyes had a slight change. [ Qian Yi is still a virgin today. Host’s success rate of sleeping on this bed is currently 5% ! ] HMM, this...; ? What the hell is going on? How did the success rate increase by 5% overnight? ! This result was definitely a little out of Lin An’s expectations! Lin an didn’t know that Qian Yi had gotten up last night to channel her spiritual power for him. At the same time, he also didn’t know why his master would lose this 5% reserve. Everything had exceeded his expectations! Actually, it was entirely because Lin an had taken care of Qian Yi last night that she had developed a good impression of him. Because of this, Lin fan’s bed was 5% closer to his master’s! There was no other reason! When he stood up, Lin an realized that his clothes had been untied. He was in a daze. After not understanding the reason, Lin an could only attribute this result to his sleepwalking. There was no delay. Lin an tidied up his clothes and the blanket on the bed. Immediately, he pushed the door open and left. Lin an heard the sound of flames burning in the bamboo forest to the west, so he came to the depths of the bamboo forest. In the bamboo forest in the distance, Qian Yi’s figure appeared. It seemed that she was still fiddling with something. At this moment, Qian Yi was in front of an alchemy furnace, blowing the spiritual fire and refining pills. The explosive aura spread throughout the bamboo forest, adding a hint of warmth to the chilly bamboo forest in the early morning. At this moment, even though she hadn’t refined pills for a long time, Qian Yi’s skills weren’t rusty. Her fingers danced continuously in the air, like the five little people dancing in front of her palm, elegant and beautiful! Lin an saw all of this. Looking at the scene, master’s alchemy skills were already above that of a grandmaster! Lin an suddenly thought of the success rate he had seen before. As long as Qian Yi was willing to teach him, then Lin an’s success rate of becoming a great grandmaster in alchemy would be 100% ! Now, he wondered when master would be able to teach him alchemy? Alchemists had a very high status on this continent. They might not have very high levels of cultivation and battle prowess, but all cultivators would use pills when they cultivated. During their daily cultivation, they would also use pills for common reasons. Therefore, alchemists might not be very strong, but they were the parents of other cultivators. Their status was very high! This world valued favors, and the favors of alchemists and armament masters were usually not easily owed! Lin an walked through the bamboo forest towards Qian Yi, his footsteps making rustling sounds. At this moment, Qian Yi also noticed Lin an’s arrival. She gave him a look, signaling for him to come to her side. “Master, what are you...; ?” Qian yi said casually, “Naturally, I’m refining pills!” At Qian Yi’s position, the pill refining furnace was suspended in the air. A wisp of flame was burning, and the soil on the ground was already charred black. Looking at the scene in front of him, it seemed like he had been refining pills here for several hours. Seeing this scene, Lin an was touched. His master was so concerned about him, it was worth it to acknowledge him! At this moment, Qian Yi’s words rang out again. “I don’t know what’s wrong with you, Kid. With your weakest talent and no natural constitution, how can you use the Incipient Sutra to Build Your Foundation?” “Luck?” Although it seemed like she was blaming him, Qian Yi’s eyes were focused. With just one look, one could tell that she cared about Lin An. However, this also allowed Lin an to understand why Qian Yi would take him in as a disciple. As expected, it was because of the scripture of no beginning! Yesterday in the square, Dugu Xin, the sect master of the Jiuxiao sect, couldn’t tell that he had successfully used the scripture of no beginning to build his foundation. The other peak masters couldn’t tell either! Now, he casually said it from his master’s mouth. It was enough to prove that his master was extraordinary. And because of the success rate of the system, Lin an didn’t need to be wary of Qian Yi at all. Seeing Qian Yi like this, Lin an also wanted to dispel her worries. He then smiled and said, “Master, when I walked past that row of desks, it was the Wu Shi Sutra that flew into my hands!” “It’s not that I chose the Wu Shi Sutra, but the Wu Shi Sutra chose me!” Qian Yi said angrily again. “Shut up! With your talent, I’m afraid that no matter how hard you try, you won’t be able to successfully form the Golden Core!” “Yesterday, I went to look for some medicinal herbs. Today, I’m going to refine pills for you. If you take these pills, at least your chances of forming the golden core will increase a little!” “Choosing the incipient sutra is a path of no return. You have to be prepared to stop moving forward!” So that was it! Lin an now completely understood. His master was very familiar with the scripture of no beginning. At least, she understood the deeper meaning behind the scripture of no beginning better than those rumors. The scripture of no beginning was indeed a path of no return! But other than himself! His master, she completely understood the situation of the scripture of no beginning! And what she was doing now was to increase the chances of him refining pills, even if it was just a little bit! This was a little struggle after knowing the result! Qian Yi didn’t stop what she was doing. She continued, “Do you have a question? The scripture of No Beginning is a path of no return, but why should I accept you as my disciple?” Lin an nodded at the side, and his interest was immediately piqued. “That’s because I met someone a thousand years ago. At that time, we were in the same realm, but I never defeated her! and she was a cultivator of the scripture of no beginning, and she had already reached the Golden Core Stage! From what she said, I learned that the difficulty of forming the golden core in the No beginning Scripture was a thousand times more difficult than that in the foundation establishment stage! “So, on one hand, seeing you reminds me of an old friend. On the other hand, I also want to do my best to see if I can help you break through to the Golden Core Stage!”  At this point, Lin an completely understood. He immediately replied, “I promise you that with master’s guidance, I will not only break through to the golden core stage, but I will also advance to a higher level!” Looking at Lin an’s determined gaze, Qian Yi shook her head and couldn’t deny it. The atmosphere on the stage also became slightly colder. Lin an saw that the atmosphere had become quiet and immediately teased, “So master is refining pills for me. I thought that master had gone to drink. Yesterday, when master came back, he reeked of alcohol...;” Before Lin an could finish, Qian Yi’s face instantly turned cold. “Why? Do you think that I look ugly after drinking?” “Is it difficult to serve?” “So you don’t want to be in the same room with me?” Although drinking was Qian Yi’s habit, it was also a way to relieve loneliness. No one could understand the melancholy in her heart. Could it be that she was also like that among her disciples? Following that, Qian Yi’s tone unconsciously became heavier. “Of course not. Master’s appearance after drinking adds a bit of charm. Master after drinking is as beautiful as usual. I’m willing to take care of master after drinking for the rest of my life. No, it’s master under any circumstances!” Lin an immediately said sincerely. Hearing this, Qian Yi instantly brightened up and smiled. Her already incomparably beautiful face seemed to have a rainbow hanging on it, giving off a celestial scent. Just as the two of them were bickering. The alchemy furnace started to buzz. Lin an turned his head and saw a string of characters jumping! [ the current success rate of refining an energy gathering pill is 96% ! ] [ the current success rate of refining an energy gathering pill is 97% ! ] [ the current success rate of refining an energy gathering pill is 98% ! ] [ the current success rate of refining an energy gathering pill is 98% ! ] Lin An’s eyes widened, and he immediately understood. So it turned out. As long as it was related to him, even if it was someone else’s work, he could still see the success rate! Just like Qian Yi, who was currently refining the pill for him, Lin an could also see the numbers that were jumping! And what happened next. Made Lin an even more excited! [ if one stalk of ice machine medicine is added at this moment, the spiritual fire will reduce the heat by 30% , and the success rate will reach 100% , and the medicinal efficacy will double! ! ! ] <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Looking at the latest characters, Lin an was shocked. This success rate system could not only see the success rate of what he wanted to do, but it could also indicate how to increase the success rate! It was as if he had already pointed out the most correct path for himself, and at the same time, it also gave him the opportunity to correct it! This was all for the sake of success! Then what else in this world could possibly be difficult for me? The cultivation of the [ beginning scripture ] would definitely be overcome by me in the end! Seeing this, Lin an instantly had a doubt. His master was undoubtedly an alchemy grandmaster, and there couldn’t be any mistakes in refining such pills! One had to know that the 98% success rate was already ridiculously high, not much different from 100% . This was enough to prove that his master was an alchemy grandmaster! Such a low-level mistake could never happen! Therefore. There was only one explanation left. That was that the alchemy skills given by the system surpassed master’s alchemy skills! To be more precise, it surpassed the restrictions of this xianxia world! Lin an could hide the existence of the system from his master, but he could say anything about alchemy skills. Thinking of this, Lin an immediately said it out loud. “Master, if you add an ice machine medicine at this moment and reduce the heat of the spiritual fire by 30% , will the quality of the finished medicinal pill be improved a little?” After Lin an said it out loud. Qian Yi was also stunned. She had previously thought that there was a slight imperfection in this pill formula, and she had even changed the direction. It was exactly the same as what Lin an had said! After hearing Lin an’s explanation, Qian Yi seemed to have understood! According to the theory of the qi-gathering pill, the qi-gathering pill was a strong pill. In terms of attributes, it leaned towards fire. If the ice machine grass was added, it would create a medicinal collision! If the spiritual fire reduced the heat by 30% , the pill furnace would instantly form a small area surrounded by cold air. Then, in this area, there was a very high chance of increasing the quality of the finished pill! What was the probability? Qian Yi wasn’t sure. It was just that when she specialized in alchemy in the past, Qian Yi felt that it was theoretically feasible. It was just that the energy gathering pill was too low-level, so Qian Yi didn’t have the desire to experiment. At this moment, Lin An’s thoughts were exactly the same as hers! Qian Yi wasn’t sure if her disciple was just saying it casually or had alchemy skills. However, Lin An’s performance piqued Qian Yi’s interest. She immediately asked, “You know alchemy skills?” Lin an smiled. “I once read about the qi-gathering pill in an ancient alchemy book. That’s why I only know a little about alchemy skills. I Can’t be compared to You!” “You dare to teach me alchemy skills even if you only know a little? Do you know that the qi-gathering pill is a strong pill? If you add ice machine grass into it, it will cause a medicinal collision! The pill furnace might even explode!”Qian Yi teased, in her heart, she had already thought highly of this disciple, so she was in the mood to joke around. Hearing her master’s teasing words. Lin An was also slightly stunned. However, he quickly realized that the system would not make a mistake, and his master was willing to state her theory at this time. Furthermore, the way she looked at him also became a little brighter. In other words, his words were more or less effective in his master’s eyes. Thus. Lin an paused for a moment and said firmly. “Master, you can try it!” Before Lin an could finish his words, Qian Yi had already thrown an ice machine grass into the pill furnace. Seeing this, Lin an smiled. His master was also an extraordinary person. Without any hesitation, she poured her heart into the herb. She probably had confidence in her heart! At this moment. After the ice-thorn grass was thrown into the pill furnace, the pill furnace instantly started to tremble, and the ripples that formed were transmitted through the bamboo forest. Even the bamboo started to vibrate at this moment. At the same time. The Flames under the pill furnace instantly dimmed by a third, and the surrounding temperature instantly dropped by a little. Qian Yi had already cultivated her alchemy skills to the point of perfection. With regards to the control of the spiritual flame, the temperature was not the slightest bit off! As expected. After the pill furnace trembled, everything below became calm! Until it steadily floated in the air! Seeing this scene, Qian Yi was also shocked in her heart. So there was nothing wrong with refining pills like this. Before this, Qian Yi had also thought about refining qi-gathering pills like this. However, because low-level pills like qi-gathering pills no longer had the value of her refining them, they were put aside. And after accepting Lin an as her disciple...; Only then would Qian Yi have the opportunity to find all the herbs to refine the pills. But after all, qi-gathering pills were too far away. Thus, until now, after Qian Yi heard what Lin an said, she only remembered that there was such a thing that needed to be tried. After Lin an reminded her, the confusion in Qian Yi’s heart was instantly solved and her vision became clear. It was like Qian Yi was in a fog and her eyes were filled with an unfathomable enlightenment. Lin An’s appearance was in the same direction as her. She just lacked a chance to confirm and she would be able to clear the fog! And Lin an was the gust of wind that blew away the fog! Very soon. At this moment, the pill furnace was completely still. A wave of medicinal fragrance instantly filled the entire bamboo forest. In an instant, the bamboo leaves within a radius of ten miles became a little greener because of the medicinal smell. This situation. It accurately entered Qian Yi’s eyes. Supreme-grade pill? This was a phenomenon that only appeared in supreme-grade medicinal pills! Qian Yi was shocked. She looked at Lin An with a hint of surprise in her eyes and unconsciously looked up to him. In terms of medicinal pills, there were three major realms: Heaven, Earth, and man. And every level of medicinal pill was divided into nine levels. As long as one surpassed the current level and let the medicinal pill get rid of the restriction of their own level, they would be considered supreme-grade medicinal pills. No top-grade pill could be found by chance, and every time a top-grade pill appeared, it would trigger a heaven and earth phenomenon. Just like the current qi-gathering pill, it was only a first-grade earth-grade pill. And now, this qi-gathering pill had completely surpassed the first-grade earth-grade, and had even reached the sixth-grade earth-grade! Even more so. Qian Yi felt that this qi-gathering pill had completely surpassed the sixth-grade category. Although it was only a sixth-grade pill, it could no longer be defined by rank! At that moment, Qian Yi became curious about this energy gathering pill. She really wanted to know how powerful this energy gathering pill was! Just as Qian Yi was about to reach out her hand, she seemed to hesitate for a moment. She suddenly turned to look at Lin an and asked softly, “Lin an, do you want to learn alchemy from me?” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “Yes!” Lin an said without any hesitation. With the system’s reminder, he had a 100% chance of learning alchemy and becoming a great grandmaster! The status of an alchemist was noble and could bring many benefits. More importantly, Lin an had the guidance of the success rate now, which would greatly increase the chances of refining supreme-grade elixirs in the future. Lin an couldn’t let go of such an opportunity. Wasn’t this the reason why he joined Qian Yi previously. Moreover, there would be refining techniques, formations, and resources in the future! His master was a treasure trove. At this moment, Lin an couldn’t wait for the supreme-grade pill to be his! Lin An was determined and didn’t hesitate at all. Qian Yi nodded and agreed first. Then, she added, “Right now, the most important thing is to increase your cultivation level to prepare for the inner sect competition. Let’s talk about learning how to refine pills later!” Lin an had given Qian Yi too many surprises. Lin An, who had reached the foundation establishment stage of the non-beginnings scripture, actually didn’t need Qian Yi to spend too much time to train him. Qian Yi was very clear about the power of the non-beginnings scripture. It could be said that he was invincible in the same stage! Qian Yi naturally understood this logic deeply. But for Qian Yi, as Lin an’s master, she wasn’t looking at this point in front of her. Instead, she was looking at the long-term direction. She could imagine any path that could increase the strength of her disciples. And getting the most resources from the sect was the first step! What Qian Yi needed was not for Lin an to just defeat the other opponents, but to astonish the heavens and bring over all the resources from the Jiuxiao sect! Only in this way could she be worthy of being her disciple. Without any delay, Qian Yi blew out her spiritual power and gently waved it at the pill furnace. The pill furnace trembled slightly in the air. Then, it flew out as soon as there were no more pills. In an instant, the heaven and earth shook, and the bamboo forest within a radius of ten miles began to rustle. Emerald green bamboo leaves slowly grew from the branches until they grew into bamboo leaves. The entire scene gave life to the bamboo forest! And as Qian Yi spread out her hands, a blood-red pill appeared in her hand. At this moment, the blood-red Qi gathering pill was overflowing with radiance. Seven rays of light circulated around the medicinal pill’s body and did not dissipate for a long time. A faint medicinal fragrance instantly filled the entire bamboo forest, refreshing one’s heart and mind. Just a light sniff was enough to make one feel refreshed. Earth rank sixth grade, the highest grade! Supreme Grade Qi gathering pill! The medicinal strength of the pill had increased by a whole fold compared to an ordinary Qi gathering pill! Supreme-grade pills were indeed ten times stronger than ordinary pills! Although doubling the medicinal strength didn’t seem like much, it was already completely beyond the limit of what this pill could withstand! Even if it had a little more medicinal strength, each pill would instantly explode and dissipate into the air. Qi-gathering pill! As the name implied, it increased the speed at which the cultivator gathered spiritual energy after using it. And it was permanently effective! And the basic potential of the spiritual energy that a cultivator absorbed in the circulatory cycle was fixed. The function of the qi-gathering pill was to permanently increase the potential of the absorption of spiritual energy! A cultivator could only take one qi-gathering pill in his lifetime! This was a pill that every cultivator had to take, and this top-grade qi-gathering pill directly doubled the function of this potential! This was equivalent to directly increasing a cultivator’s potential. Its value was self-evident! Qian Yi knew very well that as long as this supreme-grade qi-gathering pill was placed in any auction venue on the Cangyun continent, it would instantly cause a sensation. It was absolutely sky-high price! Even if a ten thousand year old sect were to spend all of their resources, they might not be able to buy it. Just like the qi-gathering pill that Qian Yi had taken back then. Its quality and effects were far inferior to this peerless pill! Very soon. Under Qian Yi’s guidance, Lin an swallowed the pill. As the pill entered his throat, a warm current instantly burst forth, and he was jolted. In just an instant, the medicinal efficacy began to spread, filling every cell in Lin an’s body. At this moment. Lin an could clearly feel the changes in his body. This feeling was as if his body had expanded. The speed at which he absorbed spiritual energy had doubled! The medicinal efficacy of a supreme-grade medicinal pill was extraordinary. This effect was simply instant! On Qian Yi’s side, because of the effect of her habitat divine body, Lin An’s body had already become one with Lin An’s spiritual energy. Therefore, Qian Yi could also feel the change in Lin An’s body. It was a mysterious feeling. Sensing the huge change in her disciple’s body, Qian Yi nodded her head in relief and said. “In the inner sect competition, I want you to surpass all the so-called geniuses in the Jiuxiao sect and become the strongest personal disciple in the history of the Jiuxiao sect!” This was the goal that Qian Yi had set for Lin an! A goal that had to be achieved. “Okay!”Lin an nodded and agreed. “After the inner sect competition, I will begin to teach you how to refine pills!” Hearing this, Lin an was already looking forward to the moment of refining pills after the inner sect competition! Lin An was very looking forward to what would happen at that time. Seeing that everything was ready. “Master, I don’t know what happened, but when I woke up today, I felt very comfortable in My Dantian. When I woke up, I realized that I was already in the late stage of the Foundation Establishment Stage! So, I will definitely not disappoint master’s expectations!” Hearing Lin an say this, Qian Yi’s heart suddenly felt nervous. What she did yesterday, would her disciple find out! Seeing that Lin an didn’t notice, Qian Yi immediately felt relieved. Hearing that Lin an had already broken through to the later stage of the foundation establishment stage, Qian Yi was secretly shocked. The speed of his breakthrough was a little too fast, simply exceeding Qian Yi’s expectations. Even though part of the reason was due to the effect of her divine body at habitat, there was no doubt that Lin an seemed to be very compatible with the cultivation method of the scripture of no beginning. At least in his understanding, there was no precedent of a rapid breakthrough in his former friend’s experience. As for the reason behind this, it was actually very simple. Lin an used the special foundation establishment pill given by the system and then cultivated the no beginning scripture. This was equivalent to having a very solid foundation, which was far stronger than the average cultivator. While she was feeling different, Qian Yi immediately went to check. Very soon. A jade-like hand grasped Lin an’s pulse. Qian Yi’s spiritual sense entered Lin an’s body. Lin an didn’t reject Qian Yi’s check. His Master was also his future dao partner, so Lin an didn’t hesitate to give her the right to check. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL At this moment. In Lin An’s body, the spiritual energy vortex was slowly rotating in his dantian. It had indeed expanded a little, and the conversion of spiritual energy within it had also become more viscous. The little golden figure in the center had its eyes closed at this moment. It had become more solid, and the Golden Light had also become a little stronger. It was a scene of prosperity! And although Lin an had only advanced by a small realm, if he used spiritual power to unleash its power, its power would be completely different from yesterday! Sensing this change, Qian Yi couldn’t help but exclaim in her heart. As expected of the legendary ancient cultivation method, the scripture of no beginnings! Just a foundation establishment stage and a small realm had such a significant change! If he broke through to the golden core stage and broke through to the nascent soul stage, wouldn’t it be beyond imagination? Now. He was only one step away from Lin an forming the golden core. Qian Yi knew this better than anyone else. This was also the hardest step of the scripture of no beginnings! It was the golden core stage where there was almost no hope! At this moment, Qian Yi was also frowning. She didn’t know when Lin an would arrive! After finishing her investigation, Qian Yi nodded her head in satisfaction and her gaze towards Lin an became gentler. Up until now, this disciple of hers had not disappointed her in any way! At this moment. “Disciple, what you need now is a cultivation technique that suits you. Although the scripture of no beginning is very powerful, a cultivation technique is also extremely important as a technique to unleash the power of an immortal cultivator!” Cultivation techniques were the main combat ability in this world. Just like the scripture of no beginning, there was a basic part that was used to build a foundation. After that, the later stages of the scripture of no beginning also had a part of a combat technique. At that time, it would be the time for the scripture of no beginning to unleash its true power! Qian Yi did not hesitate. She calmed her heart and carefully selected a cultivation technique from her interspatial ring. The principle of the highest priority was to choose a cultivation technique! Very soon. A cultivation technique called the morality demon sealing technique appeared in Qian Yi’s hand with a flip of her hand. This cultivation technique wasn’t the strongest technique in Qian Yi’s hands. The morality demon sealing technique was only ranked in the middle and lower ranks. It wasn’t even eye-catching when placed in her interspatial ring. If Qian Yi didn’t think that Lin an needed this cultivation technique, she wouldn’t have chosen it. The reason why she chose this cultivation technique wasn’t because it was useless to Qian Yi, but because it was suitable for Lin An. Qian Yi was an armament cultivator and her main focus was the way of the sword. The number of sword cultivation techniques she possessed could be described as countless. The Way of the sword wasn’t just about pointing at the sword, but it was about controlling countless types of weapons. It was extremely difficult to master, and those who weren’t talented couldn’t practice it. And now, Qian Yi felt that with Lin an’s current strength, he was still not strong enough to control those high-level and mysterious techniques. Immediately, Qian Yi took out a technique book and handed it to Lin An. Morality demon sealing technique! Low-level heaven-rank technique! After practicing it, one could strengthen one’s physique and fully utilize the coordination of one’s body. With an extremely strong gang qi protecting one’s body, one would be able to produce a supreme power upon mastering it! This was a cultivation technique that was filled with masculinity. It focused on a fist-to-fist combat style that suited one’s disciple perfectly. The morality demon sealing technique was a cultivation technique that Qian Yi had obtained by chance in a secret realm. Only males could cultivate it, so it must be very suitable for this disciple of hers! Lin an took it over and took a look. A string of characters appeared in front of Lin An’s eyes. [ morality demon sealing technique: Low-grade heaven-rank technique. After mastering it, the body functions will be the foundation. It will act as the foundation to mobilize spiritual power and can control any power. At most, it can be cultivated to the advanced stage of the Tribulation! ]! [ the host’s success rate of cultivating morality demon sealing technique is 20% ! ]! [ the success rate of cultivating it under the condition of activating the no beginning scripture is 56% ! ]! [ the success rate of cultivating it under the condition of activating the no beginning scripture and combining it with the body tempering pill is 100% ! ]! If the host takes the black flame pill as the base before training, the power of the morality demon sealing technique will change!” Lin An was shocked when he saw the notification! The first was the success rate. After learning the body tempering pill, his talent could be said to have increased by leaps and bounds. Previously, even the lowest level human rank cultivation technique didn’t have such a success rate! What made Lin an even more surprised was that if the cultivation method could be combined with a medicinal pill as the base, it could even cause a mutation? This kind of cultivation method was simply unheard of. Before cultivating the morality and demon sealing technique, who would have thought that combining it with a completely unrelated black flame pill would actually cause a mutation? Only a mysterious system would give such an answer! This was a surprise! As for the righteous energy devilseal technique...; Lin An’s eyes instantly became filled with anticipation. He subconsciously activated the scripture of no beginning to investigate this technique, and a resonance immediately appeared in his mind! The scripture of no beginning could actually cause a connection between the technique and it, and this resonance seemed to be saying that this was a perfect fit! Lin An was filled with excitement. After thinking for a moment, he looked at Qian Yi and slowly said. “Master, I just activated the scripture of no beginning to investigate this vital energy devilseal technique. Immediately, I felt a strong feeling jump in my mind.” “This feeling is like the scripture of no beginning pushing me to learn this technique! The vital energy devilseal technique is very suitable for me!” Qian Yi was overjoyed after hearing this! She had a premonition before. This cultivation technique was very suitable for her disciple! And now that Lin an had used the scripture of no beginning to investigate, it actually resonated with the scripture of no beginning, proving that her judgment wasn’t wrong. Although Qian Yi wasn’t too shocked to be able to find a cultivation technique that was suitable for Lin an in one go, there was no doubt that this made her happy. And the scripture of no beginning actually had the ability to investigate cultivation techniques. This couldn’t help but shock Qian Yi. was the [ no beginning scripture ] already so powerful? It was indeed so terrifying! After a moment, Lin an started to shake his head slightly in confusion, as if he had encountered a problem that he didn’t understand. Seeing that his disciple was puzzled. Qian Yi also furrowed her brows. Just as Qian Yi was about to ask, Lin an’s voice sounded. Lin an said a little embarrassedly, “Master, this disciple has something to ask of you!” Qian yi replied, “Yes, go ahead!” “This disciple thinks that with the help of the black flame pill and body tempering pill, this disciple will be able to adapt to this cultivation method faster!” Hearing that Lin an needed two pills at once, Qian Yi’s expression changed slightly. Body tempering pills weren’t difficult for Qian Yi. As for the Black Flame Pill, it was a little special. The black flame pill was a very special existence. It hadn’t appeared in front of the world for ten thousand years. To be able to name a rare pill like the black flame pill, it proved that this disciple of his wasn’t as simple as he appeared. If it was an ordinary person, just the name of the black flame pill might not even be heard of. Even the vast majority of alchemy grandmasters didn’t have the chance to come into contact with the black flame pill! Could it be that he did not know the rarity of this pill? And although he was an alchemy grandmaster and could refine the body tempering pill with ease, refining the black flame pill had a certain level of difficulty. The success rate was even pitifully low! As of now, the success rate of refining the black flame pill was almost zero! The black flame pill itself was extremely rare. It was a top-grade heaven rank pill to begin with. With the accumulation of medicinal ingredients from the Bixiao Peak, this was not a problem at all. The difficulty was that the composition of the black flame pill was extremely complicated. The difficulty of controlling the pill’s flames was so high that it made one’s hair stand on end. The most difficult part was that the black flame pill’s ingredients naturally did not fuse with each other! Therefore. Even the world’s top alchemists only had an extremely low probability of success. In addition, under the occasional circumstances, they could only accidentally refine it! In other words, refining the black flame pill relied more on luck! The difficulty of refining the black flame pill was no less than refining a top-tier peerless grade pill! Moreover, it was a pill above heaven rank! It was an existence that could be encountered but not sought after! Even Qian Yi herself didn’t have the confidence to successfully refine it! Black flame pill. It was completely priceless in the entire world! And this disciple of hers just opened his mouth and said it. Did he really think that he was the immortal emperor of pills? Seeing Qian Yi’s slightly troubled expression, Lin an thought to himself, “Could it be that these two pills are very difficult to refine? Even my master can’t refine them?” “The medicinal ingredients on Bixiao Peak are already sufficient, but because the grade of the black flame pill is too high, its composition is extremely complicated. Naturally, it has the characteristic of not fusing. Even I am not confident in refining it!” Qian Yi had no need to show off in front of her disciple. She immediately told the truth. In this world, the Black Flame Pill had not appeared for more than ten thousand years. If Qian Yi was determined to really refine it, coupled with the time it took for research and trial, Qian Yi had the confidence to successfully refine it within half a year. This was also because she was completely immersed in it. It was a bit of a loss, but this was the disciple’s request. Even if she could not succeed, she would at least give it a try! “Does this mean that master can not refine this black flame pill?” “If the black flame pill can be successfully refined, it might take half a year of research. I will give it a try tomorrow!” Hearing Qian Yi’s answer, Lin an immediately let out a sigh of relief and his expression became interesting. At least master had a clue to refine it! At this moment, Lin an even began to imagine the appearance of cultivating this cultivation technique after the black flame pill. “That’s great! When master collects the ingredients tomorrow and refines the black flame pill, please allow me to watch from the side!” When Qian Yi cultivates, Lin an will be able to obtain a new success rate. When that time comes. Lin an could immediately give Qian Yi some hints through appropriate hints. Who knows, he might be able to quickly refine it successfully! With master’s alchemy skills! With his own appropriate hints! Let alone half a year, Lin an believed that he would be able to refine it tomorrow! 3 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL That night. Lin an continued to cultivate the scripture of no beginning. After rotating for a hundred cycles, his cultivation level became even more stable. The night passed without a word, and time passed quickly. The next morning. Accompanied by the chirping of birds, they were in the same spot in the bamboo forest. At this moment, there were two people standing in the depths of the bamboo forest. The pill furnace was suspended in the bamboo forest. A gentle breeze blew through the bamboo forest, and the crisp rustling sound was like a beautiful piece of music. It was very pleasant to the ears. Under Qian Yi’s precise control, a wisp of flame split apart. It was like a palm holding a cauldron of pill furnace, and it was burning hot. At this moment, even the spiritual energy in the bamboo forest began to fluctuate. At this moment, the pill that Qian Yi was refining was the body-tempering pill. Lin an stared intently at the pill furnace. There were no special symbols that appeared in his eyes like yesterday. [ the success rate of refining the qi-gathering pill is 99% ! ] There were no other notifications. As expected, there were no accidents. Not long after, a wave of medicinal fragrance drifted in the air. The body-tempering pill had been successfully refined! The medicinal fragrance spread out, and the entire process took less than half an incense stick’s time. This made Lin an even more certain of his master’s alchemy abilities. After resting for the time it takes for an incense stick to burn. Qian Yi had already prepared the medicinal ingredients to refine the black flame pill. On a square table. There were 18 rare medicinal ingredients neatly arranged. Each of them was more than a thousand years old, and a portion of them came from the wild grass of Green Cloud Peak. The majority of them were accumulated over a thousand years by Qian Yi. At this moment, just the fragrance emitted by these rare medicinal herbs was already refreshing. It was enough to prove that the black flame pill that was about to be refined was extraordinary! Not long after. Under Lin An’s concerned gaze. Qian Yi slightly opened her hands, and the simple and unadorned pill furnace stopped after rotating for one round. “Disciple, look carefully. When refining pills, you have to pay attention to the order in which the medicinal herbs are put in, as well as the precise timing of putting them in, as well as the ability to control the temperature of the spiritual power!” Master was teaching while Lin an nodded in agreement. “Master, I’ll remember it.” In Qian Yi’s opinion, even though the success rate of refining the black flame pill this time was 0% ! But Qian Yi didn’t care about this result at all. She wanted to seize every opportunity to teach Lin An. If Lin an could watch the entire process of refining the pill fail.., for this disciple, it could also be considered another type of harvest! Very soon. A strange herb was thrown into the pill furnace by Qian Yi. Qian Yi’s voice sounded at the same time. “Black thorn grass, 70% poisonous and 30% cold! “This black thorn grass is 1350 years old. From the number of roots, one can determine its age. Each root is of the same length. Of the 13 roots, only one is only half as long. It’s 1350 years old! This herb was already 80% poisonous and 20% cold! Remember, each stalk of herb will be different according to the year!” “In the pill furnace, after burning it with 100% flame for 15 minutes, the black thorn herb will completely melt. At this time, throw in the second stalk of herb...;” In Qian Yi’s explanation, Lin an also understood the basic process of refining pills. For Lin An, who had to learn how to refine pills in the future, he also gained some basic understanding of refining pills. Seeing his master so devoted to him, Lin An’s heart couldn’t be more moved. He had already made up his mind that he would definitely not let his master down in the future. In fact, one day, he could even become the person she relied on in her heart! At the same time. Lin an stared intently at the pill furnace. That familiar string of characters began to appear. [ according to the current progress, the success rate of Qian Yi’s black flame pill refining is 0% ! ] ...; The time for three incense sticks to burn quickly passed. The atmosphere at the scene also became solemn. Many beads of sweat had already appeared on Qian Yi’s forehead. At this moment, Qian Yi was still controlling the flames, not slacking off in the slightest. And. The symbol still flashed in Lin An’s eyes. [ according to the current progress, the success rate of the black flame pill that Qian Yi refined is 0% ! ] Seeing this scene. Lin an couldn’t help but be shocked in his heart. The difficulty of refining the black flame pill was completely beyond his imagination! Even for an alchemist like master who had already invested more than half of his medicinal ingredients, the success rate was still 0% ! “Just as master said, the medicinal properties of every single ingredient in the black flame pill are conflicting. Therefore, if you want to refine the black flame pill, you have to control every single ingredient before you invest the time. You have to accurately control every single wisp of flame and choose the right time to heat or release the heat of the spiritual fire!” “In other words, the control of the temperature of the flame affects the fusion of the medicinal properties. If you’re not careful, you’ll lose everything!” Seeing that the success rate was still 0% , Lin an started to feel uneasy and his emotions became complicated. This wasn’t a question of whether the black flame pill was successful or not. It was the fact that this barefoot woman in front of him who was refining pills for him made Lin an love her too much. Just like that, she put in a lot of effort and didn’t slack off in the slightest! When he became the disciple of such a master, it would be a blessing! At this moment. Finally. Something different began to appear in Lin An’s eyes! “If the spiritual fire is reduced to 10% at this moment, the success rate of refining the black flame pill will increase to 1% !” At this moment. Qian Yi had already deliberately lowered the temperature of the spiritual fire. It had even reached 20% , but it had yet to reach the final 10% . At this point, Lin an understood that his master was intentionally lowering the temperature of the flame. However, there was a slight difference in perception, so it was only 20% spiritual fire. Right now, Qian Yi’s brows were slightly furrowed, as if she was still hesitating about lowering the temperature. Lin An’s voice sounded from the side. “Master, you can now lower the temperature of the spiritual fire to 10% !” Hearing Lin an’s words, Qian Yi was surprised. Her disciple seemed to have noticed her hesitation and suggested from the side. Lowering the temperature of the fire to 10% was something that Qian Yi had thought of before. However, she didn’t dare to take the risk. She knew the consequences in her heart. It was also this consequence that made her hesitate. If the temperature in the pill furnace was too low, the medicinal power of the nine cold herbs in the pill furnace would instantly freeze! Could it be that the medicinal power was not at the critical point of freezing, but directly allowed it to freeze naturally? Qian Yi did not have any extravagant hopes that she could refine the black flame pill in one go. In addition, when she was refining the Qi gathering pill previously, Lin An’s words instantly strengthened Qian Yi’s conviction and subsequently produced a peerless level Qi gathering pill. Lin An was the person who stood with her to clear the fog! Immediately. Without hesitation. Under Qian Yi’s control of the fire, the temperature of the spiritual fire instantly froze at 10% of the temperature! Very quickly, inside the pill furnace. Just as Qian Yi had expected, a burst of icy cold air instantly spread out. The medicinal effects of the nine stalks of cold spiritual medicine shockingly formed solid ice inside the pill furnace! At the same time. The success rate symbol appeared in Lin An’s eyes once again. [ if a thousand-year-old red flame grass is added at this moment and the temperature of the spiritual fire is dispersed, the success rate of refining the black flame pill will increase to 5% ! ] Lin an suddenly became expectant. That’s right! Following the instructions like this directly increased the success rate! As long as she followed the system’s instructions, the success rate of refining the black flame pill would continue to increase! Immediately, Lin an’s voice sounded again. “Master, you can now add the red flame grass and dissipate the temperature of the spiritual fire!” At this moment, Qian Yi’s heart was already filled with shock, and it exploded like a raging wave. What kind of monster was her disciple exactly? Could it be that he was a natural genius in alchemy? The timing of adding the red flame grass, Lin An’s thoughts were completely in line with his own! The only difference was that Qian Yi wasn’t sure what the consequences would be if she dispersed the spiritual fire. Could it be? The root of the problem lay in the inner space of the pill furnace? Under normal circumstances, under freezing conditions, the red flame grass would remain as normal, and its medicinal effects wouldn’t be enough to be activated! But what if it was placed in a sealed environment? Thinking of this, Qian Yi’s heart was already in a state of shock! Without any hesitation. A stalk of scarlet flame grass was instantly thrown into the pill furnace. In the next instant, the flames completely dispersed. Within the pill furnace. The temperature was instantly emptied. And this stalk of thousand-year-old medicinal herb, the scarlet flame grass, seemed to have received some sort of stimulation at this moment and instantly contracted! In the next instant, the crimson flame herb completely turned into a round bead shape. In an instant. A burst of flames completely erupted from the round bead! The temperature in the pill furnace was instantly raised by the intense flames! This was completely the flames that belonged to the crimson flame herb! The intense flames that the spirit herb itself possessed! Qian Yi deeply felt that the success rate of refining the black flame pill was continuously increasing! It was all because of this disciple of hers — Lin an! Lin an looked at everything that was happening in front of him and finally felt at ease. That was because the system had notified him that the success rate had increased to 70% ! [ if you maintain your current state for the time it takes for an incense stick to burn and invest all the remaining medicinal ingredients, the success rate of refining the black flame pill will increase to 70% ! ] It seemed that the refinement of the black flame pill was about to succeed! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Black flame pill. It was a top-grade pill refined from eighteen spirit herbs combined with spiritual fire in the heavens. Nine of them were extremely cold and nine were scorching hot. After a cultivator consumed it, they could control a wisp of heavenly fire in the heavens and earth. It was ranked at the top-grade heaven-grade medicinal pill. It was considered a different species among medicinal pills and could not be mentioned in the same breath. It was a product that could be encountered but not sought after. Before she had enough research on the medicinal properties of the pill formula and had a deep understanding of the fire of spiritual power, Qian Yi did not choose to touch it at all. This was a complete waste of medicinal ingredients! As a grandmaster in alchemy, Qian Yi was also very interested in the black flame pill. She had deduced all sorts of ways to refine the black flame pill countless times. However, all of them failed! Therefore, under Lin An’s request, Qian Yi was determined to study this pill carefully. She hoped that after studying it thoroughly, she could refine the black flame pill within half a year However, at least for now, Qian Yi didn’t think that she could successfully refine it. Therefore, at this moment, the medicinal fragrance that started to emanate from the bamboo forest directly caused Qian Yi to sink into a deep shock. This was the sign of a medicinal pill taking shape! A medicinal pill was a solid substance that was obtained from tempering the essence of plants and trees. If one wanted a medicinal pill to take shape, one had to fully melt and fuse the medicinal herbs. And now, it seemed that this step had been achieved. To be able to reach this step was something that Qian Yi had never thought of before! And all of this. Was because of Lin An’s reminder! The next step was to completely transform the black flame pill! “Master, now put in all the next medicinal ingredients!” “Master, release all the power of the spiritual fire!” Hearing this, Qian Yi chose to trust Lin an. Without any hesitation, she put in all the medicinal ingredients and controlled the spiritual fire to release all the power. At this moment, another string of notifications appeared in Lin An’s eyes. [ if you use the spiritual power of the no beginning scripture to infuse the pill, the black flame pill will undergo a mutation! ] A lotus of spiritual power appeared in Lin An’s palm and was quickly thrown into the pill furnace. Qian Yi, who had undergone a mutation, frowned but didn’t stop him. This disciple of hers had exceeded her expectations and did things that were completely out of the ordinary. However, these things that were out of the ordinary could still bring a pleasant surprise! This was a little unbelievable. Thus, Qian Yi had already decided not to think about everything that Lin an did. “Alright, master, take back all the flames. Now, we can go to the side and rest. This black flame medicinal pill will be successfully placed for two hours!” At the side of the bamboo forest. Qian Yi casually waved her hand and summoned a table and two chairs. Very quickly, the two of them sat down in the bamboo forest. Qian Yi looked at Lin an curiously. “Disciple, you really don’t know how to refine pills?” “No! I’ve read an Ancient Book of pill refining before and it recorded some unusual methods, but I’ve never refined pills before!” Hearing this, Qian Yi had already decided to officially teach Lin an how to refine pills after the grand competition. On the path of alchemy, theory alone wasn’t enough. For example, if one didn’t go through strict training and didn’t have strong control abilities, it was impossible to control the spiritual fire. If one couldn’t even control basic flames, then there was no need to even talk about refining pills! Or it could be said that if one didn’t have the ability to recognize medicine, then refining pills would still be a failure! Therefore, Qian Yi had to hand over the knowledge that was known as the foundation of an alchemist to Lin An. And now seemed to be not the time. Qian Yi was also very curious about the ancient pill refining book that Lin an had mentioned. However, asking her disciple for a book to read, how inappropriate was that! Qian Yi frowned. This detail was quickly discovered by Lin An. However, he couldn’t do anything about it. Other things aside, there was no such thing as an ancient alchemy book. It was all because of the system. Although the nature of these two things were the same, the system, an existence that transcended knowledge, was obviously not suitable to be brought out and told to his teacher. “Unfortunately...; After I touched that alchemy book, that book completely turned to dust!” Lin an shook his head and said regretfully. It was as if he was immersed in deep memories. Seeing Lin an’s expression, Qian Yi also felt conflicted. After the two of them rested for a while, they turned to look at the alchemy furnace that was flaunting its wealth in the air. At this moment. There was no movement on the alchemy furnace. In the time it took for three incense sticks to burn, it had already completely dissipated the remaining temperature. The alchemy furnace at first did not have any movement at all, as if it had never been used. In the bamboo forest, there was only the rustling sound of a breeze blowing through the bamboo forest. According to common sense. After the medicinal pill was successfully refined, there would be a little phenomenon. The simplest would be to emit a little medicinal fragrance or spiritual power fluctuation, and if it was a higher level medicinal pill, then it would be a heaven and earth phenomenon! However. Even now, there was still no movement inside the pill furnace, and there was no indication in her eyes. What was going on? There was simply no movement at all! Qian Yi also frowned. However, this was not because of Lin an, but because the pill furnace was very abnormal! There was no sign of success, nor was there any sign of failure. What was going on? At that moment, Qian Yi had a confused look on her face. At that moment, Lin an had already taken a few steps forward and arrived in front of the alchemy furnace. With the infusion of spiritual power, the lid of the alchemy furnace was quickly opened. In an instant, the green flames that filled the sky slanted out and spread out in an instant, covering the bamboo forest for a long time. The entire bamboo forest was burning at this moment! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Green Flames filled the sky. In an instant, the entire bamboo forest was set ablaze, and everything within a ten-mile radius was ablaze. It made people feel that in an instant, the bamboo forest would be burned to the ground. The pill furnace had been calm just a moment ago, but now, this abnormal phenomenon had already appeared. Lin an was shocked, “This flame won’t cause any harm!” Because the flame didn’t make him feel hot, but a cool feeling, as if this green flame contained a vibrant life! The green flame burned out from the pill furnace and quickly burned Lin an into a Burning Man! Qian Yi was shocked when she saw this scene. This was her personal disciple, and he had been turned into a burning man just like that. If anything happened to him, she, as his teacher, would be held responsible. After spending the past two days together, Lin an was already very important to Qian Yi. When she saw that Lin an had an accident, she didn’t have time to think and immediately rushed over. She stretched out her hand and grabbed, and a large amount of spiritual energy burst out, instantly extinguishing the flames! And the moment he came into contact with Lin an...; Qian Yi was stunned at first, but then she instantly felt relieved. Previously, she was too nervous about Lin an and only wanted to make sure that nothing happened to her disciple. In fact, she didn’t even think about it for a second time. But now that she felt that the flame had no temperature, she immediately reacted. “This is the flame of Life!” The flame of life came from one of the eighteen herbs used to refine the black flame pill! The grass of life! The grass of life had a powerful life attribute, and its core contained the ice flame attribute, which could be refined into a flame that could be healed. Simply put, this was a type of flame that had no offensive power. And the so-called black flame pill was the king among the eighteen herbs of the fire attribute! After a cultivator consumed it, they would possess a powerful flame that could be used in battle Based on the current situation, the flame of life had won among the many herbs. At this moment. Qian Yi seemed to have thought of something and her brows furrowed slightly. “That’s not right! If it hasn’t been consumed, we won’t know which type of flame the black flame pill will produce! ! !” “And now, before the pill has even been born, the flame of life has already erupted. Even the surrounding herbs have accelerated their growth. What exactly is the reason?” “Could it be that this is just the heaven and earth phenomenon of the Black Flame Pill?” The flame of life swept out and very quickly swept through the entire bamboo forest. The bamboo leaves had also become more emerald green. Even the herbs on the ground had become luxuriant and luxuriant. Even their age had increased. The herbs that hadn’t matured yet matured instantly matured after the flame of life swept over them. Seeing this scene, Qian Yi and Lin an were completely shocked. Since it brought about such a strange phenomenon, what kind of method would the black flame pill in the pill furnace be presented in? Could it really be a supreme grade pill? Very soon. With Qian Yi’s wave of her hand. The Flames in the pill furnace slowly dissipated. At this moment, two medicinal pills, one black and one white, appeared in the pill furnace. These two pills were like two small spheres that were attracted to each other. They slowly rotated in the pill furnace, circle after circle. Finally, they touched and fused together, forming a black and white medicinal pill that was the size of a thumb. Qian Yi muttered in her heart, “According to common sense, the black flame pill is a pure black medicinal pill. Second line, this medicinal pill is indeed black and white!” This was obviously beyond her expectations. However, the black flame pill was a heaven-tier pill. If it mutated and became a supreme-grade pill, it wouldn’t be detected. From the abnormal signs in the sky and earth, it could be seen that this pill was definitely not simple. Qian Yi looked at Lin An, and a wave of excitement rose in her heart as she said seriously, “This is a supreme-grade black flame pill!” Very quickly, Qian Yi handed over the black flame pill, her eyes filled with anticipation. “I can’t see the exact medicinal effects of this pill anymore. I’ll only understand it after I eat it.” Qian Yi was also surprised by this top-grade black flame pill, but she clearly knew that this black flame pill belonged to Lin An. The reason couldn’t be simpler. It was enough that Lin an was her disciple! Thus, Qian Yi didn’t hesitate and asked Lin an to accept the black flame pill. She looked to the other side and pointed there. “Disciple, there is a thousand-year-old spiritual spring in the back mountain of Bixiao Peak. That place will make you more suitable to cultivate the morality and demon sealing technique.” “After you arrive there, you will consume the black flame. After that, cultivate properly. I will wait for Your Good News!” ...; At the bottom of a cliff at the back of the mountain. The two of them floated down. Not long after, they arrived at a pool. The spiritual energy here was three times that of the surrounding area. When Lin an stretched out his hand to feel the cold water in the pool, he could immediately feel that it was filled with spiritual energy. This kind of water was much heavier than normal water. “Disciple, this pool of spiritual spring has been accumulated for over a thousand years. The spiritual energy inside has become much denser. This place is very suitable for you to cultivate the morality and demon sealing technique!” “Now, hurry up and enter the spiritual spring! I will stand by your side to protect you!” Hearing that Qian Yi would stand by his side to protect him, Lin an was very happy. However, now that Qian Yi was by his side, he couldn’t do anything. “I don’t care anymore!” Without any delay, Lin an quickly took off his clothes and immediately jumped into the spiritual spring. Qian Yi, who was on the side, realized that something was wrong and immediately turned her head to the side. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL In a secluded place at the back of the mountain. Lin an had already prepared everything. Soaking in the spiritual spring was like a spring breeze! At this moment, a black flame pill entered his mouth. After a moment of silence, two wisps of flames immediately appeared on the whirlpool in Lin An’s dantian. One black and one white wisps of flames began to descend. After being hot, they sank into the whirlpool. In just an instant. The entire spiritual energy whirlpool started to burn. The two-colored flames instantly rose up in all parts of the whirlpool, and they slowly began to approach the little golden man. Feeling the changes in his body, Lin an was pleasantly surprised. Before this, Lin an had already learned from Qian Yi that only after zi ah consumed the black flame pill would he obtain an unknown type of flame. Of course, this was under normal circumstances. But now, there was no doubt that it was a little abnormal. The black flame pill now had two types of flames. One was a black flame that was like a black hole. It was pitch-black and didn’t have any light at all. It was as if anything that came close to it would be devoured. Lin An didn’t doubt it at all. Even if it was light, as long as it shot into this flame, it would be devoured and wouldn’t be able to escape. As for the other type. It was a white flame. It was pale and swaying, looking like an ice-cold Flame! As long as Lin an slightly moved his mind, he would be able to feel its extremely cold aura. At this moment, the two wisps of flames seemed to have been summoned and began to fly towards the little golden man. In the end, they turned into two beads with tail flames and began to revolve around the little golden man in a regular manner. It seemed like they would never stop. At this moment. Standing on the high platform, Qian Yi saw that Lin an was not moving at all, and she was very worried. After all, Lin an was her disciple, and she definitely would not want to see any accidents happen to him. But at this moment, Lin An’s eyes suddenly opened, and flames seemed to be shooting out of his eyes. The next second. Lin an began to activate the morality demon sealing technique. The spiritual power that erupted from his body instantly caused the entire spiritual spring to start churning, as if it was boiling. Very soon, flames began to appear on the surface of the water. A black and a white flame instantly covered the entire surface of the water. Very soon, a black and a white image of a confrontation appeared. The surface of the water began to split into two halves, and a strange scene of half of the water freezing like flames appeared. At this moment. Qian Yi, who was standing at a high place, saw this scene and immediately flew down. Very quickly, she arrived at Xiao Tan’s shore. At this moment, the black and white flames immediately became like two large flaming hands. Instantly, Qian Yi’s eyes turned cold as she thought of Qian Yi’s embrace. Just as she was about to make a move...; Lin an shouted softly, “All of you, come back!” The two wisps of flames immediately withdrew as if they had received an order. They quickly quieted down. Qian Yi was immediately shocked when she saw this scene. This seemed to be the power of the Black Flame Pill? The wisp of green flames that she had seen earlier could no longer be seen. Now, two wisps of flames, one black and one white, had appeared. Both of them were extremely powerful! Then there was no mistake! This must have been the result of a supreme-grade medicinal pill! This disciple of his could be said to have had too much luck. At the same time. Lin an began to circulate the circulatory cycle and began to digest the vital energy devilseal technique. The scripture of beginnings began to play out. The vital energy devilseal technique was a body-tempering technique. One could obtain the protection of vital energy at the first stage of cultivating the Diao technique. This was like a light barrier forming around the body of the cultivator, protecting the cultivator. Even someone of the same realm would find it difficult to break through it. The protective vital energy was also the so-called vital energy of the vital energy devilseal technique! Very soon. The first stage of the vital energy devilseal technique had been completely deduced by the No beginning scripture. At this time, Lin an needed to digest all of this. And with the Black Flame pill as the foundation. Lin an successfully activated it. The Flames in his Dantian immediately started to burn. The two wisps of flames immediately transformed into two burning men and began to cultivate. Each of their actions caused the world to ripple. And the two burning men seemed to be in a competitive relationship. One of them made one move, and the other immediately responded, even working even harder! And at this moment. Qian Yi, who was at the side, revealed a surprised expression. She discovered that. In the Spirit Pool where Lin an was located, the surface of the water was falling at a speed visible to the naked eye. The spiritual energy in his body was also growing rapidly. The benefit of the life-level divine body was that the spiritual energy that the other half obtained while cultivating would be generated in equal amounts in the other party’s dantian. Just like now, as long as Qian Yi was willing, she could jump into the spiritual spring and cultivate together with Lin An. The result would be that the spiritual energy that Qian Yi absorbed would also be transferred into Lin An’s body. And now, there was an even more crucial thing to do. Should he stop Lin an from continuing to cultivate? “The spiritual spring contains extremely dense spiritual energy of heaven and earth, and it has been stored for over a thousand years. The density of the spiritual energy in it can be described as a massive amount!” “But right now, this disciple of mine is completely like a whale swallowing the spiritual energy of the spiritual spring. At this speed, in less than the time it takes for an incense stick to burn, the spiritual spring will be sucked dry!” “However, if the capacity of a person’s Dantian is limited and the energy in the heaven and earth is directly converted, if the amount is too large, the body will explode and die!” “Should I stop him now?” However, after considering that her disciple had cultivated the scripture of no beginning, Qian Yi gave up and returned to the high platform in an instant. If she didn’t want it, she wouldn’t have interfered too much. After half an incense stick’s time. The spiritual spring was completely absorbed. Lin An’s body was completely exposed to the air. At this moment. Countless lights flashed around Lin an’s body. I’ve successfully cultivated the first stage of the morality demon sealing technique! 3 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An had successfully cultivated the morality and demon sealing technique! Three incense sticks had passed since Lin An had entered the pool, but in such a short time, he had actually successfully cultivated the technique. Qian Yi was full of astonishment at her disciple’s talent. ‘Is this still the disciple who has always had average talent? Or has he already reached the level of a peerless genius just because he cultivated the no beginning scripture?’ Qian Yi had a puzzled look on her face as the thought ran through her mind. Lin An stood by the shore and examined his now well-proportioned and bald body. It was as if he was examining the power he had just obtained. His male charm was fully displayed, and Qian Yi couldn’t help but blush as she approached him. “Disciple, quickly put on your clothes!” Lin An hurriedly covered his private parts and came back to his senses. He put on his clothes and returned to the residence with Qian Yi. ...; Green Cloud Peak, inside the Bamboo House. The two of them looked at each other and sat down. After learning about Lin An’s specific gains, Qian Yi’s heart was filled with joy. A top-grade medicinal pill had actually appeared twice in two days under Lin An’s reminder, and he was just an ordinary disciple. Even a mighty figure like Qian Yi had to admit that she was a little envious. Additionally, Lin An had already mastered the first stage of the vital energy devil seal technique, and he already had the ability to protect himself. The technique had completely fused with the two wisps of flames from the black flame pill. The thick black flames were like a liquid, and they could burn anything. On the other hand, the white jade-like ice-cold flames had the effect of frost! The vital energy devil seal technique was undoubtedly a killer move! As long as Lin An used it properly, it would be a powerful weapon in future battles! Even cultivators above the golden core stage didn’t have the ability to easily deal with Lin An. He had originally estimated that he would need a few days to cultivate the technique, but he now had no choice but to learn something new in advance. Qian Yi entered the bamboo house to prepare for Lin An’s next lesson. On the southern slope of the first five Bixiao peaks, she had found some medicinal herbs for Lin An to practice alchemy. ...; On the other side of the main peaks, the Jiuxiao Sect disciples who had joined the inner sect had already received guidance from their teacher. At that moment, they were making good use of their time to cultivate, and they were hopeful that they would get good results in the inner sect competition. This contest would have a significant impact on the future allocation of resources. If a disciple from that main peak achieved first place in the inner sect competition, he would bring glory to the entire main peak! Therefore, the importance of the competition was self-evident. On the Golden Cloud Peak, a silver-robed elder was teaching Xiao Muran some battle techniques. There was anticipation in his eyes as he instructed, “Xiao Muran, this Dragon Tiger Fist is a low-grade earth-rank technique. After learning it, one’s strength will increase explosively, and the wind from your fist will be invincible. With your talent, you should complete the first level within seven days! I’m looking forward to seeing how you’ll perform in the competition, especially against Lin An from the Green Cloud Peak. You must suppress him!” For many years, the peak master from Green Cloud Peak, Qian Yi, had failed to play by the rules and she had offended many people. Among them was the silver-robed elder! “Your disciple will remember this! I will definitely break through the first stage of the Dragon Tiger Fist within seven days!” Xiao Muran replied as he knelt down before the silver-robed elder. In the past, Xiao Muran had desired to become Dugu Xin’s personal disciple. However, after arriving at the Golden Cloud Peak, he realized that the task was as difficult as ascending to the heavens. Hence, he settled for the second-best alternative, which was joining the inner sect. Unfortunately, the decision had made him lose the qualifications required to become a personal disciple. However, even within the inner sect, a genius like Xiao Muran was still highly valued. Hence, he was quickly assigned an important task which was to secure an outstanding result in the inner sect grand competition. Everybody in the sect expected him to cultivate the low-level earth cultivation technique. Xiao Muran bowed his head three times and said firmly, “Thank you, master, I’ll remember it!” Similar events happened between the disciples and their masters on the other main peaks. The requirements expected from all the disciples in the competition were surprisingly consistent. Obtaining an excellent result in the inner sect contest was the most important goal, but at the same time, they were instructed to ruthlessly suppress Lin An! The other masters were bitter because of Qian Yi’s antics in previous inner assessment tournaments, and they wanted to punish her disciple in the upcoming contest. ...; During the days before the inner sect tournament, Qian Yi would accompany Lin An on a daily basis to watch him refine the medicinal pills. She started by teaching Lin An about the medicinal herbs before she educated him about the alchemy furnace. After that, Lin An was expected to control the fire of spiritual power. Under Qian Yi’s guidance, Lin An improved his skills every day as he learned the foundations of the cultivation technique. However, after teaching her disciple, Qian Yi would return to being a lazy drunkard. Occasionally, she would disappear for the night, and every time she returned, she would return drunk. Lin An was already used to this. One night, as she returned from her drinking spree, Qian Yi bumped into Lin An at the door. Lin An didn’t hesitate. He immediately used his reflexes to help Qian Yi. When he grabbed her, a wave of fragrance mixed with the smell of alcohol assailed his face. Lin An quickly lifted Qian Yi and carried her to the long chair. The soft parts of Qian Yi’s body clamped onto Lin An’s ribs, causing his heart to throb as he subconsciously looked at Qian Yi’s bed. Ever since he had begun training with Qian Yi, a few crazy ideas had run through Lin An’s head. He had hoped that he could train hard and use his talents to get anything from Qian Yi. Lin An had strived to become her companion as soon as possible. However, no matter how fast Lin An improved, Qian Yi would not be moved. It was as if his genius meant nothing in her eyes. Unfortunately, Lin An had no option but to take things one step at a time. Ever since Qian Yi had resumed her drunk routine, she no longer had the habit of directly going to bed to rest. Instead, lay down in the chair until she woke up. “Disciple, bring me water!” Lin An turned around and fetched her a cup of water from the spiritual spring. “Master, drink slowly!” Lin An implored her as he quickly handed over the bamboo cup. Qian Yi drank the water in one gulp as if she was drinking alcohol. “Have you consolidated your cultivation?” “I’ve already memorized the Herbal Scripture that you gave me! During the holidays, I’ll be able to clearly understand the uses of all kinds of herbs,” Lin An replied solemnly. “Other than that, I’ve already unleashed the morality and devil sealing technique, and I’ve also mastered the black and white flames. I think they’ll be of great use. I won’t have any problems when the inner sect competition begins in a few days!” When she heard this, Qian Yi nodded her head in satisfaction. She waved her hand and gestured at Lin An to help her settle down and rest. 1 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL A thin veil separated Qian Yi and Li An as they slept. Because she had this reassuring disciple by her side, Qian Yi had already fallen asleep peacefully. If it was before she accepted Lin an as her disciple, Qian Yi would always keep a trace of her spiritual sense to be used to detect him. This was something that every cultivator had to do! And now, with Lin an as a sleeping disciple, the task of visiting him was naturally handed over to Lin An. Most of the time, immortal cultivators no longer needed to sleep. Some could even cultivate to a certain level and be able to abstain from food all year round. Qian Yi and Lin an were slightly different. From the fact that Qian Yi could get drunk, it could be seen that she seemed to be more willing to enjoy life. At this moment. Because she had completely let down her guard. Qian Yi’s sleeping posture was completely unrestrained. Her soft, water-like breasts were completely exposed. A unique frankincense fragrance filled the entire area. Lin An, who was affected, turned his head away. This scene happened to be completely seen by him. A veil separated them, and it was as if it was hazy and dreamy! “So Big!” “This master of mine really doesn’t care about the feelings of this masculine young disciple at all!” Lin an hurriedly turned his head away and slightly increased his breathing, but this scene couldn’t be swept away. Closing his eyes, Lin an began to think about the inner sect competition in three days. In his dantian, the spiritual energy whirlpool was a little dimmer than before. He knew that this was because he had practiced the vital energy devilseal technique. The Righteous Energy Devilseal technique also had an excellent defense. It also had another function, which was to store spiritual energy. In other words, the spiritual energy that Lin an had cultivated had already been stolen by the righteous energy devilseal technique. When a certain amount was stored, the righteous energy devilseal technique would be able to unleash its true power. What Lin an didn’t expect was that the righteous energy devilseal technique required a huge amount of replenishment. Even with the blessing of the [ Genesis scripture ] , he couldn’t easily fill it up. However, now that he had the ability to fight beyond his level, he would be invincible in the inner sect competition! And now that Lin an was in the late stage of the foundation establishment stage, he could clearly sense that he was still one stage away from reaching the golden core stage. In this world, the foundation establishment stage of cultivators was divided into the early stage, middle stage, late stage, and after that was the golden core stage. It seemed that he would meet another peak stage of the foundation establishment stage. Peak stage was not common among cultivators and could only be activated under certain circumstances. However, Lin an had already obtained the right to activate it when he had just reached the foundation establishment stage. “As expected of the first cultivation method in ancient times! Even the most basic cultivation method has more stages than other cultivation methods!” At the same time, Lin an also summarized his alchemy skills. What Qian Yi said at the moment was that one could not chew too much, so she did not teach Lin an more alchemy knowledge for the time being. Moreover. Alchemy was a prestigious profession in the Cang Yun continent. It required a huge amount of money to feed. Just like the most basic medicinal ingredients, each stalk was a spiritual treasure between heaven and earth, so it was definitely worth a lot. And there was also an alchemy furnace. Alchemy furnaces were also divided into grades. The higher the grade, the more difficult it was to obtain, and the higher the value. Just like the alchemy furnace in Qian Yi’s hands, it was called the Blue Devil’s niche. It was ranked in the entire azure fate continent. In other words, the higher the grade of the alchemy furnace, the greater the success rate of refining pills. It was also able to control the owner of the alchemy furnace more precisely. Therefore, to an alchemist, an alchemy furnace was also a symbol of status! In his thoughts. Lin An fell asleep in a daze. The next day. The sunlight scattered into the bamboo forest, making it seem like a dream. Even the water in the stream was sparkling under the sunlight. What a paradise on earth! At this moment, Qian Yi had already woken up and felt a slight chill on her chest. Only then did she realize that her previous lazy bad habit had been exposed again. Qian Yi hurriedly tidied herself up and let out a slight sigh. As her master, of course, she would mind if her disciple saw this scene. Just like in the Spirit Spring, Lin an had already been completely seen by Qian Yi. However, as her disciple, there was no harm in showing it to her master. However, as her master, she couldn’t do it. Fortunately, this disciple of hers was sound asleep. Hopefully, she didn’t see her like this! ...; On the other side of the Jiuxiao sect. Xiao Muran had already come out of seclusion on golden firmament peak. This time, it took him seven whole days to finally master the first stage of the Dragon Tiger Fist. Moreover, he had already touched the late stage of the foundation establishment realm in terms of realm! Xiao Muran said excitedly, “Master, disciple will use another two days to consolidate his strength. He will definitely be able to successfully reach the late stage of the Foundation Establishment Realm!” The silver-robed elder on one side looked at Xiao Muran’s transformation and nodded in satisfaction. “Second son, your talent is indeed extraordinary!” For a cultivator, to be able to raise a realm within seven days was something that only a genius could do. Xiao Muran was undoubtedly a genius! At the same time, on the other side. On Cang Xiao Peak. An inner disciple sat in the lotus pond and slowly opened his eyes. He immediately attracted the attention of an elder and hurriedly asked, “Qiao Zifeng, how is he now?” “Reporting to master, I have successfully entered the late stage of the foundation establishment stage, and I faintly feel that my foundation establishment stage has another realm!” “What! ! !” This elder was greatly shocked. Peak Stage? This meant that there was still a peak stage! “Very good! Disciple, if you need any medicine or magic tools, I will definitely find them for you!” After Qiao Zifeng made his request, this elder immediately disappeared from where he was and went to the sect’s treasure pavilion to retrieve the treasures. Peak stage was not common among cultivators, it was one in a hundred! It was definitely a genius among geniuses, this was the exclusive realm that only peerless geniuses had. Even an ordinary genius would directly enter the aurous core stage after the foundation establishment advanced stage. However, this kind of golden core stage was definitely inferior to the peak of the Foundation Establishment Stage! This was the difference between Peerless Geniuses and lyricism. Peerless Geniuses would always be one step ahead, one more realm! This was a natural condition, an insurmountable natural chasm! “As expected of the disciple that I nurtured with all my heart. He’s actually a peerless genius. As long as I help him break through, he’ll be able to create the history of the Jiuxiao sect for a hundred years! At that time, wouldn’t the resources of the sect be inexhaustible?” “Moreover, as long as we send Qiao Zifeng on stage, the task of humiliating the Bixiao Peak given by the peak master will also be successfully completed!” “No! We’ll complete the task of humiliating the entire Bixiao Peak!” Then what else was there to hide? Immediately report to the sect that they had obtained the resources that a peerless genius should have obtained! Because of this, this elder quickly flew towards the treasure pavilion. First, let’s not talk too much. He was talking about Lin An. At this moment, Lin an and Qian Yi were enjoying their breakfast. The two of them didn’t know. The other inner disciples of the entire Jiuxiao sect had already produced many powerful figures after ten days of cultivation. Furthermore, each of them had been given the same mission by their peak master! That was to humiliate Bixiao Peak during the inner sect competition! And their target was Lin an! 1 <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The next day. Early morning in the dew. It was very lively in the Jiuxiao sect. At this moment, the teams led by the elders of the various sects had already set off from the main peak and were rushing towards the Golden Cloud Peak. Every year, the inner sect competition would be held on the Golden Cloud Peak which was controlled by the sect master. This was also to highlight the status of the Golden Cloud Peak in the Jiuxiao sect, and at the same time, it was also a performance of the strength of the Golden Cloud Peak. At this moment, golden firmament peak was very lively. In front of golden firmament palace, there was a huge square. Smoke lingered around it, and the spiritual energy was very dense. It felt like water would be squeezed out if one touched it. Everywhere was full of vitality. As the disciples of the various peaks arrived, the Golden Firmament Square was bustling with noise and excitement. “Have you heard? Xiao Muran, who is standing next to elder Liu, is already in the late stage of the Foundation Establishment Realm!” “He successfully entered the late stage of the foundation establishment realm in just ten days. This person is indeed extraordinary!” “However, there aren’t many geniuses like Xiao Muran in the Jiuxiao sect. Only eight of them have appeared in ten years. Only under the leadership of clan leader Dugu Xin can he have such achievements!” “It seems that sect leader Dugu has too high a requirement for his disciples. Even Xiao Muran isn’t qualified to enter the ranks of personal disciples!” At this time, when there were more people, they naturally began to discuss the recent situation. Everyone was very curious about what stage the other senior and junior brothers were talking about, in order to know themselves and their enemies, so that they could advance and retreat in an orderly manner in the upcoming Grand Competition! As more and more people came here, the elders, disciples, and even the peak masters of the various peaks had already arrived ahead of schedule. This was how much importance they placed on the inner sect competition! And those disciples who had entered the inner sect ten days ago had all gathered in this square. Some of them even had excitement in their eyes. This spirited expression and fierce temperament were completely different from ten days ago. Some of them had a worried look on their faces and their brows were tightly knitted. They seemed to be much more dispirited than before. And the reason why they had such different expressions. Actually, the reason was very simple. The Smiling Man was an inner sect disciple who had achieved a breakthrough. The increase in his strength and the breakthrough in his cultivation made them full of confidence at this moment. They were preparing to amaze everyone in this competition and wanted to be in the limelight! As for those disciples who had a worried look on their faces, because of their talent, their cultivation did not increase much. This caused them to feel great pressure in their hearts. They were afraid of losing face for their divine peak. Following that, the sect master of Divine Peak issued a punishment! At this moment. A fairy with an otherworldly immortal aura appeared on the square. This person was dressed in blue silk clothes. She was tall and slender, and her black hair covered her hips like a waterfall. Her brows were filled with an otherworldly immortal aura. It was as if a fairy had descended to the mortal world, immediately attracting the attention of all the disciples! “This must be the legendary senior sister fairy!” “Zhang Ling ‘er!” “I’ve heard of her! She’s the number one genius acknowledged by the nine cloud sect in recent years. Her temperament is extraordinary, and it’s not something we can touch!” Zhang Ling ‘er was the number one genius of the nine cloud sect in the past fifty years. She was the personal disciple of the peak master of Purple Cloud Peak! The moment she appeared, she immediately attracted the attention of the disciples below the stage. Without mentioning anything else, she was just too beautiful! Although in terms of appearance, Zhang Ling ‘er was still quite a distance away from the peak master of Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi. Fortunately, the two of them had completely different temperaments. Zhang Ling ‘Er had a pure and innocent appearance, and her actions and manners were extremely refined! On the other hand, Qian Yi was an existence with a peerless beauty. It was just that...; It was just that her strange behavior did not leave a deep impression on people. A large part of the reason was that Qian Yi’s status was too high, and people did not dare to get close to her. Subsequently, not many people could savor her beauty in detail. The gossip was over. It was about the current Zhang Ling ‘Er. In the inner sect disciple competition 50 years ago, Zhang Ling ‘Er won the first prize with absolute strength! Since then, the resources of the Jiuxiao sect began to tilt towards the purple clouds peak. In fact, they even faintly overtook the golden clouds peak recently. It could be seen how much the entire sect had nurtured her! And Zhang Ling ‘ER had come here this time because of one person. Lin An! Ten days ago, after hearing that Lin an had cultivated the no beginning scripture to the foundation establishment stage, she was still in seclusion within the sect. She was extremely curious. And everything was about seeing before believing. If she hadn’t seen Zhang Ling ‘er with her own eyes, she wouldn’t dare to make a hasty conclusion. Following that, she had come here today for one purpose. To confirm whether Lin an had cultivated the scripture of no Genesis! Now, Zhang Ling ‘er stood on the high platform. Although she was still a disciple, in terms of treatment, she was already on equal footing with ordinary elders. Naturally, there was also a special place for her on the high platform. However. Zhang Ling ‘er swept her gaze across the countless inner sect disciples below the platform. She didn’t see Lin An’s figure in the crowd! This made her a little disappointed! On the other side. Qian Yi and Lin an were looking at each other as they sat, drinking the immortal spring and eating breakfast. It was very satisfying. Qian Yi had already said earlier that there was no need to rush to the inner sect grand competition. Because she knew that those who could arrive early all had one purpose, which was to gather intelligence and show off to each other. So, as long as they arrived at the Golden Cloud Plaza before the grand competition officially began, it would be fine. It was a complete waste of time to go early. At the same time. The entire Jiuxiao Sect’s elder in charge was already prepared to head to the front of the stage. When he saw that the elder in charge had already taken a step forward. Now, all the disciples began to quieten down. The elder in charge was the person in charge of the various matters of the Jiuxiao sect. He was the number one person after the sect master and a peak master. He also represented the supreme authority of the Jiuxiao sect. As long as the elder in charge made his move, it meant that the inner sect competition was about to begin. At this moment. A trace of doubt flashed through the crowd. “What’s going on? Why aren’t the people from green clouds peak here yet!” Hearing this, the disciples below the stage and some elders on the stage began to frown as they looked over. There wasn’t a single person in that area of green clouds sect. The inner sect competition was such an important matter, yet green cloud peak actually didn’t have anyone coming! This was nonsense! “It can’t be! I knew it. Lin an definitely didn’t make a breakthrough. He probably didn’t have the face to appear in the inner sect competition!” “I think it should be green cloud peak. They should be afraid!” “After all, that peak master had offended so many people previously. It’s normal for them to not dare to come to the inner sect competition!” “That’s right. I’m sure everyone knows that apart from getting an excellent result in this competition, we also have to teach Lin an A lesson!” As he spoke. The elder on the stage glared fiercely at the disciple who spoke. That disciple hurriedly covered his mouth. Although everyone tacitly agreed that they had to teach Lin an A lesson and make green cloud peak lose face. However, saying it out loud in such an occasion still made the elder displeased. It was good that everyone knew about this in their hearts! There was no need to say it out loud! At this moment. There were only a few breaths of time before the inner sect competition officially began. The elder in charge knew that he couldn’t wait any longer. He immediately came to the front of the high platform and was about to announce the start of the competition. Below the platform. In the exclusive arena of Bixiao Peak. A burst of black and white flames suddenly appeared on the empty ground. The instant heat wave swept over the surrounding disciples who were a few meters away, and they all covered their faces and retreated. Qian Yi brought Lin an and appeared on the arena. She had no scruples about everything around her, and she was even stingy with a lazy glance. At this time. The elder in charge came back to his senses. After taking a deep breath, he immediately shouted, “The inner sect battle arena! ! Start on time! !” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL A heat wave struck. Everyone at the scene was shocked. This was because there was actually a bone-piercing chill in the hot aura! At this moment, there was an expression of fear on the faces of every disciple. It was as if they were in a scorching desert, and half of their bodies seemed to be frozen. How could they not be shocked by this experience of being in the two realms of ice and fire. This was definitely the doing of the peak master of Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi! Putting everything else aside, this absolutely beautiful woman was able to instantly injure all the peak masters with a sword aura. Her strength was already without a doubt! During this short journey, Qian Yi was already too lazy to make a move and used her lazy knowledge to its fullest. It was Lin an who carried her over. The black-and-white Ashen Flames naturally came from Lin An. “The peak master of Bixiao Peak is indeed powerful. This black-and-white flame is truly rare. Has It already become so powerful?” “I can sense the aura of the late stage of the foundation establishment stage from Lin An’s body. Could it be that he has already broken through?” “Impossible. Previously, because of his good luck, he obtained the cultivation of the middle stage of the foundation establishment realm when he was in the foundation establishment realm. In just ten short days, he has grown to the late stage of the Foundation Establishment Realm?” “I won’t believe something like this. There must be something fishy going on!” Among the inner sect disciples, there were already people who began to have deep suspicions. It was possible for other disciples, but it was impossible for Lin an! How could a person who was publicly acknowledged to have average talent improve so quickly? There must be something fishy going on. The elders and peak masters on the stage were also looking at Lin An with strange gazes! This lin an looked a little dangerous! To be able to break through a realm in ten days, could he be a genius? Definitely Not! And many peak masters knew about Qian Yi’s background. Qian Yi’s identity as an alchemist was not a secret. It was just that during these years, Qian Yi did not deliberately show it. In fact, she had not refined medicine for hundreds of years. But her identity was publicly known! And to what extent, everyone did not know. It was just that with her identity as an alchemist, it was not absolutely impossible for her disciple to break through in a short time! An Alchemist’s method was to be able to raise a person’s strength by a realm through the catalysis of medicinal pills. This was like stimulating a person’s potential in advance. However, the result of this was that one’s potential would be exhausted! It was an act of uprooting seedlings to encourage growth! This was a big taboo in the path of cultivation. It was no different from entering the path of the Devil! After thinking it through, the various peak masters looked at each other and smiled. Their eyes were filled with schadenfreude. There was no time for idle talk. Lin An had no reaction to this. These inner sect disciples in front of him were no match for him. There was no need for him to take it to heart! As for the various elders on the stage, they were defeated by his master, so he didn’t need to worry at all! Lin An’s heart was like a sea of stars. How could he care about such a small figure. As for Qian Yi’s side, she was even more disdainful. In the entire Jiuxiao sect, the only person he cared about was this disciple beside him. The others could completely treat him like air. At this moment. On the stage, Zhang Ling ‘er frowned. She seemed to have smelled something unusual. “This person is Lin an? The person who cultivates the scripture of no beginning?” “Interesting!” Zhang Ling ‘er smiled tactfully and took a few steps forward. “Lin an, I heard that you have cultivated the scripture of no beginning. You must be exceptionally talented! I’m looking forward to sparring with you after the inner sect competition!” Logically speaking, when the results of the inner sect competition appeared, the senior brothers and sisters who had entered the sect before this could only give their junior brothers and sisters the right to spar. In other words, they could spar with their junior brothers and sisters in order to increase their arrogance and stabilize their dao hearts. At this moment, Zhang Ling ‘ER’s words were a little meaningful. First of all, Zhang Ling ‘er directly said that Lin an had cultivated the scripture of no beginning. Even though she wasn’t sure about this, it was a little abnormal for her to say it out loud. This was equivalent to flattery! Secondly, if Lin an obtained the first place in this competition and his senior brothers and sisters came out to compete at this time, as long as Lin an lost to her, his right to obtain the sect’s resources would be reduced by 10% ! No matter how one looked at it, he didn’t have any good intentions! In this regard, Lin an also looked at her indifferently. Zhang Ling ‘er was currently only at the Golden Core Stage. If coupled with her talent, she might be able to unleash battle prowess that surpassed the golden core stage. When the army comes, the water will be blocked! He was already at the late stage of the foundation establishment stage. As long as he was willing, he could immediately enter the peak of the foundation establishment stage. Coupled with the black-and-white Ashen Flames and the righteous energy demon sealing technique that was activated by the No beginning scripture, it wasn’t that he didn’t have the strength to fight. Lin an revealed a smile and didn’t say anything else. However. Zhang Ling ‘ER’s words spread out. It immediately ignited the arrogance of the other disciples present! Zhang Ling ‘ER’s status as a genius senior sister didn’t need to be said. She was a supreme existence. And now, this world was naming Lin an! Not her! In other words, in the eyes of this senior sister of hers, only Lin an could arouse her interest. Zhang Ling ‘ER’s decision immediately caused the talented disciples below the stage to be unconvinced. However, they didn’t show it on the surface. They only made up their minds and decided that they would definitely defeat Lin an on the stage! This would show this genius senior sister who she should value! And within the Jiuxiao sect. Zhang Ling ‘er could be said to be famous. Among them, there were some geniuses who wanted to become dao partners with her.  At this moment, everyone couldn’t help but turn their gazes toward Lin An. Other than his handsome appearance and outstanding figure, he was absolutely useless! His cultivation level was average at the late stage of the foundation establishment stage, and he didn’t even have the slightest bit of desire to win. This bit of cultivation was simply not enough! How could such a weak person have the ability to be challenged by Zhang Ling ‘er? Who Was Zhang Ling ‘er? ! She was a goddess-like figure in the entire Jiuxiao sect. At all times, she was in a calm state. When had she ever shown even the slightest bit of enthusiasm towards others? ! Therefore. The matter of Zhang Ling ‘er naming Lin an was equivalent to directly stating one thing. That was. As long as she defeated Lin an, she would be able to obtain Zhang Ling ‘ER’s recognition! Therefore, the crowd continued to discuss, and the central figure of the topic was Lin an! Seeing this scene, the various peak masters and elders standing on the stage laughed even more joyfully! The current situation was great for them. Zhang Ling ‘ER’s appearance was a stroke of genius, and she immediately directed the disaster onto Lin An. Lin an represented the peak master of Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi! That crazy woman. Everyone was very happy to see such a situation. Very soon. The discussions on the stage started to become more and more intense. The elder in charge on the stage couldn’t sit still anymore and immediately stood up and took a few steps forward. After taking a deep breath, the elder in charge immediately spoke. “Silence! The inner sect competition begins now! ! !” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The elder in charge waved his hand, and in an instant, many balls of light formed around him. With the second wave of Elder Zhang Shi’s hand, they landed in front of the various disciples. “These balls of light are the corresponding numbers to the opponents you will be facing next! This year’s inner sect competition will be a battle format. The person who stands victorious at the end will be the champion. However, if you fail once, you will be eliminated immediately!” Lin An looked at the ball of light in front of him, and the number seventeen appeared! Among the other inner sect disciples present, the corresponding number seventeen would be Lin An’s opponent. He was scheduled to face his rival in the first round. As long as Lin An defeated his opponent, he would enter the next round, and his competitor would be directly eliminated! After seeing the number, Lin An didn’t have any emotions. Instead, he looked forward to facing his opponent as soon as possible. Since he felt that he was facing some lackeys, he was eager to practice the alchemy skills he had learned from his master. However, according to his master’s requirements, Lin An would have to defeat more than one opponent. After the disciples discovered the identity of their challengers, the presiding elder on the stage continued, “The reward for doing well in the competition will only go to the top three disciples. The third-placed disciple will receive a breakthrough pill as a reward from the sect!” A breakthrough pill was a low-level first-grade pill! It was a very rare pill, and even in a sect like the Jiuxiao Sect, there wasn’t a lot of it stored! The primary function of the breakthrough pill was that, after a cultivator consumed it, there was a five percent chance of breaking through to the next realm. Even if it was during the final breakthrough stage of cultivation, as long as there was a breakthrough pill, it would undoubtedly increase a layer of protection! When they heard that the reward was a breakthrough pill, the inner sect disciples below the stage immediately gasped. “A breakthrough pill! It’s actually a breakthrough pill! I didn’t expect that the third-placed competitor would have received such a high-level medicinal pill!” “I’m not fated to get the breakthrough pill. The top three places will be too difficult for me to achieve!” “I wonder which disciple will end up with the breakthrough pill!” As the disciples chattered among themselves, the voice of the elder in charge rang out once again, “The second-placed disciple will be given priority in choosing the cultivation resources within the sect based on performance. In addition to the breakthrough pill, he will also receive an earth-grade, high-level, cultivation technique book!” As soon as the presiding elder finished speaking, there was a hiss among the inner sect disciples as they sucked in a breath of cold air. “An earth rank, high-level cultivation technique!” The disciples exclaimed. The cultivation technique was uncommon even within the Jiuxiao Sect. It was only taught to the personal disciples, and they could only learn it based on their contributions to the sect! The disciples below the stage looked eagerly at the presiding elder as he prepared to announce the reward for the winner of the inner sect competition. Going by the previous announcements, the disciples felt that the reward would be too good to be true. Looking at the eager eyes below the stage, the presiding elder curled his lips into a smile. “The winner will go through the sect’s judgment and receive the cultivation resources tilts. He will open the Jiuxiao Sect’s treasury and choose three treasures!” The elder had already finished speaking, but the silence below the stage persisted. It was so quiet that one could hear a needle drop! As the name implied, the cultivation resources tilts would be gifted to the winner, and they would choose any three treasures they pleased. For all cultivators, cultivation resources were an important and indispensable part of their survival. Possessing the cultivation resources tilts would enable the champion to access the Jiuxiao Sect’s treasury! The news was like thunder on a sunny day, and the crowd immediately exploded. Everyone was in a state of shock as they processed the information. At that moment, no disciple dared to speak softly. They were all eager to get the reward, and it was as if flames had burst out of everyone’s eyes. Many geniuses longed for the commencement of the tournament with the hope that they could secure the reward. Xiao Muran clenched his fists tightly as his eyes burned with desire. The rewards for the top three champions were all items that couldn’t be easily secured. He was now motivated to give it his all, and as he glanced at the group of senior and junior disciples beside him, his eyes were filled with intensity. “I will be allowed to choose three treasures from the Jiuxiao Sect’s treasury! No one can stop me!” When the surrounding disciples saw Xiao Muran’s expression, their hearts could not help but tense up. They all knew that going up against Xiao Muran would not be a pleasant experience. Anyone who faced him as an opponent would have to surrender in advance. That way, they could still preserve their dignity. ...; The first two disciples entered the staged and faced each other. After they cupped their hands together, they began to fight. Below the stage, Lin An turned his head to look at his master and smiled. Qian Yi had a lazy expression on her face as she watched the action. Under normal circumstances, Qian Yi should have sat directly above the stage since there was a seat on the balcony that was reserved for her. However, she had chosen not to sit with the other peak masters on the stage. Instead, Qian Yi was more willing to sit among her disciples. The various disciples faced each other in the battle rounds, and after some time, the sixteenth round was announced. The next round would require Lin An to step onto the stage. At that moment, a man dressed in a gray robe stepped into the arena. He was an inner sect disciple from Cang Xiao Peak, named Qiao Zifeng. Qiao Zifeng was already at the peak of the foundation establishment stage. He had successfully entered the ranks of the personal disciples of the elder master from Cang Xiao Peak. However, the news was yet to be announced. Therefore, in the eyes of the other cultivators, he was just an ordinary disciple! Qiao Zifeng’s opponent was already standing in the fighting arena. His name was Li Ming, and he was in the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage after ten days of cultivation. However, because of his talent, he was still a few days away from successfully breaking through. The other disciples considered Li Ming’s cultivation to be pretty good. The two fighters clasped their hands and bowed before they each took their stance. Instantly, Li Ming’s body erupted with the aura of the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage, like a gust of strong wind blowing across the arena. The disciples below the fighting ring were shocked. The intensity of Li Ming’s aura had already surpassed the strength of most of the cultivators present! Li Ming hooked his finger and said confidently, “Qiao Zifeng, come on!” Qiao Zifeng felt a wave of disdain in his heart, and his aura from the peak foundation establishment stage erupted. Before Li Ming could react, Qiao Zifeng had already rushed towards him. Bang! Before Li Ming could take a defensive stance, Qiao Zifeng had already struck him, and he simply fell to the ground. At that moment, everyone, including the peak masters from the Golden Firmament Peak, and the sect master from the Nine Clouds Sect, was shocked. The disciples ignored Li Ming as he lay on the ground and they all stared admiringly at Qiao Zifeng. He had successfully cultivated the peak foundation establishment stage. Out of one thousand people, only one person could flawlessly cultivate the stage. Qiao Zifeng was a peerless genius! The other peak masters above the stage all had disappointed expressions as they looked on. Why had such a genius chosen to join the Cang Xiao Peak Sect? However, Qiao Zifeng was still an inner sect disciple. The other peak masters hoped they could seduce him into joining their own divine peak and turn him into a personal disciple! The Cang Xiao Peak master laughed and said loudly, “Yesterday, Qiao Zifeng became a personal disciple in our Cang Xiao Peak!” After the announcement from the Cang Xiao Peak Master, the other peak masters dismissed their wishful thinking. The eyes of the disciples below the stage were green with envy. Qiao Zifeng was a peerless genius, an existence that could only be looked up to! He would only grow stronger once he gained access to the resources in the sect! Xiao Muran, who was below the stage, angrily clenched his teeth. It seemed that Qi Zifeng would take the first place position in the tournament. One disciple trembled as he approached Xiao Muran and said, “Senior Brother Xiao, we’ve found out that Lin An is number seventeen in the light sphere. He’ll be the next to go on stage!” Xiao Muran’s eyes revealed a fierce look. “Since the first place in this year’s inner sect competition seems to be taken, then I’ll have to complete my master’s order as soon as possible!” Because he could no longer compete with Qiao Zifeng, Xiao Muran would have to eliminate Lin An in the first round to gain favor in the eyes of his master. Immediately, a ball of light appeared beside Xiao Muran. It was the number seventeen! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Qiao Zifeng had appeared out of nowhere and defeated his opponent with one move. He had released the aura of a peak foundation establishment realm cultivator and caused everyone to fall into shock. He had proved to be a peerless genius, and the other disciples expected him to secure the first-place position. After Qiao Zifeng left the stage, the remaining inner sect disciples who had extremely high talent no longer had high hopes of winning the tournament. Xiao Muran was one of them. At that moment, his eyes were filled with anger. It was as if Qiao Zifeng had snatched something that belonged, and he felt helpless! The feeling made him clench his teeth, and a look of resentment formed on his face. However, Xiao Muran was now determined to face his opponent. He wanted to be the first to eliminate Lin An. This way, even if he couldn’t win the inner sect grand competition, he would still be admired by his master for eliminating Lin An in the first round. Xiao Muran planned to humiliate Lin An before eliminating him. He leaped onto the stage, and his gaze turned towards Lin An. The other inner sect disciples stared at Lin An in unison. Was he Xiao Muran’s opponent in the seventeenth round? “Lin An is too miserable! He will have to face a genius like Xiao Muran in the first round. It’s going to be a close call!” “I didn’t expect Lin An to be so mediocre. Even his luck doesn’t seem to be that good!” The whispers from below the stage reached Lin An’s ears. He scoffed at the other cultivators as he made his way to the arena. Among the crowd, Qian Yi was too lazy to even open her eyes. Soon after, Lin An had already jumped onto the stage, and he stood opposite his challenger. Xiao Muran did not hide the disdainful expression on his face as he looked at Lin An with interest. It was as if he was waiting for him to greet him. Under normal circumstances, when disciples of the Jiuxiao Sect competed on the stage, they would first make a polite gesture to show their courtesy. However, Lin An was unmoved. Instead, he keenly stared at the string of characters that were flashing across his eyes. “The success rate of the host defeating Xiao Muran with ten levels of cultivation is 100%!” “The success rate of the host defeating Xiao Muran with six levels of cultivation is 100%!” “The success rate of the host defeating Xiao Muran with three levels of cultivation is 100%!” “...;” When he saw the different success rates, Lin An’s contempt was written all over his face. ‘Is this the genius of the year?’ He only had to use a three-level cultivation technique to defeat Xiao Muran. Lin An was no longer interested in facing such a weak opponent. On the opposite side of the arena, Xiao Muran was instantly displeased. He did not understand the reason for Lin An’s disdain towards him. Was it because he was a disciple with average talent and had the identity of a good-for-nothing senior brother? “Lin An, I see nothing that you should be proud of. You actually didn’t even greet me when you entered the arena!” Immediately after Xiao Muran finished speaking, the inner sect disciples from the Golden Firmament Peak below the stage jeered. Wasn’t it natural for the weak to greet the strong? “Greet you? How can an inner sect disciple like you have the courage to ask a personal disciple to greet you? Are you worthy?” Lin An’s words were simple. Xiao Muran was an ordinary inner sect disciple. Compared to a personal disciple who served the peak master from Bixiao Peak, their statuses were far apart. Cultivators had always valued the different rankings amongst themselves. Simply put, Xiao Muran didn’t have the right to ask a personal disciple to greet him. When they heard Lin An’s words, the inner sect disciples below the stage trembled. They couldn’t refute Lin An’s words. The statement instantly stung Xiao Muran, and he defiantly responded, “When you lose miserably, you won’t be so proud anymore!” “What nonsense! Please, hurry up! I still have important things to do!” Lin An said calmly. The inner sect disciples below the stage thought that Lin An had gone crazy. They never thought that his personality would be so strong that he couldn’t even consider the consequences of irritating Xiao Muran. Bang! Xiao Muran’s aura suddenly soared. In an instant, a wave of air swept the stage, and his hair fluttered in the wind. Meanwhile, several spiritual arms promptly grew out of his body, and the spiritual energy that emerged was in the form of a dragon and a white tiger. The dragon and the tiger seemed to have a spirit as they stared at Lin An! It was a Dragon and Tiger Fist technique from the late-stage foundation establishment-level! The inner sect disciples below the stage looked at Xiao Muran in admiration. As expected of a genius, even though he wasn’t as talented as Qiao Zifeng, he should have received the attention of the inner sect elders and received a great opportunity. The Dragon Tiger Fist was a high-level cultivation technique! The power of the Dragon Tiger Fist was boundless. Combined with Xiao Muran’s late-stage foundation establishment strength, he could definitely unleash a powerful aura. For an ordinary cultivator, performing the Dragon Tiger Fist technique would instantly make one lose the desire to battle. Such formless terror usually scared people out of their wits, but now, everyone understood that Xiao Muran had mastered the powerful technique. However, they wondered whether it was a form of respect towards his opponent, or was it a form of humiliation! Did Xiao Muran intend to use his powerful strength to crush Lin An! The inner sect disciples turned their attention towards Lin An and became sympathetic. They could already envision Lin An’s miserable fate once his opponent used the power of the Dragon Tiger Fist. In his field of vision, Xiao Muran was already preparing to attack. He took a deep breath, and in an instant, a loud thud echoed in the arena. Xiao Muran had stomped his legs and a powerful explosive force had immediately caused cracks to appear on the stage. Soon after, Xiao Muran closed in on Lin An. The spiritual power of the White Tiger covered his right arm, and he bared his fangs and brandished his claws as he threw a punch at Lin An. The aura that erupted in that instant was like that of a true divine beast. The disciples could even hear the roar of the White Tiger. Lin An swiftly dodged the attack and performed a leg sweep kick on Xiao Muran. Boom! In the blink of an eye, Xiao Muran was sent flying across the stage like a kite with a broken string. He plopped onto the ground and started coughing loudly. As he coughed, blood spurted from his mouth. “How...; How did this happen? Why does he have such powerful strength!” Xiao Muran felt as if his ribs had been broken by Lin An’s kick! Theoretically, Xiao Muran had the protection of spiritual power, but it seemed that Lin An’s ability as an early stage golden core cultivator, had enabled him to break his ribs with just a normal kick. Everyone in the arena was astonished. The inner sect disciples below the stage furrowed their brows, and a storm brewed in their hearts. No one was willing to believe that Lin An had the strength to defeat Xiao Muran! “Impossible! Xiao Muran must have been careless!” “Lin An doesn’t care about martial virtue. He must have ambushed Xiao Muran!” “Fortunately, Xiao Muran wasn’t thrown out of the arena. Otherwise, he would have suffered a greater loss!” On the stage, Xiao Muran used all the strength in his body to slowly get up from the ground. Suddenly, he spat out a mouthful of blood. “Lin An, you’ve forced me to do this. I hadn’t planned on using this pill!” Xiao Muran stared fiercely at Lin An and continued muttering some incoherent words to himself. At the same time, he took out a blood-red pill and put it in his mouth. A burst of aura emanated from Xiao Muran’s body, when he raised his head, a terrifying spirit completely erupted. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Xiao Muran’s blood qi exploded. The inner sect disciples below the stage were awestruck. With the blood qi pill, even against a peak foundation establishment stage powerhouse like Qiao Zifeng, Xiao Muran would still have the strength to fight. The elders on the stage had also seen Xiao Muran’s actions clearly. At that moment, two inner court elders tried to stop him, but the masters from the Golden Firmament Peak stopped them. A blood qi pill usually consumed a cultivator’s blood, and in return, it gave a temporary burst of strength. However, it was not a fair method to use in the competition. Although ingesting the blood qi pill would increase the user’s strength temporarily by a large margin, the aftereffects would also be very troublesome. Xiao Muran’s health was now in danger after consuming the pill. Therefore, the presiding elder stood up and brushed his silver robe before addressing the crowd. “Since it’s an inner sect competition, any method is a manifestation of strength. Haven’t you all observed that Lin An has also improved his cultivation skills despite his ordinary talent! Qian Yi must have given him a pill similar to the blood qi pill!” After a brief pause, the elder continued, “As long as Xiao Muran doesn’t kill his opponent, even if Lin An is crippled from the beating, it will be because his skills are inferior to his challenger!” When they heard this, the elders who were about to step forward and protect Lin An shook their heads and returned to their seats. Although the use of the blood qi pill was a practice despised by the elders, who could guarantee that Lin An hadn’t used a similar pill? One disciple had consumed it on the stage, while the other might have consumed it secretly! Below the stage, Qian Yi maintained her lazy expression, and she didn’t attempt to protect her disciple. When they saw Qian Yi in such a nonchalant state, the elders who had tried to defend her disciple confirmed their suspicions. Lin An must have consumed a pill similar to the blood qi pill. After all, Qian Yi was an alchemist, and she had accumulated an identical number of pills as the elders present. On the battle stage, the blood qi pill in Xiao Muran’s body was surging, and it seemed as if he was about to explode. He gritted his teeth and activated the one thousand hands, Xuan Ming technique as he prepared to attack Lin An. On the other side of the stage, Lin An looked towards Xiao Muran, and a string of characters appeared in front of his eyes again. “Host’s success rate of defeating Xiao Muran with level three strength is 95%!” “Host’s success rate of defeating Xiao Muran with level five strength is 100%!” Lin An was expressionless, and his mind was already thinking rapidly. The blood qi pill could temporarily increase one’s cultivation. According to the change in his success rate, the pill had increased Xiao Muran’s strength by two levels. It seemed to have somewhat exceeded his expectations! Lin An had not expected such a small medicinal pill to give an extraordinary result! It was no wonder that alchemists had such a high status in the Cang Yun Continent. The medicinal pill had turned the contest into a life-and-death battle. However, Lin An was still happy with his chances of defeating Xiao Muran. ‘Does my fifth level strength include the Morality Demon Sealing technique and the black-and-white Ashen Flames?’ Lin An was confused as he thought about his next move. Would he have to use a wisp of flame to test Xiao Muran’s bottom line first, or would he use the Morality Demon Sealing technique to cripple him? Lin An was rooted to the spot, and he was deep in thought. “Thief! Hahaha! Lin An, you look scared! Now, obediently accept your death!” Xiao Muran said with a sinister expression. He had reached a point of no return. Qiao Zifeng had already outshined him in the tournament, and there was no chance of him getting the first-place position. To Xiao Muran, that had been an immense blow! Additionally, he was now being suppressed by Lin An, a disciple that he had usually looked down upon. After Lin An had proudly pointed out that he was a personal disciple, the words had hurt Xiao Muran’s self-esteem. As a once insufferably arrogant genius of the Jiuxiao Sect, Xiao Muran was not ready to allow others to suppress him! His self-esteem could not bear such humiliation! Especially when the person humiliating him was Lin An! After letting out a deafening roar, Xiao Muran spread out his hands, and the spiritual power of the Dragon and Tiger Fist coiled around his arms. At that moment, the spiritual animals had already turned scarlet red, like two bloodthirsty beasts that were about to suck blood. Even the experienced and knowledgeable elders were shocked when they saw the scene. Could Lin An withstand such a powerful attack? Some of the inner sect disciples below the stage covered their eyes in fright. The aura that Xiao Muran had emitted was too terrifying. The ordinary disciples felt their hearts tremble since they had never witnessed such an explosive aura. If such a cultivation technique were to attack an average cultivator, they would definitely be crushed to pieces! The inner sect competition had turned out to be too cruel. The disciples of the sects who had never set foot into the outside world had never seen such a frightening contest. “Die, Lin An!” Xiao Muran roared as he quickly rushed towards his rival. His aura was split into two halves as he swiftly charged towards Lin An. “Xiao Muran’s speed has increased so quickly! It’s at least twice as fast as before!” “I wonder if Lin An can block it!” One elder exclaimed as he observed the action. However, he was prepared to step in and stop Xiao Muran. After all, this was only an inner sect competition. It was acceptable for Xiao Muran to cripple Lin An or cause him to lose his cultivation. However, if any of the competitors lost their lives in the tournament, that would affect the image of the entire Jiuxiao Sect! Lin An felt Xiao Muran’s aura blowing towards him, and he activated the scripture of no beginning and began circulating the Morality Demon Sealing technique. Moreover, his fist was already emitting some dense white flames as he anticipated his opponent’s next strike. He had not chosen to use the Morality Demon Sealing technique to defend against Xiao Muran’s attack. In Lin An’s opinion, Xiao Muran’s speed wasn’t too fast. He was sure that he could defend himself from the incoming onslaught. Lin An was merely testing out the power that the white flames could unleash in actual combat. Just as Xiao Muran was running over, Lin An turned his body slightly and threw a punch. Boom! Lin An’s fist, whose impact was like that of a sandbag, landed on Xiao Muran’s abdomen. A muffled sound came out of Xiao Muran’s mouth, and his face had a distorted expression. It was as if his eyeballs were about to pop out. The immense pain from his abdomen caused the veins on Xiao Muran’s forehead to bulge. His eyes were bloodshot, and the impact from the punch seemed to have completely shattered the clothes on his back. In the next instant, a burst of pale flames shot out from Lin An’s fist, quickly passing through Xiao Muran’s abdomen and bursting out from his back. Suddenly, a wave of ghastly white light instantly filled the air above the fighting ring. It was as if snowflakes were falling from the sky. Soon after, a chill swept over the surroundings of the arena, and the temperature plummeted! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL As Lin An withdrew his fist, several icy blue flames emanated from his body. Xiao Muran felt his entire body turn cold, and his Dantian was completely frozen. He felt his spiritual power being instantly taken away by the blue flames. At that moment, he could no longer feel a trace of spiritual power fluctuation. It was as if his body had been drained of energy, and he could no longer stand. However, Xiao Muran’s consciousness was still clear. He knew that he was kneeling in front of Lin An, and he was paralyzed. His Dantian had been frozen and then shattered. It could not be repaired. Henceforth, he would be a cripple for the rest of his life. Xiao Muran had been confident in his ability to defeat Lin An. As long as he hit him with the Dragon and Tiger Fist, Lin An might have even lost his life. However, the rules dictated that the inner sect disciples could not harm each other’s lives. The elders from the Golden Firmament Peak would have protected Lin An. Unfortunately, the tables had turned, and Xiao Muran was a cripple. He raised his head slightly, but the bone-piercing cold air made him unable to speak. Lin An wiped the back of his hand casually as if he disliked the fact that his fist had been in contact with Xiao Muran’s body. At that moment, everyone in the arena was silent. No one had expected that the imposing Xiao Muran would be crippled by Lin An’s punch! The silver-robed elder from the Golden Firmament peak was so angry that he trembled. He had a vicious look as he stared at Lin An, and a series of words burst out from his mouth. “You! Unfilial disciple, you actually crippled Xiao Muran’s Dantian! I can’t believe that we have such a cruel person in our Jiuxiao Sect!” “Lin An doesn’t care about his fellow disciples. He severely injured a genius from our sect. He deserves to be killed!” Although Xiao Muran was his disciple, it had only been for ten days. It wouldn’t be a pity if he was crippled. However, Lin An represented the Bixiao Peak Sect. If he could use this incident to attack a rival sect, it would be a significant advantage. After he finished speaking, the silver-robed elder instantly walked onto the battle platform and stared at Lin An. However, he was no longer interested in Xiao Muran. He raised his hand to attack Lin An, but at that moment, a wave of aura accurately came from below the stage and caused the silver-robed elder to shiver involuntarily. Qian Yi, who was below the stage, had already opened her eyes, and she had been watching the events happening on the stage with interest. When the silver-robed elder sensed the wave of murderous aura, he didn’t dare to attack Lin An anymore. “You...; You’ve taught your disciple well!” The silver-robed elder’s tenacious desire to avoid a deadly confrontation made him change the topic. He knew that if his palm had touched Lin An, he would have been immediately intercepted and killed by Qian Yi! ‘This woman can definitely do it!’ A feeling of fear and humiliation ran through the silver-robed elder as he withdrew his attack. However, he couldn’t do anything. He slowly turned his head to look at the eldest master in the Jiuxiao Sect hoping that he would stand up and intervene. However, in the end, the silver-robed elder was disappointed. Xiao Muran, who was still kneeling in front of Lin An, had lost all of his mobility, and his body was cold. His hips were broken, and he couldn’t move at all. Below the stage, Qian Yi remained rooted to her position with a nonchalant expression on her face. Only when she looked at Lin An did a trace of gentleness appear. Throughout her time in the Jiuxiao Sect, Qian Yi had never changed. She had always acted on her own will, and she didn’t care about the feelings of others at all. Even the Jiuxiao Sect master had always been reluctant to confront Qian Yi. Dugu Xin stood on the stage and shook his head slightly before letting out a sigh. As the Jiuxiao Sect master, Dugu Xin knew the secret that made Qian Yi untouchable within the sect. If it were not for Qian Yi’s existence, the Jiuxiao Sect would have been destroyed in the great calamity that had taken place in the past. At the time, the Jiuxiao Sect elders had begged Qian Yi to leave the Nine Heavens Sect and join them. Fortunately, Qian Yi had only been acting alone ever since she had joined the sect, and she hadn’t done anything excessive. That had allowed the successive sect masters to avoid having any conflicts with Qian Yi. Regarding the recent battle between Lin An and Xiao Muran, Dugu Xin knew that there was nothing he could do to change the outcome. The reason was simple. First, Xiao Muran had consumed the blood qi pill in front of everyone. That was already against the morals of a cultivator. Xiao Muran had also expressed his intention to kill Lin An. If Lin An hadn’t crippled Xiao Muran, he would have died on the spot. Therefore, Dugu Xin didn’t dare to say anything at that moment. He was afraid that Qian Yi would seize the opportunity and cripple him. At least, in Dugu Xin’s heart, he knew he was definitely inferior to Qian Yi! Seeing that Dugu Xin had already tacitly agreed to the result, the other elders present maintained their silence. After some time, several disciples got onto the stage and lifted Xiao Muran, who was still kneeling on the ground. When he saw the scene, Qiao Zifeng’s gaze turned icy. Without a doubt, Lin An was far stronger than he had expected. However, Qiao Zifeng soon revealed a strange smile. How could a peerless genius at the peak of the foundation establishment stage lose to Lin An, who was still at the late stage of the foundation establishment stage! Lin An must have defeated Xiao Muran with the help of the protective magic treasure he had received from the peak master of Bixiao Peak. It must have been Qian Yi’s doing. As long as he got more information about the magic treasures, Qiao Zifeng was completely confident that he could defeat Lin An. In another corner of the arena, Zhang Ling raised her eyebrows. It as if she had seen something interesting. She sized up Lin An, and she was unwilling to let go of her gaze. As for the disciples below the stage, the scenes they had witnessed in the battle between Lin An and Xiao Muran still shocked them. Therefore, they could only hold their breaths and discuss in low voices. “Senior Brother Xiao Muran actually lost! This is simply unbelievable!” “There must be something fishy about this. I suspect that Peak Master Qian Yi is behind this. She must have given Lin An some magic protective treasures.” “This senior brother’s opinion is reasonable. I also agree that this isn’t Lin An’s strength, but the effect of the protective treasures! Otherwise, how could he be a match for Xiao Muran!” The disciples continued discussing the events that had happened fervently. However, when they saw Lin An step down from the stage, they instantly became quiet. Lin An passed through the crowd and walked towards Qian Yi. He smiled and said, “Master, I’m back!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Seeing Lin An’s arrival, Qian Yi only smiled and remained calm. Xiao Muran had been an inferior opponent, and he wasn’t worth taking to heart at all. On the contrary, Lin An seemed to be dragging things out a little. Even though he had scored a one-hit victory, in Qian Yi’s heart, Lin An was still too inexperienced. To deal with an insignificant challenger, he had actually needed to raise his hand! Qian Yi pursed her lips and gestured for Lin An to stand closer to her. On the other side of the arena, the silver-robed elder’s face was as cold as ice. Not only had Xiao Muran been crippled, but he also had no other disciple who could stand up for him in his enmity with Qian Yi. There was no chance for him to turn the tables. He could only turn his gaze to the other disciples from the Golden Peak mountain. As he exited the stage, the silver-robed elder ran into Qiao Zifeng. ‘Isn’t this the personal disciple to the peak master from Cang Xiao Peak!’ The Cang Xiao Peak master also had a rivalry with Qian Yi. However, he was completely no match against her. Therefore, Qiao Zifeng would definitely be motivated to stand up for his master and gain some face. Qiao Zifeng was like a steamed bun, a hope for revenge. Hence, the silver-robed elder was interested in forming an alliance with him. ...; The ball of light in front of Lin An had already disappeared. Not long after, the first round of the inner sect competition ended. The presiding elder instructed the losers to stand on one side of the square, while the winners from the first round stood on the opposite side. The elder stood on the stage and announced the rules for the next round. The second round of the inner sect competition would be a challenge by name. However, for the sake of fairness, every disciple would have three opportunities to reject a challenge from an undesired rival. When they heard the new rules, the elders on the stage whispered among themselves and discussed in low voices how they would deal with Lin An. In the end, the elders agreed to send their most outstanding disciples to take turns to challenge Lin An. After the discussion, they all looked at the disciples below the stage, and their eyes were full of amusement. When he saw that his master was looking at him, Qiao Zifeng nodded his head and quickly flew onto the stage. His eyes were full of arrogance as he twisted his head and circled the fighting arena. After looking around, he pointed at Lin An. “You’re it!” The inner sect disciples were puzzled. Could it be that Qiao Zifeng intended to face Lin An in the second round? The disciples below the ring looked at Lin An, and their faces were full of shock and then excitement. “The peerless genius Qiao Zifeng has actually named Lin An. He is in trouble now!” “Xiao Muran’s talent wasn’t bad, but Lin An overcame him. However, Qiao Zifeng is different. He is on another level!” “In my opinion, Lin An should refuse! After all, he has three chances to reject a challenge!” During his conversation with Qian Yi, Lin An had understood that he would be targeted. However, his rivals did not seem to care about etiquette, justice, and shame. They all intended to get onto the stage and challenge him publicly. However, Lin An would not be intimidated. In fact, the situation had turned out exactly as he had wanted it to. The reason was simple. If Qiao Zifeng was willing to take the lead and challenge him, Lin An would let him do it. He could use Qiao Zifeng as an example to the remaining inner sect disciples in the tournament. With no hesitation, Lin An went up onto the stage again. The elders above the balcony revealed smug smiles and looked at each other in surprise. They hadn’t expected Lin An to give up his right to decline the challenge. It seemed that while Qian Yi was arrogant and domineering, her disciple was extremely stupid. Since that was the case, she couldn’t blame anyone for Lin An’s expected fate in the competition. Therefore, the elders of Cang Xiao Peak sent a voice transmission to Qiao Zifeng. “Quickly, cripple Lin An!” Qiao Zifeng nodded slightly and said, “Lin An, I admire you very much! I didn’t think that you would have the courage to stand on this high platform. I don’t like to hold back, and my cultivation level is also at the peak of the foundation establishment stage. I’ll be able to break through to the golden core very soon. It’s still not too late for you to admit defeat!” The competition had not yet begun, but Qiao Zifeng had already revealed his trump card. As long as Lin An felt intimidated, his cultivation technique would definitely be affected. When they heard Qiao Zifeng’s statement, the inner sect disciples below the stage were already nervous. If they had been placed in Lin An’s position, they would definitely have rolled off the stage to avoid embarrassing themselves. Lin An’s bent his two fingers slightly, and two wisps of flames, one black and one white, appeared. The illusory flames quickly attracted everyone’s attention. The elders present tried to use their spiritual senses to probe the two wisps of flames. However, the power emitted by the flames was too strong for them to overcome. The flames were like black holes, and they devoured everything, including the spiritual senses of the elders. Additionally, the flames emitted an icy aura that prevented the spiritual senses from probing them. At that moment, everyone understood what was happening. Lin An’s flames were not simple! He must have used one of Qian Yi’s incredible treasures to generate them! However, since Lin An could take out a treasure, Qiao Zifeng was no different. Boom! A loud sound that could pierce through gold and crack rocks rang out in the arena. Blazing flames erupted from Qiao Zifeng’s body, and streaks of golden sword energy appeared. It was as if the sword was made of divine gold, and it emitted a mysterious aura. The disciples below the stage were all dumbfounded. What kind of power was this? The peak foundation establishment realm was actually so terrifying! “Lin An! You will now experience the strength of a peak foundation establishment realm cultivator!” It was too powerful! Qiao Zifeng had been able to spawn such powerful strength. The energy gathered on his body and exploded into blazing flames. It was as a hot, unbearable, sea of fire had engulfed the entire arena. The Jiuxiao Sect disciples were shocked. They didn’t dare to look at Qiao Zifeng since they were afraid that their eyeballs would melt. They couldn’t imagine how anyone would fight a monster like Qiao Zifeng! On the contrary, Qian Yi’s gaze remained calm. It was like a clear spring, unperturbed by the waves. There was a strong contrast in her appearance. In the eyes of the other elders, Qian Yi was too cold and heartless. It seemed as if Lin An wasn’t her disciple! Qiao Zifeng waved his flaming hand and was about to attack Lin An! However, at that moment, a cypress-like flame rapidly formed alongside Qiao Zifeng! It was just a small flame that was the size of a thumb, but it directly suppressed the flames that Qiao Zifeng had generated. Sizzling sounds could be heard on the stage. Everyone slowed down their breathing because they could feel that the air seemed to have frozen. They actually could not feel a trace of warmth. The atmosphere turned bone-chilling cold, and Qiao Zifeng’s arms seem to have frozen. A little while later, there wasn’t a single spark left on the stage. What kind of flame was this? The elders’ mouths fell open in shock. The disciples below the stage did not seem to understand what had happened, but the peak masters on the balcony had clearly seen the incident. Lin An’s casual flame had completely suppressed the flames erupting from Qiao Zifeng’s body! With such an enormous difference in strength, how could the competition continue? On the stage, Qiao Zifeng bit his tongue as he tried to activate his nerves. His Qi and blood slowly flowed to his arm, attempting to condense the flames again and melt the frozen ice! But just as the flames began to gather, Qiao Zifeng’s entire arm was completely shattered like glass, turning into ice crystal dust that drifted away. Immediately, pin-drop silence fell over the arena. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “The second son is too vicious!” An elder from Cang Xiao Peak roared angrily. His voice was full of helplessness and despair! In front of the disciples below the stage, he timidly tried to sound tough. “Qiao Zifeng is my peak master’s personal disciple! How dare Lin An use his dirty tricks to win the fight!” The elder’s voice was slightly hoarse and despairing. He turned his head to look at the peak master, hoping that he would stand up for his personal disciple. Originally, Qiao Zifeng had been his disciple. However, after he broke through to the peak of the foundation establishment realm, Qiao Zifeng had attracted the attention of the peak master. Naturally, the peak master would not let go of such a rare genius. He took Qiao Zifeng under his wing and turned him into his personal disciple. However, the Cang Xiao peak master stood on the balcony and maintained his silence. He didn’t even bother to look at the irate elder. The peak master was also nervous, and he could only act as if nothing had happened. He could feel Qian Yi gazing at him below the arena. The peak master was certain that as long as he dared to make a sound, Qian Yi would use the opportunity to kill him. As elders or peak masters, they were forbidden from getting involved in the disciples’ competition. Therefore, it would be unwise to raise any objections. The peak master had no choice but to watch the action unfold. Back on the stage, Qiao Zifeng’s expression was dull, and his eyes were unfocused. He didn’t understand what had happened to him. He lowered his eyes to look at his empty arm, and a chill instantly swept over him. If he wasn’t careful, his arm would be permanently damaged! Qiao Zifeng hurriedly turned to the side, afraid that his arm would shatter again. He didn’t even dare to look at his opponent. He now knew that if Lin An attacked him again, his life would be in danger. At that moment, Qiao Zifeng’s mind was a mess. He was so confused that he didn’t know how to proceed with the contest. Lin An was too terrifying! However, Qiao Zifeng had been wholly responsible for his predicament. Although he was extremely talented, his actual combat experience was too poor, and he also had an impatient personality. He had thought that as long as he activated the flames, he would be able to melt his frozen arm. In the world of cultivators, everything was about the balance of yin and yang. Once the ice had covered his hand, igniting a flame without assessing the situation would have naturally triggered the explosion! When things were extreme, they would definitely reverse! This showed that Qiao Zifeng’s actual combat ability was too poor. If it were a more experienced fighter, they would have first found a safe location and fought for time to melt the ice, instead of directly using force! Therefore, as long as they slowed down their mentality, even if they were frozen by the blue flame, they could still melt it with their spiritual power. If they used their full strength to suppress the blue ice flame and force the ice out of their arms, they would immediately attract the blue flame’s backlash! Qiao Zifeng’s arm had turned into ice crystals, and it was completely shattered. The ice crystal dust had then scattered into the air! The entire scene had been magnificent! When they saw this, the elders on the stage were so angry that they were fuming with rage. In their eyes, Lin An’s every move seemed to be a killer move! He had no mercy at all! Fortunately, even though Qiao Zifeng’s arm was destroyed, he still didn’t feel any pain. Once Lin An’s icy flame had touched Qiao Zifeng, his arm had lost all feeling, and he had lost consciousness. Qiao Zifeng, who had been filled with ambition, now looked like a tree that had lost its bark. His entire body instantly withered. There was complete silence below the stage. The inner sect disciples did not know what had happened. Lin An had just formed a small wisp of flame, yet he had displayed such a powerful might. Who exactly was Qian Yi? Did she actually possess such a powerful secret treasure! It was clear that Lin An had not used an ordinary treasure. At least in terms of rank, it had already reached the Heaven rank! How could Qian Yi have such power? The disciples now had endless suspicions about Qian Yi’s identity! Everyone was convinced that Lin An had not used his own strength. Zhang Ling’s eyebrows moved, and her heart pumped a little faster. If she were in Qiao Zifeng’s position, would she have been able to defend against the two wisp flames? Although the answer was uncertain, it was undoubtedly full of variables! At least from Zhang Ling’s point of view, if she had been in Qiao Zifeng’s position, she would definitely have paid a similar price! Did Lin An have any other trump cards? Had he even used the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ to fight Qiao Zifeng? When she thought about it, Zhang Ling frowned. Lin An was definitely not as simple as he looked! Furthermore, Zhang Ling had also heard stories about Qian Yi’s legend. In the past, other than peak master Qian Yi, no one else had dared to climb the Bixiao Divine Mountain. And now, Qian Yi had actually taken in a personal disciple for the first time. What was the reason behind this? Was it because of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning?’ Unable to figure it out, Zhang Ling could only stroke her chin as a confused look came over her face. Back on the stage, Qiao Zifeng was completely lost. After he regained his consciousness, he didn’t know whether to advance or retreat. With just one arm, he had no chance of winning against Lin An, who still possessed the blue flame. However, if he tried to escape, he would definitely become a laughingstock! Therefore, Qiao Zifeng could only look helplessly at his peak master. The Cang Xiao peak master also had a worried expression on his face. He hadn’t expected that his newly accepted personal disciple would encounter such an enormous challenge in his first inner sect disciple tournament. He was already on the verge of death. As Qiao Zifeng hesitated, several doctors walked onto the stage. Despite his injuries, as long as the doctors applied the black jade intermittent cream, Qiao Zifeng’s shattered arm could still grow back. Therefore, the doctors who were on the stage followed the prescribed treatment as they attended to Qiao Zifeng. With the doctors on the stage, the result of the fight was obvious. Lin An had won the contest. The inner sect disciples who were preparing to challenge Lin An took in a deep breath. They no longer had the courage to climb onto the stage. Xiao Muran and Qiao Zifeng had been no match for him. If a disciple with average talent stepped onto the stage to challenge Lin An, wouldn’t that be courting death? At that moment, Lin An had the aura of an Immortal Emperor. Nobody dared to approach him. Attempting to pick a fight with him suddenly seemed like a suicide mission! Qiao Zifeng, the peerless genius, had been defeated after only one move. Who else would dare to step into the arena and challenge Lin An? Lin An looked at the disciples below the stage with indifference. “If anyone isn’t convinced, they can come up to the stage and fight me!” After a brief silence, the crowd below the stage muttered softly, but no one dared to reply to Lin An’s challenge. Several disciples looked at their masters, only to see that their masters had turned their heads away. When they saw this, the disciples knew that in the eyes of their masters, Lin An was someone that they could not offend. This made the inner sect disciples below the stage feel a little more at ease. Even the masters and elders didn’t have the intention to probe further, which meant that they had already admitted that Lin An was the winner of the inner sect competition. What was there to think about now? If they couldn’t fight, couldn’t they hide? No one dared to accept the challenge. Seeing that there was no movement from the remaining competitors, the presiding elder stood on the balcony and announced, “In this year’s inner sect competition, Lin An is the champion!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL After the presiding announced that the first place belonged to Lin An, no one in the arena raised any objections. The scene remained silent. Naturally, the only outstanding issue was to decide on who would secure the second and third place positions. This was because Lin An had eliminated Qiao Zifeng and Xiao Muran in the early rounds. Unfortunately, the remaining disciples from Golden Firmament Peak and Cang Xiao Peak weren’t very good either. They couldn’t receive the remaining rewards. At that moment, the faces of the two peak masters were extremely cold and stern. They had never expected that the God Peak faction they had formed would encounter such a situation. However, the two peak masters remained defiant! They had no more disciples left in the inner sect tournament, so they naturally couldn’t compete with the disciples from the other peaks. Their only mistake had been trying to outshine Lin An! They had been too stubborn, but they had soon discovered that they had bitten off more than they could chew. The other sects were now in an advantageous position simply because of the two peak masters’ obsession with defeating Lin An. Although the rewards for the second and third positions weren’t as good as the rewards for the first place, they still carried a lot of weight. But now, there was no hope at all. As for Lin An, since he had recorded two consecutive victories over great geniuses, he was excluded from the rest of the tournament. No one dared to step forward and challenge him. The other inner sect disciples below the stage revealed envious looks in their eyes. Lin An had fought two geniuses, and he had defeated his greatest challenger with one move! Was this the strength of the Bixiao Peak? The inner sect disciples now had a different view of Lin An and Qian Yi. Could it be that the Bixiao Peak, a mountain peak that only had two people, was the strongest force within the Jiuxiao Sect? No one knew. However, several disciples were now thinking about joining the Bixiao Peak through a written test. In Qian Yi’s eyes, such a person was undoubtedly a joker! If Lin An hadn’t cultivated the ‘Scripture of No Beginning,’ she wouldn’t have taken him up to be her personal disciple. At that moment, Qian Yi looked at Lin An with warmth in her eyes. The disciple who slept and ate with her had not only made her feel at ease, but he had also made her feel proud. Such kinds of emotions had not existed in Qian Yi’s heart in the past. Lin An was like a spring breeze in the night, gently blowing through and bringing about a revival to everything in Qian Yi’s world! Following Lin An’s success in winning the tournament, he would receive his reward after three days. Since Bixiao Peak only had two members, there was nothing left for them to look forward to in the tournament. Immediately, a burst of flames erupted. Lin An grabbed Qian Yi’s hand and disappeared from the spot in an instant. ...; Three days had passed since the inner sect disciples’ tournament. Over the past few days, the situation in the Nine Cloud Sect had changed drastically. Everyone had learned to ignore the howls coming from Golden Cloud Peak for three consecutive days. They had been clear at first, but they had later become increasingly hoarse. In the end, the inner sect disciples from the other peaks could no longer recognize Xiao Muran’s voice. The howls had made the hearts of everyone on the surrounding main peak tremble. Xiao Muran, the arrogant genius, was now a cripple. The entire Golden Firmament Peak could not bear the humiliation, and Xiao Muran had completely collapsed. On the other side, at the Cang Xiao Peak, Qiao Zifeng had kneeled in front of his peak master’s loft for three days and three nights. In the end, because of Qiao Zifeng’s exceptional talent, the peak master had spared him and arranged for him to use the black jade intermittent ointment. In time, Qiao Zifeng would regrow his broken arm. Nevertheless, Lin An had greatly affected his cultivator’s Dao heart. In the future, Lin An would become Qiao Zifeng’s inner demon. All the other God Peaks were shrouded in a cloud of worry. The two members from Bixiao Peak were the only ones who enjoyed their time outside. In the early morning, the peak was shrouded in a thick fog, and it looked like a real fairyland, Apart from the fact that Lin An had defeated two geniuses with a raise of his hand and won the inner sect competition, he had also satisfied Qian Yi’s expectations! He was now on the verge of receiving the resources from the sect and opening the sect’s treasury. Lin An had already woken up early, but Qian Yi was still lazing around in her bed. Lin An had decided to practice a minor cycle from the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ in the bamboo forest. He had thought that he would experience a few titanic battles in the inner sect competition. However, Lin An had been disappointed since the geniuses he had faced were so weak that they hadn’t aroused his desire to fight. For this reason, Lin An was still in the late stage of the foundation establishment stage. After circulating one hundred minor cycles, he felt his realm loosen up, and he was excited. After his brief workout, Lin An recalled all the basic alchemy pillars that Qian Yi had taught him. Afterward, he began fusing the black and white wisp flames. He spread out his hands, and two tufts of flames immediately burned fiercely. Once Lin An cultivated the ‘Scripture of No Beginning,’ the morality demon sealing technique was activated. The two tufts of flames moved closer to one another. However, when they made contact, they bounced off each other in an instant. Suddenly, a powerful energy erupted. This energy was much stronger than the power of a single flame. The two flames seemed to repel each other, and neither seemed willing to submit to the other. Lin An would have to think of a way to merge the two flames later. He completed his cultivation and made his way to his master’s quarters. ‘It’s time to go to the sect to receive the reward!’ Qian Yi had already told Lin An that he would have to attend the ceremony at the Golden Cloud Peak. ‘Master, you are too irresponsible with your disciple’s daily life! It seems like you don’t care about your disciple’s other aspects other than training!’ Lin An shook his head and smiled. He understood that Qian Yi had to be hard on him. If she hadn’t insisted on his training, it would have been embarrassing for him to lose out on the rewards. Moreover, he also had the success rate system which was beyond everyone’s understanding! In this world, there was nothing that Lin An could not see! When he entered the bamboo house, he saw Qian Yi lying lazily on the bamboo bed. Her posture was beautiful and enchanting. After calming his heart’s palpitations, Lin An greeted Qian Yi and left. ...; On the Golden Cloud Peak, there was an empty space in front of the Treasure Pavilion. Several disciples had already gathered in the square. Among them were the second and third-placed disciples from the inner sect tournament. An elder had led them to the Golden Cloud Peak. The reason why the elder had accompanied them was because they needed someone to serve as a reference. The elder had cultivated for a longer period of time than they had as disciples, so he had a clear judgment on the quality of the rewards. With the elder’s help, the disciples would be able to obtain the best rewards out of the gifts that had been offered. Not long after, everyone frowned when they saw Lin An appear alone. The Bixiao Peak master was still too lazy. She didn’t care about her only disciple! Soon, the elder in charge appeared, and the crowd approached the Treasure Pavilion with their eyes filled with anticipation. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL A large group of people swarmed towards the elder in charge. In reality, the rewards had nothing to do with them. However, for disciples who had just joined the inner sect, it was necessary for them to have ambition and expand their horizons. Therefore, even though only the top three disciples would receive the rewards, the inexperienced cultivators wanted to be part of the ceremony. Lin An had an opposite demeanor to that of the crowd. His expression was indifferent, and he just waited patiently. The winner of the inner sect competition could randomly pick three treasures from the treasure trove. Lin An could use the success rate system to evaluate the treasures and take whatever he needed! On the other side of the square, Zhang Ling looked at Lin An with interest in her eyes and several thoughts ran through her mind. ‘How can he be so indifferent? Doesn’t he know the reward for the first placed disciple in the inner sect competition?’ ‘Lin An doesn’t seem so abrupt!’ How could Lin An put up with such a lazy master? Ever since he had won the inner sect tournament, he seemed to have lost his value to Qian Yi. Was this the reason he had attended the event at the Golden Cloud Peak without his master? Zhang Ling’s gaze shifted. At that moment, the disciples had already entered the Treasure Pavilion under the guidance of the elder in charge. This was a rare chance for the average inner sect disciples to enter the Treasure Pavilion. It was divided into three levels. The higher the level, the more precious the treasures stored inside were. After everyone had entered the pavilion, the third-placed disciple received his reward. He had secured a breakthrough pill. The disciple who had come in second also received a treasure from the Treasure Pavilion as a reward under the authority of the elder. As the disciple received the treasure, a look of excitement burned in his eyes. It was as if they were about to shoot out a ray of light. If it wasn’t for the fact that the peerless genius, Qiao Zifeng, had lost his arm, and the genius, Xiao Muran, had been crippled, the second-placed disciple wouldn’t have received the reward. The more he thought about it, the more excited he became. He felt like he was the favored son of heaven, the son of fate! Suddenly, Lin An was the only competitor on the pavilion who hadn’t received his reward. The elder in charge glanced at Lin An and noticed that he was alone. He frowned slightly, but he stopped himself from showing any more emotions. According to tradition, after every inner sect competition, the disciples who were eligible to receive the rewards had to be accompanied by their masters. On the path of cultivation, anyone who became a master had to be responsible for their disciples. Unfortunately, Lin An didn’t seem to have much luck! With such a master, his future achievements would definitely be hindered. The elder in charge walked towards the inner sect tournament champion and asked, “Lin An! Why didn’t your master come with you?” “My master went out for some business, and she hasn’t returned yet!” Lin An replied calmly. It would have been embarrassing to reveal that Qian Yi was still sleeping in her bed! Lin An had to find an excuse and prevaricate. The elder in charge flicked his long sleeves and said calmly, “If you feel that you are not valued on Bixiao Peak, you can transfer to any of the other main peaks in the Jinxiao Sect.” According to the rules, if a disciple was not valued in their sect, and the other divine peaks felt that they could be nurtured, they could bring up the idea of moving to another main peak. In the elder’s opinion, Lin An had already won the inner sect competition, which meant that his talent was already proven. However, the Bixiao Peak master had actually chosen to miss such an important event. The elder naturally thought that, in Qian Yi’s eyes, Lin An had lost his value. No one had ever thought that Qian Yi had absolute trust in Lin An. It seemed that she wasn’t willing to waste her time to see him receive his reward. However, Lin An knew the reason Qian Yi had skipped the event. She had spent all night refining the black flame pills. Under normal circumstances, it would take a disciple one thousand years to refine the black flame pills. Lin An had a secret desire to become a Dao partner with his master! That morning, he had inadvertently glanced at his success rate of refining the black flame pills. The success rate had already reached 20%. In just ten days, the success rate had increased from 0% to 20%! Lin An had no reason to leave Qian Yi. He quickly rejected the elder in charge’s hint. When he saw this, the elder didn’t stay any longer. He immediately brought the group of disciples to the second floor of the Treasure Pavilion. After all, the second floor had many supreme treasures. When everyone got comfortable on the pavilion, the elder in charge finally spoke. “Lin An, according to the rules of the inner sect competition, the winner can choose three treasures from the second level of the Treasure Pavilion! You can choose now! Since your master isn’t here to watch over you, observe the treasures and think clearly before making a choice!” The elder in charge had been in the sect for over seven hundred years, and he was very conscientious. His words were also relatively fair. He wanted to remind Lin An that such an opportunity was rare. A disciple had to choose the treasures that were beneficial to him. One couldn’t make the wrong choice because of a particular treasure’s flashy appearance. Lin An nodded his head before walking into the inner court of the Treasure Pavilion. Instantly, several treasures caught Lin An’s eyes, and a string of characters appeared in his vision. “The Seven-Star Dragon Sword. This is a low-level, low-grade, immortal sword forged from meteorite steel through a hundred thousand hammer strikes. It cuts through ordinary iron like mud and can release the user’s spiritual energy. The host can get 100% of the weapon’s power!” “A Ninth-Level Ice Soul Needle. It is a secret weapon of the Tang Sect, and it’s made from the ice soul of the Arctic region. It mainly attacks the opponent’s acupuncture points, making them lose their ability to fight. It can also infuse poison. The host’s success rate of utilizing this treasure would be 100%!” As he looked at the spiritual treasures, Lin An couldn’t help but shake his head. It was as if he wasn’t satisfied. When the other disciples saw this, they were instantly shocked. What kind of judgment did Lin An have? Why had he shaken his head after looking at such a wonderful treasure? He hadn’t even taken another look at it! The two treasures were supreme and rare. However, Lin An had avoided them. The disciples could only look at him with envy. In their hearts, they despised his poor taste. They had expected this! Since Qian Yi hadn’t accompanied him, Lin An’s poor decision-making skills had been exposed. What kind of genius was he? He was just an ignorant youth who had no vision! If any of the other disciples had secured first place in the inner sect competition, they wouldn’t have hesitated to pick any of the two treasures! Several low murmurs could be heard among the crowd. However, Lin An ignored the chatter behind him. Instead, he focused on finding a treasure that he could be interested in. At that moment, a dusty medicinal root appeared in Lin An’s vision. His eyes lit up, and the corners of his mouth curled up into a smile. “This is a Black Wood Dragon stalk. It’s a 4,000-year-old mutated elixir. Its survival rate is 0.1%! There is a soul of a Wood Dragon hidden within the stalk! The host’s success rate of extracting the Wood Dragon is 100%!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “Senior Elder, I will pick this medicinal herb as my first treasure!” Lin An said as he turned his head towards the elder in charge. He had not hesitated after seeing the rare mutated spiritual herb. He had immediately requested to obtain it. When they heard Lin An’s choice, the inner sect disciples behind him revealed contemptuous smiles. Lin An had picked a grey medicinal root instead of a good low-level treasure. He had not even asked where the root had been dug out from before it was placed on the second floor of the Treasure Pavilion. In the eyes of the inner sect disciples, this wasn’t necessarily the root of a plant. They thought it was a piece of grey soil. They couldn’t detect any spirit energy fluctuations on the piece of soil, so they concluded that it had no value. If they had been in Lin An’s position, they wouldn’t have accepted the piece of grey soil. Such a low-grade item would not even be suitable for their status if they were to put it on their bodies. The elder in charge also had a worried expression as he stared at Lin An. “Your taste is awful! If Qian Yi doesn’t come, I think our Jiuxiao Sect will save a lot of valuable things!” However, the elder in charge didn’t think too much about it. He crossed out the information about the herb from his record book. This meant that the “treasure” would be released from the Treasure Pavilion and handed to Lin An. After putting away the black Wood-Dragon root, Lin An took another step forward. The inner sect disciples could only follow behind him. “Look, this is a mid-grade earth rank cultivation method. It’s really amazing. The Treasure Pavilion actually has such a high-grade cultivation method with extraordinary power. I think that bastard Lin An will choose this cultivation method!” “That’s right. If I had the right to choose, I would definitely choose this cultivation technique! It would definitely help me make great progress in my cultivation!” “What a pity. If this cultivation technique were to be placed on Lin An, it would be a waste!” Despite the disciples’ opinions, Lin An only glanced at the cultivation technique for a moment before quickly advancing forward again. A mid-grade, earth-rank, cultivation technique would certainly add an advantage in terms of rank to an ordinary disciple who did not have any cultivation technique resources. It could even change the path of their subsequent cultivation. With a mid-grade cultivation technique, they would have an additional layer of life-saving ability. Moreover, in the Cangyun Continent, strength was the most important trait. Improving one’s strength was the most suitable way to advance their skills. Therefore, everybody wanted to learn cultivation techniques to advance to the next level. However, under the guidance of a master like Qian Yi, would Lin An struggle to learn such a low-grade cultivation technique? When he thought about it, Lin An did not need to hesitate. He felt it would be a waste of time to even take a second look at the ordinary cultivation technique. He simply turned around and left. Even the elder in charge kept shaking his head. He couldn’t keep track of the number of times he had shook his head and sighed since Lin An arrived at the Treasure Pavilion. “Do you understand what it takes to cultivate? Such an excellent opportunity actually passed you by, and you didn’t even blink!” It wasn’t as if Lin An had asked for hints from the elder in charge. He had been willing to give Lin An a detailed introduction to the treasures in the pavilion. However, Lin An had rejected the offer. Time went by, and Lin An continued to stroll around the Treasure Pavilion. The inner disciples behind him whispered among themselves, shaking their heads and sighing. Suddenly, Lin An stood still. On the shelf in front of him, there was a dark green treasure cauldron. Its body was relatively sturdy, and a steady aura faintly surrounded it. On the surface of the medicinal cauldron, there was a lifelike flame totem drawing. As the cauldron slowly rotated, the flame totems shot out faint rays of light that were vaguely visible. The simple and unadorned aura caused the inner sect disciples to involuntarily tremble! Just by looking at the medicinal cauldron, the disciples could tell that it was not a simple treasure. However, they did not think that it was a peerless treasure. The reason was simple. While the medicinal cauldron possessed the characteristics of a high-grade treasure in terms of its temperament, its surface was covered with green copper rust. It had even turned green. The disciples could tell that the medicinal cauldron had been in the Treasure Pavilion for a very long time. If such a medicinal cauldron was really a treasure, it would have been possessed by the alchemist elders in the Jiuxiao Sect. However, it had been placed in the treasure trove pavilion for a long time, and nobody had taken care of it. A thick layer of dust covered the top of the so-called treasure. This could only mean that the medicinal cauldron had no value. Perhaps it was because the alchemists had failed to see the value of the medicinal cauldron which was why they had failed to refine its medicinal pills. Additionally, there were cracks of different sizes on the surface of the cauldron. It was as if it was ready to explode with a light touch. Throughout the Cangyun Continent, alchemists were clear about the properties of a medicinal cauldron. It was uncommon for it to explode when refining medicinal pills. If a cauldron exploded, it would lead to the loss of precious medicinal herbs. Furthermore, the power produced by the explosion of a cauldron was similar to the spiritual energy produced during the explosion of a mighty figure. Therefore, under such circumstances, the cracked medicinal cauldron was like a scourge that had caused people to avoid it at all costs! But now, Lin An seemed to be interested in the cauldron! This made all the disciples sigh again at Lin An’s poor judgment! Could it be that in order to please his master, he intended to choose the cauldron as a reward? That seemed to be the only logical and explanation The elder in charge shook his head. He was an alchemist, and his ability to refine medicine was second to none in the Nine Clouds Sect! Of course, Qian Yi had never displayed her ability to refine medicine. Therefore, the elder in charge felt that he was the best alchemist in the Jiuxiao Sect. Otherwise, he could not have secured his position as a presiding elder. His identity as an alchemist was an important bonus. In the elder’s opinion, Lin An had chosen the cauldron in order to please Qian Yi! ‘What a pity!’ Once Lin An placed the cauldron in front of Qian Yi, it definitely wouldn’t impress her. To the elder in charge, the cauldron was extremely mysterious. However, he felt it was a pile of scrap metal! The so-called cauldron was like a spiritual treasure. Once it absorbed the spiritual energy of the world, the materials used to create the cauldron would be useless. Therefore, there was no possibility of repeated forging using the medicinal cauldron! Lin An was bound to be disappointed! However, he couldn’t help but frown after he heard the criticism from the surrounding inner sect disciples. They were like a swarm of flies, buzzing non-stop. Despite the disapproval around him, Lin An resolved that he would not let go of the medicinal cauldron! As he looked at the cauldron, he revealed a strange smile. “The Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron was originally a strange purple stone. After absorbing the essence of the sun and moon for over a thousand years, it became a cauldron. It was naturally formed and could completely fuse with the heaven and earth. It can fuse with all spiritual herbs, and it is ranked thirteenth on the Divine Cauldron rankings!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL On the Cang Yun Continent, alchemists had a high status. Through the integration of various ancient books, they had put together a list of the best cauldrons on the continent. Other than having various enhancements to alchemy, the divine cauldrons on the list also had one thing in common, they had not been forged by humans. Instead, they were naturally formed cauldrons that used the heaven and earth as a furnace, and the Qi of all living things as their essence! The Purple Abyss Cauldron was ranked thirteenth on the list. It had originally existed as a strange purple stone. After absorbing the essence of the sun and moon for thousands of years, it had turned into a cauldron. After hundreds of thousands of years of circulation, the Purple Abyss Cauldron had gained an illustrious reputation. According to the ancient records, the body of the cauldron emitted a purple light, and it had three leg stands that looked like a retractable claw. Once it was placed on the ground, it could pierce into the earth and absorb its essence. However, the Purple Abyss Cauldron before Lin An looked like it was in tatters, and a doubtful expression formed on his face as he examined it. Right on cue, a string of characters flashed in front of Lin An’s eyes. “A hundred thousand years ago, all the cauldrons in the world joined forces to refine a divine herb, but the herb couldn’t be tamed, and there was a change in the process. From then on, the cauldrons slowly disappeared into the long river of history. To repair them, they needed to be tempered again with extreme fire to reverse the damage! Currently, the host’s success rate of using the Black and White Ashen Flames to repair the Purple Abyss Cauldron is 41%!” Seeing this, Lin An immediately understood. It wasn’t that the divine cauldrons had changed their appearance, but that they had been damaged after undergoing a botched refining process. Now, they needed the extreme fire to repair them. It seemed that the Black and White Ashen Flames that Lin An possessed were a type of extreme fire. What surprised him the most was that there was a kind of divine herb that had actually caused the nineteen divine cauldrons to explode because they couldn’t withstand it. When he saw Lin An’s excited expression, the elder in charge crossed out the divine cauldron from the record book. The Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron would now belong to Lin An. According to the success rate system, his probability of repairing the cauldron was 41%! Lin An felt that he had to give it a try first. Abruptly, the Black and White Ashen Flames in Lin An’s hand lit up and enveloped the entire purple abyss divine cauldron. At the same time, the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron absorbed the flames released by Lin An. The dark green copper rust started to slowly recede, and the cauldron emitted traces of noble purple aura. It was like a raging wave that rose and fell, instantly filling the entire Treasure Pavilion. The aura gave everyone a refreshing feeling. It was as if their spiritual sense had been enlightened. However, in the next moment, the feeling disappeared. The aura immediately shocked everyone, and they were dumbstruck. What kind of treasure could emit such power? The presiding elder’s eyes were wide open, and his forehead was covered with beads of sweat. As an alchemist, he understood that the essence of the cauldron had been dormant for ten thousand years. It had existed in the treasure trove ever since the establishment of the Jiuxiao Sect. However, he had no clue about its origin. He only knew that the medicinal cauldron was very mysterious, but he had not opened it. With his identity as the elder in charge, he naturally possessed the right to obtain a medicinal cauldron from the treasure trove. However, he had assumed that the purple cauldron would explode as soon as it encountered the Soul Force Fire. Hence, the elder in charge had dispelled the idea of possessing the cauldron. Over the years, many alchemists in the Jiuxiao Sect had stood in front of the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron for countless days and nights as they thought about possessing it, but in the end, they gave up because there was nothing they could do. But now, a disciple from Bixiao Peak had chosen the medicinal cauldron as a reward after winning the inner sect competition. Thus, the medicinal cauldron had been activated. The elder in charge had not expected this. He did not understand the origin of the cauldron, and he thought about approaching Lin An to ask him why he had picked the divine medicinal treasure. However, the elder in charge had a respected status. If the other elders learned that he had sought knowledge from a newly promoted disciple, they would despise him. Therefore, he could only pretend that he had no interest in the medicinal treasure. However, if he had understood its origin, then he definitely wouldn’t have allowed Lin An to obtain the cauldron! Lin An took the cauldron and placed it into the system’s space. The inner sect disciples behind him were green with envy. They didn’t know the origins of the divine cauldron, so they viewed it as a strange treasure. Therefore, they weren’t envious of Lin An’s divine cauldron. Instead, they felt jealous after seeing that he had a storage ring! Although storage rings weren’t rare items on the Cang Yun Continent, the medicinal cauldron was huge. The disciples all guessed that Lin An had a storage ring with a large space. That was a rare item. Lin An’s storage ring was at least five cubic meters long! All the disciples knew that storage rings with large spaces had the highest value! In the eyes of the disciples, Lin An’s storage ring was a hundred times more valuable than theirs! The disciples were further puzzled by the Bixiao Peak master’s actions. Why was Qian Yi willing to spend so much effort on a disciple by giving him such a large storage ring? Possession of an interspatial ring was extremely rare even among the elders. Lin An was just a newly promoted disciple, but he had obtained the ring. All the disciples present were envious. However, they were wrong to assume that Lin An had received the storage ring from his master. Throughout her life, Qian Yi had never cared about such worldly possessions. In fact, she hadn’t even stepped into the Treasure Pavilion for a thousand years. What the disciples didn’t know was that Lin An’s system space was infinitely huge. After he activated the system, he could feel the hissing of the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron. Without a doubt, Lin An had already formed a connection with the medicinal treasure. In order to prevent it from erupting with even greater power, Lin An had put the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron into the system space. Once he brought the treasure back to Bixiao Peak, he would definitely let his master teach him how to use it to refine medicinal pills. In the meantime, there were more important things to do. Lin An still had to choose one last reward from the Treasure Pavilion. He paced back and forth the Treasure Pavilion, shaking his head as he walked past the unique treasures. It was as if he wasn’t interested in any of the treasures at all. The scene naturally made the disciples who were following him grit their teeth! What the hell! There were so many treasures along the way, but none of them seemed to impress Lin An. If it were any other disciple, taking any of them would have been akin to having smoke rise from an ancestral grave! But now, Lin An had already missed out on thousands of treasures! However, the inner sect disciples didn’t have any complaints or displeasure. This was because they had been motivated to broaden their horizons after seeing the unique treasures. If they had not entered the Treasure Pavilion, they would not have learned about the different rewards available in the Jiuxiao Sect. Everyone hoped that Lin An would continue wandering around the Treasure Pavilion for three days and three nights! However, Lin An abruptly stopped after an iron piece caught his eye. “Hmm? Is this the extreme fire fragment?” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The extreme fire fragment in front of Lin An looked like a black iron plate. In terms of shape, it seemed to be the tip of a wholly activated fragment. Several letters were still vaguely visible under the black rust. However, no one knew what they meant. The letters made the disciples present feel a trace of Dao rhythm. Over the past few years, the elders in the Jiuxiao Sect had placed many unfathomable objects in the Treasure Pavilion. As for when and how they were obtained, it didn’t matter. At that moment, there was no record of the treasure in front of Lin An. Perhaps, it was something that an elder had collected by chance during his training. Or perhaps, it had been a disciple who had obtained the treasure by accident. As he looked at the fragment, Lin An focused on the system’s analysis. “This extreme fire fragment is corroded. It is the key to the Zhu Room of the Sacred Dragon Mystical Realm. The current probability of the host repairing it is 1%. However, if you use the Xiuyu grass and the Lily of the Valley roots, you can wash away the corroded part. The repair rate will be 100%!” At first glance, the piece of metal seemed to contain some information. However, it needed to be repaired. Lin An didn’t know what kind of existence the Sacred Dragon Mystical Realm was. Once he returned to Bixiao Peak, he would consult his master. As for the metal itself, Lin An had no information about its true value. He would have to wash away the corroded parts in order to learn some additional details. Naturally, the metal plate was Lin An’s final reward. When they saw that Lin An had chosen the ordinary piece of metal, all the inner sect disciples present were overjoyed. They felt that Lin An’s taste was terrible! Up until that moment, none of the disciples had criticized Lin An’s strength and talent since he had already defeated two geniuses and reached the peak of the inner sect competition! As for his taste, the disciples felt that Lin An simply wasn’t sophisticated. If it had been any other disciple from the other main peaks, wouldn’t they have performed better than Lin An? The other main peaks were all well taken care of by the respective elders and their disciples. As for Bixiao Peak, the entire mountain was overgrown with weeds. There weren’t any buildings at all, and no child was assigned to sweep the compound. That was enough to prove that Qian Yi was unqualified to be the Bixiao Peak master. And now, Lin An had arrived at the Treasure Pavilion by himself to pick his rewards. Of his three choices, one treasure was a gray grass root. It was no different from the tree roots that were casually dug out from the wild mountains! The second treasure that Lin An had chosen was a tattered cauldron. Compared to the Golden Treasure Cauldron, it was a thousand miles away! The last treasure that he had chosen was the black metal plate in front of him. The disciples felt that Lin An had chosen the three treasures because Qian Yi hadn’t accompanied him to the Treasure Pavilion. In the end, they concluded that Lin An’s poor taste was the principal reason he had picked the unimpressive treasures. There was a look of sympathy in their eyes as they stared at Lin An. However, there was also a feeling of heartache. If it were any other person, would the glorious rewards in the Treasure Pavilion have escaped their eyes? Some inner sect disciples could not help but sigh. The elder in charge was also a little dumbfounded. Even though he was an important manager in the Jiuxiao Sect, he only knew a few details about the mystery of the piece of metal. It had been linked to a legendary mystic realm called the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! It was said that the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was the place where the Holy Dragon Lord had died. It was about eight hundred miles south of the Jiuxiao Sect. The mystic realm would open once every one hundred years. For thousands of years, no faction within the Jiuaxiao Sect had entered it. The elder in charge had once visited the mystic realm a few hundred years ago. However, since he had not entered the second level of cultivation, he was forcefully excluded from the mystic realm. Since then, the elder in charge had become obsessed with the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. After seeing the black piece of metal, the elder in charge had gnashed his teeth in anger! He had abandoned his dream of entering the sacred realm. Instead, he had become an alchemist, and his status had been immediately elevated. However, during his journey to the mystic realm, the elder in charge had seen some foreign words written at the entrance of the realm. The letters were exactly the same as those on the piece of metal! The elder in charge had therefore guessed that the piece of metal was closely related to the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! Unfortunately, he had lost the right to enter the secret realm because of his elevated status within the Jiuxiao Sect. But now, Lin An had chosen that piece of metal. This had made the elder in charge recall his past! Could it be that Lin An knew the secret of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm? Or had he chosen the piece of metal by accident? However, there had been so many treasures shining in front of Lin An. Why had he picked an ordinary-looking piece of metal? It simply didn’t make any sense! When he thought about it, the elder in charge concluded that Lin An must have had information about the sacred realm. He had also chosen the mysterious medicinal cauldron. How many mighty figures of the Jiuxiao Sect had stopped in front of the medicinal cauldron in the past? Now, Lin An seemed to have outsmarted them all. He had secured all the mysterious secret treasures that others had found useless. ‘Who exactly is Lin An?’ The elder in charge wondered. Could it be that Lin An had received orders from Qian Yi to pick the treasures because she wouldn’t have been allowed to make such a bold move? It was very likely! There were only two months left before the legendary Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm opened. The elder in charge resolved that he would observe Lin An and Qian Yi’s every move carefully! With a flip of his hand, Lin An stored the extreme fire fragment into the system’s space. The elder in charge had an unsatisfied expression as he crossed out the information of the metal fragment from his record book. The treasure would henceforth belong to Lin An. He packed up everything and looked at the elder in charge as he asked, “Senior Elder, where can I collect the cultivation resources entitled to the winner of the Jiuxiao Sect’s competition?” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The elder in charge was a little flustered as he casually said, “Lin An, the sect will arrange for the cultivation resources to be sent to Bixiao Peak in the future!” Lin An nodded his head in satisfaction before striding out of the Treasure Pavilion. During his time in the pavilion, Lin An had browsed through the first and second floors. He had scanned through all the information about the treasures in the pavilion without leaving anything out. To Lin An, the treasure vault was now just an ordinary storage room. There were no more valuable items for him to choose from. ...; On Bixiao Peak, in the bamboo forest, Qian Yi was sitting on a rocking chair, leisurely drinking her immortal tea. In the past, Qian Yi didn’t have the habit of drinking immortal tea during the day. At most, she would only take a sip. After she had taken up Lin An to be her personal disciple, Qian Yi had taken up the practice, and she drank less alcohol during the day. She didn’t realize that Lin An had changed some of her habits. For cultivators, habits were formed after hundreds or even thousands of years. Once Qian Yi realized that she no longer drank during the day, she would definitely be shocked! When she saw Lin An walking into the compound, Qian Yi raised her eyebrows. “You’re back? What rewards did you get?” Qian Yi had never paid any attention to the items in the treasure vault. To be more precise, she had never paid any attention to the entire Jiuxiao Sect. Thus, for so many years, Qian Yi had never set foot into the Treasure Vault. In the actual sense, Qian Yi didn’t really care about what Lin An had brought back. However, he was her only disciple, so she had a sense of duty towards him. Moreover, Lin An had always surprised Qian Yi in the past, so she thought he could do it again. Nevertheless, she did not have any high hopes about the rewards. After Lin An greeted his master, he took out a gray rhizome from his storage space. “A black Wood-Dragon Rhizome? Isn’t it four thousand years old? Does it have a wood dragon inside?” The gray rhizome wasn’t very eye-catching, but as soon as Qian Yi had seen it, she had been immediately attracted to it. Despite her reputation among the other elders, Qian Yi was experienced and knowledgeable. No matter how ordinary an item looked, as long as it was valuable, Qian Yi would be able to distinguish it. Just like the gray rhizome. If it had been an ordinary cultivator, they wouldn’t even be able to take a glance at it. But after Qian Yi saw it, her expression suddenly lit up. “Good eyesight! Disciple, help me up!” For immortal cultivators, standing up, especially for an almighty cultivator like Qian Yi, was a matter of will. However, Qian Yi had already developed a reliance on Lin An. She now depended on her disciple for even the smallest of tasks. Lin An approached Qian Yi’s side and helped her up. “Master, I saw that there was a faint spiritual fluctuation from this root, and the Wu Shi Scripture rumbled, so I brought it back. What’s so special about it?” If it hadn’t been for the success rate system, Lin An wouldn’t have noticed that there was something special about the root. Therefore, he wouldn’t have held onto it. “This is a black Wood-Dragon stem. The spirit herb has been around for 4,200 years, and it is a top-grade herb! The reason it looks so ordinary is that there is a spirit within its stem! This leads to another situation! The black Wood Dragon’s stem no longer has any usable value. The value will all go to the Wood Dragon spirit within! So, disciple, what you need to do now is to think of a way to nurture this Wood Dragon! I will help you!” After Qian Yi finished speaking, she turned and stared at Lin An with a meaningful look in her eyes. Weren’t there three treasures to choose from for the winner of the inner sect competition! Qian Yi wondered what Lin An’s two remaining two treasures would be. Would they bring her some kind of surprise? Qian Yi was still in the dark, but after she had seen the black Wood Dragon, her interest had peaked. Such a level of medicinal herb with a soul was extremely rare, even for Qian Yi herself. After putting away the stem, she looked at Lin An and asked, “Disciple, what did you choose for the other rewards?” “Master, I chose a divine cauldron. ” “A divine cauldron?” Qian Yi blinked as she tried to hide the look of disbelief that had involuntarily formed on her face. She thought that since Lin An was eager to refine pills, he had picked a medicinal cauldron! However, Qian Yi was skeptical after she heard Lin An proclaim that he had obtained a divine cauldron! Ten thousand years ago, a mysterious divine plant had appeared. At that time, all the alchemists had gathered the nineteen divine cauldrons in the world in an attempt to refine the divine plant. But in the end, all the nineteen divine cauldrons had exploded. After that, they had gradually faded from the sight of the world. To Qian Yi’s knowledge, only the Myriad Medicine Divine Tower had a Rubik’s Cube Cauldron, and it was ranked ninth among the divine cauldrons! As for the others, Qian Yi had only heard stories about their existence. She had heard about a legendary divine Dragon Cauldron that was apparently stored in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! Unfortunately, because of the rules, even Qian Yi couldn’t enter the secret realm. Even though the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was usually opened after every one hundred years, Qian Yi had been unable to confirm the news. When she thought about it, Qian Yi smiled slightly. Her disciple was too impatient! Lin An actually thought that he had chosen a divine cauldron. However, in the next breath, Qian Yi’s brows were completely relaxed, and her eyes lit up in surprise. “A Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL A huge three-legged cauldron immediately appeared in front of Qian Yi after Lin An summoned it from the system’s storage. A purplish-red stream of light flowed out of the dark green cauldron. If it wasn’t for the purplish-red stream of light, Qian Yi wouldn’t have confirmed that it was the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron. Abruptly, her breathing quickened. However, it wasn’t because she was in disbelief. It was because she was an alchemist. She had yearned to possess a divine cauldron in the past, and now, the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron had truly appeared before her eyes. How could she not be shocked? It was something that she had dreamed about for a long time. At that moment, the appearance of the divine cauldron in front of her felt like a dream. It was ranked as the thirteenth best cauldron in the divine cauldron rankings! “It really is the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron! Disciple, I am envious of your luck!” Qian Yi couldn’t hide her surprise. No one would have thought that Lin An would obtain a divine cauldron after entering the Jiuxiao Sect’s treasury! Although the Jiuxiao Sect had been established for ten thousand years, it could only be considered a sect in the pugilistic world to the various major factions on the Cangyun Continent! What good things could survive in the sect? It was an ugly existence. However, Lin An had entered the Treasure Pavilion and found a four-thousand-year-old black Wood-Dragon stem! And now, he had actually produced a divine cauldron. Even though the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron’s body was covered in cracks, and it looked as if it would shatter with a touch, its origin was clear to Qian Yi. She also knew that it could be repaired! The divine cauldron was capable of being a spiritual object between heaven and earth! Therefore, as long as heaven and earth could repair it, the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron could return to its original state. Qian Yi knew the secret. If one possessed extreme fire, the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron could return to its former glory! The extreme fire was the strongest fire that existed in the heaven and earth realms. However, its existence was as rare as the divine cauldron. From Qian Yi’s point of view, the Black-and-White Ashen Flames that Lin An had cultivated possessed a trace of the extreme fire’s characteristics. If he improved on his technique, he could turn the Black and White Ashen Flames into a pseudo extreme fire. Although it couldn’t compare to the true extreme fire that existed in the heaven and earth realms, it would still possess a trace of the extreme fire’s power! However, there was one stumbling block. The Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron’s nature was defined as feminine. Just like men and women, the divine cauldrons were also divided into genders. Qian Yi feared that the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron wouldn’t be compatible with Lin An. But even so, he was still much stronger than the other ordinary disciples. Even though she was Lin An’s master, Qian Yi couldn’t help him repair the cauldron! After she told him about the origins of the divine cauldron, Lin An was in awe of his master’s vast knowledge. Suddenly, a string of characters appeared before his eyes. “The Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron is a maternal divine cauldron, and it is not compatible with men. If you maintain it in your possession, your success rate of repairing it will be 20%! However, if you gift it to Qian Yi, the rate will increase to 100%!” After he learned about the success rate, Lin An was shocked. Of course, he didn’t have any qualms about gifting the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron to Qian Yi. However, he didn’t know whether she would accept it. In Lin An’s view, if the divine cauldron remained in his hands, it would be a pure waste! He immediately looked at Qian Yi and said, “Master, during my trip to the Treasure Pavilion, I wanted to choose a gift for you! Please accept this Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron and treat it as a sign of my respect...;” When she heard this, Qian Yi frowned and gestured for Lin An to stop speaking. The divine cauldron was a secret treasure that hadn’t appeared for tens of thousands of years! It would attract the attention of all the alchemists in the world, and she knew they were even willing to fight to get their hands on it. How could Lin An give it away? Didn’t he understand the importance of the divine cauldron? Qian Yi had no reason to take away his reward! Even though the reward didn’t suit Lin An. Despite Lin An’s intention of gifting him the treasure, Qian Yi wouldn’t be willing to accept it unless they got another divine cauldron! But, was it possible? Qian Yi quickly changed the topic. “Disciple, place the black Wood-Dragon stem into the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron. Since the cauldron gets its powers from the heaven and earth realms, it can increase the efficiency of refining medicine and strengthen the ingredients in the cauldron. The divine cauldron is a good place to nurture the Wood Dragon stem! Before long, the Wood Dragon spirit will emerge from the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron with the help of the medicine and become an actual living body!” When he realized that Qian Yi had no intention of accepting the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron, Lin An was disappointed. Without a doubt, his master had set her mind on maintaining the status quo in their relationship. She would not accept her disciple’s treasure, even if it was a divine cauldron that many alchemists coveted. Secondly, if Lin An could not give away the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron, his chances of repairing it were low. How would he convince Qian Yi? After weighing his options, Lin An threw the gray rhizome into the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron. He would wait for another opportunity to convince Qian Yi. The black Wood-Dragon stem floated in the divine cauldron. After a few ripples, it fell into silence. Lin An stored the Purple Abyss Divine Cauldron in the system’s storage space and took out his third treasure. “Master, I have another reward from my trip!” “Oh?” Qian Yi looked at Lin An as a complicated feeling overwhelmed her heart. Could it be that her disciple was the Son of Fate? The first two items had already amazed Qian Yi. Now, what would the third item be? Could it be another treasure from the heaven and earth realms? However, Qian Yi was also prepared. Even if Lin An took out a piece of worthless treasure, she wouldn’t blame him. On the contrary, she would feel more at ease. However, with a flip of Lin An’s hand, a piece of black metal appeared. There didn’t seem to be anything special about it. However, Qian Yi hesitated as she examined it. Lin An seemed to be on a collision course with the ordinary-looking piece of metal. He had already obtained a four-thousand-year-old herb, as well as a divine medicinal cauldron. Therefore, there had to be something fishy about the metal plate in Lin An’s hand. Suddenly, Qian Yi saw the words on the black metal plate, and her heart turned into a state of turmoil. ‘These aren’t the words of this world!’ Instead, the words belonged to the upper realm from which Qian Yi had originated from! At that moment, her spiritual sense completely erupted and gathered towards the metal sheet! Lin An felt as if the entire sky had collapsed! He had never experienced such kind of power. It was the first time that Qian Yi had used her full strength. Even though it was only in a spiritual sense, to Lin An, her power was enough to kill ten thousand men! He hadn’t expected his master to be so powerful. Qian Yi’s spiritual sense swept across the metal sheet, and her mind kept reading the foreign words, not wanting to finish them. After some time, Qian Yi withdrew her spiritual sense, and her eyes were completely filled with elation. She couldn’t help but hug Lin An as she said excitedly, “Disciple! I have news about another divine cauldron and the extreme fire! We can find them all in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL After he spoke, Dugu Xin revealed a malicious smile. Because the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was close to the Jiuxiao Sect, training once every one hundred years had become normal. Therefore, there was a clear rule in the sect. Opportunities and dangers coexisted in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Hence, the disciples of the Jiuxiao Sect could only enter the realm when they reached the aurous core cultivation stage. Dugu Xin felt he could use the rule to exclude the Bixiao Peak disciple from entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! “Since we’ve reached a decision, let’s go back and make some preparations. Once It’s time to invest resources, we shall arm the disciples. This time, our Jiuxiao Sect must obtain a great opportunity in the Sacred Dragon Secret Realm!” After Dugu Xin spoke, everyone left. ...; The space in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm had already begun to fluctuate. It wouldn’t be long before the mystic realm was revealed. Within a radius of ten thousand miles around the mystic realm, the other sects were also making their preparations. All the factions had one goal in mind: to send their disciples into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm to obtain an opportunity! ...; In the bamboo house on Bixiao Peak, Qian Yi was lying lazily on her bamboo bed. In order to restore the broken iron piece, Qian Yi had used an extensive amount of spiritual energy, and she was already a little tired. Of course, for a powerhouse like Qian Yi, such a loss of spiritual energy could be quickly replenished, and there was no need for her to lie down and rest. However, Qian Yi was already used to lazing around. Moreover, under Lin An’s care, Qian Yi’s lazy habits had worsened. At that moment, she was invisibly relying on Lin An’s care. Nevertheless, Lin An was happy to take care of Qian Yi. Putting aside the fact that she was his master, the more important thing was that Lin An had already discovered that taking care of Qian Yi could increase his success rate! As he looked at Qian Yi, a string of characters appeared in Lin An’s eyes. “Qian Yi is still a virgin. The host’s success rate of sleeping with her is currently 35%” Lin An had unexpectedly developed feelings for Qian Yi. Their previous hug had really made him feel more comfortable, and the thought of sleeping with Qian Yi had just crossed his mind. He quickly brushed the thought aside and picked up the brand-new shard. The shard was as bright as gold, and it looked vastly different from the black metal. At that moment, it emitted a dazzling golden light. “Master, are you sure that this Golden Shard is a key?” Qian Yi’s eyes were still lethargic. She lifted her neck slightly and said nonchalantly, “That’s right. Although the contents aren’t complete, I can already see some information. There’s a very high chance that the cauldrons of God and extreme fire are inside the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. This shard is one of the keys. Disciple, grasp it well when the time comes! Once you enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, you will have all the answers.” “Alright. I will definitely not disappoint you, Master!” Lin An smiled and said firmly. Lin An was confident because he had already used the success rate system. Therefore, if there were any treasures inside the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, he would definitely be the first to identify them. At the same time, the success rate system would guide his path to obtaining the treasures. Lin An was not worried about the journey. In fact, he felt that he did not have to prepare for anything! “It’s good to be confident! However, the operation of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm this time also depends on luck! Many mighty figures have entered the realm in the past, but when it comes to opportunities, it really depends on fate! Disciple, don’t take the results too seriously! When you understand the true meaning of the words ‘gain and loss’, ‘opportunity and fate’, it means that you have grown!” Qian Yi had long known that there was a divine hall in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, so she was even more certain about the difficulty of obtaining opportunities. However, she still had her own understanding of the concept of gain and loss. Otherwise, she would not have stayed in the Nine Cloud Sect for a thousand years. Qian Yi had never intended to force her way into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. She also had no intention of nurturing disciples and then using them to seize the divine cauldron. That completely depended on fate. Qian Yi had never tried to imitate the other elders. Her beautiful eyes narrowed slightly, which gave her a charming expression. ‘Gain and loss? Opportunity and fate?’ It didn’t matter. Lin An had a chance of success, so he naturally didn’t have to worry. He looked at Qian Yi and said leisurely, “Master, in my opinion, meeting you was also fate! I can’t lose you.” Hearing this, Qian Yi smiled charmingly. “You brat! You’re so glib-tongued. Be careful, or else I will punish you!” “Master, I’m serious!” Lin An said with a little sarcasm before he continued, “The Jiuxiao Sect has a rule stating that disciples who are not at the golden core stage cannot enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. What do you think about this?” Qian Yi naturally knew about the rules of the Jiuxiao Sect. During the conversation between Dugu Xin and the other elders, Qian Yi had roughly guessed the subject of their discussion. She knew that any choice would affect Lin An’s future, so she also wanted to see how he would deal with the situation. Lin An was also a little confused. It was the first time he heard about the rule. Although he had improved his skills, he was yet to break through to the golden core stage. After all, he was cultivating the ‘No Beginning Scripture!’ However, without the golden core stage, he didn’t have the qualifications to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. How would he deal with the new challenge? After thinking for a moment, Lin An smiled slightly. “I will openly enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm and then swagger out!” “Oh? Why?” Qian Yi asked in surprise. “Humans set the rules. Only the strong can set the rules, and only the strong can break them. I don’t think there is an existence stronger than you in the Jiuxiao Sect, so why should I care about the opinions of others! I’m your only disciple!” “Okay, you can leave now!” Qian Yi was really impressed by Lin An. Even his personality had an invisible domineering aura. The answer he had given was exactly how Qian Yi felt about doing things. Only the strong were qualified to mention the rules! The Jiuxiao Sect was just so-so! Qian Yi was delighted, and she casually waved her hand to indicate that Lin An could leave. “Okay! If you have any more orders, feel free to call me!” After saying this, Lin An left. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Half a month had passed. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was expected to open the next day. Over the two weeks, Lin An had been practicing the minor circulatory cycle and alchemy skills. Under Qian Yi’s guidance, he had completely mastered the steps of alchemy. With the black and white flames supporting him, Lin An could achieve complete success in refining some of the ordinary pills under the guidance of the success rate system. During the process of alchemy, Lin An also continuously increased his mental strength. He had already reached the bottleneck of the foundation establishment stage, and he was just one step away from breaking through the foundation establishment stage and reaching the golden core stage! Lin An knew that his chances of breaking through the foundation establishment stage and reaching the golden core stage by practicing the incipient scripture were minimal. However, he was not worried. Just as the desire to complete the foundation establishment stage formed in Lin An’s heart, a success rate notification suddenly appeared before his eyes. “Heading in this direction, the success rate of reaching the golden core stage is 25%! Heading in this direction, the success rate of reaching the golden core stage is 34%! Heading in this direction, the success rate of reaching the golden core stage is 12%! Heading in this direction, the success rate of reaching the golden core stage is 100%!” The 100% success rate was toward the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! ‘Haha! I have to say, with this system, my path of cultivation has become extremely smooth!’ ...; On a precipitous cliff in the Cangyun Continent, there was a grand palace that was extremely vast, and it was formed from palaces of all sizes. It was the Ghana Empire, the largest sect within ten thousand miles of the Heavenly Mystery Sect! In the Cangyun Continent, sects were divided into nine levels, the higher the number, the higher the status a sect had. The Heavenly Mystery Sect was at the seventh level, while the Jiuxiao Sect was at the third level! Compared to the Heavenly Mystery Sect, the Jiuxiao Sect was at an absolute disadvantage in terms of its territory, the number of disciples, and overall strength! At that moment, the Heavenly Mystery Sect already had three vast ships in the sky parked on the huge square. The ships were the chief means of transportation in this world, and every ship carried its own spiritual energy. It did not need to be controlled to reach its destination. It was the most suitable mode of transportation for a long journey. Every ship in the square was made of one-thousand-year-old ironwood. It had been carefully decorated, and every part of the ship appeared luxurious and noble. In the square, countless disciples were standing in Daoist robes. An immortal-like old man stood up and addressed the disciples. “This time, our Heavenly Mystery Sect will send three thousand Jindan stage disciples. Once again, I congratulate you on your success!” “Yes! We will definitely live up to the sect’s expectations!” “Yes! We will definitely live up to the sect’s expectations!” “Yes! We will definitely live up to the sect’s expectations!” The loud and clear voices of the disciples rang out in the square. Previously, there were at least thirty thousand disciples who had registered to enter the Heavenly Mystery Sect. However, only the three thousand disciples had successfully gone through all the rounds of the selection. After the disciples had gathered, the elder declared, “All right. Let’s go!” ...; Compared to the Heavenly Mystery Sect, the Jiuxiao Sect looked shabby. There was only one airship in the sky, and it could not be compared to the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s airships in any aspect. With a glance, a discerning person could see the obvious difference! At that moment, all the Jiuxiao Sect’s aurous core stage disciples had also gathered. The entire elite force of the Jiuxiao Sect totaled to one hundred and one disciples. Seeing that the airship had already set off, Dugu Xin let out a long sigh of relief. Qian Yi had not appeared to see off the Jiuxiao Sect disciples. Dugu Xin knew that Qian Yi did not get along with many of the elders. Additionally, since the Jiuxiao Sect had rules, Qian Yi was restrained from looking for trouble. “It’s great that she did not come! Looks like the rules are still effective on that woman!” The disciples of the Heavenly Mystery Sect and the Jiuxiao Sect set off at almost the same time, and they all arrived at the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm at the same time. However, the distance between the Jiuxiao Sect and the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was seven times closer than the Heavenly Mystery Sect. As the two sects entered the realm, the difference in the status of the flying ships in the sky was clearly visible. ...; In the bamboo forest, Qian Yi naturally knew that the Jiuxiao Sect disciples had already set off for the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. However, the situation did not trouble her. Lin An, who was at the side, was also in a state of indifference. He knew that his master definitely had a plan. Suddenly, with a wave of Qian Yi’s hand, an exquisite flying ship appeared in the bamboo forest. The ship in the sky was not big, but it was inlaid with precious gemstones that made it look extremely luxurious and far more gorgeous than the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s ships! “Disciple, come here!” Qian Yi’s voice rang out just as Lin An was admiring the ship. He quickly jogged towards Qian Yi. “Master.” “Mm. This one-thousand-year-old secret treasure ship is now yours. It’s not bad for a long journey. When you board it, you will naturally know how to use it! Also, this treasure ship will only take a short time to reach the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! However, I won’t accompany you. You just have to do as you wish. Don’t have any misgivings. If anything happens, I’ll take care of it for you! No matter what difficulties you encounter, I believe you can handle them.” After Qian Yi spoke, she handed an amulet to her disciple. If Lin An encountered a problem that he couldn’t solve, he could crush the amulet, and Qian Yi would rush to his side immediately. Lin An naturally knew what his master meant. Unless it was absolutely necessary, he did not have to use the amulet. Since he had the success rate system, Lin An felt that he did not need any trump cards. However, Qian Yi’s gesture had taken him by surprise. His emotions suddenly rushed to his head, and in the next moment, he hugged Qian Yi tightly in his arms. “Master, I will set off now. Just wait for me to come back.” Qian Yi was shocked as she awkwardly felt Lin An’s embrace. Her disciple was too impudent! How could he forcefully hug his master like that! Lin An’s behavior was simply disrespectful and too audacious! However, when Qian Yi thought about it, she felt relieved. After all, Lin An was a youth who was not even twenty years old. In her eyes, he was still a child. Perhaps, it was their master and disciple relationship that made Lin An behave in such a manner. It would be the first time that he would be so far away from home, and he still had to face many difficulties. It, therefore, made sense that he was reluctant to part ways with her. After the thought crossed her mind, Qian Yi no longer resisted Lin An’s hug. She even unconsciously embraced him with both hands. Lin An immediately reacted when he felt Qian Yi’s arms drape over his shoulders. He was almost a little too impulsive. However, he didn’t retreat! He was already certain in his heart. In any case, he would reach the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm quickly since he had a fast-moving ship. As long as Qian Yi didn’t push him away, it wouldn’t matter if he hugged her a little longer! After hugging for some time, Qian Yi and Lin An finally separated. ...; At the entrance of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, several disciples had already gathered. They were from the different major sects of the Cangyun Continent, and their respective sect elders accompanied them as they prepared to display their grand plans to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. The disciple’s eyes were full of endless expectations. Tales of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm had always been prevalent in the Cangyun Continent. It was said that there were endless opportunities in the realm, and if a cultivator was lucky enough to obtain an inheritance in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, their future cultivation path would become incomparably smooth. However, although the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm wasn’t a secret, its features were still a mystery that was beyond everyone’s imagination. The specifics of the treasures that existed in the realm were unknown. However, everyone knew that the cultivators who would succeed in obtaining benefits during their trip would become experts after leaving the secret realm. Even a cultivator of low skill would suddenly surpass many geniuses once they secured a treasure from the mysterious kingdom. Therefore, the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was a carnival for cultivators! At that moment, the Jiuxiao Sect disciples’ warship had already arrived at the entrance of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. There was a vast lake at the gateway, and it was surrounded by dense trees. From the looks of it, nobody had visited the entrance for close to a hundred years. There was nothing special about the location. However, everybody knew that they had arrived at the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm’s portal. It was just that it had not opened yet. All the Jiuxiao Sect disciples were eager to enter the secretive world. They wanted to witness the true appearance of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Even after a night of fatigue, everyone seemed to be in high spirits! The disciples had secured a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity, and they were all prepared. A golden cannon elder was leading the team, while Zhang Ling was the disciple’s representative. Zhang Ling was the only remaining peerless genius from the Jiuxiao Sect, and many of the sect’s disciples looked up to her. However, Lin An had already won the inner sect disciples’ competition. Although Lin An’s strength was terrifying, everyone felt that his victory had resulted from the use of some puzzling pills and tricks, and he had not used his actual power. Zhang Ling looked around and noticed that Lin An was not in the warship. She could not help but shake her head. The Jiuxiao Sect’s so-called champion was too disappointing. Despite the fact that Lin An was very powerful, he hadn’t appeared among the disciples chosen to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. It was obvious that he hadn’t advanced his cultivation to the golden core stage. In the cultivation world, if a disciple didn’t show progress in their cultivation, everything else was just empty talk! Lin An’s attributes weren’t like those of past star disciples. If he failed to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, the difference in quality between him and the other brilliant disciples would only grow larger. Zhang Ling knew the importance of visiting the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Her desire to enter the realm had motivated her to suppress her cultivation skills. Under normal circumstances, Zhang Ling would have already broken through the golden core stage. However, she had restrained her cultivation and caused it to remain stagnant. At that point, she was still in the eighth level of the golden core stage. Zhang Ling had no desire to proceed to the nascent soul stage since she would miss out on the opportunity to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. As Zhang Ling fantasized about the mysterious world, three battleships suddenly appeared in the sky and rushed towards the lake at a high speed. The colorful flags on the battleships fluttered gloriously in the sky. It was as if they were riding the wind and surfing through waves! For a moment, the unusual movement in the sky attracted everyone’s attention. “Look, are those disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect?” “That’s right. Only the Heavenly Mystery Sect can afford such luxurious treasure ships.” “Did they have to show their strength? We all want the same thing, and that is to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm!” “Even though they are our fellow cultivators, you can tell from their looks that they are definitely not ordinary people!” The disciples from the other sects who had already landed on the ground looked at the sky in awe, and their eyes were filled with envy. The Heavenly Mystery Sect had such a luxurious fleet of warships. Its brilliance was simply better than the sun in the sky. When they saw the looks of admiration from the other disciples, the Heavenly Mystery Sect cultivators couldn’t hide their pride. “Humph! Did you see their eyes? They are as small as ants!” “Shouldn’t the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm be more exclusive? It has always been our sect’s secret land!” “Senior Brother is right. It’s a pity that the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm is too overt. Otherwise, it would have long become our sect’s backyard...;” “There’s no need to argue with them. When we enter the realm, we shall prove that we are the best sect on the continent!” Although the Heavenly Mystery Sect cultivators knew that entering the realm wouldn’t be a simple task, it didn’t affect the pride in their hearts. Every disciple from the sect was proud and obnoxious. Soon, the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s treasure ships stopped at the bank of the Secret Realm Lake. The sect’s disciples looked like Immortals who had just flown down from the sky. They instantly occupied a central area, and it was clear that they were all talented disciples who had extremely high cultivation techniques. From their temperament, one could also observe that they were all valiant. “Is this the Heavenly Mystery Sect? The super large faction from the vast fate continent?” “I can tell that every single one of their disciples is at least at the fifth level golden core stage. This crop of cultivators is sufficient to crush all the other factions!” “Look, is that Ling Dong, the peerless genius who only appears once every one hundred years!” “It is said that he has suppressed his cultivation and is currently at the peak of the golden core stage. If he wishes, he can instantly break through the golden core stage and even reach the third level of the nascent soul stage!” “Lin Dong’s strength is unfathomable and too terrifying. It is best to stay far away from him if you meet him in the secret realm!” “Our factions are like ants in the eyes of this mysterious sky sect!” The other small sects revealed envious gazes when they saw the powerful disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. The gorgeous treasure ships matched with the stunning geniuses from the region were simply too magnificent! The eyes of the disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect were also filled with jealousy. They unconsciously swallowed their saliva and, there was a hint of deep worry in their eyes. Although the Heavenly Mystery Sect was the most powerful sect, the disciples from the sect also had their own concerns. They were afraid that the small factions would gang up and attack them. Therefore, although they were the strongest, they had no intention of breaking the rules before they entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm However, once they set foot into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, it would a different scene. The realm’s portal opened once every hundred years, and there were no rules in the mysterious land, only absolute benefits. As long as there were benefits, anything could happen. The Jiuxiao Sect disciples were worried about their previous history with the Heavenly Mystery Sect. During the last excursion into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, a genius from the Jiuxiao Sect had discovered an extraordinary treasure. However, he was killed by a genius disciple from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. The treasure naturally flowed to the rival sect, and the matter was left unresolved. Therefore, the Jiuxiao Sect had a grudge against the Heavenly Mystery Sect. However, because of the huge inequality in strength between the two factions, the Jiuxiao Sect couldn’t seek revenge. When he saw the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect, the leading elder from the Jiuxiao Sect frowned. He leaned forward and addressed his disciples, “Once you enter the secret realm, do not clash with the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. If you meet them, just surrender any ordinary treasures that you may have in your possession!” In the elder’s opinion, the difference in power between the two sects was indeed too great. If any of his disciples secured an ordinary opportunity, it was better to just let it go! After all, the lives of his disciples were more important that the treasures in the mystic realm. As the leading elder, he had the responsibility to protect all of his disciples. ...; Back at Bixiao Peak, Lin An reluctantly let go of Qian Yi. In an instant, he boarded the treasure ship of heavenly secrets and waved goodbye to his master. Within a few minutes he had already disappeared from the Jiuxiao Sect’s sphere. Normally, treasure ships sailed at an average breakneck speed. However, the treasure ship of heavenly secrets was slightly different. It flashed through the sky like a shooting star. In just a few breaths, it had already traveled several thousand miles away from the Jiuxiao Sect’s. One hour later, Lin An’s treasure ship appeared in the sky above the Secret Realm Lake. Suddenly, a luxurious treasure ship appeared above the Secret Realm Lake. Everyone who saw the treasure ship was shocked. “What grade of treasure ship is this? It actually appeared above the lake in a flash!” “Is it a mysterious figure? I’ve never seen such a treasure ship before. Which sect’s holy son is this?” “Although its dimensions aren’t huge, it looks as if its interior is inlaid with jewelry. Those gemstones are definitely worth a lot!” The disciples on the shore exchanged curious looks as they speculated about the identity of the ship’s captain. There were indeed several sects within the Cangyun Continent that had the title of a holy son. Holy sons were disciples who had peerless talent, and the Lord of the sect accepted them as personal disciples. Additionally, holy sons had a special trait. They were treated like the actual biological children of the Lord of the sect Within a sect, a holy son was an existence below one person and above ten thousand people! However, ordinary small sects did not have the position at all. The reason was simple. They were not worthy. ...; The treasure ship of heavenly secrets slowly descended and landed on the surface of the lake. On the bow of the ship, a young man dressed in white stood calmly, looking ethereal and otherworldly! Lin An looked indifferent as he steered the ship towards the shore. However, he had been surprised by the functionality of the treasure ship. It had been Lin An’s first time riding on such a means of transportation, and what surprised him was that the speed of the treasure ship was simply too fast. He couldn’t believe that he had already arrived at the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm’s portal. When he saw the shocked group of disciples on the shore, including the travel-worn seniors and juniors from the Jiuxiao Sect, Lin An was finally convinced that he had arrived at the gathering place of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Once he docked his ship, he tiptoed lightly and flew towards the shore. His movement was swift, graceful, and unearthly, and it looked as if a celestial being was descending from heaven! At that moment, Lin An didn’t know how to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. He felt that it was better to familiarize himself with the surroundings before the mystic realm portal opened. When they saw that the person who had alighted from the treasure ship was actually Lin An, everyone from the Jiuxiao Sect frowned. Originally, the Jiuxiao Sect was viewed as weak, and even its disciples had a deep sense of inferiority. They were the complete opposite of the Heavenly Mystery Sect. If a Jindan stage Senior Brother had arrived in the treasure ship, everyone in the Jiuxiao Sect would have gladly welcomed him. But now, Lin An was a foundation establishment stage Junior Brother! Wasn’t he embarrassing his own sect? As Lin An approached the Jiuxiao Sect disciples, they all looked at him in disdain. “Lin An, you’re only at the foundation establishment stage. You don’t have the qualifications to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Now, hurry up and go back!” The leading elder at the side took a step forward and said in a stern tone. “That’s right! Little Junior Brother, your cultivation level is really too low. Your presence in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm won’t help us at all. You might even drag us down!” “Senior Brother Lu is right. We simply won’t have the time to take care of a weakling like you. You’ll only drag us down!” “Lin An, hurry up and go back! Don’t embarrass yourself here!” The disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect were about to surround Lin An, and he couldn’t help but frown. He knew that entry into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was permitted for all cultivators below the nascent soul stage. However, junior cultivators were frequent casualties in the Sacred Dragon Secret Realm. Hence, the sects in the Cangyun Continent had set the required entry-level for all disciples at the golden core stage. However, Lin An felt that he was an exception to the elders’ rules. First, he was cultivating the ‘Scripture of No Beginning.’ With his powerful physique, Lin An had the potential to defeat a golden core stage disciple. Secondly, Lin An had improved his cultivation skills, and he could now control the black and white ashen flames. The specific effects of the two flames were much stronger than the cultivation skills of an average golden core stage disciple. Since he had the two flames in his arsenal, as well as the success rate system, Lin An was confident that he could survive in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. At the same time, he also had the morality demon sealing technique to protect himself from any imminent threats. During the inner sect competition, Lin An had failed to the skill because his opponents were too weak, and there was no way to test the true power of the morality demon sealing technique. Lin An had so many guarantees, so he wasn’t afraid of setting foot into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Moreover, he still had the golden metal piece in his hand that would allow him to summon Qian Yi at any moment. Therefore, Lin An had no reason to fear the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. “From the looks of it, you guys are not on my side. Then, I wish you all the best of luck in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm!” There were many disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect who had opposed him. After he had heard their sarcastic words, Lin An felt that he would have to enter the mystic realm without their help. Suddenly, with a wave of his hand, the treasure ship charged towards the shore. Lin An ignored the Jiuxiao Sect disciples and jumped onto it. Once he entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, Lin An would have nothing to do with them. He had already displayed his candor by greeting them. As soon as Lin An boarded the treasure ship of heavenly secrets, it levitated into the air again and floated in the sky. Lin An made himself comfortable in the ship and ignored the crowd. The treasure ship of heavenly secrets was an esteemed artifact, and it also possessed an imposing aura. The members of the Jiuxiao Sect dispersed and raised their heads to look up. They had been a little emotional earlier on, and they had completely ignored the fact that Lin An had arrived in the luxurious treasure ship. Moreover, he had appeared above the Secret Realm Lake in an instant. “Master, what kind of treasure is this exactly?” “I don’t know. Looking at its degree of luxury, it looks superior to our ship!” The leading elder was also confused. “I have never seen such a treasure ship in our sect’s Treasure Pavillion. It probably belongs to the Bixiao Peak Master, Qian Yi. However, I can’t believe that she actually gave it to this kid. It’s really strange!” Qian Yi was really too mysterious. It was difficult to understand her personality. However, the fact that she had many treasures was not a secret in the Jiuxiao Sect. Thus, the appearance of the treasure ship of heavenly secrets was not a big deal. In the elder’s opinion, Bixiao Peak was already in dire straits. It was possible that Qian Yi had squandered all her valuable treasures to satisfy her primitive desires! Qian Yi was the malignant tumor of the Jiuxiao Sect! There were many people in the sect who shared the same thoughts as the leading elder. Immediately, the elder angrily stared at the treasure ship and shouted, “Lin An, go back to the sect right now! This is not a place where you should be. If you persist in your stubbornness, I will report you to the sect master and have you expelled from the Jiuxiao Sect!” Lin An looked at the surface of the lake without the slightest fluctuation in his mood. To him, the Jiuxiao Sect disciples and elders were just a bunch of clowns. There was no need to care about their words and actions at all! Across the shore, the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect were also curious. After all, the treasure ship of heavenly secrets in front of them was too gorgeous. It was a high-grade treasure, and it had unparalleled aesthetics. The Heavenly Mystery Sect’s leading elder was also puzzled because he seemed to have seen the treasure ship before, but he couldn’t remember the exact moment in time he had encountered it. Suddenly, some Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples began to discuss in low tones. “Is this a Jiuxiao Sect treasure, or does it belong to one person? It’s so enviable!” “Yeah, if I could acquire such a treasure, I would never let it out of my sight!” When he heard the disciple’s chatter, a sinister thought crept into the heart of the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s leading elder. “If you kill the young man who is riding the ship in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, won’t this precious treasure automatically transfer to our Heavenly Mystery Sect?” Just as everyone was discussing how to seize the treasure ship from Lin An, ripples began to form on the surface of the lake, and bubbles emerged from the bottom of the water. Suddenly, the entire Secret Realm Lake, including the shore, was shrouded in a thick fog. All of this happened in an instant. For the disciples who had never witnessed the opening ceremony of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, the scene before their eyes made them feel astonished. In the world of immortal cultivators, they had already seen all kinds of shocking scenes. However, this was the first time they had seen such a romantic scene. It was somewhat dreamy. Originally, everyone had been waiting for the opening of the mystic realm portal on the shore. As the fog spread around the surroundings, it felt like a drizzle under the scorching sun. This gave everyone a refreshing feeling, and a cool aura blew over the shore. Abruptly, a rainbow formed over the Secret Realm Lake. The entire mountain range and the lake were filled with multicolored light, which made for a romantic atmosphere. The sky above the lake was filled with multicolored light explosions, and at that moment, it elicited a completely fresh feeling among the disciples. After the cool breeze had passed, the disciples braced themselves for the next phase. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm’s portal had opened. Every time the gateway opened; a magic array would appear. The magic array routinely accompanied the thick fog. It was similar to a maze, and it only appeared once the thick fog had completely covered the surrounding area of the lake. Any disciple with a high cultivation level would be lost in the thick fog, and only the disciples below the nascent soul stage would have the chance to see through the fog and find the entrance to the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. The magic array was the first layer of restriction in the mystic realm. “Disciples of the Heavenly Mystery Sect, prepare to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm!” The words of the Heavenly Mystery Sect elder rang in the ears of the disciples. They all became alert and looked at the fog in front of them, but they were all confused. They had no idea where the entrance to the secret realm was. Just like the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, the cultivators from the other small factions were clueless. The leading elders wouldn’t be of much help to their disciples. Although they knew that the path into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm had always been a maze, the route was not fixed. It would always change every one hundred years. They had no way to deal with this. They could only offer a simple explanation to the disciple, after which, a group of cultivators flew into the fog to search for the entrance. The disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect were not willing to lag behind. They jumped into the fog one after another. Compared to the Heavenly Mystery Sect, the Jiuxiao Sect disciples were a small faction. If they could enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm first, they would eliminate many unnecessary dangers. As long as they were the first to find the entrance to the mystic real, they would seize the best opportunities. All the Jiuxiao Sect disciples understood this, and they diligently searched for the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm’s portal. In the sky, Lin An saw the fog, and his mood lightened up. This was because the success rate system activated in his eyes once again. He immediately understood that going through the fog was the only way he would achieve a 100% success rate. Therefore, as long as he entered the fog, he would obtain the most accurate hint. Entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm would therefore be a straightforward task. Lin An recalled the treasure ship of heavenly secrets, and it continuously shrank and eventually fit on the palm of his hand. After retracting the treasure ship, he flew towards the surface of the lake. The thick fog looked like a curtain as it enveloped the Secret Realm Lake, and the magic array maze had also formed on the surface of the lake. The blue and hazy elements intermingled with each other, just like a wonder of heaven and earth. [Ding Dong! If you take a left turn, your success rate of entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm will be 0%!] [Ding Dong! If you take a right turn, your success rate of entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm will be 0%!] [Ding Dong! If you walk forward, your success rate of entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm will be 0%!] [Ding Dong! If you take thirty steps forward from the left, stop, and walk twenty steps to the right, then your success rate of entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm will be 100%!] When he saw the notification, Lin An smiled slightly. Using the success rate system was like following a couple of road signs. It would accurately guide him to his destination with no deviation. The other disciples would have to randomly scamper through the fog. Their chances of entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm depended entirely on luck. There were at least eight thousand disciples who would enter the fog, but in the end, only about three hundred disciples would find the entrance to the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. It was a difficult hurdle! Several average disciples had already been eliminated by the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm immediately after they entered the fog! However, the best disciples could still find some patterns in the fog. Among them was Zhang Ling, who had already found some clues in the fog. She had used her spiritual power to cover the entire lake and then used her spiritual sense to detect every difference. By using this technique, Zhang Ling had detected many invisible walls. The maze was a test of a cultivator’s intelligence. Naturally, several Jiuxiao Sect disciples began to follow in the footsteps of their senior sister. On the other side, the genius from the Heavenly Mystery Sect, Lin Dong, had also made some progress. He had not used his divine sense to cover the lake and search for the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm’s entrance. Instead, he had quickly summoned a treasure-seeking mouse from his pocket, and after feeding it a few spirit stones, the mouse had begun to sniff through the maze. A treasure-seeking mouse had an acute sense of smell, and it was ordinarily utilized when searching for the scent of some treasure. Since there were many treasures in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, the scent of the treasures would naturally leak out. The treasure-seeking mouse would therefore lead Lin Dong to the entrance of the mystic realm because the scent would be the strongest at that point. Lin An’s idea was simpler. He just needed to follow the success rate system’s instructions. He didn’t waste any time. He clearly knew that it would be to his advantage if he entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm before the other disciples, so he braced himself and dashed through the fog. His speed was extremely fast, and the disciples who saw him rush through the fog were all shocked. “Is he courting death? He’s not looking for the entrance at all, right? How can he find the entrance by wandering around like a fly!” “That must be a disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect. As expected, he’s a cultivator from a small sect. He’s too weak.” “This Senior Brother is right. Such a small sect is only here to make up the numbers. They won’t secure any opportunities!” When they heard the comments, the disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect furrowed their brows. Lin An was an embarrassment! He only had the cultivation skills of a foundation establishment stage cultivator, but he was stubbornly struggling through the dense fog with the rest of the qualified disciples. He didn’t even seem to care about the sect’s reputation! At that moment, the disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect all gnashed their teeth! However, Lin An’s figure had long disappeared into the dense fog. After several twists and turns, a ball of light finally appeared in front of Lin An. The ball of light had seven distinct colors, and it looked very gorgeous in the fog. It continuously rotated, like a planet made up of multi-colored light. At that moment, Lin An didn’t hesitate. He immediately walked straight into the ball of light. In the next moment, Lin An opened his eyes and saw that he was in a new world. He had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm! As soon as Lin An stepped into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, a sharp wail rang out from the thick fog outside the mystic realm. One of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples had lost his life after he walked into the wrong section of the maze. He had been instantly killed after he stepped onto a killer formation trap, and his flesh and blood had been separated! The disciple’s blood had immediately dyed the fog red, and the air was filled with the smell of blood. It was such a gruesome and terrifying scene. The rest of the disciples all covered their eyes in terror. Some had already used their cultivation techniques to avoid the filth caused by the cultivator’s exploding body. On the other side of the maze, several disciples had used their spiritual energy to turn the fog into ice sculptures. Suddenly, a gust of cold air spread out, and it brought a bone-piercing chill to the disciples in the maze! The magic array maze was the first layer of restriction before entering the mystic realm, and it had already eliminated more than a hundred disciples. This made the surviving disciples fear for their lives. However, there were still some talented cultivators who had found some clues in the dense fog. After close to forty minutes, Lin Dong finally found the entrance to the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect gathered around the glowing ball of light. However, many of them were injured, and their appearance was extremely disheveled. They no longer looked as noble as when they had first arrived. ...; In the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, Lin An had already explored the first level. Since he had the success rate system, he could accurately get the information he wanted wherever he looked. The exploration process was extremely fast. The first level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was not vast. It was only a few miles in circumference, and Lin An only took ten minutes to scan it. There was nothing noteworthy on this level. The medicinal herbs it had harbored had already been harvested, and there were only a few hundred-year-old medicinal herbs left. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm opened once every one hundred years. The first level was easy to access, so the disciples who had entered the mystic realm in the past had naturally explored it, and they had already picked all the precious medicinal herbs. When he looked at the soft green grassland in front of him, Lin An had no desire to pick the remaining herbs. To him, the scene was even worse than the rocky grasslands on Bixiao Peak! After strolling through the first level, Lin An spotted a door that led to a charming medicinal garden. He immediately walked through the doorway and entered the second level. ...; The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect had already entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm one after another. The sight in front of them surpassed their expectations. There were several spiritual herbs, and even though they were only one-hundred-year-old medicinal herbs, it was still worth digging them out and taking them back to the sect to cultivate them properly. At that moment, Zhang Ling also led a team of Jiuxiao Sect disciples into the first level. Thus, the two teams began to explore the first level together. Because there weren’t many valuable treasures at the initial level of the mystic realm, there was no conflict between the two sects. Everyone wanted to preserve their trump cards and obtain opportunities in the depths of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. ...; Once Lin An had entered the second level, he encountered a thick fog. The fog seemed to have its own spiritual power, making it hard for him to see through it. Abruptly, a string of characters appeared in Lin An’s eyes. [If you move 200 meters to the east, you will have a 100% success rate of obtaining a 200-year-old Indian Spirit Root!] [If you move 500 meters to the west, you will encounter a medicinal spirit beast. You have a projected 100% success rate of killing it!] [If you move 2000 meters to the left, you will encounter a medicinal spirit. You have a projected 1% success rate of collecting it!] [Ahead on the right...;] When he saw the success rates in front of him, Lin An couldn’t help but frown. Qian Yi had taught him a lot about medicine, and he knew that the medicinal spirit had immense value. It could tender to all medicinal herbs in a garden, and it could even catalyze the growth of the herbs! Although he only had a 1% success rate of collecting it, the advantages of possessing such a valuable treasure enticed Lin An. If he subdued the medicinal sprite, then he could manage all the herbs on Bixiao Peak. In the future, the entire peak would be rejuvenated! Therefore, even though the success rate was very low, Lin An was willing to collect the medicinal spirit. After he weighed his options, Lin An immediately walked to the left. The second floor of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Real was like a forest. Lin An stealthily walked past several herbs as he approached the medicinal spirit. Just as Lin An neared its location and took out his dagger, he noticed that the medicinal spirit had actually moved, and its speed was gradually increasing. It seemed to have sensed that he was approaching it. “Damn it! It must have discovered me!” Seeing this, Lin An couldn’t help but curse. Some intelligent life forms couldn’t be easily captured because of their high level of alertness. Lin An had been quietly moving forward, and his movement had been as stealth as a cat. Nevertheless, the medicinal spirit had still detected him. When he reached the initial location where the medicinal spirit had been resting, Lin An carefully observed the surroundings. There was an ordinary-looking small herb that seemed to be a few decades old. However, Lin An noticed that the leaves of the small herb were glowing with starlight. “It must be the work of the medicinal spirit!” Suddenly, the small herb began to grow at a speed visible to the naked eye. [Your success rate of obtaining a 60-year-old opportunity herb is 100%!] [Your success rate of obtaining a 64-year-old opportunity herb is 100%!] [Your success rate of obtaining a 72-year-old opportunity herb is 100%!] [Your success rate of obtaining an 85-year-old opportunity herb is 100%!] As soon as he saw the herb’s rapid growth, Lin An couldn’t help but be greatly surprised. The medicinal spirit could speed up the ripening of any herb. Without a doubt, that was a god-level skill! If Lin An needed a one-thousand-year-old medicine, and the medicinal herb he had cultivated was only nine hundred and ninety years old, then under normal circumstances, he would still need to wait another ten years. But with the medicinal spirit, the process could be shortened! In fact, he could even obtain a one-thousand-year-old medicinal herb in the blink of an eye! Therefore, the importance of the medicinal spirit was engraved in Lin An’s heart. Even though there was a very slim possibility of success, he was determined to subdue it. However, the medicinal spirit seemed to have disappeared. For a hundred years, no being had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. However, after Lin An had set foot into the second level of the mystic realm, the medicinal spirit had sensed that it was in danger, so it had immediately fled to the depths of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Lin An shook his head in disappointment. There was no other treasure worth exploring in the second level. Immediately, he headed in the direction of the grass and wood spirits. Over two hundred disciples had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, and a majority of them belonged to the Heavenly Mystery Sect. Because of their large numbers, they collected the medicinal herbs very quickly. As they explored the first level, one of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples laughed and said, “Look, the grass in front of us has not been touched. We are the first batch of cultivators to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. We must seize this excellent opportunity to collect the medicinal herbs!” “Senior Brother is right. We must collect all the medicinal herbs and ensure that the disciples behind us miss out on any gains!” “Hahaha! The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was originally the backyard of our Heavenly Mystery Sect. Naturally, we will not let others take advantage of it!” “When we return, the Silver Elder will give us a great merit!” When they heard the conversation between the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, the cultivators from the other sects frowned. They had been envious of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples from the moment they had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. The Heavenly Mystery Sect had more than a hundred disciples, while their own factions only had twenty to thirty cultivators who had entered the mystic realm. The enormous difference in numbers reflected the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s strength! The other sects could only endure their disadvantage and avoid provoking the powerful sect. In addition to the Heavenly Mystery Sect having the most disciples in the mystic realm, they were also the most skilled. However, several small sects had joined forces and formed temporary alliances in the first level of the mystic realm. The disciples from the various factions gathered nervously, striving to not let go of any valuable items. They all thought that they were the first batch of cultivators to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. However, the herbs on the ground were just insignificant medicinal treasures that Lin An had failed to collect. In fact, he had already reached the third level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Surprisingly, the third level was very different from the previous two levels. ‘There really is a layer of scenery on each level. This level is actually a desert!’ There was a stretch of yellow sand in front of him, as far as his eyes could see! It seemed that the third level of the mystic level had no treasures to explore. ‘However, since it’s still part of the mystic realm, there must be something strange about it!’ As expected, in less than a moment, Lin An’s feet began to sink into the yellow sand. ‘Is this quicksand?’ Quicksand swamps were a common feature in the third level. If a disciple wandered aimlessly, they would sink into the sand and drown. However, the yellow sand seemed to harbor a strange spiritual energy. Even immortal cultivators were susceptible to its pull. As the yellow sand slowly sank around him, Lin An felt a sense of danger. He summoned his strength and floated above the desert. However, even after he levitated into the air, there was still a downward force pulling him towards the quicksand. It was as if his feet were being dragged down by an enormous hand. ‘Could there be another scene under this desert?’ In reality, many sects had detailed records about the desert in the third level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Although the entrance wasn’t established, the quicksand swamps inside the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm had been documented by past cultivators to act as a reference for the disciples who would explore the mystic realm in the future. Since Lin An was yet to break through the golden core stage, he hadn’t taken part in the gathering of the Jiuxiao Sect disciples, so he naturally didn’t know much about the history of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. As Lin An struggled against the mysterious force that was pulling him towards the quicksand, he spotted the green medicinal spirit. Suddenly, the medicinal spirit dived into the quicksand. In the blink of an eye, it sank into the desert whirlpool and disappeared. Lin An frowned. He immediately stopped struggling against the gravitational pull and dived into the whirlpool. Lin An was comfortable with the risk he had taken since the success rate system had confirmed that there was no imminent danger. Moreover, the success rate of obtaining the medicinal spirit had increased to 5%! ‘This is my chance!’ At that moment, Lin An had already sunk into the quicksand swamp. His entire body was covered in sand, and he suddenly felt the pressure around him growing stronger and stronger. It felt as if his body was being endlessly compressed. Lin An quickly activated the morality demon sealing technique, and a powerful force wrapped around him and immediately eased the discomfort. The sand and the morality demon sealing technique’s diamond shield rubbed against each other, making a rustling sound. At that moment, Lin An felt as if he was in an hourglass as he slowly sank into the quicksand. After some time, he abruptly detected a sense of emptiness around him. The force that had been pulling him downwards immediately ceased to have an effect on him, and he felt as if he had broken free from some tough restraints. As he floated in the air, Lin An was shocked by the scene before his eyes. There was another world under the desert. The sand flowed down and formed a pyramid shape. Lin An also noticed that an oasis had sprung up. He immediately set his feet on the ground and observed his surroundings. Suddenly, a small green figure flashed past Lin An’s eyes. ‘The medicinal spirit! It’s really here!’ However, Lin An didn’t have much of a mind to chase after the medicinal spirit This was because the three huge pyramids that had formed had already occupied all of his attention. Around the three enormous pyramids, several other small pyramids began to form. It seemed that each pyramid had a number, and it was made up of huge flames. The size of a pyramid seemed to determine its number. There were ninety-nine pyramids. The largest pyramid was labeled with the number one, while the smallest pyramid had the number of ninety-nine. The three largest pyramids were arranged from north to south. They were spread out around the oasis like three golden turtles, and they were as stable as a mountain. The weird pyramids seemed to be laid out in a strange order. Sure enough, under Lin An’s gaze, the success rate system exposed the mystery. [In pyramid number one, your success rate of completed exploration is 0%!] [In pyramid number two, your success rate of completed exploration is 5%!] [In pyramid number three, your success rate of completed exploration is 28%!] [The success rate of completing the exploration of the twenty-first pyramid is 80%, and the probability of obtaining a fragment is 65%!] [The success rate of completing the exploration of the forty-third pyramid is 87%, and the probability of obtaining a fragment is 88%!] [The success rate of completing the exploration of the fifty-fifth pyramid is 95%, and the probability of obtaining a fragment is 99%!] “Haha! I see!” After he read the success rate system’s notifications, Lin An revealed a smile and immediately understood. “So, these pyramids contain the key fragments to enter the main pyramid. Only by obtaining all the fragments will I have the chance to enter the inner part of the largest pyramid. There has to be a certain sequence within it. Otherwise, if I go astray, I could fall into an endless reincarnation, and I could be trapped in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm!” Lin An could only obtain the treasure in the largest pyramid if he followed an exact series of steps. If the steps were wrong, he would naturally be stuck in a quagmire in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Among the sequence of pyramids, only the first, second, third, twenty-first, forty-third, and fifty-fifth pyramids harbored the treasure keys. The other pyramids were just smokescreens. There would be no value in exploring them. Lin An already had one of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm’s key fragments in his hands. He now understood that it was a spoil of war that had been obtained by the cultivators who had explored the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm in the past. According to the basic rules of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, Lin An knew that it would remain open for one month. Since he had the success rate system, he had a high chance of obtaining all the valuable inheritances in the mystic realm. Lin An’s focus shifted to the rising blue flames from the top of the pyramids, and he fell into deep thought. The flames appeared to be the materialization of the legendary extreme fire. However, the blue flames had not been detected by the success rate system, so Lin An concluded that they were just an illusion. The actual extreme fire was bound to be in one of the three great pyramids. After thinking it through, Lin An came up with a plan. As long as he followed the correct series of steps, he would wait for the most effective opening to secure the treasures in the pyramid. Since he had already identified the pyramids that contained the key fragments, Lin An had no more worries. The medicinal spirit was also temporarily thrown to the back of his mind as he rushed towards the fifty-fifth pyramid. ...; On the other side, the disciples from the other sects had entered the oasis. The first and second levels of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm did not have many valuable treasures. However, the pyramid city below the third level of the desert harbored several divine treasures. Therefore, the disciples entered the third level one after another. When they saw the spectacular scene in front of them, they were shocked. It was truly a unique world! They even felt as if they were in an alien continent. The first two levels of the mystic realm had not been as spectacular as the scene in front of them. After all, the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was just a large cemetery. How had the beautiful pyramid world formed under the desert? There was nothing wrong with the cultivator’s suspicions. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was not a part of the Cangyun Continent. Its actual location was in the sphere of the upper realm! “Senior Brother Lin Dong, what should we do now?” As the eldest senior brother of the Heavenly Mystery Sect, Lin Dong had guided the rest of the disciples through the quicksand. He had used his treasures to protect the disciples, which had allowed them to successfully plunge into the third level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. At that moment, Lin Dong appeared ethereal and otherworldly, and his aura was vividly displayed. He proudly lifted his head, but his eyes were suddenly filled with bewilderment. It was obvious that even the genius Lin Dong was completely confused by the complicated pyramids in front of him. For a moment, he did not know what to do. “Everyone will now have to count on their luck. Let’s split up! We should look out for each other since we belong to the same sect. If we encounter any danger, we should immediately send out a signal, and the nearest disciples will rush over!” When they heard Lin Dong’s words, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples felt a chill in their hearts. It seemed that even their eldest senior brother had limited information about the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. There were still too many unknowns within the mystic realm. The disciples exchanged perplexed expressions, and they all felt helpless. There was no obvious pattern to the large and small pyramids in front of them. They would now have to rely on their luck. The Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples knew it would be difficult to navigate the pyramids with no obvious clues. At that moment, the disciples from other sects also entered the oasis. Just like the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, they were all confused, and they did not know how to start the exploration. They would have to split up to increase the efficiency of their exploration and enhance their chances of obtaining opportunities! “Wait, look, there’s someone over there!” “No way! Is that Lin An?” The disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect looked over and saw Lin An’s figure. However, he quickly disappeared into the fifty-fifth pyramid. The disciples couldn’t believe their eyes, and they were all astonished. “What’s going on! We didn’t see him in the first two levels of the mystic realm!” “Could it be that he was the first to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, and that’s why we didn’t see him?” A majority of the disciples had already interacted with each other as they explored the first two levels of the mystic realm. However, nobody had seen Lin An enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. To them, he was a stranger. Now that they had seen him exploring the pyramids, they were all curious. “He must be the disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect!” “It’s him. I saw him arguing with the leading elder from the Jiuxiao Sect.” “Could it be that he entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm before us?” “It must be. Otherwise, there’s no way to explain this phenomenon!” As the disciples continued to discuss among themselves, several cultivators followed Lin An’s footsteps. After all, it was a good thing to have someone lead the way. In fact, if Lin An obtained a treasure, the trailing disciples could ambush him and snatch it! The disciples were confident that they could test Lin An’s strength if he successfully secured any meaningful opportunities. After discovering that Lin An had already entered the third level, the disciples spread out and began to explore the various pyramids. ...; Lin An had already entered the fifty-fifth pyramid, and he carefully walked through a long stone passageway. Under the dim light, the murals on the stone walls looked very exquisite. However, Lin An didn’t stare at the murals. He had already received a warning from the success rate system. The murals had a bewitching power, and they could hypnotize anyone who laid their eyes on them. Lin An’s goal was obvious. He had to secure the key fragment in the fifty-fifth pyramid! At that moment, Lin An took out the golden fragment he had received from Qian Yi. The words on the golden fragment abruptly shone. It was as if they resonated with something inside the pyramid! ‘As expected, the keys are interlinked! Once I collect them all and fuse them, I will be qualified to enter the main pyramid!’ As the thought ran through Lin An’s mind, a golden light suddenly appeared in front of him. He had abruptly entered the internal space of the pyramid. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The interior of the pyramid was a triangular room, and a dim light illuminated the hollow space. At the center of the room, there was an inverted pyramid that looked like a tabletop, and a chessboard was lying on top of it. Other than the inverted tabletop, there was nothing else in the room. Before Lin An could figure out the purpose of the chessboard, a deep voice rang out and reverberated in the hollow space. “If you can solve this exquisite chess game, the treasure vault will open, and you will choose three treasures at will!” “However, failure will lead to immediate death!” After he heard the ethereal voice, Lin An felt calm. He now understood the rules of the pyramid. As long as he solved the exquisite chess game, and passed the test, he would naturally acquire the key fragment. However, as Lin An walked towards the chessboard, three disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect and two disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect entered the inner part of the pyramid at the same time. Upon seeing that Lin An was at the center of the space, the five of them stopped. They didn’t dare to advance any further. The voice that had rung out in the pyramid earlier naturally repeated the instructions to the five disciples as well. “I have never seen this kind of chess game before. If we accept this challenge, we could lose our lives if we fail!” “This opportunity isn’t easy to obtain. I think we should look for another opportunity!” “Senior Brother is right. Let’s not waste time.” Two of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples were the ones who spoke. In their opinion, the price of obtaining the opportunity seemed too high. There were ninety-nine pyramids in the third level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. It was better to search for a less dangerous opportunity in the other pyramids. The two disciples already had the intention to retreat, but they were quickly pulled back by the third Heavenly Sect disciple who seemed to be the most senior cultivator among them. The leader of the disciples said telepathically, “Why don’t we let this disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect give it a try? In any case, we’ll just wait. If he fails, we’ll leave immediately. If he succeeds, we can snatch the opportunity from him!” Under the persuasion of the senior disciple, the other two Heavenly Sect cultivators stopped and waited to see how Lin An would solve the chess game. Across the room, Zhang Ling and the other Jiuxiao Sect disciple looked on nervously. “Lin An, there are other opportunities in the mystic realm. Please give up on this pyramid!” “Senior Sister is right. It’s difficult to survive in the third level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Don’t lose your life because of greed!” Lin An ignored his two fellow disciples. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was already a dangerous place. He couldn’t pass up on an opportunity due to fear. When he saw that the other disciples were alarmed, Lin An couldn’t help but laugh. The other disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect felt that Lin An was being stubborn, and he furrowed his brows. “Hey! Lin An, don’t be ungrateful. You should listen to Senior Sister’s words! This opportunity is too dangerous. A small fly like you can’t get it!” When he heard the disciple’s words, Lin An immediately replied, “Uneducated dogs will always bark!” “Lin An, do you want me to teach you a lesson about respect?” “Get lost!” At that moment, the atmosphere was explosive. The Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples at the side looked at the scene in front of them with a dumbfounded expression. The Jiuxiao Sect disciples were fighting among themselves. It seemed that Lin An wasn’t popular among the rest of the Jiuxiao Sect disciples. Even though he was attempting to obtain an opportunity, his fellow cultivators were still ridiculing him. It was indeed a little unreasonable! The three disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect watched the show intently. “You actually dare to disobey your eldest senior sister!” The Jiuxiao Sect disciple continued to escalate the confrontation. Suddenly, Lin An waved his hand, and a pale flame flew towards the disciple. Lin An had never interacted with the seemingly aggressive disciple, and he simply thought that he was very annoying. He resolved to give him eternal peace and shut him up forever! When she saw the white flame flying towards her colleague, Zhang Ling immediately panicked. She had witnessed the power of the flame before, so she definitely couldn’t intervene. Otherwise, she would suffer a great loss. The other disciple did not have Zhang Ling’s awareness. He thought that Lin An was just a small fly. Although he knew that Lin An had won the inner sect competition, as an old disciple who had been in the Jiuxiao Sect for over ten years, he naturally would not put with an insolent junior disciple. He immediately clenched his fist tightly and went up to meet the pale flame. Just as the disciple’s fist was about to touch the pale flame, he felt a bone-piercing chill, and his heart pumped a little faster. It was as if he had fallen into an ice cellar. The disciple immediately tried to withdraw his fist and escape, but a cold breeze suddenly blew through the room. In an instant, the disciple had turned into a frozen ice sculpture. The atmosphere in the room instantly became quiet, leaving only the sizzling sounds of ice. Zhang Ling frowned as she stared at her companion’s ice statue. She hadn’t expected Lin An to be so decisive. He had just subdued a senior disciple from his own sect. Lin An’s previous opponents in the inner sect competition had been promising young geniuses. However, he had just outsmarted an experienced senior disciple. The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect suddenly burst into laughter. Since they were not members of the Jiuxiao Sect, they had no interest in interfering in the sect’s internal affairs without any benefits. “Haha, this Junior Brother’s personality is really irritable!” “Wonderful, it’s really wonderful! This is the first time I have seen this kind of performance in my life!” The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect couldn’t help but tease Lin An. Suddenly, he turned his head and stared at the disciples as the pale flame burned furiously in his hand. “F*ck off! I don’t mind shutting all of you up forever!” A disciple from the Heavenly Mystery Sect was about to step forward, but the senior disciple held him back. Even though Lin An was arrogant, they needed him to try out the exquisite chess game! They couldn’t afford to get angry at Lin An’s words and lose such out on such an excellent opportunity! In any case, if Lin An passed the test, then they could steal the pyramid’s treasures from him, and if he didn’t succeed, they could just leave! There wouldn’t be any disadvantage. However, if Lin An were to fight with the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples before attempting the test, their plan would be in jeopardy. The senior disciple wouldn’t allow that to happen. After he restrained his companions, the scene immediately quieted down. It seemed that they wouldn’t disturb Lin An anymore. Lin An didn’t pay them any more attention. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm would only be open for a month. He had to seize every moment. Immediately, Lin An placed his hand on the inverted pyramid tabletop. Instantly, the golden light in the entire room extinguished and gathered around the chessboard! “Welcome to the exquisite chess game!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An was suddenly transported into a void. In front of him laid a crisscrossed chessboard, and on its chequered surface, there were all kinds of chess pieces. The pieces were carved into various images, and each image was vivid and lifelike. It seemed as if the chess pieces were about to come to life. The black and white chess pieces took the forms of humans, ferocious beasts, and war chariots, and they each had their own aura. Suddenly, the void was filled with the sound of war drums, and at that moment, an eerie voice rang out. Lin An had already heard the voice before, and it quickly outlined the rules of the chess game. However, although Lin An knew the rules, he had little time to come up with a strategy. ‘Isn’t it just a chess game? With the success rate system, I will naturally figure out the moves!’ After the strange voice fell silent, the chess game officially began. Suddenly, the illusory image of an old man appeared in front of Lin An, and with the wave of its hand, the illusory image began to move the chess pieces around. Nonetheless, Lin An remained calm. As the chess battle continued, the earthly seasons changed rapidly around the two competitors. From intense heat to cold winters, it felt as if they had gone through countless changes in time. The chess game progressed step by step, and the chess pieces fought wantonly on the chessboard. In the end, a king would have to be crowned. At the same time, several notifications kept popping up furiously before Lin An’s eyes. [The fifth move to the fourth move is only a test. The success rate of countering it is 100%!] [If you move your rook diagonally, your opponent will not be able to defend against the hidden arrow. Your success rate will be 100%!] ...; Lin An had an intense expression on his face as he focused on the chessboard. His battle techniques were endless, and his attacks were as swift as the wind. After some time, he completely crushed the illusory elder. Abruptly, the illusionary image turned into starlight dust and instantly dispersed. “You have defeated the chess saint; you will now receive a reward.” After the deep voice rang out, Lin An was teleported back to the pyramid. The other disciples had seen Lin An disappear in an instant, but in less than a second, he had reappeared in the pyramid again. “Senior Brother, this disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect seems to have failed. He hasn’t changed at all. He just suddenly disappeared for a moment.” “I thought there was something amazing about him. I didn’t expect that he couldn’t even enter the chess game.” “Let’s go back. There’s no profit in this pyramid.” In their opinion, Lin An hadn’t even played the chess game. However, Lin An had actually taken close to a hundred years to defeat the chess saint. Zhang Ling frowned as well. She was convinced that Lin An had failed. After all, it had only been a breath’s time since Lin An had vanished, and he didn’t seem to have accomplished anything. When Lin An looked around the pyramid, he was also a little confused. But in the next moment, the interior of the pyramid changed completely. The ground opened up and revealed several sets of bones. There were at least hundreds of remains, and judging from their appearance, they had died at different times. The most recent remains seemed to have decomposed for close to a hundred years. “These could be the bodies of the disciples who died after failing the challenge!” When he saw the scene, Lin An felt relieved. However, the other disciples in the pyramid were all scared silly. Why had such a cruel phenomenon suddenly appeared! As they stared at the remains, some of the clothes that covered the bones seemed a little familiar. “Wait, are these our senior and junior brothers from a hundred years ago?” Once they discovered that some corpses were still covered in the robes associated with the Heavenly Mystery Sect, they were shocked. In the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, death was an ordinary phenomenon. It was fine with the disciples if it occurred to someone they didn’t know, but if it was someone they knew, it would be terrifying. “It can’t be. These are the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s Tianyun Hall. So, they died here during the training in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm a hundred years ago! What is going on?” “Why did these remains suddenly appear?” Everyone looked nervous, and their eyebrows couldn’t help but tremble. The scene inside the pyramid continued to change. Soon, a few rows of weapon shelves appeared along the walls. Everyone thought the weapons were a reward. Once the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect saw the situation, they were no longer sad for their dead brothers and sisters. They immediately rushed towards the weapons. The mystic realm was full of opportunities, and they couldn’t afford to let any chances slip through their fingers! The weapons on the shelves were rare treasures. Therefore, the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect naturally wanted to secure all the weapons. Zhang Ling followed closely behind them. Although the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect had the advantage in numbers, Zhang Ling was not to be trifled with. Additionally, she was also confident in Lin An’s combat strength. “Junior Brother Lin, let’s quickly collect them. This is our opportunity!” Just as everyone was about to touch the weapons rack, a mysterious force suddenly repelled them. “What?” The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect were appalled. They had almost laid their hands on the weapons, but they couldn’t collect them. As they reluctantly retreated, an otherworldly voice echoed through the pyramid. “Only those who have solved the exquisite chess game have the right to choose three weapons as their reward!” “Those who had nothing to do with the chess game will be punished by the heavens if they insist on laying their hands on the treasures!” The mysterious voice was authoritative as it sounded off the warning. The disciples of the Heavenly Mystery Sect finally reacted when they heard the voice. “No way! Could it be that the disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect has already solved the chess game?” “Only this can explain why this phenomenon happened. I have to say, we can only wait for Lin An to finish collecting the rewards before we kill him and steal his goods!” The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect looked at each other and quickly decided to kill Lin An once he collected the treasures! They didn’t conceal their intentions. When she heard the conversation between the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, Zhang Ling could not help but scowl. She immediately said, “Junior Brother Lin, you choose the rewards first. I will deal with these three opportunists!” The three disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect immediately burst into laughter. “You two don’t stand a chance against us!” “The Jiuxiao Sect is just a small sect. How dare you go against our Heavenly Mystery Sect! In a while, when Lin An receives his reward, this will be the place where you will both die!” “Did I ask you to speak?” Lin An was already furious. “Why don’t you just shut up!” As he spoke, he charged over with the black and white flames burning furiously in his hands. The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect instantly went up to meet Zhang Ling and Lin An. When they saw that the two Jiuxiao Sect were not slowing down their momentum, the three disciples instantly became furious. The Heavenly Mystery Sect could not be provoked. It was the largest sect in the Cangyun Continent, and its disciples had superior skills compared to the cultivators from the other sects. Going by the number of disciples who had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm alone, their total number was greater than the total number of disciples from the other sects. Such a difference in strength naturally made the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples appear very arrogant. Whenever they encountered something unpleasant, it quickly aroused their anger. “You’re courting death!” “Junior Brother, I’ll leave that woman to you!” “Now, how dare a weak sect provoke the Heavenly Mystery Sect? All of you, go to hell!” Zhang Ling had already charged over. The long sword in her hand let out a rumbling sound, but just as she was about to stab one of the disciples, Lin An suddenly stood in front of her. He crossed his hands in front of his chest, and the black and white flames burned furiously on his fists. In an instant, he opened his hands, and the flames zapped out towards the three challengers. Whoosh! The blazing flames landed furiously on the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. “Hahaha, how can your flames be effective against us!” “Do you think I’m the same as that trash you froze from the Jiuxiao Sect?” “You have to know that we’re the inner sect disciples of the Heavenly Mystery Sect. We have several magic treasures that can defend against the flames.” Just as the three disciples were putting up their defenses, another barrage of flames flew in their direction. In the next breath, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples were completely shocked. Lin An’s flames were too unusual. Even though they had their sect’s defensive magic treasures, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples still couldn’t withstand the intensity of the black and white flames. Before entering the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, all the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect had been rigorously prepared. They had each received several defensive magic artifacts to protect them from any attacks. However, it seemed that the defensive magic treasures could not block Lin An’s flames. “What kind of flame is this? It’s even burning through the fire repelling clothes!” “Senior Brother, my dragon subduing flame map can no longer block the flames!” “This is bad. We cannot withstand this kind of attack. Let’s quickly withdraw and call Senior Brother Lin Dong. Perhaps, he can find a way to deal with it...;” Just as the three disciples were struggling to resist the flames, Lin An once again opened his mouth and mocked them. “Didn’t you think that you could resist my black and white twin flames? Even your Senior Brother named Lin Dong will be a dead soul under my flames!” “What? You...;” Before the senior Heavenly Mystery Sect disciple could finish speaking, Lin An clenched his hands, and the black and white flames immediately fused together and abruptly compressed. In an instant, the three disciples were completely burned into ashes. ...; In the seventy-fifth pyramid, Lin Dong sensed that the life force of the three Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples had been cut off, and an awful premonition struck his heart. “Someone actually dared to attack my Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, and it is a member of the Jiuxiao Sect! Once I break out of this mysterious realm, I will definitely settle the score with the disciples from that sect!” As the core disciple of the Heavenly Mystery Sect, Lin Dong naturally possessed a secret technique to keep track of his comrades. Hence, he quickly learned of Lin An’s actions, and he was furious. Unfortunately, Lin Dong was still within the inner space of the seventy-fifth pyramid, and he couldn’t leave immediately. He would have to wait before settling the score with Lin An and Zhang Ling. However, he could still ask the other Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples to make a move and plot their revenge in advance. Immediately, Lin Dong transmitted his voice to the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples outside the pyramid. “Zhang Chang, Li Mingyue, the Jiuxiao Sect disciples have killed three of our disciples. If you encounter any disciples from that sect, kill them without mercy!” ...; Inside the inner space of the fifty-fifth pyramid, the flames had completely burned out, and the room had suddenly fallen silent. Zhang Ling looked at the smoldering scene in front of her, and she couldn’t help but be astonished. She had some understanding of Lin An’s strength, but she really couldn’t guess the extent of his power. If Lin An had allowed her to fight with the three Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, she would have taken a lot of time. However, Lin An had dealt with them in an instant. Could it be that his strength was already above hers? Or had the two black and white flames given him an unfair advantage? Zhang Ling also knew that Lin An was cultivating the ‘Scripture of No Beginning.’ However, the scripture had always been a taboo on the Cangyun Continent. There hadn’t been a cultivator who had ever successfully mastered the strength of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning.’ Moreover, Lin An had used the black and white flames to destroy the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples instead of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning.’ Zhang Ling was suddenly curious. She even had the impulse to fight Lin An. However, in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, finding opportunities was the most important goal. “Junior Brother Lin An, are the two types of flames you used some kind of secret treasure?” Lin An didn’t even turn his head to acknowledge Zhang Ling’s question. Instead, he focused on the weapons on the shelf. After a few minutes, he chose two weapons from the shelf. The weapons were basically useless to him. However, Lin An felt that he could exchange them for some more valuable treasures in the future. The two weapons were a long spear, and a flying sword. There was nothing special about them. However, at the end of the weapon rack, there was a purple-gold wooden box. Lin An quickly picked it up, and once he opened it, a golden shard shone brightly in front of his eyes. Lin An had achieved his goal. The difference between the key fragment in his possession and the golden shard in the box was that the second shard looked brand new. Lin An thought that the distinction between the two fragments had occurred because he first key fragment had left the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, and it had been corroded by the wind and rain from the outside world, so it had become rusty. The golden shard fragment was still in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, so it naturally hadn’t been corroded. There was another important difference. Several words appeared to have been inscribed on both sides of the golden shard fragment! The first key fragment only had engravings on one side. As for the writings on both fragments, Lin An still couldn’t understand them. He assumed that he would only understand the writings once he collected the remaining fragments. After Lin An chose his treasures, he walked towards the outside of the pyramid. However, he didn’t utter a word to Zhang Ling as he walked past her. The star Jiuxiao Sect disciple was so angry that she stomped her feet furiously, unable to speak. Suddenly, the ice sculpture of the senior disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect thawed. Once he was completely unfrozen, he stared at Zhang Ling with a petrified expression, and his entire body couldn’t stop trembling. Since the senior disciple belonged to the Jiuxiao Sect, Lin An had opted against killing him. Therefore, he had used his ice flame to temporary freeze him. However, if the disciple confronted him again, Lin An didn’t mind shutting him up forever. Several disciples from the other sects had already arrived at the oasis, and they were exploring the inner parts of the different pyramids. Lin An turned to a quiet place and took out the two key fragments. Previously, with Zhang Ling present, Lin An didn’t want to expose the key fragments in front of her. But now, the two fragments suddenly emitted a bright light and abruptly combined to form a golden semicircle. At that moment, the previously unwritten fragment seemed to have been affected by the second fragment, and some characters from the upper realm gradually appeared on its unwritten side. Lin An’s vision also became clear, and a string of characters formed in front of his eyes. [The host’s success rate of obtaining the Hell King’s purgatory body is 10%!] The so-called Hell King’s purgatory body was a divine body that would reflect in a cultivator’s physique. Those who could possess a divine body were favored by the heavens. Regardless of whether they had obtained it through cultivation or an epiphany, their abilities would be greatly enhanced once they merged with a divine body! Some divine bodies had already been absorbed by the world and become famous existences. However, a few powerful divine bodies hadn’t been recognized by the world, but it wasn’t because they didn’t have the corresponding strength. Lin An’s master, Qian Yi, had a life-level divine body. Since the life-level divine body was well known in the cultivators’ world, it had a corresponding ranking. But the Hell King’s purgatory body hadn’t been absorbed. It had been a divine body from the Ancient God era, but after time had passed, all the information about its existences had been lost, and it had long been submerged in the river of time. The Hades purgatory body, the Thousand Magic Aspect golden body, and the Ancient Relic holy body were the most famous existences from that distant era! If a cultivator attained a godly body, it would increase their chances of becoming an immortal emperor. Once he read the legible writings on the merged golden fragments, Lin An was extremely surprised. ‘The Hell King’s purgatory body?’ Lin An was curious about the existence of such a unique divine body. However, he knew he could only get more information about the Hell King’s purgatory body after collecting the other two golden keys and merging the four fragments into one. When he thought about it, Lin An became a little excited. He immediately scanned the remaining pyramids and headed towards the forty-third pyramid. In less than ten minutes, Lin An had already entered the pyramid. At that moment, some disciples from a rival sect were walking out of the pyramid. Judging from their clothing, they were disciples from the Southern Cloud Sect. As they walked out, they kept shaking their heads in disappointment. It seemed that they had not successfully received any rewards. “Judging from your robe, you must be a disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect. I advise you not to go in. The challenge inside is too dangerous, it’s not something you can overcome!” The disciple spoke to Lin An in a dejected tone. “Oh? Why do you think so?” Lin An asked. “You need to go through the square inside the pyramid, but there’s no discernable pattern for you to follow. It’s impossible for an ordinary disciple to advance. You’d better turn back and avoid wasting time in the forty-third pyramid!” ‘Go through the square?’ Lin An pondered with interest and immediately said, “I’d better go in and take a look. Isn’t the so-called opportunity a test?” When they heard Lin An’s words, the disciples immediately nodded in agreement. However, they didn’t have the intention to attempt the test. In their opinion, entering the pyramid again would be fruitless. Lin An parted with the Southern Cloud Sect disciples walked into the inner part of the pyramid. The space inside the pyramid was similar to the previous hollow space in the fifty-fifth pyramid, but it was square in shape. The top of the space formed an ordinary wall, while the bottom was an endless space, like a square black hole. If one fell into the black hole, they would enter the cycle of reincarnation. Parallel to the platform, there were many square stone bricks floating in the space. Soon, a familiar voice boomed through the inner space of the pyramid and quickly explained the rules. Once a cultivator accepted the challenge, they needed to jump onto the first stone brick. The stone brick would then give a hint, and the cultivator would have to use their own judgment before choosing to jump onto the second stone brick. If the cultivator made the wrong choice, they would fall into the cycle of reincarnation. After Lin An heard the instructions, a hint immediately popped up in front of his eyes. He sequentially jumped onto the stone bricks one hundred times, and suddenly, the entire internal space of the pyramid turned around. Lin An had secured the right to choose a reward in the forty-third pyramid. Other than the golden fragment, five top-grade pills, and a pill diagram appeared in the pyramid’s treasure chest. Lin An examined the treasures and spotted a rose mother pill, which aroused his curiosity. The rose mother pill was actually a shell of a pill. If a regular pill was put into the rose mother pill, its potency would be raised by the rose mother pill. To Lin An, the rose mother pill was a valuable treasure. However, he wasn’t sure whether it would raise the quality of a peerless demonic pill. Since Lin An had the success rate system, he felt he could add the rose mother pill to his arsenal and improve his pill refining skills. It would definitely be of great use. Therefore, the forty-third pyramid appeared to have some useful rewards compared to the fifty-fifth pyramid. At the same time, the Southern Cloud Sect disciples were still standing outside the forty-third pyramid, and they pondered their next move. “There are so many pyramids. No matter how I look at it, I don’t know which one to choose!” “That’s right, Senior Brother. It can’t be that difficult in every pyramid, right?” “Right now, we’ve only collected two stalks of herbs. If we don’t get lucky, we won’t bring glory to our sect!” “It’s fine. As long as we return alive, we’ll be considered as having succeeded!” “I wonder how the Jiuxiao Sect disciple is doing?” “He might come out soon. After all, in the face of such a challenge, many people choose to retreat without a fight!” Just as they were discussing their next move, Lin An appeared beside them. “Was I right, Junior Brother? Isn’t this round very difficult? Why don’t we conquer the next pyramid together?” The Southern Cloud Sect was a very small sect. The entire sect added up to less than a hundred people. Consequently, the number of disciples who had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was less than twenty. Since the Southern Cloud Sect disciples were relatively lucky, they had suffered no losses in the magic array maze. However, even though the disciples cherished the opportunities in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, survival was their most important goal. When he heard the Southern Cloud Sect disciple’s request, Lin An wasn’t surprised. He didn’t choose to tell the disciples about his reward. After all, he had five top-grade pills. If he told them about his success, wouldn’t they die of envy? After waving his hand to decline their request, Lin An swiftly rushed to the next pyramid. He was eager to secure the final key fragment. However, just as Lin An reached the entrance, he suddenly stopped. A disciple from the Heavenly Mystery Sect stood in front of him menacingly. “This pyramid is my Senior Brother Lin Dong’s fortuitous encounter. No one else can enter!” “Didn’t you hear me? I told you to stop!” Seeing that Lin An didn’t stop, the disciple from the Heavenly Mystery Sect drew his sword. The cultivators from the other sects all gathered around to watch the show, but there were also some disciples who wanted to fight for justice. Although the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples were powerful, the disciples from the other sects couldn’t help but gossip about their arrogance. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was a place where everyone could obtain opportunities, but the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples acted like it was their back garden. Faced with such a situation, all the other cultivators were unhappy. However, there was nothing they could do. After all, the Heavenly Mystery Sect was the largest sect! Nevertheless, some disciples could no longer tolerate the fact that the Heavenly Mystery Sect cultivators actually dared to block other disciples from entering the pyramids in the mystic realm. “Outrageous! This Heavenly Mystery Sect disciple is too arrogant and despotic. Does he really treat the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm as his backyard?” Faced with the doubts from the other small sects, the surrounding Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples all revealed disdainful smiles. Clang! Clang! Clang! The sound of swords being drawn was heard continuously, and the disciples aimed the tip of their swords at the cultivators from the other small sects. In the eyes of the Heavenly Mystery Sect cultivators, even if the disciples from the other sects ganged up, they would not be as powerful as their own main sect. The numbers and strength of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples who had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm were incomparable. “Fireflies dare to compete with the sun and the moon?” “Take a step forward, and I will cut you down!” One of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples issued a naked warning. When they heard the threat, the disciples from the other sects looked at each other and remained silent. While it was possible to doubt the verbal threat, choosing to fight the disciples wouldn’t be wise. The large numbers of the Heavenly Mystery Sect were enough to destroy their own sects ten thousand times! There was no need to make enemies in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Even if they could defeat the current crop of aggressive Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, the news about their victory would definitely spread. As long as there were Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples alive, the small sects would still have to face the wrath of the huge sect in the future. Therefore, none of the other sects dared to draw their weapons and attack. When they saw the retreating crowd, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples laughed complacently. “Hahaha! See, these are a bunch of toothless mobs. In the eyes of our Heavenly Mystery Sect, they are like ants!” “Senior Brother Lu is right. An ant trying to shake a tree only asks for humiliation!” Just as the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples were looking at the other cultivators with disdain, Lin An took a few steps forward. “Stop! Are you deaf?” Lin An ignored the hostile disciples. The remaining key fragment he desired was in the pyramid, and naturally, he would not let others get to it first. If the last fragment was obtained by the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect, then he would have to wrestle it from them at all costs. Even though the Heavenly Mystery Sect was powerful, Lin An wasn’t intimidated. This was because he knew that his master, Qian Yi, was an extraordinary being. She was not afraid of the Heavenly Mystery Sect. The Heavenly Mystery Sect was considered the best faction in the Cangyun Continent. However, there was always someone better than them. The size of the cultivation world was beyond everyone’s imagination. Similar to the Hell King’s purgatory body, there were many mighty sects from the Ancient God era that were yet to be discovered. The world of cultivators had been in existence for tens of thousands of years. With his master as his guarantor, Lin An could do whatever he wanted. So, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples did not strike any fear in his heart. When they saw that Lin An wasn’t backing down, the disciples from the other small sects looked at him with a worried expression. “This disciple is from the Jiuxiao Sect, right? Don’t provoke the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, or else you’ll drag us down with you!” The Jiuxiao Sect disciples present knew that Lin An and his master had the same temperament. They were both too impulsive. “Junior Brother Lin An, come back quickly. Don’t provoke the Heavenly Mystery Sect!” “That’s right, it’s not within our sect’s norms to attack other factions unprovoked. Don’t be too impudent!” “You can look for more opportunities, but you only have one life. Don’t bring disaster to the Jiuxiao Sect because of this!” Lin An did not acknowledge his fellow disciples. Instead, he walked towards the entrance of the pyramid. When the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples saw this, they all became angry and immediately drew their swords as they rushed towards him. In just a few seconds, they had surrounded Lin An. The flames of war were about to be ignited. “Do you really think that the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm is your sect’s backyard? Well, whoever stands in my way will die!” In an instant, Lin An’s aura erupted, and it forced the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples to retreat! Suddenly, Lin An ignited his black flames and hurled them towards his opponents. “You...; How dare you defy the Heavenly Mystery Sect!” “What’s going on? What’s with the black flames!” “Senior Brother, save me! Don’t you have a magic treasure that can defend against the flames? These black flames are blazing hot!” The Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples rolled on the ground in pain as they gaped at their burning hands. Within a few seconds, their once healthy arms were completely gone, and they all revealed hateful expressions: “Jiuxiao Sect!” “Wait until our Eldest Senior Brother leaves the mystic realm...;” Before the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciple could finish speaking, Lin An let out a mocking laugh. “How boring! Is this how the Heavenly Mystery Sect taught you guys? They raised a bunch of flies!” Lin An raised his hand, and a gust of cold air instantly filled the entire area. Suddenly, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples immediately turned into ice sculptures. Lin An hadn’t even used his full strength to deal with the fifth-level golden core stage disciples. He had only needed to use his black and white flames to finish them off. As they watched the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples turn into ice sculptures one after another, the cultivators from the small sect did not utter a word. Everyone’s eyes were filled with shock as they looked at Lin An. They didn’t even dare to breathe loudly since they were afraid that they would anger the Jiuxiao Sect disciple. After they followed Lin An into the pyramid, the other disciples conferred in hushed tones. “Is this disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect? How come I’ve never heard of his deeds? Is he the peerless genius from a hundred years ago?” “I heard that a peerless genius appeared in the Jiuxiao Sect a hundred years ago. He had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm to look for opportunities, and after that, he seemed to have become even stronger because he cultivated a cultivation technique that he obtained in the mystic realm!” “No way. I heard that this disciple’s name is Lin An. He just entered the inner sect this year! I think that he’s the personal disciple to some strange peak master!” “Strange peak master?” “Yes, I heard my master say that the Jiuxiao Sect is actually a small sect, and there are no powerful people. However, the Bixiao Peak master should never be provoked because she’s the strongest in the Jiuxiao Sect. Actually, she’s the strongest being in the entire continent!” The group of disciples looked at each other in disbelief. If they hadn’t seen Lin An’s performance, they wouldn’t have believed the disciple’s words. The Jiuxiao Sect was only a small sect. Did they really have an expert cultivator? A single disciple had just destroyed several fifth-level golden core disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. Was Lin An the Bixiao Peak master’s disciple? <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “This disciple’s strength is actually so tyrannical!” The disciples from the other sects exclaimed as Lin An walked into the interior of the pyramid. Meanwhile, Lin Dong led out a few disciples at that moment. The two men exchanged unfriendly stares as they walked past each other. Lin Dong had clearly failed, and he was in a flustered and exasperated state. The trial within the pyramid was too grueling. It was simply something that he could not pass. Hence, he had given up and decided to seek opportunities in the other pyramids. When Ling Dong reached the outer perimeter of the pyramid, he was shocked. The oasis was filled with pale-white ice sculptures. Within each ice sculpture was the shape of a human. The expressions of the trapped disciples were full of fear, and their eyes and mouths were wide open as if they had been preparing to cry for help. It was a miserable sight, and the icy wind blowing furiously over the oasis made the atmosphere eerier. “These frozen cultivators are all disciples from my Heavenly Mystery Sect!” Lin Dong’s mouth was agape. He did not dare to believe it. However, as the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s lead disciple, he naturally could not overlook such a provocation. He would have to pursue the individual responsible for the attack and execute them on the spot! Lin Dong’s vicious eyes swept across the disciples from the various sects who were at the scene. Everyone immediately felt a wave of fear, but they all remained silent. Lin Dong tried to contain his rage as he waited for the cultivators to reveal the identity of the attacker. However, the disciples from the other sects did not dare to say anything. They could not afford to offend Lin An, that killing god. On the other hand, they were also afraid of upsetting the lead disciple from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. Hence, silence was the best way to deal with the situation. When he saw that no one was speaking, Lin Dong suddenly waved his large hand. In an instant, a powerful suction force grabbed one of the disciples and thrust him forward. Lin Dong grabbed the disciple’s neck and asked fiercely, “Who was it!” Faced with a threat to his life, the disciple naturally did not dare to keep his mouth shut any longer. “It was Lin An from the Jiuxiao Sect! I beg you to let me off...;” Creak! Following the crackling sound, the disciple’s neck was instantly broken! His originally flailing arms immediately lost their strength, and his lifeless body slumped to the ground. Once they saw that Lin Dong had killed their fellow disciple, the other cultivators were immediately furious. However, there was nothing they could do. After letting out a sigh, they all turned their heads away, not daring to take another look at the lead disciple from the Heavenly Mystery Sect. “Lin An! Isn’t he that brat who just entered the pyramid?” “Let’s go! This is the place where he will die!” Under Lin Dong’s lead, the remaining Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples once again walked towards the interior of the pyramid. When they disappeared from sight, the disciples on the oasis immediately relaxed. “That killer is finally gone. Let’s hurry up and explore!” “It is said that treasures magically appear in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm from time to time. We must seize the opportunity!” “The treasures in the pyramid may not be fated for us, but the treasures flying above the oasis are ownerless. Whoever acts fast will get them!” Several disciples raised their heads to look at the stormy clouds above them. Their eyes were filled with desire, and they all fervently hoped that some treasures would appear in the sky. However, they didn’t know that a mechanism inside one of the pyramids was responsible for the flying treasures. Only by triggering the mechanism would the treasures fly out. ...; Lin An had already entered the inside of the pyramid. The setting wasn’t very different from the previous pyramid, but it was much more spacious. Lin An noticed that the internal space of each pyramid was different, but there was no visible object in the current pyramid. Abruptly, the deep familiar voice rang out again, and Lin An quickly understood the rules. His last trial would be a battle. He immediately accepted the challenge, and with a flash of golden light, a monster appeared in the space. Lin An’s opponent was a ferocious monster; the flying yaksha! According to legend, the flying yaksha was made of steel, and it had immense strength. Its face was like that of a ghost, and it also had wings on its back. The fabled monster could glide at low altitudes, and it was the undisputed leader of the demons in the underground abyss, which earned it the title of demon general. The flying yaksha was especially intelligent, and its martial arts skills were profound. Therefore, it could easily defeat opponents below the nascent soul stage. This made it practically invincible to the disciples who had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Another notable feature of the flying yaksha was its skin. On the outside, it was hard to cut through with a sword, but on the inside, its vitality was extremely strong. Even if its head was cut off, the rest of its body could continue to move and kill, and it would take several hours before it died. This type of demonic creature glided like lightning, and its speed was extremely fast. One flying yaksha was enough to block all cultivators below the golden core stage. ‘I didn’t expect such a monster to be trapped in this pyramid!’ Lin An was surprised. He suddenly felt waves of fear attack his heart. It wasn’t that he hadn’t heard of such a monster. He had read several ancient books that gave detailed explanations about the flying yaksha. The descriptions emphasized how terrifying it was. The kingdoms in the underground abyss were divided into demons, yakshas, and finally the flying yakshas. They were the true demon generals. The demon general in front of Lin An was holding a steel fork that flashed with a blue light. It was obvious that the fork had been poisoned. Even though flying yakshas were extremely intelligent, and they were proficient in all kinds of languages, they were still beasts. Their only desire was to kill and eat humans. Because it had been trapped for hundreds of years, the flying yaksha in the pyramid had not had any recent contact with humans. Once it saw Lin An, it was naturally filled with hunger and thirst! It couldn’t wait to tear him up and devour him right away. Coincidentally, Lin An had already reached the peak of the foundation establishment stage in his cultivation of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning,’ so he naturally needed to test his skills in actual combat. Perhaps, an experience in actual combat would help him move on to the second stage of the cultivation scripture. Therefore, the flying yaksha in front of him was a very good opponent. However, the greed in the demon monster’s eyes made Lin An hesitant to initiate an attack. At that moment, the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect stormed into the inner space of the pyramid. However, Lin Dong immediately regretted his decision to lead the disciples into the interior of the pyramid. “Damn it! Why did he open this trial!” “This is bad. We are now part of the trial.” “Senior Brother Lin Dong, the door has already been blocked. We can only leave if we defeat the flying yaksha!” Lin Dong felt a wave of unease in his heart. Although he was confident that he could exchange a few blows with the flying yaksha, he was not sure that he could kill it. However, he now had no choice. If he encountered any danger, he would have to attack. No matter how great the opportunity in the pyramid was, Lin Dong had felt that the risk of battling the flying yaksha was too great. Now that the monster had been unleashed, he would have to fight it. If he surrendered, he would definitely die. Once he made up his mind, Lin Dong clenched his teeth and pulled out his long sword. “We’ll kill the flying yaksha first, and then we’ll kill Lin An!” A fierce expression immediately formed on Lin Dong’s face. “Junior Brothers, set up a sword formation! We will break it once we kill the flying yaksha. As for that Jiuxiao Sect disciple! Ignore him!” “Yes!” While he was speaking, Lin Dong suddenly waved his hand. Abruptly, a long golden-colored rope that had a few purple-gold bells tied to it flew out from his hand like a spirit snake and bound the flying yaksha. At the same time, Lin Dong summoned a blue flying sword, and it shot into the air and slashed towards the demon monster. The other Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples each took out their own flying swords, and together with Lin Dong’s blue flying sword, they formed a five-pointed star formation in the air. Buzz! Buzz! Buzz! The five-pointed star formation took the form of five flying swords. They were influenced by each other’s mana, and their power increased steadily as they spun in the air, forming a sword pillar that was as thick as a bucket. The pillar spun and twisted violently, and a harsh gust of wind blew through the pyramid. Immediately, the fierce battle began! “Heavenly rooster sun chain!” The flying yaksha had been about to make a move when it suddenly saw the long rope fly out from the hands of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciple. The rope emitted a strong realgar smell that spread with the wind. As soon as the demon general smelled the scent, it felt its muscles go numb, and the rope wrapped around it. Lin Dong knew that the rope was a magical treasure. It was made of ten-thousand-year-old realgar essence that had been mixed with various natural treasures as well as five-colored roosters that had been hatched at the peak of their yhang energy. The blood from the rooster’s crest had been calcined in the pill furnace of the Yu Hua Sect. It had then been refined by an extremely powerful elder and infused with mana. The rope was specially used to counter the earth demons. As long as an ordinary earth demon was tied up, it would be unconscious. However, the flying yaksha was not an ordinary demon! Although it was tied up, it would definitely not surrender! On the side, Lin An watched the scene with great interest. Since the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples had already launched an attack against the flying yaksha, he did not want to interfere. However, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples assumed that Lin An was scared out of his wits! Hence, they treated him as if he did not exist. The flying yaksha posed the greatest threat, so killing it was their topmost priority. Once they succeeded, they would turn their attention to the insolent Jiuxiao Sect disciple. Nevertheless, the flying yaksha was not an ordinary demon. Many disciples had perished in the past after getting struck by its demonic claws, but the Heavenly Mystery disciples cautiously continued attacking the demon general. “This is an excellent opportunity to sharpen your skills and fight!” “The flying yaksha is indeed extraordinary! All of you retreat! I will do it!” “Watch the sword!” Lin Dong’s magnetic voice boomed through the pyramid. Suddenly, the flying yaksha’s body emitted a red light as it flew into the air. It violently pounced, but its strength had been greatly reduced, and the blue flying sword pierced through its heart. Lin An, who was standing by the side, smiled slightly when he saw the scene before him. He was in no hurry to take part in the battle. The arcane voice in the pyramid had explained the rules clearly, and he knew that the trial was still in its infant stage. Battling the flying yaksha was merely the beginning of the trial. Nonetheless, Lin An could tell that the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples were well skilled. This was especially so for their leader, the man called Lin Dong. The magic treasures in his possession seemed to be effective. However, the current situation was still dangerous. “Do you think it’s over! Hehehe!” Suddenly, an ear-piercing shriek rang out. A second devil-like creature had once again agglomerated in the middle of the pyramid! “An earth test king!” The earth test king was a devil above the flying yaksha. Its mouth was filled with sharp teeth, but there were no flesh wings on its back. Instead, there were two battle flags. It was rumored that as long as the earth test king waved one battle flag, it could kill a nascent soul stage cultivator! Upon seeing the scene, Lin Dong hurriedly retreated. With lingering fear in his heart, he said, “This is not good. The creature that just appeared is the geodesic king, an existence comparable to the flying yaksha. Damn it! I knew the trial wouldn’t be that simple!” “It’s all Lin An’s fault. If it wasn’t for him, we wouldn’t have to risk our lives!” “Don’t worry, as junior brothers, we still have the Heavenly Mystery Sect’s sword formation, which can defend against most of the geodesic king’s damage. We also have a chance of killing it!” The might of the sword formation was the foundation of the Heavenly Mystery Sect. Although the disciples had trained in a simplified version of the formation, it was still very effective. However, at that moment, a black fog suddenly accompanied the vast demonic sound. The sound waves abruptly agglomerated into many long spears that ruthlessly pierced towards the defensive sword formation of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples. Clang! Clang! Clang! “Myriad phenomena!” Suddenly, Lin Dong shut his eyes and clenched his fists. After mustering his strength for about three breaths, his eyes were suddenly opened, and an enormous lightning blade suddenly exploded through the black fog. The lightning blade transformed into tens of thousands of rotating blade lights, and countless scenic images appeared within the blade lights. There were houses, palaces, cities, trees, flowers, mountains, immortals, lightning, flames, heavenly wind, dragon and tiger, and all sorts of phenomena rotating within the blade lights. Soon, the geodetic king’s attack was torn apart, and all of a sudden it was gone. The black fog in the pyramid immediately cleared and revealed a glimmer of light. “Hahaha! I knew it. The monster didn’t stand a chance against Lin Dong!” “I did not expect him to use such superb power!” “Senior Brother Lin Dong is really formidable. He is indeed worthy of being the leader of our Heavenly Mystery Sect.” The Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples could not help but flatter their leader, and Lin Dong seemed at ease with the flattery. “Stand by, I think there’s an attack coming!” After saying this, Lin Dong uneasily glanced at Lin An, who was still standing at the side. When he saw that Lin An did not have any intention to attack, he felt at ease. The Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples were currently facing a challenge. If Lin An caused trouble, it would ultimately affect the mental state of the disciples. Once he saw that Lin An did not have any intention to attack, Lin Dong immediately heaved a sigh of relief. Suddenly, at that moment, the geodesic king pulled out the long flag on its body. “Roar! Prepare to die, human!” After letting out the loud roar, the monster suddenly waved its hand! Abruptly, an intense wind blew wildly within the inner space of the pyramid. Its force was similar to tens of thousands of sharp blades cutting through a human’s skin. Soon, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciple’s sword formation emitted a crackling sound, and the disciples began to feel exhausted. “Senior Brother Lin Dong. I feel that the sword formation is about to collapse!” “Don’t be afraid. Hold on for now. I still have another magic treasure!” After assuring the disciples, Lin Dong frantically fished out a small bell from his spatial bag. The bell was an opportunity that he had unintentionally obtained. He did not have a detailed description of the small bell. All he knew was that the bell was a powerful defensive treasure. Under Lin Dong’s control, the small bell quickly grew bigger and transformed into a transparent bell shape. In the next instant, it enveloped the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples. Suddenly, several notifications from the success rate system appeared in Lin An’s eyes. [The success rate of the Eastern Emperor Bell blocking the demon’s attack is 50%!] [Using the Eastern Emperor Bell can increase the host’s peak foundation establishment stage cultivation by 10%!] ‘This Eastern Emperor Bell can actually affect the Scripture of No Beginning!’ When Lin An saw the scene in front of him, a trace of joy immediately flashed in his heart! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An was secretly delighted when he saw the information about the Eastern Emperor Bell. It was a treasure that could block attacks from demons, and it could also affect his success rate of cultivating the ‘Scripture of No Beginning.’ Instantly, Lin An’s interest was piqued. The Eastern Emperor Bell had already set up a strong defense. Even though the geodesic king was directly in front of the bell, it couldn’t advance towards the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples. Suddenly, a sharp golden light from the demon’s sword shot straight towards the disciples within the Eastern Emperor Bell. The golden light had thousands upon thousands of beams, and its intensity could usually pierce through any object and cut it down with incomparable sharpness. Its speed was so fast, and its vibration was so intense that even the heavens and earth resonated with it. The demon’s sword vibrated, and the sound waves echoed throughout the pyramid. The bricks beneath it immediately started to shake, and it seemed as if an earthquake was about to occur. Surprisingly, even such a powerful attack was still blocked by the Eastern Emperor Bell. When he saw the strength of the treasure, Lin An’s delight went up a notch. He had already developed a strong interest in the Eastern Emperor Bell, and he felt that the artifact was no small matter. At that moment, Lin An was already scheming up a plan to get his hands on the treasure. “Hahaha, see, this is the power of this small cauldron bell!” “As long as I have this cauldron bell in my hand, this geodesic king will not be able to harm us in the slightest!” Inside the Eastern Emperor Bell, Lin Dong continued to clamor. However, his boastful pronouncement quickly angered the geodesic king. It immediately used all of its strength to unleash the sky wolf smoke attack. First, it wrapped its flags around itself and turned into a magic ball. Once it was tightly guarded, the earth test king flew up and down, roaring like thunder. Under the control of its will, the sky wolf smoke quickly condensed and, in the end, it formed a thin layer of black smoke armor that attached itself to the geodesic king’s body. The armor had an endless amount of murderous aura, and the demon monster had a menacing look as it charged towards the disciples. “Look, the demon just formed the Sirius Battle Armor!” The battle armor was the geodesic king’s natal magic treasure, and its incomparably murderous aura, coupled with the geodesic king’s fist force roar created a death-dealing atmosphere. Soon, the earth test king gnashed its sharp teeth, and a deafening sound was emitted when it smashed into the Eastern Emperor Bell. The sound had a Dao rhythm, which made the disciples within the Eastern Emperor Bell unable to endure the sharp ringing of the bell, and they began to spit out blood. It was unavoidable. Traces of fresh blood poured out from Lin Dong’s mouth, and he immediately put away the Eastern Emperor Bell in his hand. At the same time, he stared at Lin An with a dissatisfied expression. The disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect were risking their lives by battling the earth test demon king. However, Lin An had actually stood at the side, and he looked as if he was watching a show. Even though Lin Dong was uncertain about his fate, he silently vowed that he would first kill Lin An to vent the hatred in his heart! However, at that moment, Lin An made the first move. In an instant, he arrived beside Lin Dong and quickly threw a punch towards him. He then extended his hand and grabbed the Eastern Emperor Bell. “It seems like even an ordinary person will sometimes have a certain amount of luck.” Looking at the Eastern Emperor Bell in his hand, Lin An was extremely satisfied. “Take this as the price for saving all of you!” After he uttered the words, Lin An waved his hand and burned the earth test king to ashes. Once the demon had been extinguished by Lin An’s black flames, a set of battle armor appeared in the air. ‘The Sirius Battle Armor!’ The Sirius Battle Armor carried a demonic aura, and it usually concealed the aura of a human host’s flesh and blood, making it a valuable invisibility treasure. “I didn’t expect to get such a harvest!” Seeing that Lin An had stolen Lin Dong’s treasure and killed the earth test king, the disciples of the Heavenly Mystery Sect were completely dumbfounded. Their Eldest Senior Brother’s treasure had been easily snatched away by a disciple from the small Jiuxiao Sect. If news about such a humiliating act was to be spread out, it would definitely make the disciples from the other small sects laugh their heads off. However, when they saw the geodesic king’s ashes, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples could not help but hesitate. Nevertheless, they had to take revenge on Lin An! Before the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples could make their move, an intense demonic laugh suddenly filled the air. Abruptly, a shocking black gas swept across the pyramid like a long rainbow, and a few weak disciples were swept up by the black gas on the spot, and they disappeared with a scream. The killing intent was extremely intense, and as the black gas cleared up, an underworld heavenly king demon appeared in the pyramid. In the demon world, the flying yaksha was the demon general, while the underworld heavenly king was the demon commander! The underworld heavenly king was an existence that was even more powerful than the flying yaksha and the earth test king. The two monsters could not compare to the underworld heavenly king’s strength. Unfortunately, the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples had not expected the third wave of attacks in the battle trial. The test in the pyramid suddenly felt like a suicide mission. “Defend!” Lin Dong shouted at the side in the face of danger. His heart was already filled with hatred. The Eastern Emperor Bell had been snatched away by Lin An, which had left him in an exposed and passive position. “Everyone, fight to the death! Let’s slay this devil!” Swoosh! Swoosh! Swoosh! The Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples reacted quickly, and they summoned their spirit-subduing talisman treasures. The treasures were spiritual artifacts, and as soon as they burned, a streak of red light surrounded the disciples’ entire bodies. The spirit subduing talisman was equivalent to the Dao Heart True Fire, which specialized in exterminating demons. However, the talisman could only last for an hour. It was unlike other advanced spiritual artifacts that contained a large array that could be continuously activated. Lin An looked at the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples as they took out the magic treasures, and his eyes were a little envious. Although he had felt that he didn’t need magic treasures when he entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, he was still curious. “It’s useless!” The Underworld Heavenly King had already gotten close to the bodies of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, and it directly grabbed them. The demon general then waved its long spear and summoned a few more sky devils, and they swarmed forward towards the rest of the disciples. Immediately, the sky devils extinguished the flames from the spiritual artifacts. In an instant, the disciples from the Heavenly Mystery Sect were ravaged by the sky demons, and their corpses were completely annihilated. Lin Dong was the only Heavenly Mystery Sect disciple who successfully fended off the demons’ attacks. When he saw that the situation had taken a dangerous turn, Lin An took a few steps back. Meanwhile, Lin Dong did not have the time to care about the broken protective talismans of the disciples around him. This was because the powerful sky demons had turned all their attention towards him, and they were slowly breaking down his defenses. Suddenly, Lin Dong felt a sharp feeling of despair. He took out a mouthful of blood essence and activated all of his combative magic treasures before throwing them at Lin An. A blue ice magic sword, a sky rooster sun chain, and a candle demon bead all shot up into the air. One after another, the magic treasures flew towards Lin An, and they were about to smash him to pieces. “Lin An! Since this is my fate, then let’s die together!” However, Lin An had already refined the Eastern Emperor Bell, and it abruptly formed a protective diamond shield around him. When the underworld heavenly king saw that it could not attack Lin An, it controlled the sky demons and slowly advanced towards Lin Dong. After some time, the menacing sky demons broke down Lin Dong’s defenses, and they immediately tore him into pieces. Fortunately, Lin An had already used the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ to refine the Eastern Emperor Bell. He seemed to have discovered a new way to use it, and he immediately activated his spiritual energy, which made the transparent diamond shield glow with a golden light. After a few seconds, the diamond shield began to mutate. Lin An had never thought that the Eastern Emperor Bell would actually undergo a mutation. It seemed that the defensive treasure had actually devoured Lin Dong’s weapons, as well as the Sirius Battle Armor! Lin An hadn’t expected such an outcome. ‘What’s going on? Can treasures actually devour each other?’ When Lin An saw that the golden light was enveloping his body, he couldn’t help but feel a surge of confidence. The Eastern Emperor Bell had become twice as strong after devouring the other magic treasures, so he was no longer afraid of the underworld heavenly king. Lin An looked around the area and noticed a decent weapon lying beside the corpse of one of the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, so he ran over to pick it up. Once the underworld heavenly king had killed all the Heavenly Mystery Sect disciples, Lin An was the only living disciple left in the pyramid. The monster pointed its spear at Lin An, and four sky demons brandished their weapons and charged at him. Each of the four sky demons had combat skills comparable to a peak golden core stage disciple, but Lin An was not afraid. The Eastern Emperor Bell in his possession immediately emitted a golden light that covered the surface of Lin An’s body, providing him with a layer of invulnerability. He immediately raised the sword he had picked up and charged at the four sky demons. Clang! Although Lin An was only at the peak of the foundation establishment stage, his new defensive treasure had already raised his physical abilities to the point where he was not at a disadvantage when compared to a golden core stage rival. When Lin An and the sky demon clashed, his strength prevailed, and the weapon in the demon’s claws cracked open. Abruptly, the sky demon was sent flying across the room by Lin An’s tremendous power. As Lin An was attacking the first sky demon, a second sky demon had slashed its weapon towards his head. However, the Eastern Emperor Bell’s light repelled the knife. In an instant, black and white ashen flames surged out of Lin An’s body and lapped towards the other two sky demons that hadn’t had the chance to attack. As the demons shrieked in pain, Lin An felt that the black flames seemed to have become a little stronger. The connection between the black and white ashen flames was that they would always be simultaneously strong and weak. Once the black flames became stronger, half of the extra energy was transferred to the white flames. The white flames had already shot out towards one of the sky demons. After receiving the additional power, their size increased dramatically, and they instantly froze the sky demon into an ice sculpture. One of the characteristics of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ was that the more a cultivator fought, the stronger they became. After the first round of battle, Lin An felt that the power in his body had risen substantially. He straightened up with significant force and sent the knife that had been pressed against his neck flying across the pyramid. At the same time, he swung the sword in his hand toward the sky demon at the side. The sky demon was shocked, and just as it was about to dodge the attack, the white flames suddenly consumed it and froze it into a snowman-like sculpture. Instantly, Lin An used his sword to cut the frozen sky demon into two halves. In just two rounds of battle, three out of the four sky demons had perished. There was still a sky demon lying on the ground, but the underworld heavenly king looked at Lin An with a cautious gaze. It felt that the human cultivator was different from the disciples the sky demons had previously killed. Lin An swiftly charged toward the last sky demon on the ground. “Brat, how dare you!” The underground heavenly king flew down from its perch and swept its demon flag towards the black flame. Its strength was comparable to that of a nascent soul stage cultivator, and although the black flame was strange and unpredictable, when faced with a natural gap in strength, it couldn’t be effective. The demon’s flag swept it away, and the black flame flew back into Lin An’s body. After the underground heavenly king staved off the black flame, a pair of huge black wings flapped on its back, and it flew towards Lin An. Despite the oncoming attack, Lin An remained fearless. He took a step forward and slashed his sword at the demon general. Suddenly, mana spirit energy surged from Lin An’s sword and blasted toward the underground heavenly king. “Humph, your petty tricks will not work!” The demon general held up its flag, and the golden light hit it and shattered in all directions. However, the vast power contained within the golden light had caused the underworld heavenly king’s body to stagnate. “Demon, take my blade!” Even though the demon general had blocked his strike, Lin An seized the opportunity to amplify his attack. He rushed forward and slashed out the long blade in his hand. Clang! The sword swiftly broke inch by inch on the underground heavenly king’s battle armor and disintegrated into more than ten pieces. Abruptly, the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ revolved within Lin An’s body, and he felt his strength increase again. At the same time, the underworld heavenly king countered the previous attack by draping its demon flag towards Lin An. “Morality demon sealing technique!” Although the demon general had only used an ordinary attack, Lin An didn’t dare to be careless. He hurriedly circulated the morality demon sealing technique and then cautiously struck out his palm and held onto the demon’s flag. He immediately felt a surge of power flowing through the flag and zapping his body, and the Eastern Emperor Bell intensified its golden light defense. However, even after he activated the morality demon sealing technique, Lin An could not resist the demon general’s power. Fortunately, the black and white ashen flames surged out from his body and attached themselves to the demon flag. Only then did Lin An manage to block the demon general’s attack. The underground heavenly king was greatly shocked. It immediately sensed that Lin An was more than twice as strong as before. How had such a junior cultivator achieved a rapid increase in strength in such a short period of time? When it scanned Lin An’s aura, the demon general could tell that he wasn’t using a life-burning technique. Suddenly, an immense force struck the demon general’s body through its flag, making it feel tremendous pressure. The underworld heavenly king was alarmed, but it was too late for it to escape. Ping! The demon general’s flag tore through the middle. Lin An quickly pounced on the demon general and pushed the broken debris of the flag back into the underworld heavenly king’s flesh. Finally, he nailed the shrapnel into the pyramid’s wall and stepped back to gaze at the demon general’s dangling corpse. Immediately, a humming sound rang out in the pyramid. Lin An raised his head and scanned the room as a relieved expression formed on his face. He had successfully completed the trial. In an instant, several treasures appeared at the top of the pyramid. According to the rules, Lin An could choose three treasures from the pyramid. After surveying his options, Lin An finally picked the treasures that pleased him the most. The first treasure was a cultivation technique that was based on profound flame transformation. Once activated, flames would burst out and surround the user, providing a powerful advantage during attacks. Lin An felt that he could use the technique with his black and white ashen flames to increase their explosive power. The second treasure that Lin An chose was the mythical Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. It was a strange sword that continuously increased in size once it took a life or spilled blood during combat. Lin An’s third treasure was an advancement pill. After he chose the pill, a notification from the success rate system popped up in front of Lin An’s eyes. [Ding! If the host swallows this pill, the success rate of advancing to the golden core stage will be 100%!] ‘Okay. I’ll choose these three items.’ Lin An picked the profound flame transformation technique, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and the advancement pill. A white light flashed across the room, and the three items wafted above the pyramid and floated towards Lin An. He immediately took the advancement pill and swallowed it and then sat cross-legged and began to break through the foundation establishment stage. Spiritual energy flowed through Lin An’s body, and it circulated in the regular pattern of nine small cycles and one large cycle. After a day of meditation, Lin An suddenly absorbed all the free Heaven and Earth energy in the pyramid into his body. “Phew!” Lin An opened his eyes. “I’ve successfully advanced to the golden gore stage!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An was ecstatic after he broke through the golden core stage. He then spent another two hours learning the profound flame transformation technique he had obtained in the pyramid. Finally, he examined the new weapon he had chosen, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. The blade was like a kind of metal, but it felt like a stone to the touch. It was the normal weight of a treasured sword, and a faint energy fluctuation revolved around its sharp tip. Additionally, there was a long, transparent, white crystal in the middle of the treasured sword. Lin An didn’t know its purpose, and he didn’t have the time to investigate the sword’s other features. A day had passed since he had exited the pyramid. Unsurprisingly, there were only one-tenth of the disciples left in the yellow desert, and they were mostly cultivators who had hang around the oasis and declined to enter the pyramids. In fact, there were very few cultivators who had actually entered the pyramids and secured treasures. “Senior Brother Lin An!” As he walked along the oasis, Lin An heard a familiar voice call out to him. When he turned around, he saw a handsome-looking boy. It was Junior Brother Zhou from the neighboring Purple Clouds Peak. Usually, when Lin An refined pills, he would visit the Purple Clouds Peak to borrow some herbs. Junior Brother Zhou was the disciple responsible for the Purple Clouds Peak’s herb warehouse. Because of his benevolence, Lin An could always borrow the required herbs from the Purple Clouds Peak. However, Junior Brother Zhou was also frequently punished for his generosity. During Lin An’s last trip to the Purple Clouds Peak, Junior Brother Zhou had been in the foundation establishment cultivation stage. Lin An hadn’t expected that he would actually advance to the golden core stage and enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. It seemed that Junior Brother Zhou’s cultivation aptitude was quite good, and his improvement speed was very fast. When Lin An recalled the numerous times that Junior Brother Zhou had been beaten up by his master because of lending him some medicinal herbs, he couldn’t help but laugh. “Oh, what a coincidence. Isn’t this Junior Brother Zhou? Why are you guarding that entrance?” Junior Brother Zhou was guarding the entrance to one of the pyramids. It was a common practice among most sects for their disciples to guard the pyramids and prevent others from entering and obstructing their own sect members from passing the trials in the pyramids and securing the treasures. “Senior Sister Lan Qi is taking on the test inside this pyramid. I’ve been guarding the door, but she has already been inside for a day and hasn’t returned. I don’t know if the challenge is going well.” Junior Brother Zhou had a worried expression on his face, and he stared at Lin An with a pleading look in his eyes. Lin An instantly understood what he meant. Junior Brother Zhou was worried because his Senior Sister hadn’t come out of the pyramid, and he feared that something bad had happened to her. However, he wasn’t capable enough to go in and help her. Coincidentally, he had seen Lin An wandering around the oasis, so he had called out to him, hoping that Lin An could go in and save Senior Sister Lan Qi. When he thought about how he had usually caused the junior brother to get into trouble, Lin An kindly said, “Then why don’t I go in and take a look for you? However, I can’t guarantee that I’ll be able to bring your Senior Sister out.” Junior Brother Zhou hurriedly bowed to Lin An. “In that case, thank you very much, Senior Brother!” Lin An waved his hand as he walked past Junior Brother Zhou and entered the pyramid. After walking through a long corridor, he arrived at a collapsed stone hall. Lin An stood onto a high place and looked around. Soon, he located Senior Sister Lan Qi. Although Junior Brother Zhou had called her his senior sister, Lin An was the eldest Jiuxiao Sect disciple among them. Therefore, to him, Lan Qi was actually his junior sister. In the center of the hall, there was a sinking structure that was fifty meters long and fifty meters wide, and more than ten meters deep. Inside the sinking structure, there was a game titled ‘pushing boxes.’ Lan Qi appeared to be trapped in the game. She had played the game for an entire day and night, but she still couldn’t clear the level. Although her gaming skills were weak, most cultivators couldn’t navigate through the levels, due to its tricky puzzle-like formations. “Hey!” Lin An playfully shouted at Lan Qi. “Junior Sister Lan Qi, you’re really enjoying yourself. Haven’t you had enough? If you continue to push forward, you won’t be able to clear the level.” Lan Qi, quickly raised her head and looked in the direction of the voice. When she saw that it was Lin An, she immediately scowled. “How did you get in? Where’s Junior Brother Zhou? I don’t need your help, leave this place quickly!” Even though she had been trapped in the game for a day and a night, Lan Qi’s first reaction was still to worry that Lin An, who had suddenly appeared in the pyramid, would snatch the opportunity that she was trying to obtain. “I have already defeated Junior Brother Zhou. He told me that you were here to pass the test, so I’m here to help you! Listen to my command, now push towards the box on the left!” When Lan Qi heard that Junior Brother Zhou had already been defeated by Lin An, her mind went blank. She didn’t know what Lin An’s words meant, but an immense feeling of grief immediately surged in her heart. How could she still listen to Lin An’s command, even if she was trapped in the puzzle game. She couldn’t accept his help, and she instantly pushed the box to the right. “Hey! You pushed the wrong box! I don’t have an accent. Didn’t you hear me clearly when I told you to push towards the left? Now, I’ll help you adjust your route. Push the next box to the back!” Even after Lin An shouted a new set of instructions, Lan Qi immediately pushed the box to the front. “Hey! Wrong again. Push the next box to the left!” To Lin An’s surprise, Lan Qi followed his instructions and pushed the box to the left as he had said. She then turned her head and glared at Lin An. “Don’t think that you can manipulate my actions just because you entered the pyramid. I’ll push as you say, and then I’ll do the opposite. Let’s see how you’re going to get me out of here!” Lin An was suddenly confused. He didn’t know why Lan Qi had a negative attitude towards him. However, he was still determined to rescue her from the trap. Abruptly, the success rate system lit up in front of his eyes. [The probability of successfully escaping by pushing left is 45%. The probability of successfully escaping by not pushing left is 52%. The probability of the other party following the order to go left is 74%.] [The probability of successfully escaping by pushing to the right is 61%. The probability of successfully escaping by not pushing to the right is 32%. The probability of the other party following the order to the right is 41%.] [The probability of successfully escaping by pushing forward is 54%. The probability of successfully escaping by not pushing forward is 48%. The probability of the other party following the order to the right is 74%.] [The probability of successfully escaping by pushing backward is 31%. The probability of successfully escaping by not pushing backward is 71%. The probability of the other party obeying the order to move backward is 21%.] Immediately, Lin An shouted, “Junior Sister Lan Qi, push back the next box!” When Lan Qi heard the instruction, she immediately pushed the box to the right. Suddenly, her probability of successfully escaping the trap increased to 61%. ‘Hehe, you want to fight with me?’ Lin An grinned when he saw that Lan Qi was still in a defiant mood. After she moved the box, the success rate probability of the next step appeared in front of his eyes again. “Next step forward!” “Next step backward!” “Next step backward!” “Next step forward to the right!” With the support of the success rate system, Lin An guided Lan Qi step by step towards the direction of clearing the level. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Fortunately, the rules of the pushing boxes game didn’t allow a challenger to stay in the same place for a prolonged period of time, and the right to pull a box back required several rounds before they could touch it again. Otherwise, Lan Qi could have held her ground or pushed and pulled the boxes back and forth, then even God wouldn’t have been able to save her. “Next round, turn right!” Lin An gave the last command. Due to the structure of the previous box, Lan Qi couldn’t see the space available on the right side of the box, and the success rate system gave her an 89% chance of following the command. Lin An held his breath. If Lan Qi failed to follow the instruction, then it would be even more difficult to guide her out of the game. He didn’t know how much longer she would have to spend in the maze-like trap. “Junior Sister Lan Qi, I’m sorry for lying to you earlier. Actually, it was Junior Brother Zhou who asked me to save you. If you still don’t listen to me, then I’ll turn around and leave. At worst, I’ll just tell Junior Brother Zhou that I don’t have the ability to save you. But the truth is, I don’t want to waste any more time on you.” When she heard this, Lan Qi calmed down. She no longer felt that Lin An was lying to her. Junior Brother Zhou had always been gentle, and he would never take the initiative to cause trouble. Although Lin An was arrogant, he wasn’t a person of great evil. He probably wouldn’t go so far as to kill Junior Brother Zhou. Now that Lin An had confessed that he hadn’t harmed him, she decided to go along with his instructions. After thinking about it, Lan Qi wiggled around and pushed the right-hand box. Abruptly, the tip of the pyramid shone with a faint light, and the sinking structure rose up. Lan Qi had successfully passed the level. There was a box hanging down from the top of the pyramid, and it appeared to be Lan Qi’s reward. However, she immediately noticed that there was actually a monster with wings on its back and horns on its head that was guarding the box. It could only mean that the reward in the box was extraordinary. The monster with wings slowly descended along with the box. “Junior Sister Lan Qi,” Lin An sensed the power fluctuations of the monster and realized that its strength was no less than that of the underworld heavenly king demon, “You might not be able to secure this reward on your own. Do you want me to help you?” “Don’t even think about taking my opportunity!” Lan Qi roared in anger and pulled out the sword on her waist. She then furiously charged toward the two-winged monster. At the same time, the monster grasped the pitchfork in its hand and raised it to attack Lan Qi. Clang! The loud sound of metal clashing rang out in the pyramid. Lan Qi was defeated in one move, and she was sent flying across the room by the monster’s brute force. However, the outcome had been within Lin An’s expectations. The two-winged monster’s strength was probably as powerful as a nascent soul stage cultivator, and Junior Sister Lan Qi had only just entered the golden core stage. She didn’t have any high-level magic treasures on her, nor did she have any high-level cultivation techniques, so her failure had been inevitable. As Lan Qi slowly stirred on the ground, Lin An stealthily moved towards her. After it had knocked Lan Qi into the air, a bloodthirsty look had appeared in the two-winged monster’s eyes. It flapped its wings and accelerated as it reached out its claws to grab Lan Qi’s head. Suddenly, a burst of golden light flashed, and the light of the Eastern Emperor Bell covered Lan Qi’s body and protected her. The monster’s claws were repelled by the Eastern Emperor Bell’s golden light, and they didn’t cause any harm to Lan Qi. “Profound flame transformation!” Lin An used Lan Qi’s body as cover to rush forward without the two-winged monster noticing him. At that moment, he flashed out from behind Lan Qi and activated the profound flame transformation technique. His fists, which were engulfed with flames, struck out at the two-winged monster. Pfft! Lin An took the opportunity to catch the two-winged monster off guard. His fists landed squarely on its body, and due to his success in the previous pyramid, his physical abilities were extremely terrifying. Since he had advanced to the golden core stage, Lin An would have defeated the monster even if he had purely relied on his skills. Now that he had activated the profound flame transformation technique, his strength had increased by another level. He punched the two-winged monster’s chest until it caved in and then sent it flying across the room with great force. The two-winged monster spat out a pool of stinky blood once it slumped onto the ground. Lin An took advantage of the monster’s dazed state to finish off the attack. He pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword from his waist and charged at the two-winged monster. Clang! The monster had regained consciousness, and it quickly raised the steel fork in its hand and blocked Lin An’s sword. “Black and white ashen flame mystic flame transformation!” Immediately, Lin An used the black and white ashen flame and the mystic flame transformation to instantly unleash a terrifying power. The two-winged monster was violently struck by the flames, and it fell to the ground, creating a huge crater. At the same time, Lin An used the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword to cut off the steel fork from the monster’s hand and then pushed the tip of the sword into its heart. The two-winged monster didn’t make a sound. Instantly, Lin An noticed that red energy had flowed into the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s blade. The transparent white crystal in the middle of the sword was then suffused with a layer of red light. When the transparent white crystal had completely turned red, Lin An felt that the energy waves emitted by the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword had suddenly become stronger. Once the red energy in the transparent crystal had been completely used up, Lin An realized that the waves around the sword had already reached the strength of the eleventh level of the Qi refinement realm. It had indeed become stronger, and Lin An couldn’t hide his excitement over the growth-type treasure sword. He used the black and white ashen flames to devour the monster’s corpse, and just as he had guessed, they had also become stronger. The black flames divided the extra power evenly between the white flames to maintain their spirit life-force balance. Once she regained her strength, Lan Qi looked at Lin An’s back in shock. She hadn’t expected him to be so strong. He had killed the two-winged monster that had defeated her in just two rounds. Moreover, Lin An had been so cautious. Not only had he killed the monster, but he had also burned its corpse. Lan Qi now felt that Lin An had deserved to win the inner sect competition. Whether he had used his strength or special treasures, he was worthy of the title of Eldest Senior Brother. She walked forward and looked at Lin An in awe as she said in a low voice, “Senior Brother thank you for your help. You should get the most valuable treasures in that box, so you can choose first.” Lin An turned around and glanced at Lan Qi, He felt that her personality had suddenly changed, and she was now treating him politely. Lin An quickly nodded and went to open the box with Lan Qi. Once they opened it, the two of them were dumbfounded. There was only one cultivation technique in the big box. How were they going to divide it? Lin An picked up the book and looked at it. The words, ‘Hurricane Sword Technique’ were written on the book’s cover. The hurricane sword technique was a set of sword moves that could trigger the surrounding vital energy of heaven and earth to add power to an attack. It was powerful, but it was also extremely random. Because the changes in the vital energy of heaven and earth were very unpredictable, the power unleashed at different points of attack would frequently vary. There was a possibility that the power of one sword attack would increase tenfold, but there was also a possibility that the power of one sword attack would not increase at all. Such a cultivation technique usually placed great importance on luck. “Since it’s a cultivation technique, why don’t we learn it together? However, this book has to be in my possession. Do you think that’s possible?” Lin An suggested to Lan Qi. To his surprise, Lan Qi was extremely willing. Initially, she had thought that they would each get a small reward from the box. However, there was only one cultivation technique in the box. If they could still learn it together, it would be equivalent to both of them each getting the reward. As for the book, Lan Qi didn’t mind giving it to Lin An since she had already observed his impressive combat skills. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lan Qi and Lin An immediately began to cultivate on the spot, and only after they had learned the Hurricane Sword technique did they walk out of the pyramid. “You can’t go in!” When they reached the entrance of the pyramid, Junior Brother Zhou’s voice suddenly rang out. Lin An quickly walked out and saw a group of disciples dressed in green pushing Junior Brother Zhou to the ground. The green-clothed sword cultivator in the lead looked at him and said unhappily, “Your Senior Sister has already been in there for almost two days. If she had succeeded, she would have come out long ago. Since she hasn’t come out yet, she is likely to have already died in there. You guys have failed, so it should be up to our Green Sword Sect to enter the pyramid, shouldn’t it?” “Who said I died in there?” Lan Qi’s voice suddenly rang out from the midst of the crowd. When Junior Brother Zhou saw Lan Qi and Lin An, his face lit up with joy, and he hurriedly got up from the ground and ran to Lan Qi’s side. Lan Qi looked at his dirtied pants and couldn’t help but frown. “Are you the Senior Sister that this kid mentioned? What treasure did you obtain from the pyramid?” The leader of the group, a man dressed in green, asked Lan Qi. His tone was high and mighty, and it made her feel very uncomfortable. “What we got is none of your business.” Lan Qi replied in a similarly impolite tone. “Haha!” The leader of the group laughed sinisterly. “If you’ll be sensible enough to give me the treasure, we won’t make things difficult for you. Otherwise...;” The Green Sword Sect’s leader didn’t need to complete the sentence for Lan Qi to understand what he meant. “Otherwise, what?” Lin An asked boldly. “When are you going to apologize to my junior brother? Didn’t you see that you guys made his clothes dirty?” As soon as Lin An finished speaking, he threw a handful of yellow sand that he had secretly grabbed at the leader of the group. The man in green waved his hand, and a green shield immediately formed in front of him and blocked the yellow sand. Lin An didn’t wait for the yellow sand to settle. He quickly rushed towards him and threw a second handful of sand at his face before he retreated quickly and returned to Lan Qi’s side. “Alright, now we’re even. I don’t think we have anything else to discuss.” However, the Green Sword Sect’s lead disciple was obviously not interested in talking anymore. He strode towards Lin An and threw a punch at his head. The arrogant lead disciple was at the peak of the golden core stage. Since he probably had rich combat experience, Lin An did not dare to underestimate him. He hurriedly circulated his morality demon sealing technique to block the attack. In an instant, the lead disciple’s fist landed on Lin An’s palm, and a terrifying energy wave spread out beside them and blew out a yellow sand ring. “Dark flame transformation!” Several flames suddenly burst out from Lin An’s body, and an immense force erupted from his hand and pushed his opponent a few steps back. The Green Sword Sect’s lead disciple hadn’t expected that he would lose the fight. Furthermore, he was in front of so many junior brothers and sisters. He immediately flew into a rage out of humiliation and ordered the junior disciples to attack Lin An. “Everyone, attack this ingrate! Tear him into pieces for me!” There were about thirty disciples from the Green Sword Sect present at the scene. Upon hearing the lead disciple’s order, all of them rushed forward together with great momentum. The sharp sounds of sword-drawing rang out one after another, scaring the surrounding onlookers into retreating in a panic because they were afraid that the fight would affect them. Lin An stuffed Junior Brother Zhou and Lan Qi into the pyramid behind him and then pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. A serious expression quickly formed on his face, and he clenched the sword tightly in his hands. At the same time, Lin An activated the Eastern Emperor Bell to protect himself from the impending multiple sword strikes. Clang! Clang! Clang! The frantic chimes of swords clashing with each other rang out into the air. Lin An couldn’t block all the simultaneous attacks from the Green Sword Sect disciples. However, none of the swords caused any damage to his body. Instead, they triggered the Eastern Emperor Bell’s characteristic of devouring magic treasures, and it devoured the high-quality swords in the disciples’ hands. Additionally, a success rate system notification suddenly lit up in front of Lin An’s eyes. [There is a 100% chance of increasing your power tenfold by using the Hurricane Sword technique!] Without any hesitation, Lin An immediately used the Hurricane Sword strike on the attacking disciples. A gray sword ray that was twenty meters long shot out and cut off all the swords that were slashing at Lin An. In an instant, the charging Green Sword Sect disciples fell to the ground. “Next time, swing your swords a little harder,” Lin An advised the disciples sarcastically. Everyone was shocked. Even the Green Sword Sect’s lead disciple quickly put away his sword in shock. Lin An slowly walked towards him and asked, “What treasure did you find in the pyramid? Take it out and let me have a look.” All the cultivators present immediately held their breaths. Lin An clearly wanted to return an eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth. Since the Green Sword Sect had tried to snatch Lan Qi’s treasure, Lin An would follow their example and steal a treasure from them. The Green Sword Sect’s lead disciple had obtained an earth-grade magic treasure from one of the pyramids. It wasn’t very good, but Lin An still accepted it and immediately fed it to the Eastern Emperor Bell. Afterward, he left the scene alongside Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou. [The host’s success rate of reaching the fourth level of the mystic realm by moving forward is 64%] [The host’s success rate of reaching the fourth level of the mystic realm by moving to the left is 73%] [The host’s success rate of successfully reaching the fourth level of the mystic realm by moving to the right is 21%] After leaving the oasis, Lin An followed the success rate system’s instructions to bypass the hidden traps as he led Junior Brother Zhou and Lan Qi towards the fourth level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. “Senior Brother Lin An, there hasn’t been a disciple from our Jiuxiao Sect who has ever progressed this far into the fourth level of the mystic realm. Since we’ve already obtained an opportunity, why don’t we leave the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm and return to the sect? Although the secret treasure is good, it’s also very important that we protect our lives.” Junior Brother Zhou followed behind Lin An and Lan Qi, constantly persuading the two senior disciples to turn around and leave the dangerous mystic realm. “I say, Junior Brother Zhou, you’re a man, yet you’ve followed me for so long. Why don’t you have the courage to grow at all?” Lan Qi turned around and scolded her junior counterpart as he walked. “If you continue to talk nonsense, then don’t follow me anymore.” The fourth level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm differed completely from the third level. The vast expanse of yellow sand had already disappeared. Instead, the fourth level comprised of tall forest-like primeval trees. The trees were over fifty meters tall, blocking out the sky and the sun all around the dense area. The sunlight could only faintly penetrate through the layers of leaves to illuminate the forest. “Roar!” Suddenly, the roar of a ferocious beast came from the front. A tall black wolf covered in long fur emerged and blocked the path of the three Jiuxiao Sect disciples. Judging from the energy fluctuations from the wolf’s body, it was a mid-stage golden core ferocious beast. “Look! There’s a crystal on its forehead!” Lan Qi shouted as she scanned the beast with a fascinated look. “Its body is covered in black fur, and there’s a crystal on its forehead. This is a black crystal wolf! The crystal on its forehead is an ingredient for refining medicine. It’s worth ten thousand spirit stones. Let’s take it down!” Lin An had already recognized the identity of the black wolf, and he was very excited. Spirit stones were a common currency in the cultivation world. Ten thousand spirit stones were enough for Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou to pay for one year’s living expenses. The crystal could generate a considerable amount of wealth, and Lan Qi’s eyes immediately lit up. Once the black crystal wolf locked eyes with the three disciples, it didn’t exhibit any fear. The beast let out another roar before charging towards Lin An. “Morality demon sealing technique!” Among the three Jiuxiao Sect disciples, Lin An’s combat strength was the strongest, and he also had the highest defense. Thus, he was the first to bear the brunt of the black crystal wolf’s attack. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL The black crystal wolf opened its stinking mouth and gnashed at Lin An. Under the protection of the morality demon sealing technique, Lin An activated the Eastern Emperor Bell to protect himself. He then stretched out his hands, which were covered in golden light, and used all his strength to press against the black crystal wolf’s upper and lower jaws. Its sharp teeth couldn’t penetrate his defense. While Lin An was controlling the black crystal wolf’s movements, Lan Qi ran to the beast’s side and used the Hurricane Sword technique to strike its neck. [The probability of Lan Qi using the Hurricane Sword technique to trigger five times the damage is 100%!] A success rate notification appeared in front of Lin An, and he immediately knew that Lan Qi’s strike was about to succeed. Sure enough, in the next second, a spurt of fresh blood sprayed all over Lin An’s face, making him unable to open his eyes. However, he felt that the pressure from the black crystal wolf had suddenly lessened. When Lin An let go of its jaws, the black crystal wolf collapsed to the ground. He used his shirt to wipe off the bloodstains on his face before turning his attention to the beast. There was a ferocious wound on its neck, and its life was rapidly draining away. Lan Qi’s sword had actually only severely injured the black crystal wolf. Lin An’s face lit up with joy, and he hurriedly pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and chopped off the wolf’s head. The energy fluctuations of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword became stronger, and Lin An noticed that it had already reached the twelfth level of Qi refinement. After picking off the crystal from the beast’s severed head, Lin An used the black flame to incinerate its corpse. The black and white ashen flame’s power was intense, and it seemed as if Lin An had the strength of a late-stage golden core disciple. “I’ll let you guys keep this crystal. When you sell it, just give me three thousand spirit stones.” Lin An wasn’t very interested in spirit stones, so he gave the crystal to Lan Qi for safekeeping. Not only would the gesture help enhance his cooperation with Junior Brother Zhou and Lan Qi, but it would also save Lin An a lot of time. He wouldn’t have to do the chores of finding a buyer in order to sell the crystal. On her part, Lan Qi was thrilled to receive the crystal. She had been worried that Lin An would keep the fruits of victory for himself. However, not only had Lin An failed to claim the crystal, but he had entrusted it to her for safekeeping. “Then let’s continue moving forward!” After Lan Qi put the crystal into her storage ring, she happily took the lead to explore. Whoosh! However, after Lan Qi took a step forward, a wooden arrow suddenly flew towards her. It was just an ordinary wooden arrow, so Lan Qi easily grasped it in her hand before it could pierce her flesh. As she examined the strange arrow, a little girl dressed as a caveman walked out from the bushes at the side. Her clothes were made entirely out of leaves and bark, and she had a cautious and curious expression on her face. Surprisingly, the little girl spoke in the common language that Lin An understood, and not a barbarian language as he had expected. This made him a little curious about her background. “Who are you? Where are you from?” The little girl’s childish voice had a hint of maturity as she said casually, “I’m from the Ghana Empire in the Cangyun Continent.” “Why are you alone in such a place? It’s very dangerous. Where are your companions?” Lin An replied by asking a series of questions. He couldn’t believe that she was from the Cangyun Continent. “My companions are in the camp. I’m already a qualified hunter. Naturally, I can be alone in this place.” The little girl’s reply surprised Lin An. “Camp? Do you live in this forest? Where is your camp? How many people are there?” The little girl was overwhelmed by Lin An’s questions. In the end, she got angry and simply ignored him. Suddenly, she turned around and went back into the bushes. Lin An wanted to go forward and drag her out and continue questioning her, but Lan Qi stopped him and mouthed softly, “We just need to follow her. She will definitely return to the camp.” Lan Qi pulled Junior Brother Zhou forward and motioned for him to quickly cast a spell. Junior Brother Zhou quickly understood and plucked a green leaf from a tree at the side. After infusing his mana onto the leaf, it transformed into an emerald-green butterfly and quietly followed the little girl. Not only had Junior Brother Zhou used the butterfly to track the little girl, but he had also cast a discerning spell to sense if there were any dangerous creatures wandering around. After a few seconds, his expression abruptly changed. “There’s a powerful magical beast wandering three thousand meters ahead. If that little girl runs into it, she’ll be in trouble.” “You guys follow her. I’ll take care of the magical beast.” Lin An instantly took a detour and ran ahead. In order to hide his movement from the little girl, he stealthy tiptoed along the bushes. Since the little girl was walking at a slow pace, Lin An felt that he would have enough time to kill the beast. When he got closer to the target, Lin An gradually slowed down. He hoped that he could sneak up on the beast and gain the upper hand. However, as Lin An passed by a short tree, a dangerous feeling overwhelmed his heart. “Eastern Emperor Bell, activate!” Lin An hurriedly took out the defensive treasure to protect himself. In an instant, a malevolent big mouth pierced through the cover of the tree leaves and bit towards Lin An. “Morality demon sealing technique!” Before the malevolent big mouth could bite onto Lin An’s body, he circulated the morality demon sealing technique with all his strength to increase his defense, and with the protection of the Eastern Emperor Bell, he avoided being bitten in half. However, the sharp teeth of the demonic beast still bit Lin An’s arm, leaving him with a few bloody holes on his biceps. Fortunately, the demonic beast’s body had been exposed from the cover of the dense forest. It was a tall fiendish beast that looked like a velociraptor. Its strength was equivalent to that of a mid-stage golden core cultivator, and if it had not ambushed Lin An, it would not have been able to hurt him at all. Lin An felt that he had made a fool of himself. He thought that if he had lured the demon out earlier, it wouldn’t have been so troublesome. “Black and white ashen flames!” The black and white flames simultaneously surged out from Lin An’s body. The black flames burned the lower half of the demonic beast’s body, while the white flames froze the upper half of its torso. The demonic beast’s body was destroyed, and Lin An finally escaped from its ferocious mouth. As soon as he landed on the ground, he steadied himself and pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword from his waist. With one swift movement, Lin An stabbed the sword into the heart of the demonic beast. “Roar!” The demonic beast fell to the ground with a painful roar and gradually lost its breath. During its intense struggle, the beast had destroyed the surrounding dense vegetation, and it had also cut down several bowl-sized trees with just a sweep of its tail. As the black flames incinerated the demonic beast’s body, Lin An felt that the power of the black and white ashen flames was very close to breaking through the golden core stage and reaching the nascent soul stage. Because the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword had obtained new blood power by killing the demonic beast, it broke through to the 13th level of the Qi refinement stage. Abruptly, several powerful and wonderful energy fluctuations spread out from the sword’s blade. The little girl, who was wearing primitive clothing, crawled in the bushes for more than an hour before she returned to the camp. Lin An and the other two Jiuxiao Sect disciples were still following behind the little girl. Suddenly, they heard a steady male voice boom out from the dense branches above them once they got close to the camp. “Which sect are the three of you from? Why did you follow Lin Er all the way to my camp?” ‘So, the little girl’s name is Lin Er?’ Lin An thought to himself. He was surprised to find out that they both shared the first name. Since the three disciples had already been discovered, there was no need for them to hide, and they begrudgingly walked out from among the bushes. When the little girl saw them, she was dismayed. She hadn’t expected that she would be followed, so she was very upset. Instantly the young man jumped down from the tree. He looked to be only five years older than Lin An, but his cultivation strength was already at the peak of the golden core stage. Lin An was secretly shocked. After he discovered the young man’s cultivation level, he knew that it would probably be difficult for the junior Jiuxiao Sect disciples beside him to match the strange man in a fight. At the same time, Lin An was also disappointed in his previous existence. He had really been useless. Lin An was around the same age as the mysterious young man, but he hadn’t even built his cultivation foundation, while the young man was already at the peak of the golden core stage. No wonder so many people in the Jiuxiao Sect hated him. The young man landed beside Lin Er and stroked her hair with his wide palm. “Lin Er, don’t be upset. Those who can enter this world are all elite disciples. Furthermore, they have practiced their cultivation for many years. Those who can break through the first three levels and reach the deepest part of this mystic realm are undoubtedly geniuses in the outside world. You’re only eight years old, and this was your first time leaving the camp to hunt alone. It’s very normal that you couldn’t detect them.” When Lin Er heard the young man’s consolation, her mood improved. However, when she looked at Lin An and the other two disciples, she couldn’t help but feel even more curious. Were they all geniuses from the outside world? Lin An politely cupped his fists at the young man and said, “My name is Lin An. This is Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou, and we are disciples from the Jiuxiao Sect. We came to this world to seek opportunities.” “Hahaha!” The young man suddenly laughed, and in an instant, he disappeared from Lin An’s sight. Lin An’s heart was immediately alarmed, and he hurriedly activated the Eastern Emperor Bell and the demon morality sealing technique to protect his body. Sure enough, in the next second, Lin An felt a powerful force crush his abdomen, and he was sent flying into the air. As Lin An floated through the air, he realized that the person responsible for the attack was the young man. “Black and white ashen flames!” Immediately, the black and white flames surged out from Lin An’s body as he was in mid-air, and they flowed towards the young man like two fiery snakes. When the young man saw the black and white ashen flames, his eyes instantly revealed a trace of surprise. He hadn’t anticipated that Lin An would actually have such a treasure hidden in his body. Similar to the young man, the black-and-white ashen flames, were at the peak of the golden core stage. Therefore, he didn’t dare to take on the attack head-on. Instead, he retreated in a flash. The black-and-white ashen flames didn’t chase after the enemy. On the contrary, they slowly retreated into Lin An’s body. Lin An had only used the flames because he had been dazed by the young man’s sudden attack. Now that he had stabilized himself, there was no need for him to waste his mana by activating the black-and-white ashen flames. “Profound flame transformation!” In a flash, a wave of golden flames surged out from Lin An’s body. His speed, strength, and explosive power had all increased significantly. He quickly took a step forward and rushed towards the young man and threw his flaming fists at his opponent. After an initial frantic exchange, Lin An had roughly figured out that the young man was a speed-type cultivator, so he was not surprised that several of his punches had missed their target. The young man easily avoided Lin An’s blows, and he then took a strange posture and moved to the side. All of a sudden, he raised his right leg and kicked at Lin An’s ribs. Lin An’s speed was inferior to his opponent, so he couldn’t dodge the blow. It seemed that his only option was to directly use his physical strength to take on his attacker. The young man’s speed far surpassed that of a peak-stage golden core cultivator of the same level. Lin An believed that the young man must have sacrificed a considerable amount of strength to achieve his incredible speed. It was impossible for a cultivator to have perfect attributes at all levels of cultivation, thus, Lin An was confident that he could overpower the young man. He instantly circulated the morality demon sealing technique with all his strength and then fully activated the Eastern Emperor Bell. A red and gold light shone out of Lin An’s body brightly as the young man’s kick landed on his ribs. Suddenly, Lin An was propelled backward due to the force of the kick. It was indeed as Lin An had thought. The young man’s strength was slightly inferior to that of a cultivator of the same level, but since Lin An was still at the initial stage of the golden core level, he couldn’t perfectly block the attack. However, that did not mean that he had lost. As he had blocked the kick, Lin An had not activated the dark flame transformation technique, nor had he used the combination of the black and white ashen flames. Otherwise, the young man would not have been able to land the kick. Lin An had only used the Eastern Emperor Bell and the morality demon sealing technique to test the young man’s maximum strength! After he successfully landed the kick, the young man’s figure instantly disappeared from Lin An’s sight, and he knew that another wave of attacks would be directed at him. “Black and white ashen flame, dark flame transformation!” The black and white ashen flame’s strength was at the peak of the golden core stage. Once it was coupled with the enhancement of the dark flame transformation, Lin An’s physical ability instantly rose to the same level as his opponent. It was also at that moment that Lin An finally saw the young man’s movements clearly. The young man had already arrived in front of Lin An. He suddenly stopped and swung his whip leg at Lin An’s head with the intention of knocking him out and ending the battle. Boom! Abruptly, several violent and chaotic energy waves surged in all directions, blowing Lin Er, who was not far away, to the ground. A large tree that was close to the two combatants was also blown to the side, and more than half of its roots were pulled out from the soil. Lin An had only used his right hand to block the young man’s kick. In an instant, the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ had activated in his body. Since the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ emphasized that the more one fought, the stronger one became, Lin An felt that the strength in his body had increased substantially. “Pfft!” Lin An grabbed the young man’s calf with his right hand so that he could not escape. He then raised his leg and kicked the young man’s lower abdomen. The force of the kick thrust the young man into the air, and he immediately spat out a mouthful of blood. In addition to the young man’s inferior strength, his defense was also slightly lacking. Lin An had only intended to pay back the kick that he had just received, and he hadn’t expected that his kick would cause the young man to bleed profusely. “Brother Feng Lin!” The young man slumped to the ground, and it seemed as if he couldn’t get up all of a sudden, so Lin Er quickly ran over to help him up. “All right, I think we’re even. Feng Lin, why did you attack me?” The young man got up from the ground and wiped the blood from the corner of his mouth. He smiled at Lin Er to indicate that he was fine before turning to Lin An. “Since you’re here for the Dragon God Cauldron and the Thousand-Faced Extreme Fire, you’ll naturally have to go through some tests. Facing me in combat was one of the tests. The Thousand-Faced Extreme Fire and the Dragon God Cauldron are in the middle of the Dragon God Illusory Realm. That realm is dangerous and unpredictable. If you don’t have high-level skills, you won’t survive. Therefore, if you can’t defeat my people, I’ll throw you out of the fourth level of the mystic realm.” “So, does that mean that we’ve obtained the qualification to enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm?” Lin An asked curiously. “No,” Feng Lin replied as he pointed at Lin An. “You’ve obtained the qualification, but your companions have not. The two of them can’t do it. If they can’t beat me, they’ll be thrown out of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm.” “What if we force our way in?” Lin An inquired. “Force your way in?” Feng Lin couldn’t hide his surprise. “If you force your way into a stage that doesn’t match your qualifications, you’ll only be harming yourself and others. Only ten cultivators can enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm at a time. Every time we go into the realm, we pick the best ten cultivators. Even so, there are still less than one in ten cultivators who qualify to enter the illusionary realm. If you bring the two of them with you, no one will be willing to team up with you. You won’t be able to proceed unless you’re willing to challenge the dangerous illusion on your own!” At that moment, the success rate system notified Lin An that the probability of the three of them passing the Dragon God’s Illusion was zero, so he believed Feng Lin’s words. “If my two friends can’t enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm, it’s still okay for them to hunt around here, right?” Lan Qi was not too disappointed. At least she had obtained the Hurricane Sword technique. However, Junior Brother Zhou had gained nothing from the trip into the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, so it would be a tremendous loss for him to exit the mystic realm without any treasures. The value of the magical beasts and herbs in the fourth level of the mystic realm was not bad. It wouldn’t be a wasted trip if he collected them for a few days. “That’s fine too. However, there is one more rule, they can’t enter our camp. If they want to enter our camp, they have to defeat me. If they can’t defeat me, I’ll have to throw them out.” Junior Brother Zhou and Lan Qi said goodbye to Lin An after they heard Feng Lin’s words. They immediately began to hunt and gather in the areas surrounding the camp. The two Jiuxiao Sect disciples had already seen Feng Lin’s combat skills, and they were sure that they couldn’t defeat him. Otherwise, Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou would have tried their luck, but they couldn’t risk being thrown out of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Lin An immediately questioned whether Feng Lin was being too formal when it came to beating others up in order to send them out of the mystic realm. However, with a serious expression on his face, Feng Lin replied that the ways of the ancestors could not be abandoned. Lin An could not assist Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou during their fight for a chance to enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. He could only instruct Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou to admit defeat earlier so that they wouldn’t suffer the humiliation of being thrown out of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. After saying goodbye to his friends, Lin An followed Feng Lin into the camp. He abruptly discovered that the members were holding a martial arts competition in order to select the ten contestants who would enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm in three days’ time. Since Lin An was from the outside world and had already defeated Feng Lin, he didn’t need to take part in the preliminary stages of the trails. He could only participate once the major competition started. The first and second days were the preliminaries. After the top twenty were decided, the main competition would be held on the third day. The camp members had been divided into ten groups to decide the winners. The champion from each group would qualify to enter the Dragon God Illusion Realm. If anyone had objections to the winner from any group, they could challenge the champion on the same day. If they won, they would take the champion’s place and enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. However, each group’s winner only had one chance to be challenged. Those who accepted a challenge and won did not have to accept any other challenge from the other camp members. The scale of the camp was huge. There were hundreds of people taking part in the competition, and each of them was a golden core stage expert. The camp was therefore full of martial virtue. Similar to the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, the entry requirements for the Dragon God Illusionary Realm were also below the nascent soul stage, so the few old cultivators in the camp who were above the golden core stage weren’t allowed to take part in the competition. However, some of the older cultivators had actually been to the Dragon God Illusionary Realm and received their inheritance from it during their time as golden core stage disciples. After the first day, Lin An arrived at the viewing area to watch the competition, and coincidentally, he met Feng Lin, who was bringing in a few disciples dressed in purple into the camp. Lin An had never seen the purple uniform before, and he hadn’t seen the group of disciples when the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm had opened. Therefore, he concluded that they were disciples from one of the far-off great sects. As the second batch of cultivators to enter the fourth level of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, the disciples who had just arrived appeared to be highly skilled. There were three men and two women in the group, and their leader was the youngest girl among them. She walked over towards the bustling crowd, and she seemed to have a radiating aura. The crowd unconsciously opened up a path for her, and she walked smoothly and calmly past the admiring mob. When the group of cultivators walked past Lin An, he inadvertently overheard the conversation between two of the disciples. First, there was a delicate but seductive female voice. “Senior Li Kuang, what did you do to the two cultivators who ruined my clothes?” After a few seconds, a rough male voice replied, “Don’t worry, junior sister. I’ve already beaten them both to the point that they can’t move. I hung them in the forest with vines, and I think the magical beasts have already eaten them. It was also strange that two initial stage golden core cultivators entered the fourth level before us. Could it be that they had some special trick?” The group of purple-robed cultivators walked past Lin An, and he didn’t hear the rest of their words clearly. However, he suddenly had an ominous feeling in his heart after he heard their initial conversation. “Stop!” Lin An’s voice was like thunder. The purple-robed cultivators instantly stopped in their tracks and turned around. Lin An pointed at one of the burly men. “Is your name Li Kuang? What did you guys say just now? Did you attack two human cultivators in the forest?” The group of arrogant purple-robed cultivators seemed to have just noticed Lin An’s existence. Even though his robe was actually very eye-catching, the purple-robed cultivators had casually walked past him. It could only mean that they were conceited, and they didn’t care about anyone in the camp. After looking at Lin An, the cultivators were surprised to learn that there was another outsider in the camp. They also noticed that Lin An’s attire was similar to that of the two disciples they had attacked in the forest. Li Kuang immediately understood Lin An’s intention, and he said, “Which sect are you from? From the looks of it, could it be that you’re the senior brother to those two cultivators? They had to pay for ruining my junior sister’s clothes. Take a look, the hem of her clothes was torn into tatters because of their recklessness.” When he heard Li Kuang’s words, Lin An knew that his guess was right. The six purple-clothed cultivators were all at the peak of the golden core stage, so Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou had no chance of winning a fight against them. Lin An suppressed his anger and turned around to run into the forest to look for Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou. However, he couldn’t find them. Instead, he found a few traces of what seemed to be Lan Qi activating the Hurricane Sword technique. Lin An was very annoyed. If he had known that his friends would have encountered such a dangerous situation, he would have quickly let Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou leave the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. If he hadn’t forced them to stay, they wouldn’t have ended up in their unfortunate situation. Lin An gritted his teeth and returned to the camp to wait for the official competition to begin on the third day. Initially, he thought that if he met Li Kuang in the arena, he would have a chance to kill him and avenge his junior brother and sister. However, he later discovered that the rules of the tournament were that every outsider would have to fight against a local member from the camp. Lin An would therefore not get an opportunity to avenge his friends’ humiliation during the tournament. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An had thought about losing on purpose to save his strength and wait for Li Kuang to win so that he could challenge him. However, Li Kuang was actually defeated by a local camp member before Lin An could even enter the arena. Lin An had noticed the local camp member in various battles during the previous two days. Surprisingly, he always defeated his opponents by a small margin. When Lin An asked the other camp members about the lucky cultivator, he learned that his name was Feng Hen. Feng Hen and Li Kuang had been placed in the same group, but Lin An hadn’t noticed this because he had been thinking about a plan to avenge his junior Jiuxiao Sect disciples. He had only noticed Feng Hen on the stage during his battle with Li Kuang defeated. As expected, Feng Hen had won by a small margin. Lin An couldn’t help but pay more attention to the seemingly lucky camp member. Since Li Kuang had lost, Lin An had to defeat the other opponents in his bracket. Then, in order to get another chance to enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm, Li Kuang would definitely challenge him. Out of the remaining competitors, Lin An was the only disciple still in the initial level of the golden core stage. He seemed to be the weakest competitor in the tournament, so Li Kuang would definitely choose him. However, Lin An would have to make his battles appear competitive. Even though he couldn’t lose, he couldn’t win too easily either. He would have to avoid using all of his trump cards in his fights. If he won too easily, then Li Kuang would be scared, and he wouldn’t challenge Lin An. Additionally, if Lin An exposed his secret techniques, then Li Kuang would be on guard, and it would be difficult to kill him and avenge Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou. Once his turn arrived, Lin An walked calmly into the arena. His opponent was a thin and feeble-looking man, but what surprised Lin An was that he was only at the intermediate level of the golden core stage. Despite his average cultivation level, he had defeated many cultivators who were at the peak of the golden core stage to enter the ultimate rounds of the major competition. Lin An immediately concluded that there had to be something special about his opponent. He would have to figure out the man’s special skills in order to avoid an upset. The competition began, and after both parties bowed to each other, the thin man raised his hand. In an instant, two blazing golden rays that looked like two golden snakes emanated from the man’s hand and spun toward Lin An. Lin An hurriedly activated the protection of the Eastern Empire Bell and the morality demon sealing technique. He then used his palms, which were covered in golden rays, to grab at the two golden snakes. However, Lin An was shocked by the nature of the attack. While his left hand grabbed the golden snake-shaped ray, his right hand grasped at thin air. The golden snake passed through Lin An’s right hand like a phantom and bit him, but it didn’t cause any damage. ‘Is this a phantom attack?’ Lin An wondered. After Lin An crushed the golden snake in his left hand, the thin man attacked again. In an instant, three identical golden snakes rushed out from his hand and flew menacingly toward Lin An. As the three golden snakes rushed towards him, Lin An understood that he was in trouble. After the first round of confrontation, he already knew that there would be a phantom among the three golden snakes. However, there was also a possibility that all the golden snakes were real. Therefore, an opponent had to figure out how to differentiate the real golden snakes from the phantom ghost snakes even though they had the same form. If they couldn’t adapt and differentiate between the real snakes and the phantom snakes, then they would have to intercept all the three golden snakes. If only one of them was real, then the other two attacks wouldn’t have any effect. However, from the pattern of his attacks, it seemed that the thin man would continue releasing more snakes. If he released nine golden snakes, then an opponent would have to use up more energy to intercept all the nine snakes. As the number of golden snakes continued to increase, the thin man’s opponent would have to exert more energy to defend himself, and eventually, one of the real snakes would successfully launch a sneak attack under the cover of the other fake snakes. This would not only increase the investment of defensive magic power from a rival, but it would also cause them to invest too much energy and become bored. In the end, the thin man would eventually win. Lin An had finally figured out the ability that the thin man had relied on to defeat so many experts and enter the tournament’s finals. Fortunately, the thin man’s moves were useless against Lin An. He was naturally immune to such probability problems because he had the success rate system. Instantly, a virtual screen popped up in front of Lin An’s eyes and analyzed each of the oncoming golden snakes. [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number one is 98%.] [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number two is 2%.] [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number three is 2%.] After obtaining the probabilities, Lin An immediately gave up on his defense against the other two golden snakes. He drew out his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and slashed at the first golden snake. After cutting the snake in half, Lin An tightened his grip on the sword and charged at the skinny man. Once the other two golden snakes touched Lin An’s body, they turned into phantoms and disappeared. When the thin man saw that Lin An had easily identified the real golden snake, he was immediately startled. However, he assumed that Lin An had just been lucky. After calming down, he ignited his palms again and released nine golden snakes. At the same time, the success rate system’s virtual screen quickly marked out each golden snake. [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number one is 98%.] [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number two is 4%.] [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number three is 4%.] ...; [The probability of winning the battle against golden snake number nine is 98%.] Of the nine golden snakes released, two were real, and seven were fake. Lin An’s charging figure didn’t slow down. He immediately cut the first golden snake in front of him into two halves, and to the thin man’s surprise, he didn’t bother to defend against the remaining seven golden snakes. Instead, he waited until the ninth golden snake arrived before he raised his sword to block it. With a flip of his wrist, Lin An cut off the snake’s head. Before the thin man could launch another attack, Lin An was already standing in front of him. Suddenly, the nascent soul stage elder referee quickly entered the arena and blocked the tip of Lin An’s sword, which was inches away from the thin man’s forehead. At the same time, he announced, “Lin An wins this round!” If the thin man had realized that Lin An had figured out his spell and given up on using the golden snake secret technique, he would not have lost the match so easily. However, his proud spell had been broken by an early stage golden core cultivator, which made it hard for him to accept reality. Seeing that Lin An had easily fought through the nine golden snakes, the skinny man had been extremely shocked, which was why he had failed to react to Lin An’s sword in time. In order to protect him, the referee had stopped the match and saved Lin An a lot of energy. The peak-stage golden core cultivators who had suffered defeat because of the golden snakes were all surprised. Finally, one cultivator couldn’t help but ask Lin An how he had differentiated the real golden snakes from the phantom snakes. When he heard the question, Lin An put his hands behind his back and replied calmly, “I was just lucky.” After Lin An had exited the arena, the scheduled fights took place one after the other. Among the purple-clothed disciples, only Li Kuang had lost his battle. The other five cultivators all advanced to the next round. In the other groups, nobody challenged the winners from the previous rounds. However, Lin An’s side had a long line of people who wanted to challenge him. Since Lin An was only at the initial level of the golden core stage, the other cultivators felt that choosing him was equivalent to winning. Another reason was that, in the cultivators’ views, Lin An’s victory had a lot to do with luck. The cultivators were skeptical about Lin An’s skills. He was yet to show his ability and convince the masses that he was worthy of entering the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Since Lin An only needed to accept one challenge, and there were too many cultivators who wanted to fight him, the judges couldn’t settle on an opponent, so they let him choose his own challenger. Lin An naturally pointed at Li Kuang. “Dog thief! Do you dare to sign a life-and-death contract with me? In the upcoming battle, only the winner will walk out alive! If you dare, then come up, and I’ll accept your challenge. If you don’t, then get lost. I’ll pick someone else to be my challenger.” The crowd stared at Lin An and Li Kuang with a stupefied look. Under the surprised gazes, some disciples even thought that Lin An was an idiot, and they chattered wildly. “Is this kid crazy? He’s only at the initial level of the golden core stage, and he actually wants to have a life and death duel with a cultivator at the peak level of the golden core stage?” Originally, the tournament’s judges protected the participants from losing their lives. However, since Lin An had issued a life and death challenge, the judges couldn’t interfere in the pending battle. “Ai, didn’t you hear the news? I heard that the purple-clothed disciple killed his junior brother and sister, so that could be why he issued the challenge. But he’s still too young. Even if the purple-clothed disciple’s companions don’t make a move, he absolutely can’t win against him. He’s just blinded by hatred.” “What? That’s what this is about? This kid is too lonely, but I like it. Kid, you have to survive!” “Come on!” After learning about Li Kuang’s deeds, most of the cultivators cheered for Lin An. They related to his cause, and they felt a sense of sadness. Li Kuang had naturally made the same assumption as the rest of the cultivators. He thought that Lin An was blinded by hatred, and he couldn’t help but be overjoyed. Lin Kuang hadn’t expected that he would have a second opportunity to enter the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. He immediately jumped onto the stage and said to the old referee, “Promise me that we will fight to the death, and only the winner will walk out alive. I hope that you won’t stop me later.” Lin Kuang then turned to Lin An and mocked him cruelly, “As expected, those who do good deeds will always receive good karma. Your friends ruined my junior sister’s clothes, and I crippled them and tied them to a tree so that wild beasts would feast on them. To my junior sister, I did a good deed for a just cause, and it appears that I’ve received some good karma. Therefore, the next good thing I will do is to send you to reunite with your junior brother and sister! The opportunity in the Dragon God Illusionary Realm will be the karma for my good deed!” After Li Kuang finished speaking, he ran towards Lin An and punched him in the face. His fist generated a powerful gust of wind which showed the strength of the punch. However, Lin An quickly activated the Eastern Emperor Bell and the morality demon sealing technique and then used the dark flame transformation to counter the attack. His flaming palm caught Li Kuang’s fist, but the surging energy flowed down Lin An’s face and penetrated his protective golden light. Despite the slight breach in his defensive treasures, Lin An steadily held on to Lin Kuang’s fist, and it seemed that the first exchange between the two rivals had turned into a draw. Li Kuang had originally thought that his fierce punch would knock Lin An to the ground, and he hadn’t expected him to hold on to his fist. He was a little surprised for a moment, but he didn’t dwell on the disappointment. Instead, he immediately activated the purple sun technique that he had cultivated. When he sensed the change in the power on Li Kuang’s fist, Lin An hurriedly retreated. Even though the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ was a cultivation technique that grew stronger with each battle, Lin An didn’t want to end the battle so quickly. He had planned to cautiously fight Li Kuang for a while, and he would only use his trump card once he had the confidence that he was on the verge of victory. However, Li Kuang was a skilled opponent. After he activated the purple sun technique, it covered his body in a layer of purple light. Suddenly, he pushed out his palm, and the vast purple light shot toward Lin An. When he saw the impending attack, Lin An quickly drew out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and poured his mana into it. As soon as the sword was covered in a layer of golden light, Lin An pointed it towards his opponent, and a three-meter-long golden light zapped out and collided with the purple light. In an instant, an exploding ball of dazzling light blew up in the air. Li Kuang’s attack failed, but he immediately shot another ray of purple light towards Lin An. To Lin Kuang’s surprise, Lin An quickly activated the golden light and blocked the strike, but he did not fight back. He only defended the continuous strikes, and in just over ten minutes, the two opponents had exchanged over ten rounds, and the arena continuously lit up because of the ferocious attacks. Lin An was sweating profusely from blocking Li Kuang’s attack, but he observed that his opponent’s breathing was only slightly irregular. The stark contrast in stamina between the two rivals exhibited the difference between an initial stage and a peak stage golden core level cultivator. However, after a few minutes, Lin An felt that the power in his body had already increased by two levels, and he was confident that he could launch several attacks. The success rate system’s virtual screen immediately lit up and reminded Lin An about the Hurricane Sword technique. [The probability of using the Hurricane Sword style to cause twice the damage is 90%.] After reading the success rate system’s notification, Lin An felt that using the Hurricane Sword technique wouldn’t be effective. The strike would not cause much of a stir to a peak stage golden core cultivator, so Lin An gave up on using the move. “Black and white ashen flames!” The black-and-white ashen flames also had the power of a peak aurous core stage cultivator. However, they barely tore through Li Kuang’s purple light seal. When he saw this, Lin An raised his sword and rushed towards Li Kuang. He scanned the success rate system for a clue on any advantage that would increase the power of the Hurricane Sword technique. After looking around, Lin An realized that the space in front of Li Kuang had the highest success rate probability to implement the Hurricane Sword style. However, Li Kuang seemed determined not to leave his original spot. He just stood there and attacked Lin An with the purple glow. “Hey, dog thief, if you have the guts, come and fight me. Why are you just standing there? Don’t tell me you think you’re very handsome? No way! Does such a big and burly man think that he is good-looking? That’s really quite disgusting. Or are you doing a ridiculous pose to impress your beautiful junior sister? That’s really quite pitiful.” Since he had observed that Lin Kuang’s defensive skills were top-notch, Lin An had decided to antagonize him hoping he would take a few steps forward. To his delight, Li Kuang fell for the trap. Everyone could see that he liked the flirtatious junior sister. Lin Kuang had thought that he had hidden his feelings, but now that Lin An had exposed them, he instantly became angry and embarrassed. In an instant, he stomped his feet and charged at Lin An. As he rushed towards him, he stretched out his hands with the intention of tearing Lin An’s mouth apart. Following Lin An’s insults, Li Kuang hadn’t dared to turn his head. He felt as if everyone was looking at him with a mocking gaze that said, “Look! That gorilla actually likes his peerless and beautiful junior sister! He really doesn’t know his place at all!”. “Black and white ashen flames, dark flame transformation!” Taking advantage of his opponent’s unstable battle spirit, Lin An immediately used his strongest combination skill. The black and white ashen flames were now at the peak of the golden core stage, and the dark flame transformation technique could compress and amplify the flames’ power before they exploded. Additionally, the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ suddenly altered Lin An’s physique. He immediately felt that his physical ability was similar to that of an intermediate level golden core stage cultivator. As he charged towards Lin Quang, Lin An realized that the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ had also made him more courageous in battle. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL If Li Kuang had been in a relaxed and normal state, he would have chosen to avoid Lin An’s punch. However, he was now in a state of shame and anger. All he wanted to do was kill Lin An, and his rage made him unmindful of the obvious danger. Therefore, he failed to protect himself from Lin An’s fist. Instead, he chose to unleash his strongest punch. Crack! Crack! Crack! The first two fractures were the sounds of bones breaking, while the last fracture was the sound of broken bones piercing through muscles and coming out of Li Kuang’s body. Lin An’s punch had destroyed his right arm. If Lin An had followed up with another punch, he might have been able to kill Li Kuang. However, he was in a difficult situation. If Li Kuang had any trump cards in his possession, he could have definitely used them to turn the situation around. Therefore, Lin An calmly retreated and gave up on the opportunity to follow up before running to Li Kuang’s original fighting spot. The success rate system had already given him a probability assessment, and he knew that the chances of the Hurricane Sword technique raising the power of his attack by over five times were 100%. In an instant, Lin An stood still and raised the sword in his hand and yelled, “Hurricane Sword style!” Suddenly, a terrifying energy wave rippled out, and Lin An shot a sword ray towards Lin Kuang. When they saw the devastating nature of the strike, the hearts of all the spectators in the surroundings trembled. “Stop!” The leader of the purple-clothed disciples had immediately sensed that the sword ray would take Li Kuang’s life. She had hurriedly flown up from the stands, hoping that she would stop Lin An from slashing out his sword. However, a power that was as tall as a mountain and as vast as an ocean had suddenly appeared beside her and suppressed her on the spot, making her unable to move. The leader of the purple-clothed disciples was shocked. The vast power seemed to have already surpassed the nascent soul stage. The old referee immediately intervened when he saw the purple-clothed disciple making her way to the stage, and he calmly said, “Both sides had already made their intentions clear in advance. Don’t you think it’s too late to stop this now? Why didn’t you object at the beginning? Why do you only want to stop the fight when your colleague is about to die? Do you think I will allow that?” The old referee’s words shocked the purple-robed woman. She had indeed been arrogant and despotic ever since she had entered the camp. Even the nascent soul stage cultivators present in the camp hadn’t dared to look directly into her eyes. She hadn’t taken anyone seriously, and she also hadn’t taken any rules to heart. However, the old man’s boundless power had brought her back to her senses. She wasn’t in the outside world anymore. Without the protection of her sect’s supreme being, she couldn’t do whatever she wanted. For the sake of her own safety, the woman in purple didn’t argue with the old man. Instead, she shouted at Lin An, “I am Zi Yan, the Saint of the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect. Friends above, listen carefully. If you dare to kill any of my disciples, the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect will fight you to the death. We will flatten your sect, and we will exterminate all living things in your sects, leaving no cockroaches or rats behind!” Lin An was shocked when he heard the declaration. The Purple Clouds Ancient Sect was the oldest sect in the Cangyun Continent. It was rumored that its sect master had already reached the upper limit of the world’s power and could shatter the void and become an immortal at any time. The disciples from the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect were all extremely talented geniuses. Their sect was one of the most powerful in the world. Lin An had long heard of the famous Saint Zi Yan. She was about the same age as Lin An, but he had heard that she had broken through to the nascent soul stage ten years ago, and she was the best-known genius on the Cangyun Continent. However, she had entered the mystic realm with her cultivation at the golden core stage. Lin An suspected that Saint Zi Yan must have used some secret technique to suppress her cultivation level and pushed her power back to the golden core stage before she entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Saint Zi Yan’s master was also the sect master of the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect. The sect master had always doted on Saint Zi Yan, and he would listen to anything she said. Now that Saint Zi Yan had revealed her identity, if she made another threat, it would no longer be a personal threat, but a threat made by the entire Purple Clouds Ancient Sect. “Will Lin An stop his attack?” Several disciples in the crowd wondered. Judging from the domineering behavior of the Purple Cloud Ancient Sect’s disciples, it was obvious that Lan Qi and Junior Brother Zhou might not even have made a mistake to warrant losing their lives. However, Lin An had already crippled Li Kuang’s arm. Even if Lin An ended the battle at that stage, would Li Kuang be remorseful about his earlier actions? In the end, several disciples thought that Lin An would be afraid of Sain Zi Yan’s warning. Suddenly, Lin An chopped down the sword in his hand without hesitation. “Hahaha! So what if you’re from the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect? Every man lives between heaven and earth. How can I cower in fear and submit to tyranny! If you want to fight, then come and fight! I, Lin An, am upright and righteous, why should I be afraid of anyone!” In the next instant, Lin An slashed his sword and split Li Kuang into two halves. His bright red life energy was absorbed by the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and it abruptly emitted a violent wave of energy before advancing to the foundation establishment stage. At the same time, Lin An felt a sudden realization overwhelm his heart. It was as if he had touched upon the profound meaning of the morality demon sealing technique, and his understanding of the technique had reached a new level. Abruptly, mysterious energy flowed over his body. Lin An felt that his body and the morality demon sealing technique had become one, and his connection with it was even closer. In the future, he would only need to rely on his thoughts to activate the technique, and there was no longer a need to mobilize it. Moreover, in times of crisis, it could automatically activate and protect him from any surprise attacks. The morality demon sealing technique’s defense had reached a new level. It began to coordinate with the ‘Scripture of No Beginning,’ and it made Lin An’s defense increase by leaps and bounds. Seeing that Lin An had ignored her threat and killed Li Kuang, and he had even comprehended and upgraded his technique on the spot, Saint Zi Yan was so angry that she didn’t know what to say. She just pointed at Lin An and yelled some profane words at him. Afterward, she led her subordinates and turned around to leave, as if she wanted to leave the camp and return to the outside world. It was obvious that she intended to wait for Lin An to exit the mystic realm before hunting him down and killing him. However, a few mysterious and powerful forces suddenly appeared from the surrounding mountains and trapped Saint Zi Yan and her subordinates on the spot. An old voice rang out in the camp, ringing in everyone’s ears, but it also seemed to ring directly into everyone’s hearts. “Since you’ve already won the competition, you must explore the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. You can’t leave!” Saint Zi Yan was furious. “Old fogey! Aren’t you afraid that all the disciples of the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect will come and destroy your bullsh*t secret realm?” The old ethereal voice replied calmly, “Those who enter can’t be destroyed, and those who are destroyed can’t enter. How laughable!” Without a trace of remorse, Saint Zi Yan defiantly questioned, “Then what if I don’t contribute to the Dragon God’s Illusion? I don’t care about that realm anymore. I’ll only find a way out.” “Since you destroyed your cultivation to suppress your power, why would you come back from the realm empty-handed? Moreover, our duty is only to send you into the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. After you enter, whether you live or die and whether you stay or leave will all be part of the heaven’s will as well as your fate.” The mysterious power retreated from the bodies of the purple-robed disciples, and Saint Zi Yan regained her freedom. However, she knew that if she tried to leave again, the powers that had stopped her would appear again. Saint Zi Yan was extremely angry, and she immediately spun around and locked her gaze on Lin An. When Saint Zi Yan locked her gaze on Lin An, he felt a little nervous. After all, Saint Zi Yan had suppressed her cultivation from the nascent soul stage to the peak of the golden core stage. There was a fundamental difference between her and the other peak golden core stage cultivators. She had once experienced extraordinary powers that surpassed the essence of the golden core stage, and she also had an excellent understanding of the use of her magical powers at the golden core stage. Fighting Saint Zi Yan would be like playing chess. The other peak golden core stage cultivators had the same number of chess pieces as her, but they were ordinary chess lovers. Saint Zi Yan was like a national grandmaster who had already won the chess tournament. If Lin An started a war with her at that moment, his actions would be similar to a novice playing chess with a national grandmaster and giving up a horse cannon. Even if he used all of his treasures, he wasn’t sure that he could win. Thus, Lin An couldn’t help but feel a little nervous. Saint Zi Yan was worthy of holding the title of the best disciple in the younger generation. Not only was her cultivation top-notch, but her control over her temperament was also very good. Once she calmed down from her initial rage, her intelligence quickly took over the high ground. She realized that if she continued to find trouble with Lin An in the arena, she would only be obstructed by the old referee. Furthermore, she had no option but to enter the Dragon God Illusory Realm. If she couldn’t attack Lin An and injure him in the camp, then she would hunt him down once they both entered the illusion realm. As she thought about it, Sain Zi Yan felt that there was no need for her to be in a rush. She didn’t have to kill him in the camp. Even if he managed to exit the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, Saint Zi Yan could still organize an attack and lead the disciples from the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect directly to Lin An’s sect. Would he be able to grow wings and fly once they attacked? After Saint Zi Yan figured this out, she smiled sweetly at Lin An, and then she turned around and went to her resting place to adjust her condition and wait for the following day’s trip to the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. As soon as Lin An saw Saint Zi Yan smile at him, he felt a wave of goosebumps forming all over his body. At the same time, his scalp went numb. He didn’t know what to think about Saint Zi Yan’s sudden change in mood. However, her smile had been much scarier than her angry scolding. After Saint Zi Yan left with her subordinates, Lin An felt a little confused again. He couldn’t figure out whether the Purple Cloud Ancient Sect disciples had given up on their intention to avenge Li Kuang’s death. ...; When the next day arrived, Lin An and the other group winners set out for the Dragon God Illusionary Realm under the guidance of the camp elders. After they trekked through the deep forest in the fourth level of the mystic realm, they wound up at a door-like light cave that rotated day and night. The cave was the entrance to the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. Among the four local camp members who had qualified to enter the illusionary realm, Feng Hen led the way into the circular light cave, and the purple-robed disciples closely followed him. In order to ensure his own safety, Lin An walked at the back of the line to protect himself from being ambushed. After entering the circular light cave, they arrived at an ancient stone hall. To their surprise, there were ten passageways along the walls of the ancient hall. “Ten paths?” One of the purple-robed disciples asked in puzzlement. “Which one should we take?” Immediately, Feng Hen answered, “You can choose one path for each of the ten cultivators, or you can choose one path for all ten cultivators. You can even split into several groups and go your own way. However, you only have one chance to choose an entrance. Once you enter a passageway, it’s impossible to return. You can only keep moving forward until you die or pass through. If we pass through, the mystic realm cultivators will return to the camp, but the outsiders will directly leave the mystic realm.” “Which path did the cultivators who survived the Dragon God Illusionary Realm in your camp choose in the past? Or rather, which path did your elders tell you to take?” Saint Zi Yan asked curiously. “The scenery inside each pathway is different every time a fresh batch of cultivators enters the illusionary realm. The only similarity is that there are ten paths. Therefore, the experience of past cultivators is meaningless. We can only rely on ourselves and choose our own paths.” For a moment, the cultivators were in a dilemma. On one hand, they were afraid of missing out on the best treasures, but on the other hand, they were afraid of losing their lives by choosing a difficult path. However, Lin An didn’t have a problem figuring out the best path. The success rate system’s virtual screen had already marked out the success rate of clearing each channel, and the chances of obtaining the treasures: [The success rate of clearing channel one is 0%, and the success rate of obtaining a treasure is also 0%.] [The success rate of clearing channel two is 0%, and the success rate of obtaining a treasure is also 0%.] [The success rate of clearing the third channel is 50%, and the success rate of obtaining treasures is 50%.] ...; [The success rate of clearing the tenth channel is 0%, and the success rate of obtaining treasures is also 0%.] To Lin An’s astonishment, nine out of the ten paths were dead ends. No wonder only one in ten challengers successfully survived the journey to the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. If they were not careful, they would all be eliminated in the first stage. At the same time, a sinister thought crossed Lin An’s mind. If he concealed the correct path from the purple-robed disciples, they would die in the Dragon God Illusionary Realm, and he would not have to worry about being hunted down for revenge. However, just as Lin An was thinking about the plan, he realized that everyone was looking at him, and he was shocked. Had he accidentally uttered the thoughts that had been running through his mind? Why were the cultivators all looking at him? “Why are you all looking at me?” Lin An’s voice was a little weak. Fortunately, none of the disciples suspected Lin An’s hidden intentions. Instead, one cultivator took a step forward and asked, “How did Brother Lin see through the golden snake secret technique?” “Huh?” Lin An didn’t think that they would be interested in his earlier victory, and he replied casually, “It was just based on feelings.” Lin An naturally wouldn’t tell them the truth, but he also felt that his statement had been too perfunctory. Would he have to make up a more believable lie? Unexpectedly, the cultivator immediately nodded and said, “Brother Lin’s intuition is outstanding. Please choose the path you want to take. The four of us from the mystic realm will go with you. We believe in you.” Lin An was stunned, and he glanced around the hall at the other cultivators. Sure enough, everyone looked at Lin An with trust in their eyes. It made sense. Lin An was the only disciple who had successfully figured out the golden snake secret technique. The cultivators felt that even if Lin An had just been lucky; it was better to depend on his lucky charm than on their own blind guesses. Lin An looked at the purple-clothed disciples as they stood silently at the side. Saint Zi Yan didn’t say anything, but judging from their posture, they were also willing to follow Lin An. “Didn’t Saint Zi Yan promise to kill me? Don’t tell me that she’s also going to follow her enemy?” Saint Zi Yan tilted her head and said indifferently, “I’m just tired from walking. I want to rest for a while, so you guys can leave first.” Her lie was too lame. Saint Zi Yan’s body was at the peak of the golden core stage. She wouldn’t get tired easily even if she walked for ten days and ten nights. How could she be tired after only walking a short distance from the camp? Lin An didn’t want to argue with her. He reluctantly took the lead and walked towards the third passage. As soon as he walked in, he turned around and saw that Saint Zi Yan and the purple-clothed disciples had immediately followed him. Lin An couldn’t help but curse in his heart. Saint Zi Yan really knew how to bend and stretch. The previous day, she had made a big fuss and declared her intentions to kill him. However, she was now his ‘follower’ even though he knew it was for her own profit. As they walked down the third passage, the essence of the tunnel, which was an illusion, began to manifest. Suddenly, the surrounding illusion changed as everyone advanced. At the end of the passageway, the environment suddenly turned into grassland. In the distance, a pack of fire wolves was roaming in the plain. There were about thirty wolves in the pack, and each one of them had the cultivation level of an early-stage golden core cultivator. When the environment stabilized, the alpha wolf howled, and the pack of wolves charged towards Lin An and the other cultivators with their long flaming tails. If Lin An had entered the passageway alone, it would have been very difficult for him to deal with the thirty fire wolves. However, with nine peak golden core cultivators beside him, the pack of wolves was not as intimidating. Lin An immediately pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and in the battle with the pack of wolves, he only killed two fire wolves. The other cultivators had swiftly killed the rest of the wolves. After the fire wolves had been killed, they turned into illusions and disappeared. This made Lin An’s idea of using his black flames to devour the fire wolves’ corpses come to naught. Fortunately, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword had extracted the advanced life energy from the wolves. One-tenth of the transparent white crystal in the middle of the blade was dyed red. If the white crystal eventually turned red, it could advance to the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage. After killing all the fire wolves, a box appeared out of thin air in front of the cultivators. Lin An went forward to open it and found that it only contained a pair of human-rank magic treasure boots. Since the reward was very ordinary, the cultivators were not interested in fighting over it. In the end, they held a friendly contest over the ownership of the magic treasure boots. [The probability of winning with scissors is 80%.] [The probability of winning with stones is 85%.] [The probability of winning with scissors is 90%.] ...; Although Lin An did not really want to cheat in the friendly contest, the success rate system’s notification always popped up at the right time, so Lin An subconsciously followed them. In the end, Lin An won the magic treasure boots after he went undefeated in nine consecutive rounds of rock paper scissors. After he won the boots, Lin An realized that there were subtle changes in how everyone looked at him, especially Saint Zi Yan. Was her killing intent decreasing? Since the cultivators had passed the first stage, five more paths appeared in front of them. Everyone consciously looked at Lin An, and he even saw an urge in Saint Zi Yan’s eyes for him to choose a path. Lin An tilted his head and joked, “Saint Zi Yan, are you tired again? Why haven’t you chosen your path yet?” Saint Zi Yan was especially shameless. However, there was no need for her to pretend anymore. She crossed her arms and threw her head to the side and ignored Lin An. Lin An couldn’t do anything about her at that moment, so he could only continue with the journey. The virtual screen promptly popped up in front of his eyes and marked each path: [The success rate of passing through channel one is 0%, and the success rate of acquiring a treasure is 0%.] [The success rate of passing through channel two is 0%, and the success rate of acquiring a treasure is 0%.] [The success rate of passing through channel three is 0%, and the success rate of acquiring a treasure is 0%.] [The success rate of passing through channel four is 70%, and the success rate of acquiring a treasure is 50%.] [The success rate of clearing the fifth channel is 50%, and the success rate of obtaining a magical treasure is 70%.] Out of the five channels, there were two promising pathways. The success rate of the fourth channel was 70%, and the success rate of the fifth channel was 50%. This meant that the difficulty of clearing the fourth channel was lower than that of the fifth channel. ‘Which channel should I choose? Should I choose the fourth channel to pass the level more safely?’ Lin An glanced at Saint Zi Yan and the other purple-clothed disciples and smirked. Since they were currently depending on him, they didn’t seem to have any intention to harm him. However, Lin An would pass the test eventually, and he would have to leave the mystic realm. Although he could feel that Saint Zi Yan’s hostility towards him had decreased, Lin An had still killed Li Kuang. There was a life and death feud between him and the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect. If he left the mystic realm and returned to the Jiuxiao Sect without settling the feud, he would inevitably bring destruction to his own sect. Lin An could not afford to have too much of a good an illusion about his enemies. He had to assume the worst of his enemies, and he could not ignore the potential threat that Saint Zi Yan and the other purple-clothed disciples posed to him. After some deep thought, Lin An decided to use the illusionary realm to get rid of the purple-clothed disciples! He would choose the fifth passage that was even harder to pass. Instantly, he lifted his feet and walked towards the fifth passage. Saint Zi Yan looked at Lin An and suddenly felt a sense of unease, and she considered whether she would have to choose her own path. However, on second thought, Saint Zi Yan reasoned that Lin An didn’t have the strength to harm her. He definitely wouldn’t choose a dead-end path because he couldn’t afford to face her in battle. Saint Zi Yan wasn’t afraid of an early-stage golden core cultivator. She was a peak-stage golden core cultivator who had fallen from the nascent soul stage, and she definitely had more combat experience than Lin An. After her deliberation, she led her team and followed in Lin An’s footsteps. The setting in the tunnel was the same as the previous passageway. As the cultivators continued to advance, the scene kept changing, However, Lin An immediately discovered something different about the second tunnel. When he spun around, he discovered that there wasn’t a single cultivator following behind him. How was this possible? Lin An had seen Saint Zi Yan and the other cultivators follow him into the tunnel, and he was immediately puzzled. Could it be that the passage had diverted the other cultivators? In the process of advancing, everyone had been channeled into different small spaces. Lin An’s mind spun as he walked through the passage. At the end of the passage, there were pools of lava everywhere. The weather was gray, and it seemed as if Lin An had encountered a smoggy blue planet. He walked forward and noticed that there were no living things around him, so he couldn’t figure out the format of the impending test. It wasn’t until he had wandered around the wilderness for nearly half an hour that Lin An realized that the strange place seemed to be a chess game. There was an equal distance between each lava pond, and it seemed that the ponds uniformly formed a chessboard. Beside every lava pond, there was a big rock. After Lin An accidentally kicked one of the big rocks into a lava pond, the pond suddenly dried up, and the success rates of all the other rocks instantly appeared. Therefore, Lin An finally understood, He was in a terrestrial chess game. The ponds were all crisscrossed in equal distance to form a chessboard. Once a rock was pushed into a lava pond, it amounted to a black chess move, and if the pond dried up, it meant that it was a white chess move. Since Lin An had pushed the nearby rock into the pond, the game had already begun. The challenger in the terrestrial chess game always had a slight advantage, but the level was still difficult to overcome. This was because the chessboard was too big, and the distance between each pond was ten meters, which made it impossible for the challenger to carefully observe the overall perspective of the game. Therefore, the challenger seemed to play a game of blind chess. In order to prevent the challenger from observing all the moves, the terrestrial chessboard was filled with smog. In this way, even if a challenger could fly, they wouldn’t be able to observe the movements of the game from the sky. Additionally, the smog was also poisonous. Not only could it prevent a challenger from thinking carefully, but it could also cause them to face the threat of slow death. Therefore, the challenger would have an anxious feeling in their heart, which would further hinder them from playing normally. The challengers who did not understand the changes in the magma could not immediately guess that they were playing a terrestrial chess game. Therefore, in order to obtain more information, they would continue to randomly kick the enormous stones, and before they knew it, they had lost. In some cases, a few challengers didn’t even realize the format of the challenge until they were on the verge of dying. Even Lin An, who had already figured out the content of the challenge right from the start, was at a disadvantage because of the random placement of his first move. After analyzing the visible lava ponds in his vicinity, Lin An realized that the level was extremely vicious. When he thought about it, Lin An couldn’t help but feel extremely fortunate. He was glad that he had the success rate system, or else he would have definitely died in the terrestrial chess game. Even though past challengers had tried to come up with some moves during the terrestrial chess game, their efforts had borne no fruits. Luckily, Lin An had a significant trump card. The success rate system’s virtual screen popped up in front of him and analyzed the terrestrial chessboard. [The success rate of pushing down this stone is 20%.] [The success rate of pushing down that stone is 21%.] [The success rate of pushing down the stone to the left is 82%.] ...; Without any hesitation, Lin An pushed the stone with the 82% success rate into the lava pond, and the pond immediately dried up. He then noticed that the success rate of the stones in front of him had increased, and he was overjoyed. [The success rate of pushing down this stone is 100%.] After a few moves, there was only one stone left, and Lin An was on the brink of winning the chess game. Suddenly, an overwhelming feeling of disappointment came over him. There was nobody present to see him advance, and he felt that he had missed an opportunity to show off. Dong! The sound of the rock falling into the lava pond rent the air. Lin An had cleared the level. In an instant, the surrounding environment changed drastically, and he suddenly found himself in a spacious hall. There were ten boxes in the middle of the hall, and ten large screens were hanging along the walls of the hall. One of the screens was blank, but the other nine screens showed the progress of the other nine cultivators. Lin An chose to focus his attention on the ten boxes in the middle of the hall, There were ten cultivators who had entered the Dragon God Illusionary Realm, and there were ten boxes in the hall. It seemed that any cultivator who cleared the level was entitled to one treasure. However, since Lin An could touch all the ten boxes, he discovered that any cultivator who cleared the level could choose at will. Therefore, the first cultivator to clear the level had a tremendous advantage to go through the treasures and obtain the best reward. Abruptly, Lin An used the success rate system’s virtual screen to scan the boxes, and it indeed gave him a hint: [The probability of obtaining a top-grade treasure from box number one is 42%.] [The probability of obtaining a top-grade treasure from box number two is 12%.] [The probability of obtaining a top-grade treasure from box number three is 21%.] ...; [The probability of obtaining a top-grade treasure from box number ten is 92%.] The probability of obtaining a top-grade treasure from box number ten was 92%, which was the highest probability out of the ten boxes. Thus, Lin An chose the tenth box. After he picked up the box and opened it, he discovered a small golden flag. Its flagpole was made of gold, while the surface of the flag had exquisite and complicated patterns. Suddenly, a notification popped up on the virtual screen: [This is the thousand-faced extreme fire, a mid-grade immortal treasure.] Lin An was overjoyed. He had actually obtained a mid-grade immortal treasure! Moreover, one of the reasons he had entered the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm had been to secure the thousand-faced extreme fire. Even though he had added the Eastern Emperor Bell to his arsenal during his adventures in the mystic realm, it was only a magic treasure. Despite the bell’s rank as a high-grade magic treasure, it was still inferior to an immortal treasure, and even a low-grade immortal treasure could crush it. The thousand-faced extreme fire was actually a mid-grade immortal treasure, and it was incomparable to the Eastern Emperor Bell. After holding the thousand-faced extreme fire in his hands, Lin An understood its use. The thousand-faced extreme fire could trigger a large-scale fire riot, but after using it once, he would have to allow it to cool down for some time so that it could automatically repair and recharge itself. The power of the thousand-faced extreme fire customarily formed a bond with its user. Even if Lin An used it at his current cultivation level, the fire riot it would trigger would be difficult for even a nascent soul cultivator to withstand. As Lin An admired his new treasure, some loud music suddenly played on the big screen to his right. He hurriedly stored the thousand-faced extreme fire into his storage space and looked at the big screen. Saint Zi Yan appeared to have completed her challenge, and Lin An was immediately shocked, He felt that she was too abnormal. Not only was her cultivation the best among the younger generation, but her brainpower was also quite high. Under such a tough environment, she had actually won the chess game! The scenery around Saint Zi Yan changed, and she appeared in the hall. When she saw Lin An, she was instantly astonished. She hadn’t expected that Lin An would be the first cultivator to solve the chess game. “Did you also solve the previous level based on feeling?” After her initial shock, Saint Zi Yan didn’t show any killing intent towards Lin An. Instead, she teased him. Lin An didn’t answer her. Now that the two of them were alone, he had to be careful and guard himself against an attack from Saint Zi Yan. Previously, he hadn’t had to worry because Feng Hen and the rest of the cultivators had been present. Even if Saint Zi Yan had made a move, Feng Hen would have definitely defended Lin An since he needed his help to successfully navigate the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. However, now that Feng Hen was trapped in the terrestrial chess game level, he definitely wouldn’t be able to help Lin An. Nevertheless, because of the thousand-faced extreme fire he had just obtained, Lin An wasn’t afraid of Saint Zi Yan. It was just that he wanted to rely on the thousand-faced extreme fire to pass the upcoming trials, so he wasn’t willing to fight with Saint Zi Yan. Suddenly, two of the big screens on the wall went blank. To their surprise, there was no change in the hall. After the big screens went out, a new cultivator did not teleport into the hall. Lin An and Saint Zi Yan both realized that two of their colleagues had failed the challenge. When Lin An studied the blank screens, he learned that one of the cultivators who had failed was a local from the camp, while the other was a woman who had been part of Saint Zi Yan’s sect. Once he looked at the other big screens, Lin An felt that the remaining cultivators were in danger. Abruptly, another big screen went out, and all of a sudden, the big screens on the wall all went blank one after the other. After ten minutes, all the other cultivators had failed the challenge! Saint Zi Yan looked at the blank screens with an uncertain expression, and she finally opened her mouth to address Lin An. “Perhaps there is a possibility of reconciliation between us? To be honest, Li Kuang was only one of my subordinates. I didn’t have any special relationship with him. Back at the camp, I only threatened you for the sake of my sect’s face. Since there are no more disciples from my sect who know that you killed Li Kuang, and those who witnessed my threatening words are all dead, perhaps the two of us should end our rivalry. The road ahead is very dangerous. We should let down our guard and trust each other in order to have a greater chance of escaping.” The reason why there were no witnesses was that the cultivators in the camp hadn’t learned the identity of Lin An’s sect. Furthermore, the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm only opened once every one hundred years. Since all of Saint Zi Yan’s subordinates had died, no one from the outside would know what had happened between Lin An and the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect in the mystic realm. Lin An’s attitude was hard to predict. He did not reply to Saint Zi Yan’s proposal. Instead, he casually said, “You should choose your reward first. Everyone who passes the level can pick any of the boxes as a reward.” Saint Zi Yan immediately walked to the nine remaining boxes. As she seized up her options, Lin An suddenly opened his mouth and commented, “In the pile of boxes in front of you, there is an immortal treasure. It is most likely to be in the box in front of you. So, which box will you choose?” Saint Zi Yan’s figure suddenly stopped. If it had just been an ordinary treasure, she would not have paid any attention to Lin An’s guidance and she would have chosen the box that pleased her the most. However, Lin An had hinted that there was an immortal treasure in one of the boxes. Even in the Purple Clouds Ancient Sect, immortal treasures were scarce. Saint Zi Yan had only come across one mid-grade immortal treasure. Now that Lin An had told her that there was an immortal treasure among the boxes, Saint Zi Yan could not make a careless choice. She knew that Lin An was testing her. If she really trusted him, she would listen to his guidance and choose the box that he had recommended. However, if she followed her instincts and chose the other boxes, then her chances of working together with Lin An would definitely plummet. Therefore, Saint Zi Yan was in a dilemma. Would she trust Lin An, or would she follow her instincts and choose a box that she actually desired? Of course, if she really trusted Lin An, she would have to follow his advice. If what Lin An said was true, then the immortal treasure was in the nearest box. She had only fallen into her dilemma because she didn’t trust Lin An. When he saw that Saint Zi Yan was hesitating, Lin An already knew what to do. ...; Saint Zi Yan took a deep breath and finally reached her hand out toward the box closest to her. However, Lin An quickly grabbed her forearm and stopped her. “I lied to you. There’s no immortal treasure in this box.” When he saw Saint Zi Yan’s surprised expression, he pointed to another box and said, “Choose that box. The reward inside the box is the best.” Saint Zi Yan had ultimately chosen to believe in Lin An, so he also chose to temporarily put aside his hatred and work with her. After Saint Zi Yan obtained a low-grade immortal treasure from the box, she was overjoyed. Once she put away the reward, a new passageway appeared before her and Lin An. They were about to enter a new level. There were still five passageways, and Lin An carefully read the success rate probabilities on the virtual screen: [The clearance rate of the first passage is 0%, and the probability of obtaining treasures is 0%.] [The clearance rate of the second passage is 0%, and the probability of obtaining treasures is 0%.] [The clearance rate of the third passage is 30%, and the probability of obtaining treasures is 90%.] [The clearance rate of the fourth passage is 50%, and the probability of obtaining treasures is 50%.] [The clearance rate of the fifth passage is 70%, and the probability of obtaining treasures is 30%.] This time, there were five passageways, and three paths had a reasonable probability of survival. It seemed that the further a cultivator progressed, the more difficult the level would be, but there were also more paths of survival. Lin An concluded that the first choice had been the most important because there had only been one path with a high survival probability out of the ten passageways. “The first and second passages are both dead ends. The third passage is the most difficult, but the chances of obtaining treasures are the greatest. The fifth passage is the least difficult, but the rewards might not be that great. The difficulty and rewards of the fourth passage are both equal. Which path do you think is the best choice?” Saint Zi Yan gazed at Lin An, and she couldn’t hide the excitement in her beautiful eyes. “You really have a way to predict the future! Which divination technique do you practice?” When she saw that Lin An did not answer her question, Saint Zi Yan didn’t probe further, and she just directly expressed her opinion: “Choose the path with the best reward. I lowered my cultivation level to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm for the sake of the treasures. If I secure an ordinary reward, it won’t be worth my effort.” Lin An couldn’t help but marvel at Saint Zi Yan’s intelligence. She was right. He had also entered the mystic realm to secure the best reward, and it, therefore, made sense to choose the path with the best reward. In an instant, the two of them walked towards the third passage. As they continued to advance in the passage., the surrounding environment continued to change, and finally, they arrived at a strange stone forest. The sky above the forest was full of dark clouds, and there was a depressing feeling in the air. At the top of the largest rock in the forest, there were several human-shaped monsters that had wings on their backs. They all held long spears in their hands, and they had two horns on their foreheads. Additionally, the wings on their backs were spread out like those of a large bat. Lin An and Saint Zi Yan both sensed the terrifying energy waves that were coming from the monsters’ bodies. They immediately knew that each of the monsters had the strength comparable to a nascent soul stage cultivator. Lin An’s and Saint Zi Yan’s expressions slightly changed, but they both remained fearless. Since they had already chosen the path, they would have to confront the monsters. Immediately, Lin An unsheathed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and gripped it in his hand. He then activated the Eastern Emperor Bell, which bathed his body in golden light. “Although it’s a little embarrassing, can I trouble you to take the initiative in the attack? I cultivate the ‘Scripture of No Beginning,’ which grows stronger with each battle. As long as I can drag out the period of weakness in the early stages of each battle, my strength will eventually surpass the peak of the golden core stage. If you don’t have any trump cards that can determine our victory, I think this is the only strategy we can use to clear the stage.” When she heard this, Saint Zi Yan glanced at Lin An curiously before she nodded in agreement. In an instant, they both raised their swords to block an incoming attack. Two of the bat monsters on the tip of the strange rock had already jumped down. Just as they were about to touch the ground, they spread their wings and attacked Lin An and Saint Zi Yan. The spears in their hands glowed with a dense metallic luster, and when they approached Lin An, they attacked from both sides. “Black and white ashen flame, mystic flame transformation!” The black and white ashen flames already had power comparable to a nascent soul cultivator. Lin An hadn’t dared to be negligent, and he had immediately used his strongest combination skill. The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword was covered in a layer of golden light, and as Lin An swung it, a vast sword aura danced out and charged toward the oncoming bat monster. Pfft! Even though it was the strongest attack skill that Lin An had mastered, the bat monster simply stabbed forward with the spear in its hand and easily separated the sword aura before continuing its furious charge toward Lin An. At that critical moment, Lin An felt Saint Zi Yan’s hand pat his back, and she transmitted her mana to Lin An. He immediately channeled Saint Zi Yan’s spirit energy into the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and its glow became even brighter. Suddenly, Lin An felt his battle prowess increase drastically, and he took a step forward to meet the bat monster’s spear! <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An’s body was already comparable to a peak golden core stage cultivator after he received a boost from the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ and the morality demon sealing technique. The black-and-white ashen flames had also faintly surpassed the power of a peak golden core stage cultivator after being enhanced by the profound flame transformation. Therefore, when Saint Zi Yan had transmitted her spirit energy to Lin An, his strength had increased, and it was now comparable to a nascent soul stage cultivator. He took a step forward, and his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword clashed with the bat monster’s spear. Abruptly, violent energy flowed out in all directions, making a frenzied din between the man and the monster. Lin An felt as if he was wrestling with a rhinoceros. He sensed that the endless power on the other side seemed determined to destroy him, but he knew that he absolutely couldn’t back down. Saint Zi Yan was behind Lin An, and she had selflessly given him a sizeable amount of mana to help him withstand the enemy’s attack. However, she was also fighting against a nascent soul stage monster, and if Lin An backed down, then Saint Zi Yan would definitely be torn to pieces by the enemy’s pincer attack. “Hurricane Sword strike!” Lin An didn’t have time to pull out the virtual screen to check the success rate of the strike. He could only quickly use his trump card and hope for the best result. After Lin An used the Hurricane Sword technique, he discerned that the power that was continuously transmitted through the bat monster’s weapon had suddenly weakened, and he was overjoyed. He immediately turned his body to the side to deflect the bat monster’s power, and then, he raised his leg and kicked the monster’s ribs. The bat demon flew into the air, and this signified that Lin An had barely won the first round of battle. However, Lin An’s kick had the power of a full-strength attack from a peak-stage golden core cultivator. If he had kicked away the body of a golden core cultivator, the cultivator would have been severely injured. To his surprise, the kick to the bat monster’s body had only caused a minor injury to its ribs. Even its bones hadn’t broken, and Lin An felt that the toughness of the nascent soul stage monster’s body was actually so terrifying. Saint Zi Yan was also in a bitter battle with the other bat monster. Although her cultivation level was not necessarily lower than the bat monster, the power she could mobilize in the mystic realm was only at the peak of the golden core stage. Furthermore, she had already transferred a portion of her power to Lin An. Even so, she still withstood the bat monster’s attack with great difficulty, and her combination of strength and endurance was as expected of the best cultivator in the younger generation! [There is a 90% chance of triggering ten times the power of the Hurricane Sword technique at the place where Saint Zi Yan is standing.] Lin An had summoned the success rate system’s virtual screen to check the effectiveness of the Hurricane Sword style near Saint Zi Yan. He discovered that the technique could trigger the maximum power at that point, so he took advantage of the space he had created after kicking away the bat monster and rushed towards the bat monster that Saint Zi Yan was dealing with. “Hurricane Sword style!” While Saint Zi Yan was confronting the bat monster, Lin An slashed out his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. The bat monster saw that Lin An’s sword strike was unstoppable, so it hurriedly retreated to dodge the strike. However, it was currently fighting against Saint Zi Yan. Once the bat monster retreated, the energy flow it had emitted to battle against Saint Zi Yan didn’t have any follow-up support, so it instantly collapsed, and Saint Zi Yan’s vast power instantly devoured it. The wave of support was mainly because of Lin An’s victory in the first wave of battle. If Lin An had lost the first round against his bat monster opponent, then the support would have been to the advantage of the bat monster, and in the end, Saint Zi Yan would have lost the battle. Therefore, the spirit energy that Saint Zi Yan had transmitted to Lin An hadn’t been wasted. After Saint Zi Yan’s vast energy flow overpowered the bat demon, its vitality rapidly decreased. At the same time, its body was also suppressed by Saint Zi Yan’s power, and it could not move. Lin An really wanted to take the opportunity to kill the bat demon with his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, but unfortunately, the bat demon that he had previously kicked away had already recovered, and it was once again charging towards him, which meant that he no longer had the time to spare to kill the suppressed bat demon. “Hey!!” Lin An said to Saint Zi Yan quickly, “I know it’s shameless to ask this, but can you leave this dying monster for me to fight and deal with the monster that’s still alive and kicking?” Saint Zi Yan looked at Lin An with a strange gaze. When a peerless beauty like her fought monsters alongside other men, they would always rush forward and take the lead, afraid that she would hurt a finger. It was the first time she had fought alongside a cultivator like Lin An who would ask her for help and then switch monsters with her. Was Lin An taking advantage of her? However, Saint Zi Yan believed that Lin An had a good reason why he had requested the switch, and without much delay, she withdrew the energy flow that she had used to suppress the bat monster. She then turned around to deal with Lin An’s original bat monster. Abruptly, Lin An took advantage of the fact that the bat monster on his side was seriously injured and dying, and before it could react, he hurriedly rushed towards it and used the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand to chop at its head. When the bat monster saw that the blade was rapidly approaching, it instinctively tried to save itself by using both of its hands to clamp on Lin An’s treasured sword. “Hurricane Strike technique!” Lin An used the hurricane strike sword style and triggered three times the damage. Instantly, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword broke through the bat monster’s defense and attacked its fatal point. After the bat monster died, a bright red life energy was extracted from its body and it poured into the transparent white crystal on the body of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. The transparent white crystal was quickly dyed red, and its energy waves suddenly became stronger. The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword broke through the early stage of the foundation establishment stage and upgraded to the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage. Lin An then used the black-and-white ashen flames to devour the bat monster’s corpse. The black flames suddenly doubled in size, and Lin An felt as if they had broken increased in intensity. An overwhelming power appeared within the black-and-white ashen flames after Lin An activated them. However, he was not unfamiliar with the immense energy. This was because he had already experienced the power during his battle with the bat monster. He, therefore, realized that the black-and-white ashen flames had broken through the peak of the golden core stage and moved into the nascent soul stage! Suddenly, Lin An’s face lit up with joy. Since he had the ‘Scripture of No Beginnings,’ his power had become much stronger. In addition to the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, which was at the middle stage of the foundation establishment stage, and the black and white ashen Flames, which were at the nascent soul stage, he no longer needed Saint Zi Yan to transfer her magic power to him. He could now fight against the bat monster with his own power. Lin An looked toward Saint Zi Yan and noticed that she was already extremely tired after fighting against two nascent soul stage monsters, and she looked as if she was about to be defeated. “White Flame!” He immediately used the white flame in the black and white ashen flames to block the bat monster’s spear that was attacking her. Then, he raised his sword and charged towards the bat monster. The bat monster wanted to raise its spear to block the incoming strike, but Saint Zi Yan also took the opportunity to attack. Her turbulent energy flow bypassed Lin An and attacked the bat monster’s side. There were attacks from the front and side, and the two waves of attacks basically arrived at the same time. After weighing the pros and cons, the bat monster only used a small amount of energy flow to deal with Lin An, who looked relatively weak because he was at the initial stage of the golden core stage. However, it was this miscalculation that caused the bat monster to lose its life. It did not know that Lin An was already far more dangerous than the exhausted Saint Zi Yan! “Black and white ashen flames, mystic flame transformation!” In an instant, the black-and-white ashen flames attached themselves to the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. Lin An easily split the bat monster’s energy flow and slashed the sword at its neck. The bat monster quickly swung its spear to block the strike, but Saint Zi Yan’s energy flow overpowered it. The monster’s body was engulfed by the surging golden light, and it quickly lost its ability to resist. Lin An quickly flicked the monster’s spear away and stabbed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword into its heart! Abruptly, bright red life energy flowed along the slender blade of the sword towards the transparent white crystal. The life energy upgraded the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and the energy waves it emitted suddenly became stronger. Lin An immediately understood that the sword was close to advancing to the late stage of the foundation establishment level. After the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword sucked the life energy, the black and white flames covering the sword incinerated the bat monster’s corpse. Once they had burned the monster’s body, the black flames increased their strength and moved five percent closer to upgrading to the second stage of the nascent soul level. “Your sword and flames, why do I feel like they’ve become much stronger?” Saint Zi Yan had a look of disbelief as she gazed at Lin An’s Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and the black-and-white ashen flames. After Lin An had successfully killed the two bat monsters, four more identical bat monsters jumped out from the top of the towering stone mountain. The scene caused Lin An and Saint Zi Yan’s scalps to go numb, Could it be that every time they defeated the bat monsters, their numbers would double? At a glance, there were probably no less than a hundred bat monsters in the surrounding forest. After a few rounds, the number of enemies that Lin An and Saint Zi Yan would face would be thirty-two. If they were forced to defend against thirty-two nascent soul monsters, Lin An would have no option but to use his last trump card, the thousand faced extreme fire. However, Saint Zi Yan would definitely not be able to defeat the bat monsters even if she restored her cultivation level to the nascent soul stage. Suddenly, several thoughts ran through Lin An’s mind as he prepared to deal with the four bat monsters that were flying towards them. “Saint Zi Yan, have you learned any defensive spells?” “Why are you asking this?” Saint Zi Yan replied curiously. After being thin-skinned during the previous two rounds, Lin An no longer felt embarrassed. “Can I trouble you to restrain three of the bat monsters? I’ll come and help you after I kill the isolated monster. Even if I restrain the three bat monsters, it’ll be very difficult for you to kill the other bat monster, and if both of us deal with the two bat monsters, then neither of us will be able to win. In the end, they will overpower us and kill us.” Saint Zi Yan couldn’t believe her ears. “Are you crazy? I’m just a weak woman at the peak of the golden core stage. You actually want me to deal with three nascent soul stage monsters?” However, after Saint Zi Yan complained, she immediately said, “I can only hold on for five minutes! I have a secret technique that can restore my strength to my original level. These bat monsters are only at the first level of the nascent soul stage. I’ve already cultivated to the fourth level of the nascent soul stage, and I can still deal with them for a short while. This was originally the trump card that I had planned to use to pass the final stage of the trial. I can only use it for five minutes. Can you kill the isolated bat monster within five minutes?” “Saint Zi Yan is indeed the best among the younger generation!” Lin An quickly flattered her and promised, “Five minutes will definitely be enough!” “Okay.” Saint Zi Yan took the lead and charged towards the four bat monsters. Her aura began to rise, and she nodded at Lin An, “Then let’s begin!” Saint Zi Yan used her golden energy flow to attack the first three bat monsters. After she got their attention, she quickly ran to the side and lured the three bat monsters away from Lin An. The fourth bat monster saw that its three teammates had already surrounded Saint Zi Yan, so it flew towards Lin An. At first, Lin An pretended that he couldn’t match the bat monster’s strength, and he fled. Seeing that Lin An was running away, the bat monster thought that he was afraid, so it roared excitedly before flapping its wings fiercely and flying towards him like a bullet. However, Lin An was actually buying time to use the success rate system’s virtual screen and search for a location where the Hurricane Sword style could trigger a powerful attack. Unfortunately, he couldn’t find an ideal location in a short period of time, and considering that Saint Zi Yan could only hold on for five minutes, he suddenly stopped and turned around before slashing at the bat monster with the sword in his hand. The bat monster had been charging at Lin An with all its strength. Therefore, it couldn’t dodge the sword attack in time, and it could only brace itself and extend its spear towards Lin An. “Black-and-white ashen flames, dark flame transformation!” Lin An didn’t have the extra time to think through his attack. He directly used his strongest move with the intention of winning the battle quickly. Pfft! The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword emitted a flame-flaring sound as it slashed at the bat monster’s spear. When the spear and the sword collided, a ferocious energy exploded, and it swept out in all directions like a gust of wind. Lin An suddenly felt that the power of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ had been activated, and his strength increased. The black-and-white ashen flames and the power of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ were both at the nascent soul stage, which enabled Lin An to suppress the bat monster. In an instant, the bat monster was sent flying by Lin An’s attack. “Black-and-white ashen flames!” Taking advantage of the opening, Lin An activated the black-and-white ashen flames to lick at the monster. The bat monster’s wings were burned by the black flames, and its feet were frozen by the cold air from the white flames. In one round, Lin An had already displayed a huge advantage in strength! “Hurricane Sword Strike!” Lin An suddenly stepped into an area that would increase the power of his attack fivefold and used the Hurricane Sword strike on the bat monster. Pfft! A stream of fresh blood arced into the air, and the bat monster fell to the ground. Lin An dashed forward again and raised his sword to chop off its head. The blood-red life energy was extracted from the bat monster’s body, and it poured into the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s transparent crystal. With no hesitation, Lin An used his black flames to devour the bat monster’s corpse, and the black and white ashen flames had a ten percent increase into the second level of the nascent soul stage. When he looked across the forest, Lin An was surprised to see that Saint Zi Yan actually had the advantage in her battle. The three bat monsters had been suppressed, but Lin An knew that she could only hold on for another minute since the time limit of her secret technique would soon be up. He hurriedly brought up the virtual screen and looked around for a place where he could trigger ten times the power of the Hurricane Sword technique. Finally, he found a spot under one of the nearby stone peaks, and he quickly ran over. “Hurricane Sword strike!” As Saint Zi Yan was holding off the bat monsters, Lin An used the Hurricane Sword strike to unleash a powerful attack on one of the bat monsters. Crack! In an instant, Lin An’s strike cut the bat monster into two halves. Even though he was ten meters away from the monsters, a bright red life force flew over and poured into the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s transparent white crystal. The energy fluctuations on the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword changed, and an even stronger energy spread out in all directions like ripples in a pond. The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword had advanced to the late stage of the foundation establishment level. The time limit for Saint Zi Yan’s secret technique eventually ended, and her strength continuously flowed out from her body. When Lin An saw that she wasn’t able to hold on any longer, he quickly rushed forward and held her shoulder. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “You should rest for a while,” Lin An said comfortingly. “Leave the rest to me.” He then stood in front of Saint Zi Yan, and the power in his body surged out. Because he had fought many battles since he had entered the mystic realm, the ‘Scripture of No Beginning’ had already made Lin An’s strength comparable to a peak golden core stage cultivator! Additionally, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword was already at the late stage of the foundation establishment level, while the black and white ashen flames were in the first stage of the nascent level. Therefore, Lin An could fight two bat monsters at once. Moreover, the two bat monsters had already suffered some injuries during their battle with Saint Zi Yan, so they were no longer in their strongest state. “Roar!” The two bat monsters shrieked loudly and raised their iron spears as they flew towards Lin An. “Black-and-white ashen flames, profound flame transformation!” The black-and-white flames twined around like two cannonballs and shot towards the two bat monsters. They immediately raised their spears to block the attack, but the two balls of flames suddenly exploded and knocked the two monsters to the ground. “White flames!” Lin An used the white flames to freeze the two bat monsters. Since he still didn’t know whether he would fight against eight bat monsters in the next round, he wanted to capture the bat monsters without killing them in order to buy time for himself and Saint Zi Yan. One of the bat monsters was frozen into an ice sculpture by the white flames, while the other bat monster flapped its wings and dodged Lin An’s white flame. “Hurricane Sword strike!” With no hesitation, Lin An used the Hurricane Sword style to slash at the escaping bat monster. Luckily, it couldn’t dodge the attack in time. The bat monster’s wings and legs were cut off, and it slumped to the ground. “White flames!” Lin An used the white flames again to control the injured bat monster. He also stopped its wound from bleeding, because he did not want it to die prematurely. “Saint Zi Yan, keep an eye on these two monsters. Don’t let them die. I’ll see whether the bat monsters that have yet to awaken have an awakening mechanism.” After Lin An explained his plan to Saint Zi Yan, he summoned his secret treasure ship and flew towards the bat monsters at the top of the stone mountain. The bat monsters didn’t even stir as Lin An approached them. He quietly floated along the stone mountain and decided to test whether the bat monsters would wake up if he attacked them. To protect himself, Lin An used the black flames to surround one of the bat monsters. When he was satisfied that he had surrounded it with enough black flames, he pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and stabbed the monster’s heart! Sure enough, the bat demon stirred after it was attacked. The intense pain had awakened it, and it let out a heart-wrenching howl. Abruptly, the bat monster flapped its wings vigorously in an attempt to escape, but under Lin An’s control, the surrounding black flames immediately devoured it. Its wings were quickly burned, and the bat demon’s flaming corpse plummeted to the ground. At the same time, bright red life energy poured into the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and half of the transparent white crystal was dyed red. Instantly, the black and white ashen flames advanced by fifteen percent into the second level of the nascent soul stage. Lin An was overjoyed. It seemed that he had found the correct method to clear the trial! At first, he had been afraid that he would have to face all the one hundred nascent soul stage monsters. The success rate system had also indicated a thirty percent chance for him and Saint Zi Yan to clear the test. However, it turned out that as long as a cultivator found the right method; it was possible for them to clear all the tests in the Dragon God Illusionary Realm. “I think I can kill all the bugs!” Lin An was thrilled, and he planned to use the same method to deal with the remaining bat monsters. Pu! The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword stabbed a bat monster’s heart, and the black flames devoured it. The bright red life energy instantly flowed from its body and poured into the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s transparent white crystal. In an instant, several energy waves emanated from the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and it had advanced to the peak of the foundation establishment stage. The black flames consumed the bat monster’s corpse, and they experienced a twenty percent increase in the second level of the nascent soul stage. Puff! Lin A killed another bat monster. ...; After killing close to a hundred bat monsters, Lin An’s Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword directly advanced to the peak of the golden core stage. His black-and-white ashen flames had also advanced by leaps and bounds, and they had entered the fourth stage of the nascent soul stage. After just a few battles, the magical flames had equaled Saint Zi Yan’s cultivation level, and she was the best cultivator in the younger generation. A wave of mixed emotions suddenly washed over Lin An. On the one hand, he was happy that his two magic treasures had increased their power, but on the other hand, he was sad that his own cultivation level was only at the early stage of the golden core stage. “Hey!” Saint Zi Yan yelled from below the stone mountain range. “The two bat monsters you trapped seem to have frozen to death. You have to be careful!” As soon as she finished speaking, Lin An saw that the eight bat monsters around him had opened their eyes. He was immediately worried that the monsters would destroy his secret treasure ship, so he hurriedly flew towards Saint Zi Yan and finally stopped beside her. When she saw that there were eight monsters flying down from the top of the stone mountain, Saint Zi Yan was extremely nervous. “What should I do?” Her voice was a little shaky. “There are eight nascent soul stage monsters. Even if I recover my cultivation, I won’t be able to defeat them. Moreover, I can’t use my secret technique at this moment. I’m finished! I’m dead! Don’t tell me that my reputation will be ruined today?” After hearing Saint Zi Yan’s words, Lin An suddenly had an idea. “Actually, I’ve never touched a woman in my life. Saint Zi Yan, if this is the end, can you let me kiss you so that I can leave this world without any regrets? Of course, it would be even better if I could use the farewell cannon.” “Ah?” Saint Zi Yan was a little confused. “We don’t have much time, do we? These bat monsters are only ten seconds away from flying over. Are you that fast?” Suddenly, Lin An raised his hand and waved it, and the black and white ashen flames gushed out of his body like a dam, engulfing the eight bat monsters. Instantly, half of the bat monsters were frozen into ice sculptures, and the other half were burned by the black flames, and they rolled onto the ground. They had all lost their ability to fight. “I think we now have enough time.” Lin An laughed casually as he glanced at Saint Zi Yan. When she looked at the scene in front of her, Saint Zi Yan was dumbfounded. She hadn’t expected that Lin An was so strong that he could defeat all eight bat monsters in one strike. How had he done it? Was it because he had used the strange black flames to burn the monsters’ corpses? When she thought about it, Saint Zi Yan concluded that Lin An’s current strength had probably surpassed her actual combat strength. She could no longer maintain her title as the best cultivator in the younger generation. How had Lin An achieved such success? He was clearly still at the early stage of the golden core level! After the eight bat demons died, Saint Zi Yan realized that there were no more bat demons at the top of the stone mountain range. They had actually cleared the test. In an instant, a pillar of light descended from the sky and illuminated the ground. Afterward, a chest then appeared out of thin air. It was the reward for clearing the level. “We’ve cleared the trial!” Saint Zi Yan was excited to have survived such a difficult level, and she ran towards the chest and opened it. A burst of golden light surged out of the chest, and in the midst of the bright light, a golden dragon danced in the air. Afterward, it shrank into a cauldron. “The Dragon God Cauldron!” Not only was Saint Zi Yan the strongest among the younger generation in terms of her cultivation and intelligence, but her knowledge was also superior to others. She had quickly recognized the first-grade immortal treasure. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “There’s only one reward?” Lin An asked with a puzzled expression. “Then how do we split it?” Even though Lin An had killed most of the bat monsters, if it hadn’t been for Saint Zi Yan’s help at the beginning of the battle, and the secret skills that he had used, then he wouldn’t have been able to clear the round. Therefore, Saint Zi Yan and Lin An had the same merit, but there was only one reward. “This treasure belongs to you, the next one belongs to me!” Saint Zi Yan said straightforwardly. When he thought about it, Lin An felt that Saint Zi Yan really had a big heart. Even though they were skilled cultivators, there was no guarantee that they would successfully complete the next challenge. However, since she had already laid out the terms of their cooperation, Lin An gladly agreed. He had been practicing his alchemy skills, so the Dragon God Cauldron would be a great help to him. After storing the reward in the system’s space, Lin An secretly looked forward to the next trial. Instantly, the passages leading to the next stage appeared in front of the two cultivators. This time, there were only two passages. Before Lin An could pull out the success rate system’s virtual screen, he realized that there were several words inscribed at the top of the passageways. When he read the words, he learned that one passage led to the next stage, while the other was the exit to leave the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. Additionally, only one cultivator could pass through each passageway. Clang! Lin An suddenly heard a sword being drawn, and he hurriedly dodged to the side, just in time to avoid Saint Zi Yan’s blade. When he turned around, he saw that the necklace hanging around Saint Zi Yan’s neck was emitting a blinding light, and the light was pointing towards one of the two passages. Saint Zi Yan was holding a sky-blue sword with a jade hilt in her hand, and it was emitting a mysterious ripple. She had not taken out the sword during her time in the Dragon God Illusionary Realm, and Lin An was instantly dismayed. The sword looked beautiful and majestic, just like its owner. However, just like its owner, the sword could not be underestimated. There had to be some kind of mysterious and terrifying power hidden in the small sword that was enough to make Saint Zi Yan feel she could use it to choose the path with the greatest reward. “What do you mean by this?” Lin An asked coldly. Saint Zi Yan’s expression was dark, and her mood had changed drastically. “I lowered my cultivation level to enter the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm for the hell king’s purgatory body behind that path. It is related to my future life plans, and I cannot give it to you.” ‘But I never thought of competing with you...;’ The sentence was stifled in Lin An’s heart, and he couldn’t say it out loud. Clang! Lin An pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and activated the Hurricane Sword technique to stab Saint Zi Yan. To his surprise, she raised her sword and lightly swung it, easily neutralizing the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s aura even though it was ten times more powerful. It seemed that Saint Zi Yan wasn’t using her own power. Lin An could clearly feel that the defensive force had been directly emitted from the jade hilt on her sword. Lin An suspected that even if he used the black and white ashen flames, profound flame transformation technique, he could not withstand the power within Saint Zi Yan’s sword. It turned out that she had actually concealed her actual strength. Suddenly, Lin An had a new understanding of the thirty percent success rate that the virtual screen had showed during the previous level. Perhaps, the thirty percent success rate had not referred to his chances of using his treasures to clear the level. Instead, the probability rate had been based on Saint Zi Yan’s brute strength alone, and she would have had a thirty percent chance of directly breaking through the attacks of the hundreds of nascent soul stage monsters on her own. “Thousand-faced extreme fire!” Lin An immediately took out the thousand-faced extreme fire treasure from the system space and used it on Saint Zi Yan. Several flames surged out from the flag and rushed towards her noisily. “Pure origin heaven sword lashes!” Lin An realized that it was the first time that Saint Zi Yan had used a martial technique in his presence. When she had fought the bat monsters, she had only used energy flow during her attacks. It seemed that she had been deliberately hiding her moves from the very beginning. Once the thousand-faced extreme fire’s flames collided with the sword aura from the jade hilt sword, Lin An felt as if he was in the middle of a storm. However, he knew it was definitely not an illusion. The jade hilt sword in Saint Zi Yan’s hand had to be a celestial treasure! After the attack ended, the energy in the thousand-faced extreme fire had been used up and even a portion of the flag had been burned. Fortunately, the thousand-faced extreme fire treasure could automatically repair itself. When he looked at Saint Zi Yan, Lin An noticed that the sword in her hand had also cracked a few times. It must have been greatly damaged, and he concluded that she could only use the sword for a short period. “Profound flame transformation!” Lin An rushed towards Saint Zi Yan and threw a punch at her face with his right fist. However, he immediately saw that she had not blocked or dodged the punch. Instead, she had closed her eyes! If the punch had hit her, then her beautiful face would have been damaged forever. Lin An quickly withdrew his fist and turned his body to the side. He brushed past Saint Zi Yan and quickly set his feet to regain his balance. “What are you doing?” Lin An couldn’t help but complain. “If you’re angry, I’ll let you punch me to vent your anger. Now that you’ve damaged my protective magic treasure, you can punch me again to vent your frustration and then allow me to enter the next level. Is that okay?” Lin An nodded his head in disbelief. He then walked towards the passageway that led out of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. “Didn’t we already agree that the Dragon God Cauldron would be mine, and the next reward would be yours? Now that I don’t have to do anything, I’m more than happy to leave.” Lin An walked in front of the passageway, but he abruptly stopped and said, “I thought that we were already friends, but I didn’t think that you wouldn’t trust me. Forget it! Let’s just pretend that we never met and that we never helped each other! The next time we see each other, we’ll just be strangers!” After he spoke, Lin An leaped into the exit tunnel, and his figure quickly disappeared into the passageway. Saint Zi Yan hurriedly took a few steps forward and stretched out her hand as if she wanted to say something, but Lin An had already disappeared. She didn’t know why, but her heart was faintly aching. Lin An’s words run through her mind. ‘The next time we see each other, we’ll just be strangers.’ Saint Zi Yan felt as if a piece of red-hot carbon had pierced her heart. The feeling was so painful that she almost couldn’t breathe. Salty tears flowed out from the corners of her eyes, and they stained her cheeks with the color of sadness and dripped onto the ground. Suddenly, she fell to the ground in a daze, and there was only one voice echoing in her head: ‘I thought we were already friends.’ ...; Lin An immediately suspected that there was something wrong with the exit passage. He felt as if he was riding a roller coaster with his eyes closed, and the world around him was spinning wildly. Dong! Lin An fell into a fast-flowing river. He sank down to the riverbed and immediately observed his surroundings. After confirming his location, Lin An planned to summon his treasure ship in order to fly out of the river. However, for some reason, it seemed that the ship had been damaged in the exit passage. After he took out the treasure ship, Lin An discovered that it had lost its ability to fly. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An had no choice but to lean on the edge of the boat and flip into it. He then lay in the thousand treasures boat and exhaled loudly. After docking the boat to the shore, Lin An put it back into the success rate system’s storage space and then used one hand to grab onto the grass by the shore to bring himself up. After he climbed onto the shore, Lin An raised his head, and he immediately made eye contact with a pair of bright watery eyes. A little girl, who was about ten years old, had been staring at him, and to Lin An’s surprise, she was wearing the same uniform as him. Was she a Jiuxiao Sect disciple? “Why is my Senior Brother pretending to be a fish in the river?” Suddenly, Lin An realized that there was a fishing hook attached to his clothes, and the little girl was holding a fishing rod in her hand. It turned out that Lin An hadn’t found the right opportunity to dock, but he had been pulled to the shore by the fishing rod. “I fell into the water when I came out of the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm. I didn’t mean to trouble you.” Lin An said unhappily. Unexpectedly, the little girl started to giggle. “Senior Brother, why are you teasing me? The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm is thousands of miles away. If what you’re saying is true, then could it be that you’ve been drifting your way here for the past few months? Even if you drifted for a few months, the timing doesn’t match. The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm only opened a few days ago. Could it be that you’re talking about the time when it opened a hundred years ago? My Senior Brother really has perseverance after drifting for more than a hundred years.” When he heard the little girl’s words, Lin An frowned. “A thousand miles away? Where am I?” “This is the Ghana Empire’s southern border.” “What?” Lin An turned pale with shock. ‘The Ghana Empire’s southern border!’ The Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm was located on the northeastern border of the Ghana Empire. How had he traveled close to a thousand miles away from the mystic realm? Lin An couldn’t help but wonder why he had teleported to the strange shore. “The Jiuxiao Sect is far away in the northeastern region of the Ghana Empire. Why would a little girl from the Jiuxiao Sect be here? Or is the uniform on your body, not yours?” Lin An asked. “I’m a special agent from the Jiuxiao Sect’s southern region. I’m here to open up a southern market. You inner sect disciples don’t understand the hardships of frontline personnel like us,” the little girl said arrogantly. “Roar!” While they were chatting, the frightening sound of a beast’s roar suddenly rang out, and the little girl’s expression changed when she heard it. “Oh no! The ink devil beast is here. Quickly, get up! We have to escape.” The little girl threw the fishing rod onto the ground in panic, and for a moment, she couldn’t decide which direction to run to. They both heard the loud thud of plodding footsteps, and then, a five-meter-tall dark green monster that looked like a lizard and a rooster appeared in Lin An’s field of vision. The little girl was so frightened that she cried out in panic. As she ran, she held onto Lin An’s hand tightly. “Don’t panic, you have to calm down! It’s just a small lizard. We can kill it.” Lin An comforted her. “Small lizard? Are you calling that five-meter-tall beast a small lizard? You better stop acting tough. This ink devil beast’s strength is comparable to that of a golden core stage cultivator. Since we can’t beat it, we better run quickly.” Suddenly, Lin An pushed the little girl to the side and looked at the ink devil beast that was charging at him as he slowly pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword from his waist. “Hurricane Sword style!” Lin An knew that using the Hurricane Sword technique would only double the power of the attack. However, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword was already at the peak of the golden core stage, so he felt that the strike was more than enough to deal with the charging beast. Crack! The ink devil beast was instantly cut in half by Lin An’s sword strike. The bright red life force was sucked away by the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, but only a small portion of the transparent crystal turned red. Lin An didn’t even bother to use his black flame to devour the ink devil’s corpse since it would only contribute to a marginal increase in the flame’s power. When he turned his head, he saw that the little girl’s mouth was wide open in shock. She hadn’t expected that the ink devil beast, which was comparable to a golden core stage cultivator, would actually be cut down by such an extremely young man! The little girl had originally thought that only marginal disciples like her traveled to the southern border of the Ghana Empire. However, Lin An’s strength was almost at the thirteenth level of the Qi cultivating stage. “You...; Which peak in the Jiuxiao Sect do you belong to?” Lin An casually sheathed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and said nonchalantly, “The Bixiao Peak.” “That’s absolutely impossible!” The little girl immediately shouted, “How could that woman, Qian Yi, take in a disciple!” “It’s up to you to believe it or not,” Lin An replied and paused for a while before he continued, “then, can you tell me who you are and what you’re doing in this place?” “My name is Zuo Nanshuang. I’ve been ordered to come here and find the hell king’s purgatory body!” The little girl held her head high and puffed out her chest as she spoke. It was obvious that she was very proud of her mission. “How old are you?” Lin An inquired. “Eleven years old!” “What’s your cultivation level?” “First level of the Qi refinement stage!” “Who’s your master?” “I’m an outer sect disciple. I don’t have a master.” “Then where did you receive this order?” “I saw it in the sect’s announcement. Anyone who finds the location of the hell king’s purgatory body can become an inner sect disciple unconditionally!” Lin An thought for a moment before he retorted, “Wasn’t that announcement put out three years ago? Everybody knows that the hell king’s purgatory body is in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm.” The little girl continued to hold her head high and puff out her chest. “So what if it was announced three years ago? It’s definitely still valid. So what if it’s already known to be in the mystic realm? There’s more than one hell king’s purgatory body in this world.” “Ah...;” Lin An didn’t know what to say. He instantly decided to tease the little girl. “Maybe if you improved your cultivation level three years ago, you might already be an inner disciple.” “Hmph! I’ll definitely find the hell king’s purgatory body. I have to become an inner disciple through hard work.” While they were chatting, Lin An noticed that several few flying swords had appeared in the distance, and they were slicing through the air towards them. Instantly, the little girl’s expression changed again. “Oh no, someone’s coming to attack us. Let’s run!” As she spoke, the little girl wanted to pull Lin An along with her. However, Lin An used his right hand to hold her head in an attempt to calm her down. “We’re in a rush. We have to calm down. What are you talking about?” “The ink devil beast!” The little girl said in an alarmed tone. “The corpse of an ink devil beast is worth a thousand spirit stones. Once an ink devil beast dies nearby, the disciples from the Water Mirror Sect always attack the cultivators responsible and steal the fruits of their victory. Let’s run. If we lose the thousand spirit stones, so be it. Our lives are more important.” “Since it’s worth a considerable sum of money, why don’t the disciples from that sect hunt the ink devil beast for themselves? Instead, they seem determined to snatch other people’s rewards?” With no hesitation, the little girl replied, “What do you mean? Isn’t it obvious that hunting an ink devil beast is more tedious than snatching other people’s rewards? Let’s leave quickly.” “I’ve never had the habit of swallowing my anger,” Lin An said defiantly. “I’d like to see what the Water Mirror Sect disciples are capable of.” “Young man, you’re really too impulsive. The Water Mirror Sect has too many disciples. You can’t beat them.” Zuo Nanshuang signed as she advised him. However, Lin An stood his ground and ignored the little girl’s unsolicited counsel. Not long after, the few flying swords spun in the air and landed beside Lin An. Then, an aurora flashed in the distance, and a cultivator riding on a flying sword flew over. “I am Yang Luo of the Water Mirror Sect. Who dares to harm the wealth of our sect?” The sword-wielding cultivator hovered in the air and loudly rebuked Lin An. Lin An had heard of the cultivator’s tactic before. It involved taking control of the public’s opinion first and claiming that the ink devil beast was the sect’s own wealth right from the start. In that case, the Water Mirror Sect cultivators would have a moral advantage. “You guys are too shameless. This ink devil beast was raised naturally. How did it become your sect’s wealth? Could it be that you gave birth to it yourself?” Lin An replied loudly. The sword-wielding cultivator sneered, “This ink devil beast ran out from our sect. Now that you’ve killed it, we don’t intend to hold you responsible. Do you still want to take its remains away?” “Bullsh*t! How can you prove that this ink devil beast ran out from your sect? All the ink devil beasts in the world look the same. You’re clearly trying to snatch the fruits of my victory.” “Hehe, since you say that I’m going to snatch it by force, then I’ll have to snatch it by force.” The sword-wielding cultivator sneered. Suddenly, the flying sword next to him flew past Lin An’s eyes and produced a piercing sound. The little girl’s face instantly turned pale, and she subconsciously took a step back. Just by looking at the appearance of the sword-wielding cultivator, one could tell that he had some skills. How could an ordinary cultivator have the power to levitate the swords? Therefore, his cultivation level was probably above the golden core stage. The little girl tugged at Lin An’s sleeve and said timidly, “Why don’t we give him the ink devil’s carcass? Even if you can beat him, you can’t beat the entire Water Mirror Sect. If you beat the junior disciples, then the senior disciples will come. It’ll be an endless stream, and it will be extremely annoying. This is just a small amount of wealth, so just endure it.” “Endure?” Lin An smiled. “Ever since I came to this world, I haven’t met anyone or anything that I’ve had to endure.” “Then let’s see who’s the real deal!” The sword-wielding cultivator commanded. In an instant, four flying swords around him transformed into golden light and flew towards Lin An. However, Lin An’s expression didn’t change. He narrowed his eyes slightly, and within a few breaths, he could clearly see the trajectory of the flying swords that were covered in golden light as they flew towards him. He quickly raised his hand and waved it. Abruptly, the four flying swords slowed down their motion, and Lin An picked them all out in mid-air. His physical fitness was already comparable to that of a peak golden core stage cultivator and coupled with the fact that the morality demon sealing technique had been automatically activated, the flying swords of a mere early-stage golden core stage cultivator could not even scratch his hand. “Not bad, good stuff!” Lin An mockingly praised the four flying swords. Then, he activated the Eastern Emperor Bell and swallowed all the flying swords. Pfft! The Eastern Emperor Bell immediately devoured the flying swords, and a defensive force surged back toward the cultivator. Suddenly, the Water Mirror Sect disciple spat out a mouthful of blood. “How dare you!” The sword control cultivator was furious. He summoned his natal flying sword and charged at Lin An. To his dismay, Lin An used the same trick again. He raised his hand and summoned the natal flying sword into his hand. The natal flying sword was a little stronger than the other four flying swords. It hummed and struggled in Lin An’s hand, and it almost broke free and escaped. Lin An once again summoned the Eastern Emperor Bell, and it absorbed the life-bound flying sword. Immediately, the sword-wielding cultivator fell from the sky like a kite with a broken bridle and fell to his death on the ground. When Lin An realized that the Water Mirror Sect disciple had fallen to his death, he was shocked. How could a mighty golden core cultivator die by falling from such a height? It seemed that his skills had been too fake. However, Lin An didn’t know that it was actually because he had absorbed the disciple’s life-bound flying sword, which had caused the sword-wielding cultivator to be seriously injured. Without the life-bound flying sword, the cultivator couldn’t live any longer, and the sudden fall from the sky had been the last straw. Therefore, all of those factors had combined together and resulted in the Water Mirror Sect disciple’s death. At the side, Zuo Nanshuang had been stunned as she looked at the scene that had unfolded in front of her. She had originally thought that because Lin An was only a golden core stage cultivator, while his opponent was a sword cultivator, the battle would favor the Water Mirror Sect disciple because he had the advantage of flying. She had felt that Lin An wouldn’t survive the bitter fight, but she hadn’t expected that in just two rounds, his opponent would fall from the sky and die. It was too unbelievable. [Ding! You have successfully killed a golden core stage cultivator and obtained a lucky gift bag. Do you want to open it and take a look?] After the sword control cultivator had passed away, a crisp notification from the success rate system suddenly rang in Lin An’s ears, and he saw something that looked like a lucky gift bag in the system’s storage space. “Open it. Let me take a look,” Lin An instructed the success rate system. [Ding! The lucky gift bag will open according to the host’s wishes.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for unlocking the lucky draw function.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for unlocking the method of obtaining lucky draw coins.] [Ding, Congratulations to the host for obtaining one hundred lucky draw coins.] After opening the lucky gift bag, a series of system notifications rang out, and Lin An activated the lucky draw function. The virtual screen unfolded in front of his eyes, and Lin An saw a row of lucky draw machines displayed on it. From left to right, the lottery coins required for a single draw were ten, one hundred, one thousand, and ten thousand, and they systematically increased in sequence. The lucky gift bag also provided him with an initial one hundred lottery coins. The one hundred lottery coins could draw the first lottery machine ten times, but they could only draw the second lottery machine once. Lin An thought about it and decided to try the first pool. The virtual screen was a touch screen and there were two buttons under the lottery machine that had the words “single draw” and “ten consecutive draws” inscribed over them. After giving it some thought, Lin An reached out and tapped on the single draw button. The light and shadow on the virtual screen started to flow as if there was a ball of light spinning in circles. [Ding! The lottery has been completed. Congratulations to the host for obtaining the Lightning Dharma Body skill.] [The Lightning Dharma Body technique enables a cultivator to transform into lightning. The body is like a god and a ghost, and its movements are swift and unpredictable. The body’s physical attacks are usually accompanied by lightning damage.] Even though the reward looked very powerful, it was only a low-level human-rank skill, and this made Lin An a little depressed. However, after the lottery had been completed, Lin An immediately saw an exchange button appear on the lottery machine. There was only one treasure on the exchange button that could be exchanged: the cultivation method upgrade point. Lin An pressed the exchange button since he wanted to get more information about the cultivation method upgrade point. [Ding! You have obtained a cultivation method upgrade point. Do you want to upgrade your cultivation method? Hint, the cultivation method that you can upgrade now is the Lightning Dharma Body Technique.] Lin An could only upgrade one cultivation method, and it seemed that only a cultivation method given by the system could be upgraded, but a cultivation method that had been obtained in the world could not be upgraded. In addition, the cultivation method upgrade point also cost ten lucky draw coins, which was the same price as one lucky draw. “Upgrade the cultivation method.” Lin An chose to upgrade the cultivation method. Otherwise, this cultivation method upgrade point wouldn’t be of much use. [Ding! You have spent one cultivation method upgrade point. Congratulations on upgrading the Lightning Dharma Body to the middle-grade human rank.] The middle-grade human rank cultivation method was still unremarkable, so Lin An pressed the exchange button again. [Ding! You have received a cultivation method upgrade point. Do you want to upgrade your cultivation method? Hint, the cultivation method you can upgrade now is the Lightning Dharma Body technique.] “Upgrade the cultivation method.” [Ding! You have spent one cultivation method upgrade point. Congratulations on upgrading your lightning body to the upper-grade human rank.] <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Afterward, Lin An spent twenty lottery coins in exchange for two cultivation method upgrade points, and his Lightning Dharma Body advanced to the low-earth grade. Although the low-earth grade wasn’t very impressive, it was enough. Lin An didn’t have many lottery coins left, so he planned to keep the remaining coins in case they came in handy in the future. After a brief chat, Zuo Nanshuang took Lin An to her village. Since she was only an eleven-year-old girl, she gave her room to Lin An to sleep so that he could avoid suspicion, and she went to neighbor’s house to spend the night. Due to the fatigue from his adventures in the Sacred Dragon Mystic Realm, Lin An fell into a deep sleep. He only woke up after three strokes of the sun the following day. However, just as Lin An stirred from his sleep, Zuo Nanshuang pushed the door open and walked in with a flustered look on her face. “It’s bad! It’s bad! Let’s run quickly. Today, I went to the streets to sell the ink devil beast’s corpse, and I discovered that many disciples from the Water Mirror Sect were searching everywhere for the person responsible for their colleague’s death. I reckon that it was the disciple that you killed. It won’t be long before they trace us, so let’s run quickly,” Zuo Nanshuang said as she packed her luggage. After packing up, she grabbed Lin An’s hand and dragged him outside the room. Lin An furrowed his brows and let Zuo Nanshuang pull him towards the village entrance. Boom! Just as Zuo Nanshuang and Lin An reached the village entrance, they saw a ball of flames rushing towards them. Suddenly, the fiery flames exploded in front of them and blocked their path. Zuo Nanshuang’s expression changed drastically as she muttered to herself, “How could this be?”. “You’ve been acting like an old man since we met. Don’t you understand simple logic? How could a little girl like you, who’s only at the first stage of the Qi cultivation level have the ability to kill an ink devil beast? Seeing that you went to sell the corpse, didn’t you think that the Water Mirror Sect disciples would be suspicious?” Lin An pushed Zuo Nanshuang backward and stood in front of her in a protective stance. “Go to a corner and find a place to hide. Don’t worry, I’ll bring you away safe and sound.” Zuo Nanshuang obediently followed his instructions and ran behind the water tank under a nearby house. However, her face had turned pale with fear. A group of cultivators flew over from all directions and entered the village. Wherever they passed, they killed every villager they saw. Immediately, the village was filled with a thick smell of blood and a cacophony of chilling screams rent the air “Stop!” Lin An was furious. “I was the one who killed your fellow disciple. Why are you murdering these innocent people?” “Hmph. Innocent! They won’t be innocent if they protect a criminal like you.” “Lightning Dharma Body!” Suddenly, Lin An transformed into a streak of lightning and flew towards the cultivator in the lead. The leader was condensing a fire attribute mana in his hand, and he was about to chop down a fleeing villager. “Why aren’t you stopping!” Lin An turned his body in the air and blocked the villager in front of him with a zigzag trajectory. Bang! The fire-elemental mana ball did not break through Lin An’s morality demon sealing technique, and it instead crashed onto his body and exploded in all directions. “Immortal Elder, save me!” For a moment, the villagers who saw Lin An’s action seemed to have a glimmer of hope, and they immediately began to ask him for help. At the same time, the villagers were very touched. They had always thought that in the eyes of immortal cultivators, they were just ants that could be destroyed with a wave of a hand. They never expected that an immortal cultivator would use his body to block an attack against them. Lin An’s heroic act had deeply touched the hearts of the villagers, and they slowly overcame their fear and gathered together. However, Lin An knew that protecting the villagers would not solve the problem. He solemnly raised his head and looked coldly at the immortal cultivators. The Water Mirror Sect disciples showed no fear. They looked back at Lin An and sneered, “Hehe, if you had just come to the Water Mirror Sect and surrendered, there wouldn’t be so many mortals dying today. Although I don’t know who you are, do you know that a strong dragon cannot suppress a local snake? Besides, you’re not a strong dragon. Isn’t it wise to keep a low profile when you’re on someone else’s ground? I’ll use your blood to pay tribute to Li Luo’s spirit in heaven and to wash away the stain on the reputation of our Water Mirror Sect!” These Water Mirror Sect disciples were high and mighty, and their hands were stained with the blood of countless innocent mortals. They looked down on all living beings with derisive eyes and treated the humans as ants. With a simple thought, they could take away the villagers’ precious lives! “Hahaha!” Lin An stood still and swept his cold gaze over the arrogant cultivators. “Those who have their hands stained with the blood of sin will end up with sin!” His tone was cold, and he looked at the immortal cultivators as if they were zombies. Although Lin An’s voice wasn’t loud, every word he spoke was authoritative and clear! The Water Mirror Sect cultivators exchanged puzzled looks after they heard his words. At the same time, the villagers also looked at Lin An with solemn eyes. They felt that under the silent atmosphere, there was a surging emotion. Boom! Lin An’s entire body was instantly covered in his black and white ashen flames, and his aura directly broke through the clouds. “Kill!” Lin An pointed his finger towards the cultivators, and the sound of a flame explosion boomed out. It immediately shocked the surrounding area, and the expressions of the onlookers all changed. The black and white ashen flames intersected in the air, forming a huge dragon that flipped over and flew up. In an instant, the Water Mirror Sect cultivators were shocked. “What is that thing?” “What kind of magic treasure is that?” “The pressure is actually so terrifying. Could it be a heaven rank secret treasure?” “It must be. Only the magic treasures from the large sects can emit such terrifying energy fluctuations.” “I think he’s only at the initial stage of the golden core level, but he actually has such a secret treasure. He must have something even better. Kill him, and take the high-grade magic treasure!” “Charge!” Instantly, the eyes of dozens of Water Mirror Sect disciples flashed with greed. They activated the flying swords beneath their feet and charged towards Lin An. They had an opportunity to obtain a magic treasure that belonged to one of the big sects? The temptation was too great for them. “Die!” Lin An looked coldly at the greedy disciples and roared angrily. He went on to raise his right hand and pointed it forward. Boom! The black and white ashen flames formed an azure dragon that spun and rushed toward the Water Mirro Sect cultivators, creating an explosion in the air. Swish! To Lin An’s surprise, one of the cultivators had bypassed the azure dragon, and he instantly threw a punch towards him. With no hesitation, Lin An countered the attack, and his fist collided with the cultivator’s fist head-on. Suddenly, the immortal cultivator’s right fist was immediately shattered, but Lin An did not suffer any damage. “Profound flame transformation!” Lin An used the technique as he threw another punch, and he immediately shattered the immortal cultivator’s body and bones. Seeing that their most powerful cultivator had been defeated by Lin An with one punch, the Water Mirror Sect disciples all fell silent, and the rapid rhythm of their heartbeats could be heard. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received ten lucky draw coins.”] The success rate system’s notification instantly lit up after Lin An killed the cultivator with his fist, while the black-and-white ashen flames had also made some progress in the second level of the nascent soul stage. Lin An’s gaze didn’t linger on the dead cultivator. He immediately swept his gaze across the Water Mirror Sect disciples who had surrounded him in all directions. However, a wave of fear had swept the disciples’ hearts, and they quickly retreated. Lin An had actually killed an immortal cultivator at the intermediate stage of the golden core level with a single punch? The disciples could not believe that he was at the initial stage of the golden core level. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “Run!” One Water Mirror Sect disciple suddenly shouted. “Quickly, go back and pass the news to the sect master. Tell all the elites in the sect to come over.” One by one, the sword-riding cultivators stepped onto their flying swords and activated their spells as they sought to escape. “Do you still want to take off after killing so many people?” Lin An’s face was covered with a layer of frost as he looked at the fleeing cultivators and let out a cold smile. In an instant, tens of thousands of lightning bolts flashed out from Lin An’s figure after he activated the Lightning Dharma Body. The lightning arcs flashed, and Lin An instantly disappeared from the spot. Crack! Crack! Crack! Within a few seconds, he caught up with the sword-wielding Water Mirror Sect disciple who had flown the furthest distance, and a cold smile appeared on his face. “Do you think you can escape?” The sword-wielding immortal cultivator immediately cried out in fear, “No! No! Spare me!” However, the villagers had also shouted for mercy. Had the Water Mirror Sect disciples spared their lives? Lin An promptly threw out a punch that was comparable to that of a peak golden core stage cultivator and instantly took the disciple’s life. The lightning on Lin An’s body flashed again, and he chased after the next immortal cultivator. Pfft! “Please, don’t!” “We are the inner sect disciples from the Water Mirror Sect. Our sect is filled with experts. You can’t afford to offend us. You can’t kill us...;” ...; An hour later, the ground was covered with the corpses of Water Mirror Sect cultivators and their broken flying swords. Lin An’s eyes were almost red from taking the lives of the cultivators and endless killing intent surged in his heart. The begging cries and threats from the Water Mirror Sect cultivators echoed in his ears. However, Lin An didn’t feel any pity in his heart because he knew that the disciples deserved to die, and their hands were all stained with blood from indiscriminate killing. At the same time, the success rate system’s notifications rang in his ears continuously. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You’ve received ten lucky draw coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You’ve received fifteen lucky draw coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You’ve received thirteen lucky draw coins.”] ...; Zuo Nanshuang and the other villagers stared blankly at the frequently blazing light in the sky. They could only see countless streaks of lightning flashing in the sky, accompanied by a huge dragon made of black and white flames. Concurrently, a large number of immortal cultivators fell from the sky one after another, and they were either dying or already dead. Before long, dozens of Water Mirror Sect disciples were lying on the ground without any movement. A shower of blood continuously poured from the sky, and the horrendous howls from the disciples filled the air. ...; The villagers gradually fell into a state of shock. They had never thought that they would witness so many immortal cultivators lose their lives, and they thought that they were dreaming. Crack! Suddenly, a bolt of lightning flashed, and Lin An appeared in front of the villagers. All the surviving villagers couldn’t help but look at him with respect and gratitude. Lin An slowly looked at the bodies of the dead villagers on the ground and clenched his fists. Although he hadn’t killed them, they had all died because of him. Even though Lin An had eliminated many powerful cultivators in the battle, the war was not over yet. The disciples from the Water Mirror Sect would definitely attack the village again. If Lin An left, the remaining villagers would not survive. Therefore, he made up his mind to protect the remaining villagers. After nightfall arrived, Lin An lay on Zuo Nanshuang’s bed and tried to figure out how he would protect the surviving villagers. He could not stay in the village forever, and in the end, his gaze landed on his newly opened system function, the lucky draw function. The battle with the Water Mirror Sect disciples had earned Lin An several hundred lucky draw coins. At first, he exchanged some coins for a cultivation method upgrade point to raise his Lightning Dharma Body to the highest level, the heaven rank high-grade. Then, he set his gaze on the second lottery machine that required a hundred lottery coins for one draw. Lin An used his finger to press the lottery button under the second lottery machine, and the virtual screen lit up and spun in circles. [“Ding! The lottery has been completed. Congratulations, host, for obtaining the eight-desolation fog formation.] Suddenly, Lin An saw that there was an additional item in the system’s space. [The eight-desolation fog formation enables a cultivator to block the vision of an intruder and use spatial and illusory methods to influence the enemy’s understanding of the layout of the formation.] All Lin An had to do was to insert the eye of the formation, and he could deactivate it by pulling it out from the ground. At that moment, someone suddenly knocked on the door. When Lin An opened it, he was relieved to see that it was Zuo Nanshuang. “What’s the matter?” Lin An asked. “The villagers just finished debating. They think that the disciples from the Water Mirror Sect will come again. It’s too dangerous to stay here, so everyone plans to move out of this village.” Zuo Nanshuang’s voice sounded a little disappointed. She had lived in the village for almost a year, and she already had an attachment to the other villagers. Therefore, she was still a little reluctant to leave on such short notice. “Although I don’t object to them doing this, isn’t it more dangerous to leave now? Without my protection, what if the Water Mirror Sect disciples apprehend and kill the people who escape the village? How about this, I will build a formation in this village. You tell the villagers that if they are willing to leave, they can leave. If they are not, I can guarantee that my formation will protect them.” Before Zuo Nanshuang could express her stance, a panicked cry suddenly rang out. “They’re here! They’re here again! There are many immortal cultivators flying towards the village!” When she heard the warning, Zuo Nanshuang was scared stiff. However, Lin An remained fearless in the face of danger. He directly took out the eight-desolation fog formation and inserted it into the room. Instantly, a white mist rushed out of Zuo Nanshuang’s house and gradually spread out to the entire village. The confused villagers were instantly thrown into chaos, but Lin An quickly asked Zuo Nanshuang to calm them down and explain the situation. Afterward, he went up to meet the immortal cultivators who were flying over. The Water Mirror Sect disciples who had been flying towards the village saw the white fog engulf it, and they immediately stopped in their tracks. “What happened? What’s going on?” “It looks like someone has activated a spell formation.” “It’s on such a large scale. You can’t tell from the surface that it’s dangerous.” “Yeah, it’s just a layer of fog. What can it do?” “Humph, it’s just a small trick. It only adds to the laughter!” The immortal cultivators discussed animatedly as they looked at Lin An’s spell formation and shook their heads in disdain. Only their leader, Elder Li, had a serious expression on his face as he looked at the fog in silence. Elder Li took out another flying sword and thought about testing out the spell formation. However, before he could make a move, something suddenly rushed out from the fog with a speed similar to a bolt of lightning. The foreign object had only appeared in an instant, but it had already sped towards the sky above Elder Li. He quickly raised his head and saw a blazing bolt of lightning streaking across his eyes and smashing toward him. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL ‘This is not good!’ Elder Li thought to himself as alarm bells rang in his heart. He hurriedly moved to the side and tried to make an evasive move. However, Lin An had already upgraded the Lightning Dharma Body to its highest rank. How could a mere cultivator like Elder Li react in time? Lin An’s huge foot suddenly stepped on his face. Bang! A bolt of dazzling lightning crackled and instantly stunned Elder Li. He was immediately electrocuted, and his body swayed as he fell from the flying sword. “Elder Li has fallen!” Several exclamations rang out from the Water Mirror Sect disciples all around. After defeating one of the sect’s leaders in an instant, Lin An transformed back into the Lightning Dharma Body and flashed back to the village before standing outside the fog. Once Elder Li had lost his life, Elder Ma immediately took over the command of the Water Mirror Sect disciples. “Despicable! You actually dared to ambush us!” “You dare to kill an elder of my sect? You’re finished.” “I’m here to fight to the death with you!” The disciples from the Water Mirror Sect were all furious, and they clamored one after another. “I clearly came from the front, but you guys said that I ambushed you. Isn’t that slander? You’re all just incompetent and can’t see my actions clearly!” Lin An shrugged his shoulders and defended himself. “Kid, you’re courting death.” Elder Ma took a step forward and formed a spell with his hands. “Ha!” Lin An raised his hand and pointed towards him, and a flying bird made of black and white ashen flames rushed out of his body. Its body carried a majestic wave of energy as it pounced toward the cultivators. “Be careful!” “Those are the black and white ashen flames!” “How...; How is this possible? Why would a cultivator with the black-and-white ashen flames appear in a place like ours!” In an instant, the Water Mirror Sect disciples were at a loss, and they fell into chaos as they cried out in alarm. Lin An controlled the flames as he laughed out loud. “You country bumpkins! Don’t you want me to broaden my horizons? If you are too scared of the black-and-white ashen flames, then I’ll take out the thousand-faced extreme fire so that you’ll be shocked out of your wits.” “Ah...;” A series of miserable cries rang out in the sky as several cultivators died under the black-and-white ashen flames one after another. Moreover, due to the devouring effect of the black flames, not even a speck of ash was left behind after their deaths. A gentle breeze blew, and the jarring sound of Lin An’s blazing black and white flames filled the air. Many Water Mirror Sect disciples stood in a daze due to fear, and it was as if they were frozen in time. [Ding, Congratulations to the host for obtaining victory in battle. You have obtained fifteen lottery coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining victory in battle. You have obtained nineteen lottery coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining victory in battle. You have obtained thirteen lottery coins.”] ...; In the midst of the chaos, Lin An discovered that a few Water Mirror Sect elders had fled into the nearby forest. He immediately used his Lighting Dharma Body spell to chase after them. A bolt of lightning shot through the forest, burning many trees along the way. “Wah...;” A miserable scream rang out among the elders. One of the elders was struck by a bolt of lightning, and after he fell to the ground, he couldn’t stop twitching. The remaining elders’ faces turned extremely ugly, but since there was nothing they could do, they abandoned him. However, how could Lin An let them go? A blazing bolt of lightning flashed beneath his feet, and he used his Lighting Dharma Body to block their path. “Fellow Daoist, where are you going? Aren’t you here to kill me? I’m not in the direction you’re running to.” The elders sneered and immediately formed a spell. They quickly unsheathed their swords, and Lin An only felt a white light flash before his eyes. A few flying swords were charging at him at a breakneck speed, and he immediately felt the hairs on his back stand up. However, Lin An didn’t panic because he knew that he could easily block the flying swords. “Eastern Emperor Bell!” Lin An activated the Eastern Emperor Bell, and a blazing golden light covered his entire body. The sound of a few flying swords slashing at Lin An’s body rang out, but they couldn’t break through the double defenses of the Eastern Emperor Bell and the morality demon sealing technique. Immediately, the elders’ bodies trembled. Since they had joined forces, they had expected to break through Lin An’s defenses. “Are you guys done fighting? I think it’s my turn!” Lin An casually pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and shouted, “Watch the sword!” Buzz! The strength of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword was comparable to that of a cultivator at the peak of the golden core stage. It generated a buzzing sound in the air as it slashed toward the elders. The elders were shocked by the powerful strength of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and exclaimed in shock, “What’s going on?” “What kind of weapon is this?” “It looks like it’s a swallowing spiritual treasure. How can there be such a strange weapon in this world?” The elders immediately ran away in all directions. They didn’t dare to face the sword head-on. Pfft! The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword pierced through an elder’s chest and took his life. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received eighteen lucky draw coins.”] After killing the elder, Lin An didn’t hesitate, and he continued to chase after the other elders. At that moment, the group of golden core stage cultivators in front of him looked like a pile of human-shaped lottery coins. After some time, a few elders had been completely destroyed by Lin An’s power. The other Water Mirror Sect disciples couldn’t believe their eyes. Lin An was only an early-stage golden core stage cultivator. Why did he have such an overwhelming advantage in the one-on-one fights? He had actually killed the elders of the Water Mirror Sect in one round. After they witnessed Lin An’s violent killing spree, the other cultivators felt that he was simply too strong! Clap! Clap! Clap! Under the startling crackle of lightning, Lin An rushed toward the remaining elders. “This is not good. Retreat quickly!” The remaining elders panicked and could no longer care about the doubts in their hearts. They abandoned the Water Mirror Sect disciples and fled as fast as they could. However, after running for a while, Elder Ma’s expression changed, and he realized that Lin An had already blocked their escape route. All of the elders were instantly flustered. They couldn’t win a fight against Lin An, but they also couldn’t escape. The elders had arduously worked on their cultivation skills for over a hundred years, but to their dismay, they were actually going to die at the hands of a junior cultivator! “No! If we continue to run like this, we’ll only be defeated one by one. That kid is only at the initial stage of the golden core level, and everyone present is at the peak of the golden core stage. Why would we be afraid of him?” After falling into a desperate situation, Elder Ma’s ferocity was similar to that of a cornered beast, and he immediately shouted his orders. The rest of the elders also felt emboldened, and they declared that they would fight Lin An to the death. “That’s right. That kid’s combat strength is so strong. He must have used some secret technique to increase his strength in a short period of time. He definitely won’t be able to last long. As long as we ambush, we’ll definitely be able to kill him!” “But his speed is too fast. How are we going to delay his movements?” “Go to that village and capture some hostages! The kid seems attached to that place, and he even set up a protective formation around it. There must be someone he cares about. As long as we capture the right hostage, we will be able to restrict this kid’s movements.” The elders were indeed old foxes who had lived for more than a hundred years. They had quickly thought of a way to deal with Lin An, and several elders immediately turned around and ran towards the village at the foot of the mountain. Lin An looked at their actions and couldn’t help but exclaim in his heart, ‘Your train of thought is correct, but if you can’t beat me outside the village, how can you fight me if you run to my home ground?’ Lin An didn’t stop the elders from executing their plan. He didn’t want them to bite him in desperation. Instead, he patiently followed behind them from afar and planned to finish them off after they entered the village. “Haven’t you eaten? You should run faster and think about my time, okay?” Hearing Lin An’s words, the elders fumed with anger, and their expressions turned extremely sullen. They were, after all, powerful cultivators who had dominated the region around them for hundreds of years. Throughout their history, they had never suffered such humiliation in their entire lives. They hadn’t expected that they would actually flee from a junior golden core stage cultivator. Despite their anger, Elder Ma cheered on his colleagues. “Everyone, you can do it. As long as we capture the hostages, we can make that brat kneel down and kowtow to us.” Lin An was instantly amused when he heard Elder Ma’s words. He felt that the Water Mirror Sect’s leader was just giving him a helping hand. After a few minutes, Elder Ma had already led the group of elders to the village at the foot of the mountain. “Charge in and take the hostages!” Elder Ma led the charge and stormed into the eight-desolation fog formation. The other surviving elders all had cold smiles on their faces as if they were about to be freed. They felt that once they took the hostages, they would definitely make Lin An kneel in front of them and submit. However, Lin An stopped outside the spell formation and revealed a bright smile. Boom! The elders who noticed his actions were stunned, and an ominous feeling suddenly rose in their hearts. The fog in front of them broke open, and a huge flaming dragon opened its mouth towards them. “Ah!” The elders suddenly let out terrified screams, but it was too late. Lin An had seen that they were about to enter the eight-desolation fog formation, and he had summoned the black-and-white fire dragon and hidden it within the formation in order to catch them all in one fell swoop. Under the cover of the fog, Lin An had controlled the fire dragon, and he had only unleashed it once the elders had breached his defensive formation. There was no room for them to dodge, and they were immediately swallowed by the black-and-white ashen flames. The flaming dragon had caught the elders by surprise, and they couldn’t escape. Instantly, Lin An felt that the black-and-white ashen flames had undergone a ten percent increase into the nascent soul stage level. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained fifteen lottery coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained nineteen lottery coins.”] “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained thirteen lucky draw coins.”] ...; Following the sound of the few success rate system notifications, the surroundings around Lin An fell silent. Among the Water Mirror Sect cultivators that had attacked the village, most of them had died from the black and white ashen flames, and he felt that the level four nascent soul treasure was very useful. “The battle has ended.” Lin An heaved a long sigh of relief. The fight had provided him with more than three hundred and sixty lottery coins, and he immediately laughed out loud. With no hesitation, Lin An pulled up the lottery interface on the success rate system’s virtual screen. Since he had obtained several lottery coins, he naturally chose to draw the second lottery machine that required one hundred lottery coins. In an instant, Lin An reached out and pressed the single draw button, The light and shadow on the virtual screen started to flow as the lottery spun in circles. [Ding! The lottery has been completed. Congratulations to the host for obtaining the sword control technique.]” [The sword control technique enables a cultivator to kill enemies and also fly a thousand miles in a day.] When he saw the new treasure, Lin An couldn’t help but smile. Flying across the sky on a flying sword was a skill that was quite in line with his wishes. “Continue to draw!” Since he had more than four hundred lottery coins remaining, Lin An chose to continue using the lottery system. He stretched out his hand and tapped on the single-drawn button. The light and shadow on the virtual screen began to flow and spin in circles again. [“Ding! The draw has been completed. Congratulations, host, for obtaining the ice arrow snipe skill.] ” [The ice arrow snipe skill condenses an ice arrow and kills an enemy in your sight from a thousand miles away.] After Lin An had drawn the two skills, the second lottery machine also displayed the exchange button for the skill upgrade point. However, the skills that Lin An had drawn were already impressive, so there was no need for him to press the button. Therefore, Lin An didn’t choose to upgrade them immediately. Instead, he chose to store the remaining three hundred lottery coins for emergency purposes, and he didn’t plan on drawing the lottery machine again. He would wait until the next time he needed the coins. When Lin An returned to the village, he saw that every villager was in a state of shock. They had witnessed Lin An’s actions during the entire battle. Even though the enemies could not see the inside of the fog formation from the outside, the villagers had watched the battle clearly from the inside. When they saw the dragon formed by Lin An’s black and white ashen flames, they were almost scared silly. The immortal cultivators, who were usually high and mighty, had been chased around by Lin An, and they had finally rushed into the mouth of the fire dragon that was hidden in the fog formation. After the battle, the villagers still felt a deep sense of disbelief. Why had the immortal cultivators been so scared? Hadn’t their reactions been the same as those of mere mortals? Looking back at the sky, the villagers saw that there were no traces left of the massacre, but the enemies had all been defeated. After a while, Zuo Nanshuang eventually emerged from the water tank she had been hiding under. Her face was stained with dust, and she looked especially cute. Once the villagers saw Lin An, they swarmed around him one after another. A look of reverence appeared in their eyes, and they all simultaneously asked him if he was injured. After an examination, they found that he was unharmed, and they all called him “Immortal Lin.” The villagers were extremely grateful. Lin An had saved them from danger twice, and they all wanted to bow to Lin An and express their gratitude. However, Lin An quickly stopped them. Although they didn’t acknowledge it, Lin An was still the reason why they had suffered such an unexpected disaster in the first place. How could he accept their admiration? After the Water Mirror Sect cultivators had suffered defeat, the villagers were all relieved and they didn’t talk about moving away anymore because they felt that Lin An’s eight-desolation fog formation would protect them. However, in order to conceal his movements, Lin An decided to move away from the village alone. Although he had an irreconcilable blood feud with the Water Mirror Sect, all the cultivators who had seen him were dead, so he was not worried that he would be recognized. Just as the sun was about to cover the entire sky, Lin An left the village and arrived at a small town called Nanxing. The town was not very big, and its permanent population was around a hundred thousand people. There were also many immortal cultivators flying around in the sky above Nanxing. When Lin An walked into the town, it was still very lively. Many restaurants and shops were still open for business. After Lin An observed for a moment he discovered that most of the people in the restaurants and shops were immortal cultivators, and a majority of them were in the Qi cultivation stage. In such towns, ordinary people generally wouldn’t come out to play at night because many of the immortal cultivators were extremely violent. Even if the immortal cultivators committed evil deeds, there was nobody to hold them accountable. Therefore, those who came out to play at night were basically immortal cultivators. Among the mortals, only wealthy town dwellers who could hire immortal cultivators as bodyguards would dare to come out and play. Suddenly, a group of immortal cultivators walked towards Lin An, and his heart instantly raced. Looking at their uniforms, Lin An could tell that they were from the Water Mirror Sect. However, the only reason why he was nervous was that he didn’t want them to recognize him. Otherwise, he was confident that he could easily beat up the few Water Mirror Sect disciples. Fortunately, the group of disciples obliviously walked towards Lin An as they chatted and laughed loudly. Each of them was carrying a sharp sword on their back, and they looked as if they had just had a meal. However, when they brushed past Lin An, they suddenly looked at him in surprise. Since Lin An had been nervous, he had unconsciously released his aura, and the disciples had sensed it. Lin An’s expression didn’t change as he steadily walked forward. However, he didn’t walk too far before he heard the discussions among the disciples. “What a strong aura!” “That cultivator is so young. How could his cultivation be so high?” “When he walked past us, I felt like I was facing a ferocious beast. I couldn’t even breathe!” As the Water Mirror Sect disciples walked away, Lin An couldn’t hear the rest of the conversation. “Hey, have you heard?” Suddenly, another group of immortal cultivators walked past Lin An, and he overheard their conversation. “What?” “Some Water Mirror Sect disciples went out of the city today and said that they wanted to take revenge for their fellow sect members. In the end, when the sun went down, not a single person returned. I’m afraid that they’re doomed.” “How could I not know about this? I have a friend from the Water Mirror Sect. They were discussing this matter at the elders’ meeting today.” “And I also heard that they found out the attacker’s sect. It seems that he’s the personal disciple to an incredible senior elder.” Lin An couldn’t help but be a little surprised when he heard their words. The Water Mirror Sect’s efficiency wasn’t bad. They had even found out the identity of his master. In an instant, Lin An’s interest was immediately piqued. He squatted in a corner and eavesdropped on the passerby’s conversation. “I heard that the attacker’s master is a big shot in the Jiuxiao Sect. She’s a character that no one dares to provoke in the northern border of the Ghana Empire. Even their sect master is very afraid of her.” “Are you serious? What background does that big shot have?” “I heard that she is the peak master of a certain peak in the Jiuxiao Sect. Her name is Qian Yi.” “That’s right. The elders in my family have all heard of her. When they found out that they had provoked her this time, they claimed that even the emperor of the Ghana Empire has to respect her. How powerful do you think that Qian Yi is?” “It can’t be! Could it be that the Water Mirror Sect offended such a character? I think there’s going to be a problem.” ...; At the same time, the elders’ hall of the Water Mirror Sect was fully packed. Other than the few cultivators who had already been killed by Lin An, the other elders were all present, and the sect master sat on the most honorable seat. They were all animatedly discussing Lin An and his master, Qian Yi. “This is serious. I’m sure everyone has heard of Qian Yi, the Bixiao Peak master. If we kill her beloved disciple, she will definitely fight us to the death. The consequences will be unimaginable.” “Coward! That brat has killed many of our disciples, and almost all of our enforcement forces have been wiped out. If we can’t come up with an explanation for this, how will our Water Mirror Sect survive in the southern border of the Ghana Empire?” “That’s right! Our enforcement forces have suffered heavy casualties as well. We definitely can’t let it go just like that!” “That kid is so ruthless. How can we let him escape without consequences? If our dead brothers know about this in the afterlife, will they have any peace?” “Sect Master, please stand up for us!” “Sect Master, please stand up for us!” Instantly, all the members of the Water Mirror Sect turned their gazes towards the sect master who was silently sitting on his chair. Several elders took the lead to bow and pleaded with him to stand up for them. The sect master was a middle-aged man with stars in his eyes and heavy brows. He wore a very plain white Chinese tunic suit, but as he sat in his chair, he gave off an imposing aura as well as a very strong sense of presence. The sect master’s name was Gu Wenfei. Gu Wenfei’s cultivation level was at the infant transformation stage, and he had already surpassed the nascent soul stage. The Water Mirror Sect’s master was unrivaled in the entire southern region of the Ghana Empire. He was only slightly weaker than the sect master of the Fire Element Sect, the largest sect in the region. The fact that the Water Mirror Sect had been able to dominate the entire southern region of the Ghana Empire had a lot to do with Gu Wenfei’s strength. He calmly looked at the spots on the table in front of him with a serious expression and felt that the matter about Lin An was very troublesome. He had only met Qian Yi once when he was young. Apart from her stunning beauty, her strength had left a deeper impression on Gu Wenfei. Qian Yi’s power was still fresh in his memory. Even after so many years, he still did not think that he could block her palm strike. After meditating about Lin An’s situation for some time, Gu Wenfei looked at the expectant gazes of his disciples and said in a deep voice, “This matter cannot be treated carelessly. I know that everyone here is aware of Qian Yi’s power. Now that her disciple has come to our territory, I think it is not appropriate for us to make things too difficult for him. However, so many of our disciples have died at his hands. It won’t make sense if we don’t do anything. How about this? We’ll invite him to the sect to have a talk. If we can talk things out, the conflict will be resolved.” ‘Talk things out and resolve the conflict!’ Everyone fell into a daze. Gu Wenfei had been known for his ruthlessness ever since he had entered the Water Mirror Sect. When had he ever been reasonable? Nevertheless, he had just volunteered to have a peaceful talk with a junior disciple. Was Lin An’s master really that strong? However, since Gu Wenfei had already made the pronouncement, no one dared to oppose him. They all stood up slowly and took their leave. ...; After he had gathered enough information in the small town, Lin An climbed over the mountains and returned to Zuo Nanshuang’s village. Just as he reached the entrance to the mountain village, Lin An saw two sword lights flying toward him. There were two sword cultivators standing on the flying swords, and judging from their clothing, they were from the Water Mirror Sect. ‘Are they looking for trouble again?’ Lin An quickly prepared himself for a fight. However, he didn’t expect the two cultivators to harmlessly land in front of him. “Fellow Daoist Lin, our sect master invites you to the Water Mirror Sect for a chat.” Lin An was surprised after he heard the words. ‘The sect master of the Water Mirror Sect?’ Lin An wondered. He did know why the leader of his archrival sect would want to have a chat with him. Seeing that Lin An had no reaction, the two cultivators hurriedly added, “Fellow Daoist Lin, don’t misunderstand us. Our sect master has no ill intentions. He just wants to invite you for a chat so that we can clear up the misunderstanding between us.” ‘Clear up the misunderstanding?’ Lin An couldn’t help but be perplexed. He had already killed so many Water Mirror Sect cultivators. However, he quickly recalled the conversations he had overheard in the small town and immediately understood. The Water Mirror Sect cultivators were probably scared, but Lin An hadn’t expected that Qian Yi’s reputation would be so great that they would take the initiative to back down just because he was her personal disciple. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An thought about it and felt that if the Water Mirror Sect cultivators were willing to give in, it would not be impossible to make peace. After all, he could not stay in the mountain village and protect the villagers forever. “Then I’ll follow you.” After he spoke, Lin An used his lightning avatar and flew towards the Water Mirror Sect’s territory. “What a fast movement technique!” “He can actually transform into lightning. His cultivation is indeed extraordinary, and he must have been born with a noble background.” The two disciples exclaimed in surprise once they saw Lin An’s swift movement. The entrance to the Water Mirror Sect’s territory was made of stacked rocks. The rocks were rugged and very strange, and on top of the entrance was a huge vermilion plaque with the words, “Water Mirror Sect” written on it. The sight was very heroic. If one stood at the gate and looked into the distance, they could vaguely see a large square surrounded by clouds and mist between the mountains, and on both sides of the square, there were several neat houses. Above the mountains, many disciples were flying on their swords as they headed in different directions. Whoosh! After Lin An had taken in his surroundings, the two Water Mirror Sect disciples who had delivered their sect master’s invitation finally arrived at the entrance and stopped beside him. “Please, come this way.” The two disciples had become more courteous, and they led the way. The path was paved with stone bricks, and after half an hour, Lin An was brought to a towering hall. It was the same meeting hall where the elders had discussed how to handle his affairs. Several Water Mirror Sect elders who had high cultivation levels sat on both sides of the meeting hall. In the middle of the hall was a middle-aged man wearing some white ordinary clothes. Lin An walked into the meeting hall and in an instant, numerous gazes fell on him. “Let me ask you, is your master Qian Yi from the Jiuxiao Sect?” Gu Wenfei’s dignified voice rang out. Lin An did not speak, and the meeting hall instantly fell into silence. All the cultivators present were dumbfounded. They immediately felt that Lin An was disrespecting their sect master. “Since it’s a peace talk, then let’s talk. Why are we talking about irrelevant things?” Lin An finally replied after he saw that the atmosphere had turned cold. Gu Wenfei looked at Lin An in deep thought before he continued, “That’s right. The reason I invited you here today is to resolve the misunderstanding that has arisen between us over the past two days.” “Alright, then tell me, how do you want to resolve it?” Lin An answered calmly. Gu Wenfei glanced at his subordinate and said, “This all started because you killed my disciple...;” “Stop!” Lin An quickly interrupted and retorted sharply, “How can you accuse an innocent person? Did I kill one of your men? Or did he fall to his death? Furthermore, this all started because your men tried to steal my ink devil beast. I was just defending myself. In the end, your disciples were immoral. Why did they try to steal my monster? If it were up to me, they deserved...;” “That’s enough!” Gu Wenfei promptly interrupted Lin An’s incessant chatter. “Then let’s get straight to the point. Before you came, we had already discussed this. As long as you apologize to everyone today, we’ll let bygones be bygones.” Lin An couldn’t help but sneer. His eyes swept across all the cultivators present in the hall, and he said, “I’ve already stated my position. From the beginning to the end, it was your disciples who initiated the trouble. I didn’t do anything wrong in this matter, so why should I apologize to you?” After a prolonged moment of silence, Gu Wenfei finally asked, “Then, according to your opinion, how should we resolve this matter?” Lin An paused for a moment. He had agreed to attend the meeting to make peace, but if the back and forth continued, they wouldn’t be able to come to a conclusion, so he said, “How about this? Since it’s a misunderstanding, why don’t we all have a meal together today and get to know each other better? In the future, we’ll all be friends. This matter will be considered to be over. Sect Master, what do you think?” Gu Wenfei sized up Lin An as he thought about his proposal. The rivalry between them had originally been caused by his disciples’ unreasonable actions. Many of the cultivators who had wanted to snatch Lin An’s ink devil beast had been killed in retaliation. The elders who had sought revenge over their colleague’s deaths had failed, so it seemed that the Water Mirror Sect would have to swallow its pride and make peace with Lin An. Additionally, the matter had to be resolved amicably due to Qian Yi’s illustrious reputation. Once Gu Wenfei agreed to Lin An’s terms, he immediately decided to rush back to the Jiuxiao Sect. ...; After a few days of traveling, Lin An encountered a forest and saw that there were quite a lot of wild beasts roaming around. In order to earn some lottery coins, he entered the forest and planned to hunt down the monsters for a few days. Over the following days, Lin An hunted all kinds of monsters and earned several lottery coins. When he got tired, he would use the sky as his quilt and the earth as his bed to rest, and once he woke up, he would continue to hunt the monsters. “Croak!” During the journey, Lin An suddenly heard an unpleasant croak. When he looked in the direction of the sound, he saw an extremely ugly giant frog. It had two lantern-sized eyes, and countless little poisonous insects were crawling on the surface of its stinky smooth skin. As he looked at the monster, Lin An realized that it could actually speak. “Croak! I need some food. Unfortunately, I’m thin, and I don’t have enough to eat.” Lin An was a little surprised. According to what he had read, demonic beasts needed to cultivate to the peak of the golden core stage and successfully pass the fourth heavenly tribulation. Only after they had entered the nascent soul stage could the demonic beasts gain intelligence and speak human language. If they went on to cultivate to the peak of the nascent soul stage and pass the fifth heavenly tribulation, they would enter the infant transformation stage, and only then could the demonic beasts transform into human form. Since the giant frog could speak, but it could not take human form, Lin An concluded that it was a demonic beast at the nascent soul stage. After the giant frog croaked, its long and thin tongue, which was full of barbs, shot towards Lin An like a long spear. “Lightning Dharma Body!” Lin An used the Lightning Dharma Body to instantly dodge the attack. However, the toad did not give up. It opened its mouth wide and suddenly sucked in spiritual energy from all directions. Instantly, spiritual energy from the surrounding monsters surged into its body, and its entire figure continuously expanded. For a moment, Lin An was secretly worried. He felt that the toad monster was holding back its ultimate move. “Black-and-white ashen flames, profound flame transformation!” Lin An immediately used his strongest attacking skill to strike the toad monster. At the same time, the toad bounced up from the ground. It looked like a cannonball, and its ugly and huge body crashed into Lin An. However, Lin An did not dare to be careless. He threw his fist, which was covered by the black-and-white ashen flames, towards the monster. The force generated by the punch was equivalent to that of wind and thunder as Lin An’s fist heavily slapped toward the toad monster’s head. Bang! Lin An’s powerful fist smashed fiercely onto the toad monster’s head, causing its entire face to twist and distort. After that, its huge body freely fell from the sky. In an instant, the toad monster formed a large pit as it smashed into the ground, and a foul-smelling liquid flew up in all directions. Lin An’s black-and-white ashen flames had been amplified by the profound flame transformation, which had caused a huge injury to the toad monster. The nascent soul stage demonic beast had just been beaten down to the ground, and it couldn’t get up anymore. Without hesitation, Lin An pulled out his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword with the aim of ending the toad monster’s life. However, he was shocked after a few figures suddenly appeared from the forest. They held bows, arrows, knives, and spears, and without uttering a word, they charged towards the toad monster. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An was stunned. Was he experiencing another monster snatching incident? “Quickly, stop! This monster’s life is mine to take!” Lin An shouted and rushed towards the strangers. However, the imposters completely ignored Lin An, and two of them even turned around and attacked him. Whoosh! An ice arrow with a sharp piercing sound took to the air and flew toward Lin An with an indomitable momentum. “Ice arrow sniper!” Instantly, Lin An used his new skill to meet the ice arrow. The opponent’s strike was intercepted by Lin An, but his ice arrow continued to charge towards the assailant. The opponent raised his shield to block Lin An’s ice arrow, and at the same time, he shouted to the others, “Deal with this kid first. His strength is not simple. Let’s take him out!” When they heard their colleague’s words, the strange men turned their heads and looked at Lin An in surprise. One of the men, who was holding a huge sword, glanced at Lin An and said, “Isn’t he just a kid at the initial stage of the golden core level? What’s so special about him? Can’t both of you beat him?” His companion echoed, “How can a kid at the initial stage of the golden core level actually dare to enter this magical beast forest alone. He really doesn’t fear death like a newborn calf.” The man who had exchanged blows with Lin An solemnly replied to his companions, “Don’t underestimate him. The spell he used just now was very sharp. I’m afraid his background isn’t basic. He might be a disciple from a large sect.” Hearing this, the other men immediately shot scrutinizing gazes at Lin An. While they had been conversing, Lin An had also been sizing up their strength. The five men were all at the golden core level. Two of them looked like they were at the initial stage of the golden core level, and the other two looked like they were at the intermediate stage of the golden core level. Finally, their leader appeared to be at the advanced stage of the golden core level. The attackers didn’t even have a peak stage golden core expert among them, and Lin An felt that they were really weak. He looked at the five cultivators and said calmly, “I was the one who defeated this demonic beast. It doesn’t make sense for you guys to come here and snatch the monster. Also, you guys seem to want to kill me as well.” When the five cultivators heard Lin An’s words, they were stunned for a moment before bursting into laughter. “You defeated it? Haha, I’m dying of laughter. Do you know what stage this demonic beast is at? Do you think you can defeat it just because you’re at the initial stage of the golden core stage?” “Furthermore, so what if you killed it? I’ve snatched other people’s treasures my entire life. When have I ever been reasonable with anyone?” Suddenly, Lin An pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and laughed. “Since you’ve put it that way, then there’s no problem. You guys can attack together. Don’t waste my time. After all, my life is much more precious than yours.” The five cultivators were once again stunned by Lin An’s words. Then, they started laughing again as if they were looking at a fool. “Hahaha, is this kid’s brain damaged? He actually wants us to attack together?” “Hehe, kid, don’t think that you’re invincible just because you’re from a famous sect.” “Open your eyes and see. You’re only at the initial stage of the golden core level. No matter how flashy your techniques are, they’re meaningless due to the suppression of your cultivation level.” “Those who can’t control their pride always lose their lives easily. Obviously, you’re already dead.” After they finished speaking, all five men revealed a mocking smile that was filled with killing intent! Lin An looked at them and couldn’t help but reply, “Don’t worry. The only people filled with pride are yourselves. You are already dead.” “Haha! What a stubborn fool.” The group’s leader suddenly raised the long spear in his hand and declared, “Stop talking nonsense with this arrogant fool. Let’s fulfill his wish and attack together. Hurry up and finish off his life. Later, when we encounter other demonic beasts, we’ll use his corpse as bait.”  “Got it!” The two close combat partners immediately responded and raised the swords in their hands as they charged at Lin An. The other two long-ranged attackers cast spells while the leader attacked Lin An from the side. “Eastern Emperor Bell!” Lin An activated his defensive treasure to block the ice arrows and the balls of fire that were flying towards him. Afterward, he leaped and ran towards the two close combat partners. Boom! Lin An exchanged a few blows with the two close combat partners, and after a few rounds, they were sent flying by his superior power. Pfft! The two men were killed by the sword light from the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and their bodies were slashed open. Their corpses crashed into the big tree behind them and sank deep into the tree trunk. The three remaining cultivators turned pale with fright, and their expressions were full of shock and horror as they turned to look at Lin An. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty lottery coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received twenty lucky draw coins.”] The success rate system’s notification sound rang in Lin An’s ears. He immediately knew that the two close-combat enemies were dead, and he went on to activate his lighting avatar as he charged towards the remaining opponents. When the two long-range enemies saw that Lin An was charging towards them, they were instantly enraged. One of them used an ice arrow, while the other used a spell to rush towards Lin An. However, compared to Lin An, their speed was too slow. Just as they had taken their stance, his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword was already in front of them. “Stop!” The group’s leader shouted. However, since they had already disrespected him, how could Lin An hold back. He sneered and slashed the sword in his hand towards the two men. Pfft! Pfft! The two long-range enemies immediately lost their heads. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for your victory in battle. You have obtained eighteen lucky draw coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for your victory in battle. You have obtained seventeen lucky draw coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop, golden core stage advancement pill!”] After he heard the third notification, Lin An was very surprised. He wouldn’t have to train bitterly to advance his cultivation. Without hesitation, Lin An took out the advancement pill and ingested it. [“Ding! Congratulations on advancing to the second stage of the initial golden core level.] The leader of the dead cultivators stared at Lin An fiercely, and then, he threw the tip of his spear into the ground and stepped on it. Suddenly, he turned into a shooting star and soared into the sky, Once he was out of reach, the leader turned around and said bitterly, “You’re dead for sure. You dare to kill my subordinates! My Forest Wolf Gang will definitely remember you!” Lin An laughed and used his lighting avatar to chase after the leader. In just a few breaths, he had already blocked his path, “You want to run after offending me? Are you dreaming?” “Ah!” The leader was shocked by Lin An’s speed and his eyes widened. Pfft! In an instant, the leader’s body continued soaring through the sky, but his head had fallen off, and it plummeted to the ground. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained eighteen lucky draw coins.”] The success rate system’s notification rang out again. Lin An had finally killed the second group of bandits he had encountered. He then returned to the ground and walked towards the toad monster that he had defeated. In an instant, Lin An stabbed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword into the toad monster’s head and successfully killed it. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained fifty lucky draw coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a luck drop. You have received one golden core stage advancement pill.”] Lin An was overjoyed after he obtained another advancement pill. He immediately took it out and ate it. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for increasing your cultivation level. You have successfully broken through to the third stage of the initial core level.”] The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s crystal had already been dyed red from killing the toad monster. If Lin An killed another magical being, the sword would break through to the nascent soul stage. After stabbing the toad monster, Lin An used the black and white ashen flames to devour its body. The black and white ashen flames instantly had a sixty percent increase in the fifth stage of the nascent soul level. Once he had vanquished the toad monster, Lin An decided to continue moving around the forest and hunt more demonic beasts. He was eager to earn lucky draw coins so that he could obtain additional advancement pills and enter the peak of the golden core stage. The forest was quite dangerous, and just after Lin An had walked for half an hour, he encountered another demonic beast that had the strength comparable to a nascent soul stage cultivator. This time, it was a strange blood-red insect that was trapped in a swamp. To Lin An’s surprise, several cultivators were flying around it on swords. However, the strange insect’s strength was not ordinary. Although its body was huge, its speed was extremely fast, and it was extremely agile. The flying cultivators attacked it from all directions, but it swiftly dodged their attacks. It even spat out some light balls from time to time to counterattack the cultivators. The battle gradually turned white-hot, and just as Lin An thought that a winner was about to be decided, a dozen figures suddenly rushed from the nearby trees and surrounded the swamp. The expressions of the sword-wielding cultivators changed drastically when they saw the imposters, and all of them turned pale in an instant. Lin An immediately knew why the flying cultivators had heightened their guard. The cultivators who had surrounded the swamp were wearing the same uniforms as the five men he had killed. It seemed that they were also members of the Forest Wolf Gang. It was obvious that the gang’s reputation was not good, which was why the expressions of the sword control cultivators had changed drastically. A tall man walked out from the Forest Wolf Gang’s group, and after he glanced at the sword control cultivators, he arrogantly said, “Leave your magic tools and spirit stones, and I’ll let you go.” Whoosh! After it had seen so many people appear, the red insect’s body flashed and quickly disappeared into the swamp. The sword-wielding cultivators were no longer in the mood to care about the strange insect because the cultivators from the Forest Wolf Gang were more dangerous than it. They looked at each other helplessly, and in the end, their leader begrudgingly instructed, “Do as he says.” After he spoke, he took the lead and put down the sharp sword in his hand. At the same time, he threw the storage ring on his finger onto the ground. When the other cultivators saw their leader’s actions, they did not have any thoughts of resisting. They all threw their flying swords and valuable items onto the ground. A few of them looked at their treasures unwillingly before they walked away. However, the Forest Wolf Gang had no intention of letting the sword-wielding cultivators go. When they saw that they had put down their weapons, the gang members immediately surrounded them. ‘Oh! You’re all so shameless,’ Lin An silently mocked the gang members. ‘Looks like it’s time for me to make my move!’ Suddenly, Lin An walked out from his hiding place. “Someone’s here!” When the other Forest Wolf Gang members heard the commotion, they immediately alerted the cultivators who had surrounded the camp. “Kill him!” The tall man who seemed to be the Forest Wolf Gang’s leader immediately ordered his subordinates to kill Lin An. They all rushed towards Lin An, but abruptly, the sword-wielding cultivators took the opportunity to pick up their flying swords on the ground and prepared to attack together. Lin An hurriedly stopped the sword-wielding cultivators and said calmly, “Don’t make a move. Just watch my performance!” He immediately held the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and dashed towards the Forest Wolf Gang members. The sword-wielding cultivators immediately looked at Lin An with constipated expressions, Was Lin An stupid? He was only at the initial stage of the golden core level. How could he instruct them to watch his performance? However, in the next moment, they were all dumbfounded! Lin An transformed into lightning and rushed in front of the Forest Wolf Gang cultivators. With a slash of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, all their weapons were instantly cut in half. The collision between the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and their magic treasures created a huge shockwave that sent several cultivators from the Forest Wolf Gang flying across the forest. Unfortunately, they crashed into a few large trees and, and their bones were crushed to pieces. The sword control cultivators were dumbstruck, and their faces were filled with shock! Lin An had actually killed several Forest Wolf Gang members with one move. Moreover, among the gang members, there were several cultivators who were a number of cultivation levels above Lin An. How was this possible? He was clearly only at the third stage of the initial golden core level. ...; The Forest Wolf Gang members were also shocked, and they looked at Lin An as if they were looking at a monster! The tall man was even more moved. He couldn’t help but glare fiercely at Lin An. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for successfully winning the battle. You have received twenty-one lucky draw coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for successfully winning the battle. You have received twenty-three lucky draw coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for successfully winning the battle. You have received twenty-two lucky draw coins.”] ...; Seven consecutive success rate system notifications rang in Lin An’s ears. His lucky draw coins were above one thousand, and he could now try the third lucky draw machine. However, another success rate system notification chimed in Lin An’s ears. [Ding! Your lottery coins have exceeded a thousand. Please activate the exchange function and examine it.] Lin An opened the exchange interface and found that there was only one thing he could exchange the coins for: a golden core stage advancement pill. The requirement for the exchange was five hundred lottery coins. Immediately, Lin An chose to exchange his coins for one advancement pill, and he ingested it. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for successfully breaking through to the fourth stage of the initial golden core level.”] “Good. Then let me finish off these cowards!” Lin An laughed loudly and raised the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword as he charged towards the Forest Wolf Gang members. Boom! Boom! Boom! The Forest Wolf Gang members hurriedly used all kinds of spells and magic treasures to attack Lin An, but they were dismayed to discover that his defensive techniques were too strong. Regardless of whether they used spells, magic treasures, or sword techniques, the golden light that was covering Lin An’s body easily blocked the strikes. In an instant, the gang members saw Lin An’s blood-red ominous sword slashing toward their heads, and after they felt the chilly blade touch their necks, their eyes went pitch black. During Lin An’s killing spree, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword broke through to the nascent soul stage. As he held it in his hand, Lin An gave off an awe-inspiring sense of danger. The sword control cultivators at the side were all amazed, and their faces were filled with disbelief and shock. “This person’s strength is definitely not at the golden core stage! He must have used a secret technique to hide his cultivation level!” “Right! It must be. Look, he was only at the third level of the golden core stage just now, and now he’s already at the fourth level!” “Then he must have used a secret technique to change his appearance. Otherwise, how could he be so strong at such a young age?” “Judging from his strength, he must be a nascent soul stage senior!” The sword control cultivators all heaved a sigh of relief as they tried to come to terms with their lucky escape from the Forest Wolf Gang’s crutches. Meanwhile, the success rate system notifications kept ringing in Lin An’s ears. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty lottery coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-two lottery coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-three lucky draw coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop, golden core stage advancement pill!] ...; Buzz! The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword let out a crisp sound as it swung. Standing among the pile of corpses, Lin An had a blood-thirsty expression. Among the cultivators present, only the tall man and his two subordinates were left from the Forest Wolf Gang. Abruptly, the two underlings turned pale as their lips trembling slightly, and their faces filled with fear. The tall man’s face was also ashen, and his eyes stared fixedly at Lin An as he asked in a deep voice, “Who exactly are you?” “You don’t deserve to know,” Lin An retorted. The tall man instantly felt his chest tighten. No one had ever spoken to him in such a manner. However, the sword-wielding cultivators were secretly pleased as they watched on. When had the members of the Forest Wolf Gang ever suffered such humiliation? If they had not seen it with their own eyes, they would never have believed it to be true. A few of them clicked their tongues in wonder and openly displayed their delight. The tall man clenched his fists tightly as if he was holding in his extreme anger. “You brat! Ever since the establishment of the Forest Wolf Gang, we have never been humiliated like this. Do you want me to call someone who deserves to know?” After Lin An heard the tall man’s words, his interest was immediately piqued. The lottery coins he had earned from killing the Forest Wolf Gang members had already helped him advance his cultivation in the golden core stage. If he earned a few more coins, he would be able to reach the peak of the golden core stage. His eyes immediately lit up, and he said, “Alright, you can call for reinforcements. Remember, the more the better.” The tall man immediately swung his sleeves and was about to leave, but Lin An waved his hand and signaled for him to stop. “Wait, what if you go and don’t come back? Just let your subordinates go. You’ll have to wait here.” The sword control cultivators who were watching the show at the side instantly felt like they were about to be struck by lightning. Why was Lin An afraid that the tall man wouldn’t return? He had already killed so many gang members. The tall man should have been more worried that Lin An would escape after killing his colleagues. “Senior Brother!” One of the sword-wielding cultivators stepped forward and said to Lin An, “The Forest Wolf Gang has seven nascent soul stage experts guarding it, and their overall leader has already reached the eighth stage of the nascent soul level. He’s the strongest existence in this area. We absolutely can’t let them go back.” To the cultivator’s surprise, Lin An answered indifferently, “Heh, as long as they are still in the nascent soul stage, there’s nothing to be afraid of!” Then, he turned around and told the members of the Forest Wolf Gang to quickly call for help. “Stop wasting our time. Everyone’s life is very precious.” After the two subordinates left, a muffled sound suddenly came from the swamp. In an instant, the tall man standing by the swamp was swallowed by the strange blood-colored bug in one gulp. Lin An was immediately shocked. He quickly used his white flames to freeze the corpse of the strange blood-colored bug. When he went to examine its mouth, he realized that the tall man was already hopeless. Lin An couldn’t help but sigh faintly. The twenty or so lucky draw coins he would have earned from killing the tall man were gone. Meanwhile, the sword control cultivators beside him were dumbstruck. Everyone looked at Lin An with fear in their eyes, He had actually frozen the magnificent nascent soul stage blood-colored bug they had been hunting!  Who exactly was he? How could he have such strength? No wonder he had been fearless during his confrontation with the Forest Wolf Gang members. It turned out that the nascent soul stage experts they had warned him about did not strike fear in his heart. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for your victory in the battle. You have obtained fifty-one lucky draw coins.”] Lin An once again used his black flames to devour the corpse of the blood-colored bug. At the same time, the progress of the black and white ashen flames improved to eighty percent. Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Suddenly, a few air-piercing sounds came from the forest. It sounded as if countless figures were passing through, and everyone present sensed a majestic killing intent that was mixed with a strong aura. Lin An’s expression didn’t change. He looked in the direction of the depths of the forest and felt that the Forest Wolf Gang members were quite efficient. They had arrived in such a short amount of time. In a few breaths, the reinforcements had already arrived. The sword-wielding cultivators all felt a sense of panic after they heard the series of sounds originating from the deep forest. It was as if a whirlwind had been created in the forest, and all of a sudden, dozens of figures dashed out from the woods. The new group of cultivators all wore green robes, and they were holding all kinds of weapons in their hands. Within a few minutes, their killing intent surged as they quickly surrounded the entire swamp. Afterward, eight figures walked out from the crowd. They were all at the nascent soul stage, and their majestic auras caused the faces of the sword control cultivators to turn pale. The middle-aged man in the middle had a gloomy expression. His eyes were red, and it was as if a monstrous killing intent was about to erupt from his body. He scanned his surroundings, and his gaze suddenly landed on Lin An. Boom! In an instant, a terrifying killing intent spread out from the middle-aged man’s body and turned into a gust of wind and waves that blew across the swamp. Subsequently, his body turned into a scarlet blood shadow and exploded from where he stood. The middle-aged man then unsheathed his giant sword and suddenly slashed it towards Lin An. However, Lin An abruptly waved his hand, and a ball of black and white flames as well as a long sword that was emitting a cold light flew towards the middle-aged man. The two treasures were released at the same time and combined into a terrifying force. When he saw Lin An’s attack, the middle-aged man desperately turned the tip of his sword as he attempted to block the attacks of the two treasures. Clang! The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword collided with the middle-aged man’s huge sword, causing a series of sparks to fly. Under everyone’s dumbfounded gazes, the middle-aged man grunted as he was sent flying into the air like a kite with a broken string. At the same time, the black and white ashen flames quietly arrived and licked his clothes like a giant snake. Boom! A powerful energy fluctuation instantly spread out. “Ah!” The middle-aged man suddenly widened his eyes. His face was covered with fear, and he let out a shocking scream. A moment later, he was completely engulfed by the black flames as his faint screams rent the air. ...; Everyone present was stunned! They had not clearly witnessed the entire sequence that had led to the middle-aged man’s death. They had only seen him charging towards Lin An, who had then casually thrown out two treasures. Afterward, they saw the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword directly blast the middle-aged man away with terrifying speed and power. Finally, the terrifying black and white ashen flames had wrapped around him, and the middle-aged man had died after a few screams. Everyone subconsciously looked at Lin An, and their eyes filled with shock and fear! They all felt as if they had underestimated his power. “He is so strong!” Although the sword-wielding cultivators had already witnessed Lin An’s strength in battle, they hadn’t expected him to be so dominant. The faces of the Forest Wolf Gang members immediately stiffened, and the remaining seven nascent soul stage powerhouses became extremely fearful. Their bodies could not help but start to retreat because they did not want to act rashly. In their hearts, they wanted to find an opportunity to escape. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained fifty-three lottery coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop. You have received a storage ring.”] The sounds of the success rate system notifications rang in Lin An’s ears. <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL Lin An looked at the rest of the members of the Forest Wolf Gang and said, “Alright, what are you waiting for? Attack!” The few sword-wielding cultivators listening to Lin An’s arrogant words didn’t think that he was courting death. Instead, their hearts were filled with anticipation. He had actually dared the Forest Wolf Gang members to attack him at once! Many of the sword-wielding cultivators had imagined that they would say such a line in their lifetime. They all felt that Lin An was too arrogant! At the same time, the sword-wielding female cultivators present were filled with admiration, and they looked at Lin An in a daze. However, some members of the Forest Wolf Gang felt that Lin An’s challenge was ridiculous, and they laughed out loud. In their eyes, Lin An was only at the initial stage of the golden core level. The fact that he had killed the middle-aged man had completely been due to the unexpected effect of the magic treasure. Such a powerful magic treasure had to have a cool-down period. Moreover, the Forest Wolf Gang still had seven nascent soul stage cultivators. Could Lin An kill them all at once? “Haha! Looks like you can’t wait to go to hell. Then we’ll send you on your way!” Suddenly, an elder from the Forest Wolf Gang addressed the other six nascent soul stage cultivators. “Everyone, since our leader is dead, why don’t we use this kid as our wager. Whoever kills him first will become the next leader of the Forest Wolf Gang!” The six nascent soul stage cultivators looked at Lin An with playful gazes and replied, “Okay!” Lin An had always adhered to a more aggressive principle in all of his battles. Since he had already decided to fight, he didn’t waste any more time. A surge of blue lightning covered his entire body, and he used his lighting avatar to charge towards the Forest Wolf Gang members! “Hehe, is this kid so eager to die?” The few nascent soul stage experts laughed mockingly. They knew that Lin An’s cultivation was at the sixth level of the initial golden core stage, and in their eyes, there was nothing to be afraid of. However, as Lin An approached, the nascent soul stage experts were instantly moved. His body carried a strong sense of danger, and they felt as if a grim reaper was approaching. Immediately, chills ran through their spines as they anticipated the attack. Lin An stabbed out his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and the dazzling sword’s shadow brought with it a terrifying power as it poured down on the nascent soul stage experts. Clang! Clang! Clang The sounds of weapons clashing rang out continuously. The seven nascent soul stage cultivators either used their swords and spells to block Lin An’s attack. However, their bodies were all suppressed by the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and they retreated frantically. Instantly, the shockwaves from the collision spread out in all directions, causing the large group of Forest Wolf Gang disciples in the surroundings to fall to the ground. The sword control cultivators who were watching the battle were stunned! Lin An held the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand as he charged towards the Forest Wolf Gang members. His supreme figure glided across the forest gracefully as if he was a god of war. “How could this be?” “He’s only at the sixth stage of the golden core level. Even if he has a superior cultivation technique and can fight against nascent soul cultivators, he can’t possibly fight against seven of them with such ease, right?” The members of the Forest Wolf Gang were also filled with shock. Lin An’s actions had completely overturned their understanding of the cultivation world. After they had observed the first round of the battle, the sword control cultivators stared at Lin An in a daze. Their strange gazes blankly roamed around his body. Among them, a few girls bit their lips lightly. Lin An’s strength had truly broadened their horizons. His ability to suppress so many nascent soul stage cultivators at the same time with the cultivation of a golden core stage disciple was simply unheard of. In the end, Lin An’s aura had deeply shocked everyone present! Abruptly, all the Forest Wolf Gang cultivators who were below the nascent soul stage got up from the ground in fear and fled in all directions. The seven nascent soul stage cultivators were even more dumbfounded. They covered their chests and slowly crawled up from the ground. After they wiped the blood from the corners of their mouths, they looked at Lin An in fear. “How is this possible!” “How can a mere golden core stage cultivator possess such combat strength!” “Who exactly are you?” Lin An placed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword on his shoulder and replied, “You don’t need to know. I’m just a dying man. Let me send you all to hell.” Suddenly, a blast of black and white ashen flames surged onto Lin An’s palm. He waved his hand without mercy, and instantly, the entire forest was filled with light. “Ah!” The seven nascent soul stage cultivators let out terrified cries. Four of them were swallowed by the black flames, while the other three were frozen by the white flames. The black and white ashen flames continued to sweep into the distance and consumed the fleeing Forest Wolf Gang disciples, as well as the trees and demonic beasts in their path. After a few minutes, the entire space was instantly clear. [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lucky draw coins.”] [“Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-three lucky draw coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lucky draw coins.”] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop. You have received two golden core stage advancement pills.”] ...; A series of success rate system notifications rang in Lin An’s ears. He instantly swallowed the two golden core stage advancement pills and used the lottery coins he had earned to obtain another advancement pill. Then, he raised his cultivation level to the ninth stage of the advanced golden core level. He was now only one stage away from the peak of the golden core stage. After he saw the improvement in his cultivation level, Lin An was very surprised. He hadn’t expected that his encounter with the Forest Wolf Gang would bring him so many benefits. He had already earned more than a thousand lucky draw coins. The surrounding sword control cultivators were bewildered. The ice sculptures in front of them were a reminder of the unbelievable scenes they had just witnessed. They looked at Lin An with startled expressions, and they had already run out of superlatives to describe him. Before Lin An had appeared at the swamp, the sword-wielding cultivators had been willing to submit their weapons and escape. Who would have thought that they would have been saved? Lin An had destroyed the entire Forest Wolf Gang with just a wave of his hand! “Wait, do you sense that?” Several quick-witted cultivators immediately discovered that Lin An had advanced to the ninth stage of the golden core level. All of a sudden, everyone’s eyes widened in disbelief as they looked at him. At the same time, a hint of amazement appeared in the eyes of the female cultivators! “Fellow Daoist, you’re really too strong!” A little girl who was among the sword-wielding cultivators said excitedly. She had never witnessed such a battle that involved a disciple crushing cultivators who had higher cultivation levels than him. In the face of the compliments from the sword-wielding cultivators, Lin An only smiled reservedly. After the fight was over, a few sword control cultivators invited Lin An to their sect as a guest since they were clearly interested in befriending him. Because he didn’t have any urgent matters to attend to, Lin An followed them to the Chu An city, which was the location of sword-wielding cultivator’s sect. Along the way, he learned that the sword-wielding cultivators belonged to the Scarlet Cloud Sect. The Scarlet Cloud Sect had originally been a large faction. However, after the mysterious disappearance of their two sect masters, the sect had gradually declined. The current sect master was a beautiful woman named Shao Baifeng. She had relied on her outstanding talent to cultivate the nascent soul stage in just over twenty years. Afterward, she had become the sect master. Shao Baifeng’s parents had died in one of the sect’s battles when she was young. The entire Scarlet Cloud Sect now relied on her and two other nascent soul stage elders for protection. However, they would occasionally be bullied by the other nearby sects. At the Scarlet Cloud Sect’s mountain gate, many of the houses were shabby, and the shelters looked like they had been in disrepair for a long time. The entire sect only had fifty cultivators, and their cultivation levels were basically at the foundation establishment stage and the initial stage of the golden core level. Night-time had arrived, and the stars shone brightly in the sky. Lin An laid on the bed for a long time, unable to fall asleep. Unexpectedly, just as he was deep in thought, a beautiful figure landed in front of his window, bringing with it a faint fragrance that lingered around the tip of his nose along with the breeze. It was none other than the beautiful Scarlet Cloud Sect’s master, Shao Baifeng. Her temperament was cold and ethereal, and she stood outside the window like an otherworldly fairy. “Sect Leader Shao, you’re still awake?” Shao Baifeng smiled faintly. Her eyes were bright, while her teeth were as white as snow. “Fellow Daoist Lin, you must be joking. After cultivating to the nascent soul level, immortal cultivators no longer have the secular desire to sleep, so what’s the point of talking about sleep?” When he heard her words, Lin An smiled and asked comfortingly, “Then what’s the matter, Sect Leader Shao? Come in and have a seat.” Shao Baifeng waved her hand slightly. “There’s no need. I just want to have a few words with you.” After a brief pause, she continued, “Does fellow Daoist Lin have a dream?” Lin An was stunned. After thinking for a while, he replied, “To maintain world peace?” Shao Baifeng laughed lightly. Her beautiful face was like the warm sun in the spring, and she changed the topic again. “Then, fellow Daoist Lin, have you ever thought of finding a place to settle down and cultivate on a daily basis instead of spending your days in slaughter?” Lin An finally recalled that he hadn’t revealed that he was a disciple from the Jiuxiao Sect. It seemed that Shao Baifeng thought of him as a free-wheeling crane. Additionally, the fact that he had displayed his might in the forest had clearly moved the Scarlet Cloud Sect disciples. “Sect Master Shao, are you here to persuade me to join the Scarlet Cloud Sect?” Shao Baifeng smiled, “That’s right. I’m rashly disturbing you because I want to invite you to join the sect. I’m willing to treat you as the first elder. I wonder if you would be interested?” However, just as Lin An was about to reply, an arrogant clamor suddenly came from the mountain pass of the Scarlet Cloud sect. “Shao Baifeng, have you prepared the spirit stones for this month?” “Why aren’t you coming out to welcome us? If you neglect us, we might destroy the Scarlet Cloud Sect!” “Shao Baifeng, our sect master is bringing people over. I advise you to hurry up. Otherwise, if our sect master doesn’t see the spirit stones when he arrives, your Scarlet Cloud Sect will bear the consequences!” ...; Shao Baifeng’s expression turned extremely unsightly, and she immediately explained to Lin An that the invaders were from the demonic sect. They had always exploited spirit stones from the Scarlet Cloud Sect, and their strength was tyrannical. No one in the Chu An region dared to provoke them. Previously, Lin An had heard from Shao Baifeng’s disciples that they would occasionally be bullied by other factions because they were weak. However, he hadn’t expected to encounter the bullies so quickly. The invaders were so arrogant, and Lin An immediately understood how difficult it had been for Shao Baifeng, as the leader of the Scarlet Cloud Sect, to encourage and maintain her disciples for all those years. A strong, angry feeling rose coldly in Lin An’s heart, and he left his shelter and walked towards the mountain gate. When he arrived, Lin An saw more than a dozen cultivators dressed in white cloud robes shouting at the entrance. Among the heckling crowd, there were two nascent soul cultivators, while the rest were all golden core stage cultivators. Judging from the crowd, Lin An concluded that the disciple’s combat strength was equivalent to that of the Scarlet Cloud Sect. From the impostor’s arrogance, their leader was yet to arrive. No wonder they dared to be so arrogant. “It’s so late at night, and you’re still barking like dogs. Do you have any sense of civic-mindedness?” Lin An scolded the two nascent soul stage cultivators. The cultivators from the demonic sect were instantly stunned, and their sinister gazes instantly locked onto Lin An. “Where did this kid, who doesn’t have enough hair, come from? He doesn’t know the immensity of heaven and earth. Hurry up and call that b*tch, Shao Baifeng!” Lin An slowly shook his head as he tried to maintain his calm demeanor. “Since she doesn’t know how to speak the human language, then I think there’s no need for you to talk like that.” Suddenly, a blast of golden and blue lightning covered Lin An’s body, and his figure instantly disappeared. The tail of lightning intertwined into a bright electric net, and the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword carried a murderous intent as it suddenly suppressed the pressure in the hearts of everyone present! Poof! The sound of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword slicing through human flesh and blood rang out. Lin An’s moves were too fast, and no one present, including the two nascent soul stage cultivators, could see his movements clearly. After reaching the ninth stage of the golden core level, Lin An’s body was already comparable to that of a nascent soul stage cultivator under the tempering of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning.’ Naturally, the demonic sect cultivators couldn’t keep up. Bang! The helpless cry of one of the cultivator’s head hitting the ground startled the other disciples. Their expressions changed drastically, and they all used their magic treasures and techniques in an attempt to avenge their companions. Whoosh! At that moment, a few streaks of light pierced through the air. Shao Baifeng had rushed out accompanied by her Scarlet Cloud Sect disciples. “Shao Baifeng! What do you mean by this? Are you going to start a war with us?” One of the demonic sect cultivators asked angrily. For a long time, all of the small sects in the Chu An region had been the demon path cultivator’s targets. Several sects had tried to resist their attacks, but in the end, they had all been defeated and obediently handed over their spirit stones. However, Shao Baifeng didn’t pay attention to the demon path cultivators. Instead, she saluted Lin An and said, “Thank you, fellow Daoist Lin, for your help!” “It was nothing. Killing a bug is nothing,” Lin An replied nonchalantly. When they heard the mocking words, the demonic sect cultivators were furious. One of the nascent soul stage cultivators looked at Lin An coldly and asked, “You are not from the Scarlet Cloud Sect! Why are you stopping us? Are you trying to make an enemy out of the entire demonic sect?” No matter their location on the Cangyun Continent, the demonic sect cultivators were not a force to be underestimated. Furthermore, they were ruthless, and other immortal cultivators were unwilling to provoke them. The members of the demonic sect were used to being domineering, so before a fight, they would use the reputation of their sect to threaten the enemy and gain a psychological advantage. The tactic had been very effective. After learning that a group of cultivators was from the demonic sect, most challengers would choose to swallow their anger and voluntarily hand over their spirit stones to appease them. However, Lin An did not seem intimidated. “You guys should all attack me together and save me some time,” Lin An said coldly. The nascent soul stage member from the demonic sect stared at Lin An and gritted his teeth as he said, “When our sect leader arrives, he will definitely massacre the Scarlet Cloud Sect. You’re finished. Today, both you and that sorry sect are finished. We won’t let any of you off.” As soon as he finished speaking, a powerful pressure appeared from afar and quickly moved towards them. Everyone present was shocked, and they all immediately raised their heads. At that moment, dozens of flying swords were rushing towards them, and on each flying sword, there was a powerful figure. The demonic sect’s leader was a middle-aged man in the nascent soul stage. His sinister facial features revealed the evil nature in his heart. Additionally, the two cultivators behind him were both nascent soul stage cultivators. When he took in his surroundings, Lin An noted that the demonic sect had five nascent soul stage cultivators in total. The demonic sect’s leader, whose name was Ran Gang, landed on the ground in an imposing manner. After sweeping his cold gaze across everyone present, his eyes finally landed on Lin An, and they exuded a sense of viciousness. Rang Gang immediately sneered and said indifferently, ” You’re just a mere golden core stage kid. Do you actually know the immensity of heaven and earth? I’m going to teach you a painful lesson today.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL “You talk too much. If you have the ability, then come at me.” Lin An said calmly as he made his stance. Ran Gang’s arrival had not caused the Scarlet Cloud Sect cultivators to panic. They had already witnessed Lin An wipe out the members of the Forest Wolf Gang, and they were confident that he could take on the five nascent soul cultivators from the demonic sect. Some of the cultivators from the Scarlet Cloud Sect even sympathized with the pitiful members of the demonic sect. They were about to be exterminated, yet they were still acting high and mighty. Abruptly, Lin An took out a cannon from the success rate system’s storage space. He had obtained the cannon after drawing a hundred lottery coins the previous day, but he did not know much about its power, so he decided to test its functionality on the demonic sect cultivators. The aggressive cultivators were surprised when they saw Lin An suddenly take out the strangely shaped cannon. They couldn’t believe how inexplicable his action was. “What is he doing? Why did he bring out a cannon?” “Is he scared silly by our formation? Could it be that he wants to use a cannon usually used by mortals to fight against us?” “Could it be that he wants to set off fireworks?” “No way! I see a faint energy fluctuation on this cannon. Could it be some kind of magic treasure?” “Are you crazy? Who would he use a cannon as a magic treasure? Its power is usually dull and heavy. It would be a complete burden in a fight.” “You’re right.” “Hehe. I’d like to see what kind of tricks you want to play!” Ran Gang sneered. “It’s just a mere cannon. Even if I stand here, you can’t hurt me at all.” Suddenly, Lin An laughed, “Then you better watch carefully!” Boom! A blinding beam of light with a destructive power blasted towards the members of the demonic sect. The beam of light was so bright that it blinded their eyes! After two minutes, the light gradually extinguished, and the demonic sect cultivators slowly opened their eyes. To everyone’s surprise, more than half of the members of the demonic sect, including three nascent soul stage cultivators, had disappeared. It seemed that they had all died from Lin An’s attack! The Scarlet Cloud Sect members were also shocked to see that Ran Gang had also lost an arm. Suddenly, a strange silence came over the scene. The cultivators from the demonic sect who had survived the previous shot were all in a daze. Even Ran Gang, who had the highest cultivation level among the demonic sect members, was stunned. The immortal cultivators had never witnessed such a devastating mortal weapon. After Lin An had fired the shot, Ran Gang hadn’t even had time to react before he had been blinded by the light. In an instant, a strong destructive power had emanated from the cannon. Before Ran Gang had recovered his vision, he had first felt a sharp pain coming from half of his body. Then, when his vision came back to him, he saw that more than half of his subordinates had disappeared, along with three nascent soul stage subordinates. “Aah!” Ran Gang let out a roar of anger and pain. The other members of the demonic sect regained their senses after they heard the painful howl. When they saw the scene in front of them, they were all stupefied. “What...; What happened?” “Where are my friends! Why did they disappear?” “What happened...; Master, your hand!” Suddenly, the few surviving demonic sect cultivators panicked and lost their minds. They hadn’t expected such a seemingly ordinary cannon to release such terrifying power. The impact of the cannon’s first strike had also surprised Lin An, but at the same time, it also made him realize its most fatal flaw. It was too expensive! The first cannon shot had completely used up all of its energy. If he wanted to continue using it, he would have to spend one hundred lottery coins to recharge it! “Quickly, run!” Ran Gang shouted and directly jumped up from his original position. Suddenly, he mounted onto his flying sword and rushed towards the mountains. When they saw their leader’s sudden move, the surviving demonic sect cultivators all followed him and fled. “Haha!” A huge golden beam of light flashed and appeared from the mountain gate and immediately caught up to the fleeing cultivators. Lin An had quickly spent one hundred lottery coins to fire a second blast from his cannon. All of the fleeing demonic sect cultivators were affected, and they instantly turned into ashes. Afterward, Lin An saw a series of notifications pop up on the success rate system. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained thirty lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained thirty-two lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained thirty-four lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop, golden core stage advancement pill.] ...; The success rate system’s notifications kept ringing in Lin An’s ears, and he was delighted to obtain another golden core stage advancement pill. Without wasting any time, Lin An hurriedly took out the advancement pill and ate it. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for advancing to the peak golden core stage.] The success rate system rang out. Lin An had finally advanced to the peak of the golden core stage. ...; After wiping out the members of the demonic sect, Lin An walked leisurely along the mountain path. He had already left the Scarlet Cloud Sect after kindly declining Shao Baifeng’s offer to be an elder in the sect. At that moment, Lin An came upon a desolate grassland. The Jiuxiao Sect was still very far away, and if he were to travel by foot, it would take him at least two months to reach it. However, he wasn’t in a hurry to return to his sect. As the saying went, everything along the way was a scenery. It was better to take a stroll and explore the mountains. “Robbery!” After Lin An had branched onto a small path, a few people suddenly appeared. One of the middle-aged men said to Lin An, “Fellow Daoist, I advise you to hand over all your belongings. This is the foot of my Cang Wu mountain. With a single signal, dozens of my brothers will rush over. It’s better if you don’t try to resist.” Lin An was secretly delighted when he heard the man’s words. The man in front of him had the highest cultivation level of the group of bandits, and he was only at the eighth level of the golden core stage. The others were mostly at the foundation establishment realm. After learning about their intentions, Lin An suddenly laughed, and the middle-aged man said angrily, “What an arrogant brat. Brothers, let’s take him down together.” Suddenly, the middle-aged man unsheathed his flying sword, and after he waved his hand, the flying sword turned into a streak of light and charged towards Lin An. A few foundation establishment stage companions also walked forward and surrounded Lin An to prevent him from escaping. After the bandits sealed off Lin An’s escape route, they looked at him and revealed cold smiles. “This kid really doesn’t know his own limits. He dares to go against us at the foot of the Cang Wu Mountain. With a few senior brothers working together, even a nascent soul stage powerhouse can bend to our will...;” Before the bandit had finished speaking, Lin An’s figure instantly turned into a streak of lightning. With a flash in their eyes, he charged straight towards the middle-aged man. Clang! The middle-aged man reacted quickly and flipped his flying sword to block Lin An’s strike. However, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword immediately connected with the bandit’s flying sword and split his body in half! The middle-aged man fell to the ground, and his head was separated from his body as his fresh blood stained the ground. Everyone was instantly dumbfounded and stood rooted to the ground. The remaining bandits turned pale, and their eyes were filled with fear. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lucky draw coins.] The other golden core stage cultivators reacted and said fiercely to Lin An, “You actually dared to kill a member of the Cang Wu Mountain. We’re going to fight it out with you!” One of the skinny bandits stepped up and unsheathed his sword. He had a very aggrieved expression as he looked at Lin An. However, Lin An was a little confused. Why did the bandit seem so aggravated? If a stranger happened to pass by, they would think that it was Lin An who was actually robbing the Cang Wu Mountain bandits. The skinny bandit shook his arm and formed a spell with his hand. Suddenly, his sharp flying sword charged at Lin An with a murderous cold light. “Lightning Dharma Body!” Lin An activated his lightning avatar to dodge the flying sword and quickly approached the skinny thief. He then unsheathed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and swung it. Abruptly, an overwhelming sword shadow instantly covered the sky above the skinny thief. The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s nascent soul stage power appeared to have covered the sky and the sun. Boom! Since the Cang Wu Mountain bandits were too weak, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s power didn’t just attack the skinny bandit. It would be too much of a waste to only kill one enemy. Its power directly exploded in the air above the dozen foundation establishment stage thieves, and they were all knocked down. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received ten lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received eleven lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received thirteen lottery coins.] ...; A haughty smile appeared on Lin An’s lips as he held onto the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. “You dare to rob me with your meager cultivation level? I think you’re just courting death!” It was clear that Lin An wouldn’t let the matter rest so easily. His body was suddenly covered in lightning, and his figure flashed as he activated his lightning avatar and flew towards the direction of the Cang Wu Mountain. Not long after, the members of the Cang Wu Mountain discovered Lin An’s rapid approach and sent out over a dozen disciples and a nascent soul stage elder to meet him. The nascent soul stage elder’s gaze swept across Lin An, and immediately, he detected the faint spiritual energy of the Cang Wu Mountain cultivators that Lin An had killed. “Brat! Did you dare to kill my sect’s disciples? Kneel and surrender!” When they heard the elder’s words, the disciples behind him also shouted, “You’re only in the golden core stage, yet you dare to be so unbridled. You should kneel and accept your death!” “Accept your death!” With a nascent soul stage cultivator leading the charge, the disciples from the Cang Wu Mountain were extremely arrogant. However, Lin An suddenly laughed out loud. He held the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and poured his mana into it, which stirred up waves of golden light. He then waved it downwards, and countless golden rays flew straight towards the nascent soul stage cultivator. “You think such a clumsy technique is worthy of making a fool of yourself in front of me?” The nascent soul stage elder snorted coldly. He immediately gathered a fire-colored vital essence with one hand and swung it towards Lin An. In an instant, the fire-colored vital essence scattered the golden rays. When he saw the unique counterstrike, Lin An activated his lightning avatar and dodged the remaining fire-colored vital essence attacks. As the lightning interweaved, Lin An quickly approached the nascent soul stage elder. At the same time, he took the high ground and slashed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword toward the elder’s head. Instantly, a powerful force rushed toward the nascent soul stage cultivator. “Eh?” The nascent soul stage cultivator exclaimed in surprise and revealed a strange expression. However, the mana in his body circulated, and a blast of lightning covered his body. At the critical moment, he dodged the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. “What...;” Lin An’s face was immediately filled with surprise. The nascent soul cultivator had just displayed the Lightning Dharma Body technique. “I didn’t expect to meet a user of the Lightning Dharma Body in such a place. You have such an exquisite movement technique. It’s a pity that I have cultivated the Lightning Dharma Body technique for over two hundred years, so I can definitely execute it more efficiently than you.” The old man stopped in front of Lin An and smiled coldly. Seeing that the nascent soul stage cultivator seemed to have the upper hand, the disciples from the Cang Wu Mountain cheered wildly. “Mighty Elder!” “Hey, kid, you actually cultivate the same technique as our elder. Let our elder teach you the correct way to use that technique!” “Elder, turn his bones into ashes and avenge our dead brothers.” ...; Lin An furrowed his brows and realized that things had become more complicated. “Black-and-white ashen flames!” He immediately used his strongest attack to see whether the elder’s Lightning Dharma Body could dodge it. However, he was shocked after he realized that the majestic black-and-white ashen flames had gushed out like a hurricane and instantly engulfed the dozens of disciples that had accompanied the elder. A puzzled expression suddenly formed on Lin An’s face. Although he had activated the black-and-white ashen flames, he hadn’t expected the flames to be so violent. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lucky draw coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty lucky draw coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-three lucky draw coins.] ...; [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop. You have obtained an incomplete scroll of the cloudless spell.] As the success rate system’s notifications kept ringing in Lin An’s ears, he realized that he had obtained an unknown cloudless spell. He immediately opened the system’s storage space to get more details about the cloudless spell. [The cloudless spell is an invisible and formless spell that can be used together with all movement techniques to increase the speed of a cultivator.] Once Lin An progressed in his cultivation of the ‘Scripture of No Beginning,’ the cloudless spell could increase his movement techniques by forty percent. After understanding his new treasure, Lin An planned to search the area for more members of the Cang Wu Mountain and kill them all. He immediately activated his lighting body avatar again and flew towards the mountains. After a few minutes, Lin An arrived at the bottom of the Cang Wu Mountain. After finding the entrance to the Cang Wu Mountain’s main quarters, Lin An strode in and unsheathed his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and randomly destroyed all the mountain structures he could see. “Who dares to be so impudent here?” Seeing that Lin An had attacked them unprovoked, dozens of disciples from the Cang Wu Mountain immediately rushed out and shouted. In the end, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in Lin An’s hand transformed into countless sword shadows before covering his entire body and creating an impenetrable defensive spell around him. Suddenly, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword beheaded many of the foundation establishment stage and golden core stage disciples who had rushed out. “Stop! How dare you!” Soon, the elders of the Cang Wu Mountain were all alarmed, and they rushed out together. Their sect leader also appeared, and Lin An quickly noticed that he was a late-stage nascent soul stage cultivator. One of the elders raised his hand and asked, “Which sect are you from? Why did you come to our sect to cause trouble?” “What an arrogant person. You dare to barge into our sect by yourself with only a golden core cultivation level.” “Do you want to die a painful death!” Several elders shouted angrily, and their faces full of righteousness. However, Lin An let out a disdainful laugh. “Why? You don’t know what you’ve done? You’re dominating an entire region with your bandits. Why should a sect like yours exist? Today, for the sake of world peace, I’ll uproot all of you!” After Lin An finished speaking, a ball of black and white ashen flames emerged from his palm, and its terrifying power shook the surroundings. With a wave of Lin An’s hand, a vast power swept out, and the black-and-white ashen flames pounced towards the crowd like a huge dragon. Only the Cang Wu Mountain’s sect leader had sensed the terrifying power contained within the black-and-white ashen flames, and he hurriedly shouted, “Be careful! This thing...;” However, before the sect leader could finish his words, everyone had been directly engulfed by the black-and-white ashen flames, and they were all completely devoured. [Ding! Congratulations on your victory! You have obtained forty lucky draw coins!] [Ding! Congratulations on your victory! You have obtained forty-three lucky draw coins!] [Ding! Congratulations on your victory! You have obtained forty-one lucky draw coins!] ...; [Ding! Congratulations on your victory! You have obtained a lucky drop! A fragment of the ashless mantra!] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop. You have received an incomplete scroll of the ashen-free spell.] ...; [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining the complete version of the ashen-free spell. The speed of your lightning avatar has increased by eighty percent.] After killing off all the elders and the sect master from the Cang Wu Mountain, Lin An felt that even if some cultivators escaped, they would no longer cause any trouble. He trudged down the mountain path, and after he had walked for some few minutes, a sedan chair slowly appeared in the distance and came up the mountain. Lin An ignored it and whistled as he leisurely brushed past the palanquin. Suddenly, the curtain beside the palanquin was pulled back, and a handsome man spoke to Lin An. “Fellow Daoist, may I ask how to get to the entrance of the Cang Wu Mountain?” Lin An raised his eyebrows and replied, “The Cang Wu gang no longer exists in this world. There is only the Cang Wu Mountain. If you are going to the Cang Wu Mountain gang, then I don’t know, but if you are going to the Cang Wu Mountain, then you are already on the right path.” After Lin An finished speaking, he sauntered away from the palanquin with his hands behind his back. The handsome man didn’t understand what Lin An meant, so he continued to go up the mountain. Soon, the traveling party came upon the mountain gate that Lin An had destroyed. At that moment, the base of the Cang Wu Mountain was dead silent. The ground was covered in blood, but there wasn’t a single corpse. The handsome man was instantly shocked. The expressions of the subordinates carrying his sedan chair also turned hideous. They all looked at the scene in front of them in disbelief. “This...; Could this be the doing of that brat we passed along the way?” “Although the Cang Wu Mountain isn’t a large sect, it’s still one of the most feared sects in the Ghana Empire. How could one person wipe it out?” “No wonder that brat said that the Cang Wu Mountain gang no longer exists in this world. Could it be that he looks young, but he is in fact an old monster in the infant transformation stage?” The handsome man and his subordinates were all stunned, and they felt that the reality before them was too absurd. ...; A few days later, Lin An encountered another nascent soul stage demonic beast in the magic forest. After he killed it, he received a lucky drop, golden core stage advancement pill. Once he consumed it, Lin An advanced to the second level of the peak golden core stage. He continued to walk for some distance, but suddenly, he saw a ghastly scene that was a few meters from his position. Several corpses were strewn all over the place, and fresh blood had dyed the area red. Instantly, Lin An cried out in surprise. However, after he composed himself, he continued to move forward. He carefully navigated the scene and walked towards a nearby river. As Lin An passed by the river, he suddenly sensed that something was wrong. Just as he was about to investigate, the sound of water splashing suddenly came from the side. When Lin An turned around, he saw a strange fish that was the size of a person, and its mouth was wide open. It immediately splashed out of the water and bit towards him. “Lightning Dharma Body!” A golden light instantly surged out of Lin An’s body, and he disappeared just as the huge strange fish was about to shred him to pieces. His Lightning Dharma Body had been strengthened by the cloudless spell, and its speed had increased by eighty percent. Lin An had disappeared so fast that he had left a mirage at his original spot. However, he did not flee from the strange fish. Instead, he simply moved to the side and pulled out the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword to cut open its body. Instantly, a gush of fresh blood splattered all over Lin An, but the strange fish escaped back into the river. Lin An was immediately surprised after he saw that the strike from the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword had not killed the strange fish. “You still want to escape?” Lin An held his sword tightly and chased after it. As he pursued the nascent soul demonic beast, the two cultivators who had been hiding in the shadows by the side of the road were instantly fascinated. As they watched the scene before them, the faces of the two young women were filled with shock. A golden core stage cultivator was chasing after a nascent soul stage demonic beast? How was that possible? The scene was simply too unbelievable. Since the physical fitness of demonic beasts was superior to that of humans, even cultivators at the same level of cultivation would find it very difficult to deal with demonic beasts. Just as the two women gazed at Lin An in amazement, the demonic fish that was running for its life suddenly spoke, “Human, don’t go too far!” “Go too far? Aren’t you the one who wanted to eat me? Don’t you think you crossed the line when you attacked me?” Lin An cursed back. Gradually, his lighting avatar got closer and closer to the demonic beast. Once he was within reach, Lin An lifted the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand and suddenly slashed it. In the next second, the river was cut off, and the strange fish was also cut in half. The two young women who had been hiding in the shadows by the side of the road were shocked beyond words. Lin An had killed a nascent soul stage demonic beast with just one slash. The river had also been temporarily cut off because of the overly powerful impact from Lin An’s strike. What kind of terrifying force had he used? Even as he had been chasing after the strange fish, Lin An had already sensed the two people hiding in the shadows. However, since they had not shown an intention to harm him, he had no interest in caring about them. He was about to turn around and leave when the voices of the two women suddenly rang out behind him. “Fellow Daoist! Can you help us?” Lin An turned around and looked at the two women who were deliberately trying to hide their appearances. “What’s the matter?” His voice was clear and calm, just like the mountain stream in the early morning. After a few seconds, one lady said, “To be honest, my sister, and I were originally from the Imperial City. We were out on a mission and didn’t expect to be ambushed by our enemies. Our servants and guards were all killed in battle before we managed to escape. However, the crisis hasn’t been resolved yet. I wonder if you can escort the two of us back to the capital. I will definitely return the favor!” Lin An was stunned when he heard the lady’s words. Had the two women escaped from the ghastly attack that he had seen upstream? The encounter seemed to be too much of a coincidence. Lin An quickly thought about the lady’s proposal and felt that since he would have to pass by the Imperial City to return to the Jiuxiao Sect, he could lend a hand to the two ladies. Therefore, he agreed to their request. The woman was very touched when she heard Lin An grant her request, and she and quickly promised, “I will definitely remember your actions. When we return to the Imperial City, I will definitely return the favor!” Lin An was about to say something polite, but suddenly, a few figures appeared in the distance, and they turned into a blood-red light before flying towards them at an astonishing speed. Even as the cultivators drew closer, Lin An couldn’t see their faces clearly. Each of them was wearing a mask and a black robe, and the fluctuations around them indicated that they were all in the nascent soul cultivation stage! The black-robed cultivators did not say a single word. As assassins, they paid the most attention to efficiency, and they never communicated with their targets. In an instant, they turned into a bloody light, and the tip of their knives pointed straight towards Lin An’s heart. “Let’s go!” When they saw the black-robed assassins, the two sisters jumped up from their original positions and fled into the depths of the forest. Boom! A few seconds after the two sisters escaped, an explosive sound suddenly came from behind them. It sounded like a thousand-meter-high waterfall that had flown through a deep valley. Immediately, a flash of lightning blasted behind them. The two sisters were shocked, and when they turned around, they opened their mouths in amazement. Lin An was covered in blood, and he was holding a long green sword like a god of war who had survived a vicious battlefield. To their surprise, he was wearing a relaxed smile as he followed them. Immediately, the two sisters’ hearts pounded like huge drums. In just a few brief moments, more than a dozen elite assassins had lost their lives at Lin An’s hands. “How...; How is this possible?” Their minds went blank on the spot, and their faces were filled with apprehension as they muttered amongst themselves. Lin An, who was only at the peak of the golden core stage, had single-handedly killed all the nascent soul assassins as if they were ants. Throughout their lifetime, the two sisters had never experienced such a suffocating feeling of power. ...; Even if Lin An and the two sisters traveled day and night, it would still take them six days to return to the Imperial City. They galloped for three days and two nights, but the elder of the two sisters finally couldn’t hold on any longer, and she asked the others if she could take a break. The three of them found a place and planned to rest for a while. Just as they sat down, Lin An heard some conversations coming from some nearby cultivators. “My fellow Daoists, let’s speed up our journey. Right now, the Imperial City is probably packed with cultivators from all directions.” “That’s right. The Hundred Flowers Valley is one of the three great sects in the Ghana Empire. They only recruit disciples once every one hundred years. It’s said that there are countless geniuses in their sects. Even the princess from our country once entered their sect to practice.” “Moreover, the Hundred Flowers Valley only opens fifty trial points at a time. The trial points are scattered all over the continent. Right now, the station at the Imperial City is the only one that is within my range. I’m afraid that the people who will travel to the city will be too qualified.” “Don’t worry! With our cultivation level, we will inevitably qualify for the first round of the trial. Everyone, do your best!” “Yes! Do your best!” ...; After listening to the cultivators’ conversations, Lin An understood the details about the Hundred Flowers Valley trial. It was a big event for the sect to recruit new disciples. The event was only held once every one hundred years, and each time, some trial points would be randomly set up all over the Cangyun Continent. Only the well-informed cultivators managed to track the location of the trial points, and those who didn’t have any connections could only rely on fate. After Lin An arrived at the Imperial City, he parted ways with the two sisters and decided to look for the Hundred Flowers Valley trial site. After going around the mountain path and branching into a forest path, Lin An saw a shade of green. The path was covered with withered yellow leaves, and it was quiet all around. At that moment, he saw a group of people standing a few meters in front of him. One of them pointed forward and said, “The trial site is right in front of us. It is said that once a cultivator crosses the entrance, they encounter a sea of fire. Only those who pass through the sea of fire are eligible for the trial. Moreover, I heard that the sea of fire is extremely strange. It is impossible to resist it by only using our spiritual energy.” Everyone looked up, and indeed, they saw a barrier in front of them. The barrier separated the outside world from the sea of fire, and it also protected unsuspecting cultivators from accidentally entering and dying in the sea of fire. One cultivator standing beside the path then continued, “Does anyone have any good magic weapons? The power of this sea of fire formation is not to be underestimated. Even a nascent soul stage cultivator wouldn’t dare to step into it blindly. This barrier is actually testing our countermeasures. We cannot be careless.” A young man, who was wearing a white robe, stepped out from the group. He took out a fire repelling pearl from his pocket and looked at the barrier in front of him with high spirits. “Fellow Daoists, I will take my leave first. Let’s meet again later!” After he finished speaking, the white-robed youth directly stepped towards the barrier. Boom! The sound of burning flames came from the barrier’s temporarily opening, and a hot gust of wind blew onto the faces of the cultivators outside the barrier. The white-robed youth’s expression froze. He quickly activated the fire repelling pearl in his hand, and a blue light surged out and enveloped him. Once the light had covered his entire body, the white-robed youth’s confidence was boosted, and he stepped into the sea of fire. “Fellow Daoists, I’m going too!” At that moment, another cultivator stepped out. He stood in front of the sea of fire and took out a transparent raincoat. After putting on the raincoat, the eager cultivator stepped into the sea of fire. Several flames attached themselves onto his body, but they were all absorbed by the raincoat. When the remaining cultivators saw the raincoat, they were all envious Then, after discussing among themselves, they all walked towards the sea of fire. Their expressions had all turned serious, and they displayed all kinds of magic treasures as they charged into the sea of fire. “Everyone, it’s almost time.” A few meters from the barrier, Lin An stood silently and observed the scene. After all the cultivators had charged towards the sea of fire, he concluded that they had successfully passed through the formation and qualified for the next stage. However, just as Lin An was about to turn back, the aura on his body suddenly soared. Suddenly, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword on his waist vibrated before it flew into his palm with a swoosh, and he gripped it tightly. Abruptly, an invisible hurricane surrounded his entire body, and his clothes fluttered in the wind. He raised the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and his eyes flashed with a bright light as he slashed it to the ground. “Hurricane Sword technique, open!” Boom! The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword let out a crisp chime. The Hurricane Sword technique had caused Lin An’s spiritual energy to surge wildly, and after he slashed down his sword, a white line suddenly appeared in the sea of fire formation. After a few seconds, the white line rapidly expanded and gradually split the sea of fire into two. Bang! An earth-shattering sound rang out in the sea of fire. Afterward, an invisible and violent wave of air surged out from the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and a large fire proof zone appeared in the sea of fire. It seemed as if the entire sea of fire had actually been forcefully torn apart! A two-meter-deep giant crack that extended from Lin An’s feet to the end of the sea of fire had been formed. “Gulp!” The few cultivators who had just entered the sea of fire swallowed their saliva with great difficulty, and they were all stunned. The cultivators stared blankly at the crack as they tried to come to terms with Lin An’s actions. At the eye of the sea of fire formation, the two female disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley who had been tasked to maintain the formation were stupefied. “How...; How is this possible? What did I just see?” “Did he just split the sea of fire with only one strike?” The earth-shattering strike from the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword had caused everyone to fall into silence. The scene was so quiet that one could hear a pin drop. It was too terrifying! Lin An had to be a monster! His actions were too terrifying! The aspiring disciples all felt that even a nascent soul stage cultivator could not withstand the power of Lin An’s sword strike. The cultivators among the crowd who had high cultivation levels looked at each other in surprise. Their faces were full of bitterness and shock, and they remained speechless for a long time. At that moment, everyone had a strange feeling in their hearts. The young man who had broken through the sea of fire with one sword strike seemed to be different from the other golden core stage cultivators! When Lin An crossed the sea of fire and landed beside the other cultivators, he could feel their icy stares scanning his entire body. “Eh, fellow Daoist, what a stroke of luck!” The other cultivators squeaked as they tried to find the right words to flatter Lin An. However, they couldn’t find any adjectives to describe him. In the end, they could only say dryly, “That was a powerful move. You were very lucky...;” On his part, Lin An hurriedly said a few humble words to acknowledge their praise. “Whoosh!” Just as Lin An was conversing with the cultivators, a figure suddenly flashed in front of them. His speed was as fast as a shooting star, and in a few breaths, he had arrived in front of everyone. Judging from the man’s uniform, he was also a disciple from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. He looked to be the disciple in charge of the trial site, and judging from his aura, he wasn’t below the nascent soul stage. It was clear that the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect was extremely powerful. Even a disciple whose only responsibility was to maintain order had such a high cultivation level. When the disciple scanned his surroundings, he was first attracted by the gigantic crack that had formed on the ground. He frowned and asked in the direction of the sea of fire formation, “What’s going on?” Suddenly, a burst of light shone from the formation’s eye, and soon after, the two female disciples who were responsible for maintaining the normal operation of the formation walked out. There were still traces of shock on their faces. After they came out, they first glanced at Lin An before saying to the nascent soul cultivator, “This is...; His sword split it open.” As the female cultivator spoke, she pointed at Lin An. “Sword?” The nascent soul cultivator was first stunned, and he quickly turned his gaze toward Lin An. However, Lin An apologetically cupped his hands toward the Hundred Flowers Valley disciple. “You’re out. Wait here for my eldest senior brother to punish you,” the disciple said directly to Lin An. When he heard the disciple’s words, Lin An’s face immediately darkened. The two female disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect were slightly stunned. They looked at Lin An and then at the senior brother as if they wanted to say something, but they hesitated and remained silent. “I just want to ask, did you set a rule that a cultivator can’t break the sea of fire spell formation when you set up the trial? If you did, then forgive me for not obeying.” “Hmph!” The nascent soul stage cultivator snorted coldly. He raised his hand and gathered a blast of vast natural spiritual energy out of thin air. Suddenly, a flying sword was suspended in front of him. A sparkling and translucent green light shone on it, and his mana appeared to forge with the sword. “This...; This is the Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword!” When they heard the words, several challengers immediately cried out in surprise. The Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword possessed powerful offensive power, and with the addition of the disciple’s spiritual energy, the sword was not only a lethal weapon, but it was also a healing object. It could kill the enemy and simultaneously regenerate itself all at the same time. Because of the uniqueness of the Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword, a majority of the cultivators from the other sects on the Cangyun Continent couldn’t match up to the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples in a battle. Additionally, the senior brother from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect was also a nascent soul-stage powerhouse. The few challengers immediately felt that Lin An, who had been in the limelight a few moments ago, was going to be unlucky. After all, he was only a cultivator at the peak of the golden core stage. Whoosh! The senior brother from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect waved his hand, and the flying sword hovering next to him let out a clear chime and suddenly charged toward Lin An with bursts of light. “Ha! Petty tricks!” Lin An snorted coldly. He unsheathed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword from his waist and suddenly slashed forward. It was just a simple slash, but a violent and terrifying aura had been released from the strike. Boom! With a muffled sound, Lin An’s strike cut the extremely powerful Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword in half. Even though the Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword was a top-grade weapon, it couldn’t compare to the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, which had the strength equivalent to a third-level nascent soul stage cultivator. The violent power released after the two swords collided caused the expressions of the two female disciples to change. Their hearts were filled with shock, and they felt as if they had just seen a grim reaper wave his hand. “Senior Brother, be careful!” The two female disciples cried out in alarm! The expression of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect senior brother did not change. His figure instantly turned into a blur, and the green light he had transformed into slowly drifted backward. Suddenly, a violent power spread out and passed through the green light, but it did not cause any injuries to the Hundred Flowers Valley senior brother. “Eh? What a powerful technique!” Lin An was a little surprised. The green light had actually protected the nascent soul stage disciple, and the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s attack had no effect on him. The exchange once again proved that the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect’s foundation was extraordinary. The nascent soul stage senior brother was stronger than all the nascent soul cultivators that Lin An had encountered in his past battles. Of course, Saint Zi Yan wasn’t included in that list since she had lowered her cultivation to the peak of the golden core stage. However, Lin An wasn’t sure about the extent of Saint Zi Yan’s power. The Hundred Flowers Valley Sect’s senior brother only recovered after landing a few hundred meters away. After experiencing the power of Lin An’s powerful strike, he didn’t dare to act rashly anymore. He only stared at Lin An with a fearful expression. The nascent soul stage cultivator understood that Lin An hadn’t used his full strength in their previous confrontation. However, his strongest magic treasure, the Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword, had been destroyed. That could only mean that his strength was far inferior to Lin An’s. The two female disciples had also been greatly frightened. After their senior brother’s Hundred Flowers Spirit Sword had been cut in half, they had thought that he was going to die on the spot. Fortunately, the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect’s techniques were exquisite, and they had allowed their senior brother to escape death. Lin An’s powerful strength and decisive ruthlessness had also left a deep impression in the hearts of the two female cultivators. On their part, the challengers at the side were completely dumbfounded. They had thought that even if Lin An could survive the attack from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect’s senior brother, he would still be severely injured. However, they hadn’t expected that Lin An would defeat the nascent soul stage disciple after only one round. He has also destroyed the disciple’s most valuable treasure. The cultivators all felt that Lin An seemed to be too powerful! “I really didn’t expect that he could be so strong even though he is at the golden core stage!” The challengers couldn’t help but mutter in a low voice. Whoosh! At that moment, another handsome figure floated down from the sky above. In an instant, the white-robed man, who had starry brows and sword-like eyes, landed between Lin An and the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect senior brother. Lin An guessed that the man was the eldest senior brother that the nascent soul stage cultivator had mentioned. Sure enough, the two female disciples and the nascent soul cultivator both bowed their heads in fear. However, the eldest senior brother didn’t respond to the two female cultivators. His deep eyes looked at the nascent soul stage senior brother, and he said calmly, “I asked you to come down and see what happened. Is this how you work for me?” The nascent soul stage disciple immediately lowered his head and cupped his hands toward the eldest senior brother. “Please punish me, eldest senior brother!” “You didn’t provoke me, so why are you asking for my punishment?” Suddenly, the eldest senior brother turned and pointed at Lin An. “You should apologize to him!” The nascent soul stage disciple was instantly shocked. He couldn’t believe the instructions he had received, but he didn’t dare to refute the eldest senior brother’s decision. He clenched his fists and slowly walked towards Lin An. After he lowered his head, he said in a meek voice, “I’m sorry, fellow Daoist. I was too rude!” The change in the nascent soul stage disciple’s attitude was really hard for everyone to imagine. The eldest senior brother from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect had actually asked his own disciple to apologize to an outsider? It seemed to be a rare act of reasoning that went against the ruthless nature of the cultivation world. At the same time, it also indirectly proved that Lin An’s strength was so intimidating that the eldest senior brother wouldn’t dare to provoke him. Since the nascent soul stage disciple had already apologized, Lin An didn’t bother too much. He accompanied the other aspiring cultivators as they walked towards the registration area for the second stage of the trial. After Lin An and the other aspiring cultivators left, the smile on the eldest senior brother’s face gradually faded, and he became expressionless. “That cultivator’s strength is not simple. Even if I were to face him, my chances of losing the battle were very high. That is why I wanted you to apologize.” The eldest senior brother explained calmly. “What?” The nascent soul stage disciple and the other two female disciples who were in charge of maintaining the sea of fire formation immediately exclaimed in shock. “Eldest senior brother, you are at the fifth level of the original infant stage. That cultivator is only at the peak of the golden core stage. How could you lose to him?” The nascent soul stage disciple asked in disbelief. The eldest senior brother glanced at him indifferently and replied, “I’m afraid that he didn’t even use thirty percent of his strength during your sword fight. If he had used his full strength, I’m afraid I wouldn’t have been able to block it.” The terrifying sword hadn’t even reach thirty percent of its power. When he heard the statement, the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciple was astonished, and a cold sweat broke out on his back. The eldest senior brother’s confession had sent waves of lingering fear all over his body. ...; After a few moments, one of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples appeared and explained the contents of the second test to Lin An and the other cultivators. “In the valley behind me, there’s a spiritual herb called the starlight grass. This grass only grows by absorbing the essence of the stars and the moon. It’s extremely rare in the world, and its uses are very limited since it can only be used in one prescription. However, the effects of that prescription are not simple. Therefore, the second round of the trial is for all of you to form teams and enter the valley. Each team will be limited to six people. As long as one person from each team can find the starlight grass, all the other members will be considered to have passed the test.” One of the cultivators behind Lin An shook his head and sighed, “This starlight grass is extremely difficult to find. Although it can grow anywhere, the grass doesn’t grow uniformly. It is said that within a thousand miles, only one starlight grass can survive.” Lin An immediately laughed. The trial was practically tailor made for him. In terms of solving puzzles, there were very few cultivators who could compare to him. He immediately stepped through the barrier and entered the valley. To his surprise, there were many people in the valley. The entire mountain peak was populated with cultivators from the foundation establishment stage to the golden core stage. There were even a few nascent soul stage cultivators who were taking part in the trial. Lin An was a little stunned. The Hundred Flowers Valley Sect was so popular. Countless cultivators had signed up for the sect’s trial. In Lin An’s memory, every time the Jiuxiao Sect recruited new disciples, the total number of aspiring cultivators who signed up wouldn’t surpass one thousand. Some of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples in the crowd were busy handing out team tokens to the cultivators who wanted to complete the trial. Lin An took a glance and walked towards one of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples. A long line had already formed in front of the disciple, and Lin An felt that it would take quite a while before it was his turn. Fortunately, although there were many cultivators in the line, there were basically six people in a team, and they quickly left after receiving their tokens. Suddenly, a few burly figures cut the line in front of Lin An. The other party had the upper hand, and without waiting for Lin An to speak, he said, “Kid, if you know what’s good for you, then stay put. Otherwise, when we enter the mountain later, there will be a lot of suffering for you.” Lin An glanced at them indifferently, and he was immediately amused. The six cultivators were all at the golden core stage. Even with their lousy cultivation levels, they had still dared to jump the queue ahead of Lin An. However, he didn’t flare up immediately. If he fought with the burly man before they entered the valley, they would both lose their qualifications to take part in the trial. It was better to wait until they entered the valley and then have a taste of the “suffering” that the burly man had promised. When Lin An reached the front of the queue, he saw that the person in charge of registering the aspirants was a young female disciple. She had a pretty face, but her brows were tightly furrowed, and she seemed to have a bad temper. The adolescent female disciple raised her head and looked at Lin An indifferently as she coldly said, “Tell me the names of all the members of your team.” “My name is Lin An. I’m the only one.” The woman couldn’t help but be stunned when she heard this. “You’re the only one?” “Yes.” “Are you sure?” “Yes.” As soon as she said this, the surrounding cultivators immediately burst into laughter. “Haha! Is this kid stupid?” “He’s really out of his mind. He actually wants to enter the valley alone.” “Even if we enter the valley in groups of six, we can’t guarantee that we’ll be able to find the starlight grass in six hours. Does he know that if he enters the valley alone, he’ll only have two hours?” “Also, does he know about the dangers lurking around in the valley?” “This kid’s cultivation level is quite high, but I didn’t expect him to be so stupid. Young Man, I advise you to quickly recruit a team.” ...; Lin An’s lips curled up as he scanned the cultivators around him and said, “I think I can find the magic herb in two hours.” After he spoke, he flung his sleeves and grabbed a wooden tablet from the young female disciple’s table. He then took a step forward and headed towards the valley. Because of Lin Ans’ words, the news about his decision instantly spread among the other cultivators. “Hey, did you hear? There’s a young man who actually came to challenge the second stage alone!” “Haha, I was there. I’ve been happy about this for a long time. How can he be so stupid?” “That’s right. He will only have one-sixth of our time to clear the stage. That young man is really stupid.” “Yo, look! Isn’t he the person in front of us?” “Hey! Where are you going? Damn, it really is him!” ...; As Lin An walked towards the valley, a success rate system notification popped up on the virtual screen. [If you continue to walk forward, the probability of obtaining the starlight grass will increase to 74%.] A satisfied smile appeared on Lin An’s face. The foolish cultivators did not know that he had a secret cheat code. Even as they were laughing at him, Lin An knew that he would have the final bragging rights. After walking into the valley, Lin An realized that a huge spell formation had covered the entire mountain. He carefully followed the guidance of the success rate system, and he walked towards a sparsely populated area. Suddenly, he came upon two groups of cultivators who appeared to be having a heated argument. A group of golden core stage cultivators had surrounded a group of foundation establishment cultivators, and one of the foundation establishment cultivators, who was a woman with an extraordinary temperament, said angrily, “Don’t go too far!” “What do you mean by go too far? We clearly saw this starlight grass first, but you guys suddenly jumped out and beat us to it. You are really immoral. You guys better hurry up and hand it over.” Lin An felt that the words of the golden core stage cultivators were very reasonable. Whoever had seen the starlight grass first had the right to claim it. Thus, Lin An spoke up in a confident tone. “Hey! What are you guys doing? It’s fine to quarrel, but the problem is that you guys are arguing over my starlight grass!” The cultivators present all turned around and looked at Lin An in shock. However, under the guidance of the success rate system, Lin An reasoned that he had seen the starlight grass as soon as he had entered the valley. Therefore, since the golden core stage cultivators had applied the principle that whoever had seen the starlight grass first had the right to claim it, Lin An felt that the starlight grass belonged to him! Everyone looked towards Lin An in confusion. They all felt that he was too shameless! Just as the cultivators were in a daze, one of the golden core stage cultivators recognized Lin An. He had been at the scene when Lin An had split open the sea of fire formation with a single sword strike. The golden core stage cultivator had also witnessed Lin An defeat the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples. In the end, the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect’s eldest senior brother had asked his own disciple to apologize to Lin An. “Kid, I advise you to mind your own business. If you know what’s good for you, then scram.” One of the golden core stage cultivators said sternly. The expression of the golden core stage cultivator who had witnessed Lin An’s previous actions immediately changed, and he hurriedly pulled the cultivator who had scolded Lin An and said hurriedly, “Brother Li, forget it! Forget it!” However, the arrogant cultivator completely ignored him and said with a cold snort, “I think this kid doesn’t know what it means to have the courage of a leopard after eating a bear’s heart. He still dares to stand in front of us. We must teach him a lesson.” “Don’t provoke him any further!” The cultivator who was familiar with Lin An shouted out in fear. His tone was extremely stern as he addressed his companions. His golden-core stage companions were all stunned. Even the foundation establishment cultivators, who had been surrounded by the golden core stage cultivators, were perplexed. They didn’t know what had happened to the frightened golden core stage cultivator. Lin An stood a few meters away from the group and held the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword by his waist as he looked at the cultivators with a smile. However, the frightened cultivator couldn’t feel the warmth in Lin An’s warm smile. Instead, he felt as if the grim reaper was smiling at the group. The scared cultivator instantly felt a burst of cold sweat run down his back. His intuition told him that he couldn’t stay among his companions any longer, so he quickly cupped his hands towards Lin An and said, “Brother Lin, what a coincidence. So, you were the first to see this starlight prairie. No wonder I felt that it was so imposing! Oh, right! I suddenly remembered that I still have something to do, so I’ll take my leave!” After he spoke, the frightened cultivator quickly stepped onto his flying sword like a startled bird and flew away unsteadily. Lin An couldn’t help but chuckle when he saw the cultivator’s mediocre flying skills. The other golden core stage cultivators watched their companion leave the scene and suddenly had blank expressions on their faces. They looked at the escaping cultivator in confusion and then turned their gazes toward Lin An. No matter how hard they tried to reason together, they all felt that Lin An wasn’t a tremendous threat to them. At most, he was at the peak of the golden core stage. Other than that, they couldn’t see anything else that would make their companion panic and escape. Instantly, all the cultivators present were confused. However, there wasn’t much time left for them to react. In the next second, Lin An’s figure had blurred, leaving only a trail of lightning on the ground. Suddenly, he dashed toward the aspiring disciples. The few golden core cultivators didn’t realize what was happening. Some of them reacted and spun around, only to see that the starlight grass had disappeared. When they turned back again, they saw Lin An standing at his original spot, and he was holding the starlight grass in his hand. From the moment he had vanished to when he had reappeared again, the entire process had only taken the space of one breath, so much so that the golden core stage cultivators had turned around twice, but they hadn’t seen Lin An attack at all. The foundation establishment cultivators were also stunned. They didn’t know any profound movement techniques, but just from the round-trip that Lin An had displayed, they could already see the difference between him and the golden core cultivators who were standing in front of them. It was like the difference between the clouds and the mud. Even though Lin An and the golden core stage cultivators were in the same cultivation level, they were no longer on the same level of strength. At the same time, the golden core cultivators’ eyes were filled with anger, and they looked at Lin An with dark expressions. “Don’t tell me you want to fight with us?” One golden core stage cultivator asked. His tone was full of arrogance and anger. Lin An couldn’t even be bothered to lift his eyelids as he said calmly, “Fight with you? Are you even worthy? You’re just a weakling. I can destroy you with a single strike.” “Hmph! What big words!” Instantly, the few golden core stage cultivators shouted together. “The cultivator who escaped is most likely this person’s accomplice. They joined forces to put on a show just to scare us.” “I don’t believe that he can cope with us all at once. Let’s attack together!” “Kill!” Immediately, the golden core stage cultivators attacked decisively. Their movement techniques generated the sounds of wind and thunder as they charged towards Lin An. They didn’t believe that Lin An could be any stronger than the combined power of their attack. Instantly, the combined attacks of the five cultivators generated many sword shadows that instantly surrounded Lin An. The dense sword shadows, combined with the power from the attackers’ cultivation techniques, formed a dense attack net around Lin An and made it impossible for him to escape. When the foundation establishment cultivators saw the effectiveness of the attack, their faces instantly turned pale. “What good teamwork! Looking at their proficiency, these five cultivators probably fight together often, and they have already honed their common attack techniques.” “That peak golden core stage cultivator still wants to fight five opponents at once. This time, he has encountered a tough challenge.” “These five cultivators are probably even harder to defeat than my senior brothers from my previous sect.” “That kid should use his terrifying speed to escape. He can’t defeat his five opponents in a head-on fight.” ...; Buzz! The soft hum of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword suddenly rang out. Lin An unsheathed his sword and gently waved it at the attacking golden core stage disciples. Suddenly, a vast and mighty power spread out from his body and caused the dried leaves on the ground to flutter wildly. In the next moment, a terrifying aura suddenly enveloped the area and pounced toward the few golden core stage cultivators. Their faces turned ashen, and under the encirclement of Lin An’s power, they felt as if they were about to suffocate. Instantly, a strong sense of danger assaulted their hearts. “This is bad! Everyone, proceed with caution!” One cultivator shouted in alarm. However, it was too late. All the golden core cultivators suddenly felt their vision darken, and then, in the next instant, they saw a pair of eyes that were filled with killing intent flash infront of them. “No...;” The golden core stage cultivators let out an unwilling roar. Abruptly, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword generated blood-red sword shadows that blotted out the sky and covered the earth as they pressed down on the cultivators. Afterward, the sword’s violent aura immediately stirred up a storm. Pfft! Pfft! Pfft! Pfft! Pfft! Lin An’s sword cut off the vitality of the five golden core stage cultivators. In the next instant, the success rate system’s notifications rang out in his ears. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty lucky draw coins!] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lucky draw coins!] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-three lucky draw coins!] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-four lottery coins!] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lottery coins!] Several meters from the scene, the few foundation establishment stage cultivators looked at Lin An with dumbfounded expressions. They had originally thought that Lin An could only rely on his extremely high movement techniques to escape. However, they hadn’t expected him to brazenly attack and kill all five golden core stage cultivators with just one strike. The terrifying sequence had been extremely shocking. The foundation establishment stage cultivators sensed the lingering killing intent on Lin An’s body, and they instantly trembled! “Sigh, fellow Daoists, let’s go somewhere else and continue our search. Maybe, we can find another starlight grass,” one of the foundation establishment cultivators said to his companions with a bitter smile. “Mm...;” His colleagues nodded in unison. They didn’t dare to ask Lin An for the starlight grass that he had already plucked since the bodies of the golden core stage cultivators on the ground were still warm! At that moment, the success rate system notifications sounded in Lin An’s ears. When he turned around and saw that the foundation establishment cultivators were about to leave, he immediately asked in a puzzled voice, “Hey, why are you guys leaving? Don’t you want this starlight grass?” The foundation establishment cultivators immediately stopped in their tracks and turned around to look at Lin An in fear. To their surprise, Lin An threw the starlight grass towards them. “Take it. I can find another herb easily.” The six foundation establishment cultivators couldn’t believe their eyes. Lin An had fought the five golden core stage cultivators with great difficulty because of the starlight grass. Why would he give it away so easily? When the starlight grass landed in their hands, the cultivators were delighted, and they quickly bowed to Lin An. “Thank you for your help, senior. We will definitely remember this favor in our hearts!” They seemingly thought that Lin An was an old monster who had the ability to retain his looks, but in fact, he was actually younger than them. After parting ways with the foundation establishment cultivators, Lin An saw a few cultivators on the other side of the valley who were desperately searching for the starlight grass. “This starlight grass is too rare. After searching for so long, we haven’t even seen a single trace of it.” “It’s also because our luck is too bad.” “No, it’s because the starlight grass is too rare. That is why the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect uses the herb as a test item.” “Sigh, let’s take a break and then split up. This way, we can increase our chances of finding it.” At that moment, the tired cultivators saw Lin An walk past them. Suddenly, he bent down and pushed one rock aside and revealed a starlight grass that had been covered up! “F*ck! A starlight grass!” The nearby cultivators immediately cried out in surprise. However, they immediately realized their oversight and quickly covered their mouths. However, it was too late. Dozens of cultivators in the surroundings had heard their cry, and they rushed towards them. As the incoming cultivators surrounded the area, they noticed the starlight grass in Lin An’s hand. “Hey! Hand over the starlight grass obediently. Otherwise, don’t blame us for making a move!” “You’d better hand over the starlight grass voluntarily. Otherwise, no one will save you today.” “Take a good look at your current situation. There’s no way for you to escape. We’ll give you two seconds to consider. Hand over the starlight grass, and we’ll spare your life!” In just a few seconds, dozens of cultivators had simultaneously surged forward like a tide and surrounded Lin An. For the first time, he suddenly felt a sense of oppression due to the overwhelming number of cultivators who had surrounded him. In the encroaching cultivators’ eyes, Lin An had no way to escape. Even though he was facing some disadvantageous odds, Lin An looked at the cultivators and smiled disdainfully. “In my opinion, all of you are trash! Let’s get this over with. I’m in a hurry!” After he spoke, Lin An held the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and strolled forward. His long robe fluttered in the wind, and a domineering aura slowly spread out. Boom! A blue lightning stirred up Lin An’s body as he charged into the crowd. He held the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword horizontally in his hand like a sharp killing weapon, and the sword light it emitted swiftly sliced through the throats of the approaching cultivators. Poof! In the next moment, several shrieking cries rang out, and many cultivators died on the spot. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained seventeen lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained fifteen lottery coins.] [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained twenty-one lottery coins.] ...; After attacking the cultivators, Lin An felt that the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand had become sharper. Waves of blood-red life energy were infused into the transparent white crystal on the body of the sword, and Lin An sensed that the sword was close to breaking through the nascent soul stage. If there had been an infant transformation stage powerhouse present among the cultivators, Lin An would definitely have thought twice about launching an attack. However, there had been less than ten nascent soul stage cultivators in the crowd, and the rest had mostly been golden core stage and foundation establishment stage cultivators. Therefore, Lin An had gladly accepted their challenge. The fact that he would earn some easy lottery coins also motivated him. The situation had turned into a pure slaughter, and Lin An didn’t feel any pressure at all. The success rate system’s notifications kept ringing in his ear. The more Lin An killed, the more comfortable he became, and the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword increased its power. When he savored the power flowing through his body, Lin An felt that no one could stop him! Combined with the Lightning Dharma Body and the azure mantra’s speed treasure, Lin An easily dodged the joint attacks of the charging cultivators. Suddenly, at that moment, a few figures appeared in the sky. One cultivator raised his head and immediately recognized the identity of the flying cultivators. With a strong and hopeful voice, the cultivator shouted, “It’s the senior brothers and sisters from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. We’re saved! Senior brothers, senior sisters, please save us!” However, Lin An’s figure flashed in front of the cultivator, and with a flash of his sword’s light, he chopped off the shouting cultivator’s head. “No one can save you today!” Lin An said coldly as he wiped off the blood from his Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. Nevertheless, the remaining cultivators still felt that they had found some hope of survival. They continued shouting at the flying figures in the sky, “Senior brothers and sisters of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect, please save us!” “This person is a demon. He is bloodthirsty. Please send out the elders from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect to suppress him!” “I beg you. Please help us!” ...; In order to attract the attention of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples, the cultivators who were under siege began to fabricate facts and create rumors about Lin An. However, Lin An glanced at the sky and sneered. If the disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect interfered, he wouldn’t mind killing them as well. After all, he didn’t really want to become a Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciple. At worst, all the sect members would do was throw a tantrum and throw Lin An out of their trial. After the disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect landed, they were shocked by the bloody scene on the ground. In the end, after they investigated the incident, Lin An still received the qualification to advance to the third stage. Several Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples even gave him directions to the third stage of the trial. Throughout the investigation, Lin An had been confident that the facts were on his side. Since the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples had been reasonable, he wasn’t afraid of advancing to the next stage of the trial. After leaving the valley, Lin An followed the instructions he had received and walked for a while. After passing through a barrier, he arrived in front of a trial tower. There were a few cultivators who had also passed the second stage, and they were discussing several strategies on how they would tackle the trial tower stage. “This stage tests the strength of everyone’s souls. There are ten levels in the tower, and each level increases the pressure on a challenger’s soul. If the challenger can’t withstand the pressure, he or she is forcefully ejected from the trial tower.” “I heard that the highest result in the trial is the fourth level. Then, as long as we clear the third level, we have a very high chance of advancing.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Simple MTL <strong>Editor: </strong>Simple MTL When Lin An carefully observed the tower of trials, he discovered it wasn’t just a simple building, but it was in fact, a magic treasure! The fact that the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect had used such a large magic treasure as part of the trial was proof that it was a prestigious sect. Once Lin An had passed through the barrier and seen the tower of trials from afar, he had been instantly surprised. The tower was much bigger than he had imagined. It was so tall that it almost reached the clouds! Several colored lights circulated over the tower’s body, while the top of the tower was like a bottle lid, and it gave off a majestic aura. At that moment, the aspiring cultivators were standing outside the tower. Other than the disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect who were maintaining order, the rest were all waiting for the trial, or their fellow cultivators who had already taken part in the trial. As the cultivator’s eyes scanned the tower of trials, they occasionally let out a series of exclamations, but there would also be a few sounds of regret mixed in. “Right now, only two cultivators are persisting on the third level. I don’t know if anyone will graduate to the fourth level today.” “I’m afraid it will be difficult. There are already five nascent soul cultivators who have entered the tower, but not one of them has succeeded.” “This test is a bit biased. The strength of one’s soul isn’t only related to one’s cultivation level. For example, among the cultivators who are persisting on the third floor, one of them is in the golden core stage!” “It’s really enviable. With such a sturdy soul, I think that one can be trained to be an alchemist or a weapon master after joining the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect!” “Alchemists and weapon masters are simply too scarce. Even ten cultivators from the same realm are not as precious as an alchemist or a weapon master.” “Now, let’s see if any of you can persevere until you enter the fourth level. Once you enter the fourth level, you’ll definitely advance to the next stage of the trial.” After a few moments, one Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciple walked out and said in a clear voice, “The fifth round of the trial is about to begin. Fellow Daoists, please get ready.” Immediately, dozens of cultivators began to move. They quickly gathered all their tokens and walked towards the entrance of the tower of trials. Lin An patiently followed the crowd and joined the queue. “The trial will begin immediately!” A male disciple from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect shouted in a deep voice. At the same time, he took out an iron token and slapped it onto the tower of trials. Clang! A crisp sound rang out, and a ray of light flashed past the entrance of the tower. Suddenly, the dozens of long lines of cultivators were all swept into the tower of trials. Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! All the tokens that the cultivators had carried flew out and hovered outside the tower. The tokens were connected to the minds of the cultivators. As long as the cultivator passed a test, the token would rise by one level. Once Lin An entered the tower, he stopped for a moment. He didn’t have as much confidence in his soul power as he did in battle, so he planned to gather some tools first. However, when he stopped, he immediately attracted the attention of the cultivators around him. “Haha! I’m dying of laughter. Look, there’s a colleague who can’t even take the first step.” “Pfft! No way! It’s only the first level, and he can’t even take the first step? Isn’t he too weak?” “Yeah, even a foundation establishment cultivator can easily walk to the second level. This kid is at least at the peak of the golden core stage.” “I don’t think I’ve heard of any top cultivator who would stop at the first floor, let alone the first step!” “Young Man, congratulations, you’ve set a record, but it’s the lowest record ever.” The group of cultivators walked past Lin An with a mocking look on their faces and walked towards the second floor of the tower of trials with ease. ‘F*ck! You guys better remember this.’ Lin An secretly cursed before he activated the success rate system’s lucky draw function. He had already earned several thousand lucky draw coins from his previous battles, and after choosing to store one thousand coins as a backup, he then used another one thousand coins to draw the first lucky draw machine. The lucky draw machine only cost ten coins per draw, so Lin An directly drew it a hundred times. After that, he used the remaining coins to draw the second lucky draw machine. The second lucky draw machine cost a hundred coins per draw, so he only drew it ten times. As he scanned through the prizes he had drawn, Lin An found two items in the pile that would be useful to him in that moment. One prize was a soul-strengthening pill. A single pill could increase a cultivator’s soul power by one percent, and there were ten pills in the bottle. The prize had only cost Lin An ten lottery coins. The other prize was a soul-strengthening liquid. One bottle of the liquid could increase a cultivator’s soul power by one hundred and two percent, but the prize had cost Lin An one hundred lottery coins. After he had scanned the two prizes, Lin An chose to consume the bottle of soul strengthening elixir to test its effects. He opened the bottle and poured the elixir into his mouth. Then, he walked towards the second floor of the tower of trials. The taste of the soul-strengthening elixir was like that of a wild fruit. However, once the effects of the elixir took effect, Lin An felt as if his entire body had an endless amount of energy. His brain also felt hyperactive, and he quickly strode up the stairs on the second floor. “Eh? How can that kid move that fast?” “That’s right! It’s strange, he was clearly suppressed at the door just now, how can he move so quickly?” “Could it be that under the training of the tower of trials, he broke through his cultivation level?” “How is this possible? Although the tower of trials is full of mysteries, how can it have such a rapid breakthrough speed? Could it be an immortal artifact?” When the cultivators realized that Lin An had suddenly caught up to them, they immediately cried out in surprise. After Lin An entered the second level of the tower of trials, he discovered that many cultivators were stuck on that level. Everyone’s faces were filled with solemn expressions as they resisted the tower’s suppression. The cultivators who had just mocked Lin An were on the second level, and when he saw their consternated looks, he immediately let out a loud laugh. “Haha! I’m dying of laughter! Why are all of you standing still?” The cultivators were already under immense mental pressure, and after they saw Lin An’s smile, they couldn’t help but feel that the suppression of their soul power had become a little unbearable. They were instantly furious, and they all turned around to glare at Lin An, but in the next moment, they were stunned by what they saw. Lin An was walking towards them with an evil look on his face, pretending to be a hooligan. They couldn’t believe that the suppression of the tower of trials didn’t have much effect on him. “How is this possible?” “Wasn’t he suppressed on the first floor? Why is he still here? He suddenly seems so relaxed!” When he heard the cultivators’ words, Lin An laughed disdainfully, “I was just renewing my energy, but I never thought that you guys would be such vile people! Once you saw that my energy was low, you spared no effort to mock me and hurt me. You caused a huge injury to my immature mind, so how are you going to compensate me?” The other challengers were stunned for a moment, but then, they laughed fearlessly, “What do you think you can do in a place like this? If you dare to use a spell to attack us, the tower of trials will immediately send us out together. With your spiritual power, you might have a chance to break through to the fourth level, right? Don’t tell me you want to die together with us?” Lin An couldn’t help but be startled when he heard the cultivator’s words. The contestants in the tower of trials weren’t allowed to use spells? What kind of bullsh*t rule was that? He also wondered why the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples had failed to explain all the rules before the cultivators had entered the tower. Seeing that Lin An was in a daze, the cultivators continued to mock him. “What? You don’t dare? Anyway, our chances of breaking through to the third level aren’t high. If you want the tower of trials to send you out along with us, we don’t mind.” Immediately, the cultivators burst into laughter. Lin An looked at them for a while and realized that they were all tensed up. Despite their mocking words, they all seemed to be under immense pressure. He instantly understood and turned his gaze towards a corner. The few challengers’ furrowed brows relaxed, and they heaved a sigh of relief in their hearts. Although they had said that they weren’t afraid of getting kicked out together with Lin An, they still wanted to take the test properly in order to obtain a chance to enter the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. ...; Outside the tower of trials, everyone was discussing the progress of the previous batch of challengers. However, the tower suddenly emitted a bright light, and a figure directly teleported to the outside. “Huh? What’s going on? I haven’t even completed one-third of the progress of the second level. How did I fail the challenge?” “This is the lowest record in the trial’s history. Looks like this guy won’t be entering the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect.” Instantly, everyone was shocked. However, after the challenger landed, his face was filled with anger and grievance, and he directly shouted at the few Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples who were maintaining order around the tower of trials, “Senior brothers and sisters, I want to file a complaint. Someone inside the tower was eating stinky tofu in front of me. It stunk, and it seriously affected my ability to concentrate on resisting the suppression of my soul. I request to retake the test!” When they heard the cultivator’s grievance, the other aspiring cultivators were surprised. The few Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples were also a little stunned. After all, they had never encountered such an incident before. Under the suppression of the tower of trials, there had actually been a cultivator who had the leisure to eat smelly tofu? After the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples discussed among themselves for a moment, one disciple stepped forward and said, “The rules did not specify that cultivators may not eat during the trial. We do not consider this a serious interference factor. Moreover, you were only at the second level. To be bounced out by such a minor factor is proof that you are too weak.” Whoosh! At that moment, the tower of trials emitted another ray of light, and it ejected another figure from the second level. The second cultivator’s face was also full of anger and unwillingness. As soon as he landed, he did the same thing as the previously ejected cultivator and directly shouted at the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples, “Senior brothers and sisters, there’s someone inside who seriously interfered with my progress. I request to retake the test!” The Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciple frowned and said coldly, “Eating doesn’t count.” “Eating?” The cultivator looked at the cultivators in astonishment and immediately said angrily, “Eating stinky tofu is one thing, but that person even added something into it. That smell was worse than horse sh*t!” As the cultivator spoke, he seemed to relive the smell, and he immediately squatted to one side and gagged desperately. Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Suddenly, the body of the tower of trials shone brightly. Other than Lin An’s wooden token, the other wooden tokens were all absorbed by the tower. Afterward, a large group of cultivators was sent out at the same time, and their faces were full of grievance and resentment. Before they could finish speaking, they all squatted down to retch. “The second level stinks more than a public toilet that has never been cleaned before! Senior brothers and sisters, we request a reassessment!” A few cultivators shouted weakly at the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples. At that moment, Lin An was standing in the tower and looking at the people who had been teleported out. He held a bottle of medicine in his hand, and a wicked smile formed on his face. “Hmph! The hundred lottery coins I spent on this bottle of super-invincible stinky tofu and flavored water were good value. It can increase the smell of stinky tofu by a thousand times! Didn’t you want to fight me? Well, I chose to stink you to death!” Lin An then stored the flavored water in the success rate system’s storage space. After entering the third level of the tower of trials, he took off the mask that he had put on his face to isolate the smell. He had also drawn the mask from the lottery, and without it, he would not have been able to withstand the stinky tofu’s smell. After Lin An entered the third level, he experienced a majestic pressure that pressed against his body. As Lin An advanced step by step, the suppressive force felt like a raging wave, and it continuously suppressed his body. “Look, isn’t he suppressed! How did he get suppressed again not long after he stepped into the third level? It was clearly very easy for him on the second level.” “Looks like he pretended that it was easy on the second level, but in the end, he couldn’t continue to pretend on the third level.” “But with his peak golden core stage cultivation, he should be qualified to enter the third level. As long as he walks a little further, he should be able to get the chance to enter the next level.” The crowd outside the tower saw that Lin An was stuck on the third level, and they discussed the situation. Some cultivators felt it was a pity that Lin An appeared on the verge of failure, while some were happy to see that he was struggling. Lin An stood on the third level of the tower of trials and felt his legs tremble. He gritted his teeth and took out the soul-strengthening liquid from the success rate system’s storage space. He quickly opened the lid and drank it. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for consuming the soul-strengthening liquid. Your soul strength has increased by 120%!] Boom! Lin An felt a powerful force spread out from his body. The force counteracted the suffocating pressure on his body, and he felt extremely relaxed again. The new feeling was basically no different from his experience outside the tower of trials. The people outside the tower watched as Lin An’s wooden token, which was already on the verge of collapse, suddenly returned to its path. They were all shocked and stared at Lin An’s wooden token in shock. “What...; What’s going on?” “In just a few breaths time, his soul power has actually become more than twice as strong!” “What happened? The tower of trials had clearly suppressed him, but now he’s suddenly exerting force. Was he pretending to be weak, or has he broken through again?” “This is too exaggerated. Look at that person. It’s as if he can’t feel the suppression of the tower of trials at all on the third level!” The exclamations that rang out from outside the tower showed the astonishment of the other cultivators. However, Lin An slowly walked up to the fourth level of the tower of trials with a heavy expression. The reason why Lin An’s expression was so heavy was that after drinking the spirit strengthening liquid, he had faintly sensed that there was another cultivator’s aura on a high level of the tower! Lin An wondered who the cultivator was, and how he had made it to the seventh level of the tower of trials! After Lin An’s soul power had strengthened by one hundred and twenty percent, he felt little pressure when he entered the fourth level. However, when he was close to the fifth level, the feeling that there was someone on the upper level became even stronger. “Looks like there is someone on the upper floors. I feel like I should go and take a look.” The suppressive force on the fifth floor increased by another level, and Lin An walked as if he was carrying a heavy load. Although his speed had decelerated, he could still move forward slowly. The scene immediately shocked everyone outside the tower. “Did I see an illusion? He can actually move forward on the fifth floor. How is this possible?” “Could it be that he’s going to break through to the sixth floor? Oh my God! How can a golden core stage cultivator do such a thing?” The cultivators outside the tower of trials were stunned. However, Lin An continued to move forward. The closer he got to the sixth floor, the more suppressed Lin An felt. It was as if he was stepping into a field that had been planted in early spring with his bare feet. Every step that he took felt extremely strenuous. Nevertheless, it wasn’t as if Lin An had gained nothing. He clearly felt that his soul power was gradually becoming stronger as he fought against the tower of trials. When he reached the bottom of the stairs that led to the sixth floor, Lin An was a little hesitant, and he looked up apprehensively. Based on the pressure that he had experienced on the fifth floor, it would be impossible for him to persevere on the sixth floor without using a treasure to boost his soul power. “Fellow Daoist!” The Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples below shouted at Lin An. “It’s really enviable for you to have such a level of soul power at such an age. However, it’s better not to go up to the sixth level. Only the elders of our sect, who are at least at the infant transformation stage, can go up to the sixth level. With your age, you can’t go up to the sixth level. Please, consider your own life!” Lin An chuckled and immediately took out a bottle of soul-strengthening liquid from the success rate system’s space. He opened the lid and poured it into his mouth before proceeding towards the sixth floor. The faces of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples instantly changed as they cried out in surprise, “Fellow Daoist Lin, we absolutely have no intention of scaring you on purpose. Every word we say is sincere. The soul suppression on the sixth floor is extremely terrifying. If the difference between the power of your soul and the suppression is too great, your soul will be compressed to the point of shattering before the tower of trials pops you out! You will be completely hopeless!” However, Lin An stopped and turned to address the concerned disciples. “The first time I went to a bathing center, I was also very scared. I gradually became brave, and once I put on that hand card, I instantly grew up. After I put on the hand card, I was no longer a boy. I immediately experienced the seven emotions and six desires of the human world. Therefore, all greatness comes from a brave challenge!” After he spoke, Lin An resolutely turned around and stepped onto the stairs that led to the sixth level! Outside the tower, the dumbfounded challengers, and the few Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples, watched on in disbelief. “All greatness comes from a courageous challenge. What a wise saying! I didn’t expect this cultivator’s literary talent to be so outstanding. The words that came out of his mouth are words that have been spoken for thousands of years!” “That’s right, and he also has the heart of a strong man, possessing the courage to challenge everything!” “It really makes us feel admiration!” “No wonder he’s so strong, so what he said was right, to cultivate the heart first! Without the heart of a brave man, how could he have the power to conquer the trial?” “That’s right, it really makes us feel ashamed!” Many immortal cultivators sighed with emotion as they mulled over Lin An’s bold words. “However, this young hero is probably being too arrogant this time. He definitely hasn’t heard of this tower of trials having the title of ‘the five levels of the mortal world, and the five levels of hell.’ The five levels below the tower of trials are normally used for the entrance test. Although it’s difficult to enter, it’s still within the reasonable range. It’s not like there aren’t those who have reached this level before. But the sixth level of the tower of trials is really not accessible to anyone who isn’t at the infant transformation stage! Although the strength of the soul isn’t necessarily determined by one’s cultivation level, the soul still grows strong when a cultivator advances through the various cultivation stages. Without reaching the infant transformation stage, it’s impossible to reach the level of strength that the soul must rely on during innate conditions.” “Sigh, I’m afraid that young hero is doomed this time.” The inspection window of the tower of trials could only be opened to the fifth level because the suppression of the soul on the sixth level was too strong. If the inspection window on the sixth level were to be opened, a violent force would tear the entire building apart. Therefore, none of the cultivators on the outside could see Lin An’s figure anymore. They could only guess his situation by observing the wooden token that was floating outside the tower. As long as the tower of trials failed to absorb the wooden token, it meant that Lin An was still holding on, and he was still safe. However, none of the cultivators were optimistic that Lin An could hold on for long. They all felt that he would be ejected from the tower of trials in the next moment. However, as they stared blankly at the tower of trials, a few minutes went by. Lin An’s wooden token was still floating quietly around the tower, and there were no signs that the tower of trials would absorb it. The cultivators outside the tower were immediately astounded. “How is this possible?” “Why hasn’t he been ejected by the tower of trials yet?” “Looking at the movement of this wooden tablet, it seems like he really withstood the suppression of the spiritual power on the sixth level?” “This is simply shocking! There are actually people born with such terrifying spiritual power in this world!” The cultivators outside were all shocked. They had seen countless geniuses achieve various feats in the past. However, even the Emperess of the Ruoshui Kingdom, the woman who had been known as the number one genius during the past three thousand years, had not displayed such an unreasonable talent at Lin An’s age! If the news about his achievement were to spread out, who knew how many factions would crazily fight over him. At the same time, Lin An, who was on the sixth level of the tower of trials, was already sweating profusely. His legs felt like they would collapse at any moment. Before going up to the sixth level, he had drunk another bottle of soul-strengthening liquid, and his soul power had increased by another one hundred and twenty percent. But even so, when he officially stepped into the sixth level, Lin An still felt his soul tremble. It was as if a mountain was pressing down on his body, and his soul power was about to be crushed. Fortunately, he managed to persevere with his extraordinary willpower. Additionally, Lin An had also reached into the success rate system’s storage space and activated a defensive garment that could partially block the suppression power of the tower of trials. [Ding! The host has been detected to be on a spiritually rich level. If you stay here for an hour, you can automatically temper your soul and increase the power of your soul by 50%.] As Lin An stood firmly on the sixth floor with the help of his protective clothing, he suddenly heard the notification sound go off. He was startled, but he was then immediately overjoyed. As long as he could withstand the suppression of the tower of trials, his soul’s power would increase by fifty percent, and then, no matter how strong the tower of trials’ suppression turned out to be, it wouldn’t be difficult to endure it anymore. Therefore, Lin An could save a lot of lottery coins since he would no longer need to draw the lottery machines. If the sixth level had such a generous reward, the seventh and eighth levels had to have even more valuable advantages. Lin An gritted his teeth and persevered through the sixth level with the belief that his soul would become stronger. In order to withstand the effects of the pressure on the sixth level, Lin An frequently moved around in search of the points where the pressure was less intense. An hour passed by quickly, and the success rate system’s notification finally rang in his ears again. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for successfully undergoing the tempering. The power of your soul has increased by 50%!] Buzz! As the success rate system notification sounded, Lin An felt an ethereal sound originating from his mind. The parts of his body related to the power of the soul became stronger, and according to his perception, the speed of his brain’s circulation also increased. After Lin An’s soul increased in strength, its power spread outwards, breaking the suppressive force that was like a shackle on his body. He immediately let out a long breath, and he felt as if a heavy burden on his body had been lifted. “Since that’s the case, then watch me clear this tower of trials. I won’t listen to anyone who tries to persuade me!” After he motivated himself, Lin An resolutely took a step towards the seventh level. ...; Outside the tower of trials, Lin An’s wooden token had remained at the height of the sixth level for over an hour. The cultivators below the tower had stared at the wooden token for a long time, and the entire area had been filled with a dull atmosphere. “How can he be so strong! He’s already been in there for an hour, and it seems like he’s continuously advancing on the sixth level?” “This is already the highest record achieved since the establishment of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. Even if he exits the tower of trials in the next moment, he is already the best cultivator among the younger generation in the field of soul strength!” “That’s right. It is said that the nine-star artifact master from the Green-Wood Kingdom Sect next door stepped into the sixth floor when he was young. However, he was ejected from the tower of trials just as he entered the sixth floor. From then on, that record became a mountain that countless young talents failed to climb over.” “Who would have thought that a genius from our Ghanaian Empire would break this record? He entered the sixth level of the tower of trials at the peak of the golden core stage, yet he still persisted for close to an hour with no signs of defeat. It seems that the younger generation is outstanding!” “How long do you think he can persist for?” “I think he should be out soon. After all, it has already been an hour. It’s impossible for him to persist any longer.” “I think no matter how amazing he is, he’ll probably be out in the time it takes an incense stick to burn.” “That’s right. If he continues to hold on like this, he’ll probably permanently damage his soul power and become a cripple. It’s not worth the risk for him to stay in there any longer.” The cultivators continued to discuss the situation animatedly. Basically, they all felt that it wouldn’t be long before Lin An exited the tower. A few Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples looked at the tower with extreme nervousness, and their palms sweated profusely. “I didn’t expect that our Hundred Flowers Valley Sect would have such good fortune. A hundred years ago, there was a proud daughter of the heavens with an ice spirit root who later became the Empress of the Ruoshui Kingdom. Now, we’re witnessing another disciple who has peak soul strength, and he could definitely reach the peak of alchemy and artifact refinement in the future!” Buzz! At that moment, Lin An’s wooden token began to move. Everyone stared at it with their eyes wide open, and their mouths were aghast. The faces of all the cultivators at the scene were filled with shock and disbelief. “How is this possible!” “Oh my God!” “Am I dreaming? Could what I just witnessed be my delusion?” A majority of the cultivators couldn’t help but exclaim in awe. The shock in their hearts was indescribable. The Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples had been the first cultivators to notice the movement. They had hurriedly raised their heads to look at the tower of trials and exclaimed, “Eh? Why isn’t the wooden token on the sixth level?” Once they had cast their gazes at the higher parts of the trial tower, the disciples had been scared silly. “The seventh level!” Several female disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect screamed. Their voices were out of tune, and their hearts felt like they were being bombarded by reality. How was it possible for a peak golden core cultivator to step onto the seventh level? Was the person inside really human? “No! No! This is absolutely impossible. I have spent my entire life studying the path of medicine refining. I have consumed countless natural treasures to nourish my soul, and until now, I was only barely able to step onto the seventh level of the tower of trials. This black-robed youth is only twenty years old; how could he do this?” At the eye of the third stage, a white-haired and bearded elder saw the scene, and his face was filled with shock. The few Hundred Flowers Valley Sect disciples beside him also had blank looks as they observed the tower. Originally, they had been chatting casually, and they had estimated that Lin An would exit the tower after a few seconds. However, who would have thought that before they could even finish their words, the youthful cultivator would suddenly charge towards the seventh level! The move had caught all of them by surprise. “S-senior, he went up to the seventh floor.” “Huh? Ah, yes! I saw it.” “No, senior! Have you forgotten? The Empress of the Shui Nation is currently in seclusion on the eighth floor. What if Lin An makes his way up to her level?” “Uh...;” The senior brother was momentarily stunned before he shook his head and said, “Don’t worry, the seventh level is definitely his limit. Even if it isn’t, the eighth level has already been closed by the elders. It’s impossible for him to proceed any further!” ...; Inside the tower of trials, Lin An was practically sprawled on the floor. He couldn’t even lift his face, and he was in a very sorry state. Fortunately, there were no other cultivators on the floor, or else, they would have viciously made fun of him. Lin An felt that he was about to be completely crushed by the power of the tower of trials. His soul was on the verge of shattering, and he had a feeling that it was about to split open. His only respite was that the defensive clothing that he was wearing was partially resisting the suppression of his soul’s power. Otherwise, Lin An would have definitely been thrown out by the tower of trials. However, he was determined to hold on because the success rate system had issued some encouraging instructions. [Ding! The system has detected that the host is currently out of the training ground. As long as you hold on for an hour, you will increase the power of your soul by 80%!] Under the high pressure, Lin An really wanted to curse the tower of trials, but the suppression was too strong, and it was basically impossible for him to make a sound. However, as Lin An was holding on for dear life, a woman was on the eighth floor of the tower of trials, and she had just closed her eyes to begin her meditation on her cultivation techniques. The woman on the eighth level of the tower of trials was surrounded by frost, and her aura emitted a bone-chilling frigidity. Her posture was graceful, and she was so beautiful that one would forget to breathe when looking at her. It seemed as if the woman had sensed something, and she suddenly opened her ice-cold beautiful eyes. Her pitch-black and deep eyes seemed to reflect the entire Milky Way galaxy. “This feeling, is it an inner demon?” The Empress of the Ruoshui Kingdom frowned slightly. After looking around the eighth level of the tower of trials, she solemnly closed her eyes again. ...; Lin An’s hour-long tempering had finally passed. His spiritual power was once again strengthened by eighty percent, and within a few minutes, he mustered his strength and got up from the ground. “Humph, this trial tower is only so-so. Did it think it could stop me with its suppression? I didn’t think so!” After he spoke, Lin An patted the dust off his clothes and walked towards the stairs that led to the eighth floor. His walking posture was vigorous, and he was no longer suppressed. However, before Lin An could step onto the stairs, he felt that the space in front of him seemed to have been frozen. He tentatively stretched his hand out, and sure enough, his right hand touched an invisible wall. Lin An looked at the stairs suspiciously. Since his soul power had been strengthened once again, he could clearly sense that there was indeed someone on the eighth floor. He rubbed his chin and pondered the situation. If there was a cultivator inside the eighth floor, why had they used such a method to seal it off? Could it be that a prisoner was being held up in the tower of trials? Or was there a very precious treasure hidden on the eighth floor? As he thought about the possibilities, Lin An’s curiosity grew even stronger. He felt he had to break through the barrier and take a look. Considering the special characteristics of the tower of trials, Lin An concluded that he could attempt to use his soul power to break through the restriction that was in front of him. He immediately summoned the power of his soul from his body, and the majestic power of his soul condensed into a large palm in front of him. Using his mind, he guided the power to push towards the invisible wall. Instantly, Lin An felt that the invisible wall had sunk in, and it didn’t bounce back. His face lit up, and he gradually pushed against the invisible wall using his soul power. It was as if his entire body was stuck in a rubber band, and he kept walking in. Lin An was constantly pulling at the “rubber band invisible wall,” but he also felt that the wall’s resistance was also increasing. However, his hard work eventually paid off. He forcefully broke through the “rubber band invisible wall” and climbed to the eighth floor. Boom! After reaching the eighth floor, a powerful force overcame Lin An’s body and sucked him in. Afterward, Lin An suddenly broke through an ice wall and landed directly in front of a figure. He slowly raised his head and looked at the person who was sitting in front of him. Suddenly, Lin An was dumbfounded when he laid his eyes on the figure. His heart seemed to have been struck hard by the scene he saw. The woman in front of him had smooth skin, and her eyes were full of autumn light. She was simply too beautiful. What was even more shocking was that the beautiful woman was actually naked, and she was sitting cross-legged on the ground! On her part, the woman’s previously serious expression had changed to that of astonishment. Lin An’s mind was blank. In his previous life on earth, he had seen many beautiful women over the Internet. However, the appearance and temperament of the woman in front of him were simply incomparable. She was really too beautiful, so much so that Lin An subconsciously thought that she was a goddess. Her facial features were as exquisite as a painting, and her skin was as fair as snow. Lin An could also see that her temperament was dignified and graceful but solemn at the same time. She displayed the aura of a person of high status and power. As Lin An stared at the woman in front of him, he realized that her deep eyes were also staring back at him. However, after just one glance at Lin An, the woman closed her eyes again, collected her thoughts, and returned to her cultivation. Even though Lin An could tell that the woman’s identity was not simple, it was impossible for him to guess that she was the Emperess of the Ruoshui Kingdom and that she could turn the clouds into rain with a flip of her hand. Seeing that the woman seemed unbothered even though she was sitting naked in front of him, Lin An was instantly surprised. Could it be that the customs in the tower of trials were so open! Although Lin An was excited, he knew that the most important thing he would have to prioritize was to recover his mobility. Thus, Lin An spoke to the woman in front of him. “Beauty?” However, Lin An’s gentle call did not cause the woman in front of him to react. Instead, she remained lifeless like an ice sculpture. Even her long eyelashes did not move in the slightest. The corners of Lin An’s mouth immediately twitched. He tried to move his body, but under the powerful pressure from the surroundings, he could not move at all. Lin An had no choice but to speak up again. “Miss, please help me. I can’t stand up.” Despite Lin An’s cry for help, the Ruoshui Empress didn’t stir. Lin An continued to call out, “Miss, please help me. I really can’t stand up.” The Ruoshui Empress didn’t respond, but her eyelashes fluttered a few times at that moment. Lin An called out to her a few more times, but she remained motionless. Once Lin An realized that he couldn’t count on the woman, he knew that he would have to save himself. Fortunately, the success rate system notified him that if he survived on the eighth floor for an hour, his soul power would receive a one hundred percent increase. Therefore, all Lin An had to do was hold on and withstand the suppression power on the eighth level of the tower of trials for one hour. ...; At that moment, there was complete silence outside the tower. Everyone stared blankly at the wooden token that showed that Lin An was at the eighth level. The entire area was silent, and one could almost hear a pin drop! Although the scene before the cultivators’ eyes was even more magical than the sun rising from the west, everyone was already a little numb to the successive shocks. After entering a level, Lin An would stay for about an hour each time before he would go up to the next level. Now, he was actually in the eighth level! Lin An’s progress no longer shocked the cultivators, but instead, they all trembled in fear. “That guy, what kind of monster is he? Is he really human?” “The eighth level? Oh God, I must have fallen into a nightmare to see such a ridiculous thing. My eyes are full of karma!” “I’m actually lucky enough to witness a golden core stage youth reach the eighth level of the tower of trials? Our Ghana Empire is really going to produce a peerless genius this time!” “With such a level of soul power, even if he closes his eyes, he will definitely become a peerless expert in the future.” “It’s definitely not just that. With his record, I’m afraid that after today, his name will shake the entire Cangyun Continent!” “With such a disciple, even the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect will benefit. This is really a blessing for their sect.” “Perhaps it will attract competition from all directions.” “I’m so envious!” As they looked at the hovering wooden token, all the cultivators outside the tower of trials were amazed. The disciples from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect were scared out of their wits! Their faces were pale with fright, and their mouths were wide open in disbelief. “How is this possible? We’ve clearly closed the entrance to the eighth level. How did he get in?” “If he disturbs her majesty’s cultivation, then we will be in big trouble.” Several disciples paced back and forth anxiously; their foreheads covered in sweat. Although the Empress of the Ruoshui Kingdom was their disciple in name, with her current status, strength, and influence, even the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect was under her rule. If she was interrupted while cultivating in seclusion, there would be some undesirable consequences for the sect. The few disciples sucked in a breath of cold air as they thought about the situation. “The few of you stay here. I’ll go and report the situation!” The disciple in charge of the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect soared into the sky after he spoke and disappeared in the blink of an eye. ...; Inside the trial tower, on the eighth floor. “Pfft!” The face of the incomparably beautiful woman sitting in front of Lin An instantly turned pale, and she suddenly spat out a mouthful of blood. The blood sprayed onto the ground in front of Lin An, giving him a fright. He hurriedly raised his head and looked at the woman. To his surprise, Lin An saw that the woman who had been silent ever since he had entered the eighth floor was actually clutching her fair and soft chest. Her face was deathly pale as one of her hands propped her up from the ground. Lin An also observed that there was still a trace of blood at the corner of her mouth. He was instantly stunned, and he quickly asked, “What’s the situation?” [Ding! The soul refining stage is complete. Congratulations to the host for successfully strengthening your soul by 100%!] Abruptly, the success rate system notification sounded in Lin An’s ears. The increased power from his soul neutralized the suppressive force from the tower of trials, and he gained the ability to move. The woman’s face was still pale, and Lin An could not help but feel pity for her. He hurriedly searched through the success rate system’s storage space to see if he could find anything that could treat her among the pile of treasures that he had obtained from his lucky draw. After finding different combinations of medicine that could treat several kinds of injuries, Lin An hurriedly took them out from the success rate system’s storage space and walked towards the Empress. When she saw Lin An’s movements, the Empress’s pupils suddenly contracted, and she was appalled. Her eyes were instantly filled with fear, and her face became increasingly pale. Ever since she had taken over the throne, this was the first time that the Empress had felt a trace of despair and helplessness. However, Lin An remained calm as he sat down by her side. He gently pried her lips and teeth and poured the medicine in his hand into her mouth. The Empress’s heart suddenly thumped, and she was stunned! “What...; What is this? Why does it taste so mellow?” When Lin An heard the Empress’s words, he picked up the medicine bottle and looked at it. The label on the medicine bottle read, ‘Intermittent Mellow Cream.’ For the first time, Lin An doubted the effectiveness of the success rate system. Intermittent ointment was traditionally applied for external use. What was the purpose of creating an alcohol-flavored version? However, just as the Empress was marveling at the taste of the strange medicine, a mysterious power suddenly erupted from her mouth and rushed straight into her mind. In an instant, the Empress’s entire mind went blank. Her soul power had been greatly strengthened, and the injuries on her body had healed. Additionally, she had also broken through the final bottleneck in her cultivation technique. “How is this possible?” The Empress immediately cried out in surprise. Only then did she realize that she could also speak! When she looked at Lin An again, she couldn’t help but feel amazed! She was very clear that the mysterious power she had just experienced was the effect of the concoction of medicine that Lin An had fed her. Moreover, it was also because of the medicine that her soul had instantly recovered and allowed her to break through the bottleneck that she had been bitterly cultivating for several months. ‘How could there be such a miraculous thing in the world?’ The Empress muttered in her heart. She couldn’t help but carefully examine Lin An again. After seeing him clearly, the Empress gasped! He was only at the peak of the golden core stage, yet he was able to move freely on the eighth level of the tower of trials! How terrifying was the strength of his soul? “Are you taking part in the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect entrance trial?” In the end, the Empress took the lead and gently questioned Lin An. Her voice was very soothing, and it carried a hint of a calm and unruffled charm. Her brows were also very relaxed, and it appeared as if she could see through Lin An. However, even though she was a woman of high status, her eyes couldn’t help but reveal a hint of admiration for Lin An’s amazing talent. The Empress also saw a great deal of admiration in Lin An’s eyes, When she followed his gaze and realized that it led back to her chest, she suddenly reacted. The Empress had just realized that she wasn’t wearing any clothes! Whoosh! An icy cold aura instantly spread out from her body and covered her entire figure. Finally, the cold aura stuck tightly to her body and turned into an opaque layer of ice crystal armor that covered her skin. The ice crystal armor was carved with strange and complicated patterns, and under the contrast of the armor, the Empress looked even more stunning. It was as if she was the queen of the world of ice and snow! At that moment, her face became tense, and a wave of mixed emotions rushed over her. The reason why she had ignored Lin An after he had entered the eighth floor was because she had planned on killing him after breaking through her cultivation. There was nothing to fuss about with a person who was about to die. But now, Lin An had saved her life, and he had also helped her breakthrough her cultivation. When she stared at Lin An’s clear eyes, she recalled how he had poured the medicine into her mouth, and her originally cold and hard heart turned as soft as silk. However, her heart was still conflicted, and she didn’t know what to do with him. When Lin An saw the Empress going through her mixed emotions, he was a little stunned for a moment. It seemed that she had become even more beautiful. Lin An faintly sensed the aura of a prominent leader emanating from the Empress, but the aura didn’t have any aggressiveness. Instead, it made him feel that she was dignified, graceful, and magnanimous. It was clear that the woman in front of Lin An could easily move people’s hearts. However, because she was too beautiful, many men couldn’t help but feel ashamed when they stood in front of her. “Can you tell me how you came to the eighth floor? According to what I know, there should be a barrier at the entrance of the eighth floor of the tower of trials. A peak golden core stage cultivator like you shouldn’t be able to enter.” With no hesitation, Lin An immediately bragged heroically, “How can a mere barrier stop my footsteps? As long as I have the desire, there’s no place in this world that I can’t go to!” However, Lin An’s words weren’t exaggerated. With the help of the success rate system, his growth speed had increased by leaps and bounds, and he even had the lucky draw function to accompany him. Therefore, he felt that anything was truly possible. The Empress smiled and shook her head. She didn’t argue with Lin An over his bold statement. Seeing that her reaction was average, Lin An naturally wanted to prove himself. He sized up his surroundings and headed towards the stairs that led to the ninth floor. Just as he was about to leave, the beautiful woman called out to him. “Since you’ve already passed the eighth level, there’s no need for you to continue with the subsequent tests. You can directly secure the entry qualification to the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. Why do you need to go any higher?” Just as Lin An was about to continue arguing with the Empress, the tower of trials suddenly shook violently. In an instant, the intense power of several infant transformation stage cultivators surrounded him from all directions. “Oh, no! I’ve provoked many enemies in my past journeys. I think they’re here to kill me. Quick, let’s leave!” Lin An said in shock. The Empress had also sensed the powers, and she calmly smiled at Lin An. “Don’t worry, these are the four elders from the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. You’ll be fine.” “How can I be fine? Their murderous aura is so strong that it can scare a child to tears! You might be fine, but I might be in big trouble. Let’s not talk about it anymore. I have to escape. The green mountains will not change, and the green waters will flow forever. We’ll meet again if we’re fated to!” With that, the space in front of Lin An rippled, and his figure gradually blurred. The Empress’s expression immediately changed, and she cried out in disbelief, “Are you tearing the void open! You actually have a way to bypass the spatial restriction of the tower of trials and escape!” Lin An grinned mischievously and replied, “Of course, I have countless treasures on me. If I can’t even do such a small thing, wouldn’t that be a disgrace?” As he spoke, he threw a void escape talisman towards the Empress. “Just treat it as a goodbye gift. It’s not very valuable. It’s just a small treasure, but it can only be used once! Goodbye!” Although Lin An had said that it wasn’t valuable, the treasure he had produced could break through the restriction of the tower of trials. Such a valuable item made the Empress flattered. She hurriedly threw a jade pendant that she had brought with her to Lin An. “This is a return gift!” As soon as she finished speaking, the void escape talisman had already teleported Lin An dozens of miles away. When the Empress looked around the empty eighth floor, she suddenly felt a sense of loss. ...; Lin An had just landed on a strange path when he saw a few figures passing by in the distance. However, when he observed them closely, he was instantly stunned. The distant figures actually had a pair of horns on their heads, and one of them had a tail. Lin An immediately used the success rate system to scan the three strange beings, and several details popped up on the virtual screen. The two creatures were the offspring crossbreeds of both humans and demons, and they could transform into human form. The creatures had once been strong and prosperous on the Cangyun Continent, and they were known as the demon race. However, the relationship between humans and the demon race deteriorated completely. The demon race was defeated in the war between the two races, and their numbers drastically decreased. In the end, the crossbreed offspring race could only hide in the dark, and they rarely appeared in the world. Lin An didn’t expect that he would encounter the legendary demon race after escaping the Hundred Flowers Valley Sect. His curiosity was instantly aroused, and he followed the three creatures. After activating his lightning avatar, Lin An only left an afterimage at his original spot. When he was within an earshot distance of the demon race creatures, Lin An realized that the three demons were all male, and their cultivation levels were all at the golden core stage. As they walked, they began whispering among themselves. “This time, I really have to catch a few tender-skinned children and bring them back. Otherwise, the king will definitely be angry.” Lin An trailed the demon race creatures for a while until they arrived at the side of a lake that was at the foot of an enormous mountain. There were a few children playing along the shores of the lake, and they were running towards the demons. Splash! At that moment, a loud sound suddenly came from the surface of the lake, and a large string of water splashed out. One of the demons had quietly slipped into the water and swam along the lakeshore. Once it rushed out from the lake, it opened its arms and pounced at the children with a sinister smile. At the same time, the other two demons also jumped down from a nearby tree and blocked the children’s paths. The children were immediately scared, and they cried loudly as tears flowed down their faces. “Demons! How dare you!” Lin An shouted thunderously. He immediately appeared at the scene, and lighting bolts flowed through his body as he took a protective stance in front of the children. Lin An’s way of appearing had been domineering, and it instantly shocked the three demons. When the demons saw that Lin An was an immortal cultivator, their expressions instantly changed, and they were filled with panic. “Kill him!” One of the demons’ eyes suddenly turned cold. “We have lived for so many years, yet today, we have been discovered by a human cultivator. Our race will suffer. We must kill him!” The eyes of the other two demons abruptly revealed their killing intent as they stared at Lin An. Pfft! However, just as the first demon made its move, Lin An had already slashed it into two halves. The demon didn’t even have the time to groan before it fell to the ground. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained nineteen lucky draw coins.] Abruptly, the two surviving demons revealed terrified expressions on their faces. They were so scared that they didn’t even think about saying anything fierce. In an instant, they took off and frantically rushed into the forest with all their might. Whoosh! A bolt of lightning flashed in front of the two demons, and suddenly, an ominous sword flew over and planted itself into the road in front of them. Lin An had quickly caught up with the two demons, and he had a faint smile on his face. The expressions of the two demons instantly changed drastically. In a trembling voice, they said, “This is impossible! We demons have always been famous for our physical fitness. How did you catch up to us?” “Of course, it’s my movement techniques. We humans aren’t like you guys who only know how to use brute force. Alright, let’s cut the crap and continue running. I saw that you guys weren’t desperate enough to escape, so I gave you a head start.” The two demons were stunned, and they couldn’t believe their ears. After looking at each other, they didn’t say a word. In the next moment, they suddenly started running again and soon disappeared from Lin An’s sight. Lin An unhurriedly used his Lightning Dharma Body to follow them. His goal was to trail the two demons until they led him to their tribe so that he could get some more information about the demon race. After all, they were the mortal enemies of humans. As a pure human, Lin An still had a sense of responsibility to protect his race. The two demons ran quickly and took several remote paths. As they ran, they laid traps along the way. Unfortunately, their actions bore no fruits. Lin An, who was trailing them in his Lightning Dharma Body state, easily avoided all of their traps. The demons ran through several hidden caves and eventually, Lin An arrived at a secluded part of the forest. He immediately saw a barrier that appeared to have been set up by a spell formation. It looked majestic and extraordinary and based on Lin An’s observation; the spell formation had to be at least at the intermediate level. The two demons easily ran through the barrier and disappeared. However, Lin An suspected that it wouldn’t be so easy for him to pass through the barrier. Therefore, he searched the success rate system’s storage space to see if there were any treasures that he could use. After searching through the system’s space, he didn’t find a suitable treasure. He concluded that he would have to use the lottery machines again to get a treasure that could help him sneak past the barrier. Fortunately, in the ten-lottery coin lucky draw machine, Lin An immediately drew the items that he needed. [Congratulations, you have obtained an acting mask. The mask enables a cultivator to achieve 100% impersonation of the body and appearance of other people or alien races. Its initial effects last for four hours, and after the time is up, one lottery coin will be deducted for every two hours it is in use.] Lin An instantly put on the mask, and his body flashed with a bright light. Afterward, his hands and feet, as well as the sides of his cheeks, were covered with downy yellow fur. At the same time, his skin transformed into a golden hoop of tiger skin, and he resembled the fabled monkey king demon! “Wow! This is actually very domineering!” As he examined his body, Lin An expressed satisfaction with the effects of the mask. Even though Lin An had turned into a monkey demon, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword was still strapped to his waist, and he realized it would be too out of place. He immediately stored the sword into the success rate system’s storage space and took out a golden metal rod that he had won from the lottery. He then played around with his new weapon and walked towards the barrier array in front of him with satisfaction. However, he didn’t expect that just as he approached the spell formation, the space in front of him would suddenly distort, and violent spiritual energy would surge towards him. The barrier appeared as if it had turned into a bloody mouth, and it instantly enveloped Lin An with immense killing intent. However, Lin An didn’t panic. In the next moment, the black and white ashen flames suddenly surged out of his body and surrounded him. The flames transformed into a lotus flower that seemed to pierce through the void and they began to bloom. However, in the blink of an eye, the black and white ashen flames were devoured by the demonic barrier formation. To Lin An’s surprise, a blazing ray of light suddenly burst out from within the formation, and it seemed as if a golden sun had descended upon the world! Boom! In an instant, a deafening explosion reverberated in all directions. The entire ground shook violently, and vicious energy tore apart the formation, causing ripples in the air as the energy spread out. The scene happened to fall into the eyes of the two demonesses in the forest behind Lin An, and they were instantly dumbfounded. They had never seen such a terrifying destructive power in their lives. The elder demoness’s voice immediately rang out. “Hey monkey, who are you? Why did you blow up our protective spell formation?” Lin An tidied his clothes and said with a faint smile, “Your attitude is too vile. These demons actually chased me away without saying a word. I’m here to witness the lightning tribulation sacrifice.” The two demonesses’ expressions froze as they looked at the mountain protection spell formation. Lin An had already reduced the formation to ruins, and white smoke was rising everywhere. It was a tragic sight, and there were even a few golden core stage demon corpses lying on the ground. The demonesses instantly wondered which of the two parties, between Lin An and the dead demons on the ground, had been more unpleasant? The ancient spell formation had been passed down for many years, but it was now destroyed. To make the situation more perplexing, the monkey demon had destroyed the formation in one move. The demonesses felt that the monkey demon’s strength was truly terrifying. “Let’s go. Since I’m not welcome here, then take me to your place,” Lin An said to the two demonesses in the forest. “Or do you guys not welcome me as well?” Lin An deliberately emphasized every word, and his point was that, if the demonesses didn’t welcome him, then they would suffer the same fate as the dead demons. Hearing the threat from Lin An, the two demon witches didn’t want to offend such a terrifying monkey demon, so they led him to another camp. Under the guidance of the two demonesses, Lin An entered a pitch-black cave and circled around for a long time. It was a very complicated place, and there were many tunnels interconnected on the inside. Some led to alternative paths, while others were dead ends. It was simply an underground maze. Soon, after they had walked through several tunnels in the cave, they vaguely saw a dim light in front of them, and Lin An immediately knew that the exit was not far away. Whoosh! At that moment, a faint swishing sound cut through the air! In an instant, a foreign object headed towards one of the demon witches. It was a silver needle, and it had appeared out of thin air. Lin An immediately saw that the needle was headed directly toward the demon witch’s snow-white neck. However, the two demonesses actually hadn’t noticed it at all! “Be careful!” Lin An hurriedly alerted the demoness, and without hesitation, he waved the golden metal rod in his hand. Clang! A set of sparks suddenly flew out in the pitch-black cave. Lin An struck the silver needle, and it stuck into the stone wall nearby. At the same time, five masked nascent soul stage assassins, who were dressed in long black robes, charged out and surrounded Lin An and the other two demon witches at the entrance of the narrow cave. Lin An looked at the attackers and realized that they were familiar! Hadn’t the two women he had escorted back to the Imperial City been chased by cultivators who had been dressed in similar outfits? “Haha, it’s said that the women of the demon race are all extremely beautiful, and naturally charming. Their eyes and smiles can seduce one’s soul. Seeing them today, they really live up to their reputation.” “It’s a good time to capture them and dote on them!” “This monkey demon is really quick-witted. If it wasn’t for him, my death-seeking flying needle would have already taken your life.” “Fortunately, he’s only in the golden core stage. Otherwise, with his off-the-charts spiritual power, today’s mission might have failed because of him!” One demoness turned around and said to Lin An with a serious expression, “Don’t be careless! They’re the elite assassins of the Heavenly Police. They’ve learned the art of killing since they were young. Even if I were to face the weakest of them, I can’t guarantee victory!” One of the demonesses was at the golden core stage, while the demoness that had cautioned Lin An was at the nascent soul stage. Lin An waved his hand and retorted, “Are they very strong? I only killed a dozen of them a while ago, and they were just so-so!” When they heard the monkey demon’s arrogant words, the two demonesses were instantly stunned. The five assassins also heard the mocking words, and their killing intent instantly filled the air. “The dozens of our comrades who lost their lives in the south last time were related to you?” Without waiting for Lin An’s response, an icy glint flashed across the eyes of the five assassins. They raised the blood-red blades in their hands, which were as thin as cicada wings, and charged towards Lin An and the two demonesses. The assassins’ speed was extremely fast, and their movements were extremely strange, making it difficult for the naked eye to follow their moves. The golden core demon witch was no match for them at all, so her nascent soul stage counterpart hurriedly protected her behind her back. However, one assassin suddenly emerged from the void, and his blood-red, ice-cold short blade directly slashed towards the golden core demon witch’s neck. Fortunately, in the next instant, a red light suddenly flashed in front of the assassin’s face. His eyes instantly widened, and he let out a faint gasp as his head was decapitated from his neck. The remaining four assassins were stupefied on the spot, and they looked at Lin An with incomparable shock. The golden core demon witch had narrowly escaped death. Her face was deathly pale, but like the nascent soul demon witch, her expression instantly changed to that of astonishment. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained thirty-nine lucky draw coins.] “Kill the monkey first!” One of the assassins shouted in a deep voice and joined forces with the other three assassins to attack Lin An. They could sense that Lin An, who was at the peak of the golden core stage, was obviously more dangerous than the nascent soul demon witch. Pfft! With the speed of the Lightning Dharma Body and the cloudless spell, the opponents couldn’t keep up with Lin An. He suddenly beheaded a second assassin, who was at the eighth level of the nascent soul stage. Instantly fresh blood sprayed all over the walls of the cave. “What!” Three loud exclamations came from the side at the same time. The three assassins couldn’t hide their distress. They abruptly stopped attacking and hurriedly retreated away from Lin An, but their faces were still filled with shock. The golden core stage monkey demon had just killed an eighth level nascent soul stage assassin with one strike. How was that possible? The two demon witches were also stunned. They hadn’t expected that Lin An could gain such an overwhelming advantage in a lopsided battle against four nascent soul stage expert cultivators. [Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained forty-one lucky draw coins!] The remaining three assassins were dumbfounded. After they had witnessed Lin An’s bizarre combat strength, they immediately chose to retreat. “We can’t continue. This monkey isn’t simple!” “Mission failed. We retreat!” “Ah!” Even though they had conceded defeat, Lin An had no intention of letting them go. The three assassins were as good as dead! After they exited the cave, Lin An and the two demon witches came into a vast field. Several strange, human-shaped creatures were going about their activities passively. There were all kinds of weird creatures. Some had the body of a human and the tail of a snake. Others had two horns on their heads. While some had the lower body of a horse, and the upper body of a human. The creatures worked hard in the field. Several of them were making use of their pure physical qualities, while others used spells to move the soil or water over a large area. In the distance, there were a few neatly arranged houses. It appeared that there were several creatures cooking in the houses, and green smoke was rising from the chimneys. At first glance, the scene looked like a paradise. At that moment, a demon with goat’s horns on its head rushed over when it saw the nascent soul demoness and said anxiously, “Leader, you’re finally back. There’s a problem in the pill refining room!” The nascent soul demon witch immediately frowned. “What happened?” The goat-horned demon timidly replied, “The refinement of the vitality strengthening pill and the soul-nurturing pill failed!” The nascent soul demon witch was shocked, and she hurried in the direction of the alchemy room. When she arrived at the alchemy room, she saw that it was a complete mess. As she scanned the room, she noticed that the alchemy furnace seemed to have exploded. When Lin An saw that the nascent soul demon witch didn’t look well, he comforted her, “Don’t worry, it’s just alchemy. I know how to do this! Let me help.” “You?” The nascent soul demon witch and the goat-horned demon looked at Lin An together as they sized him up. “You know how to refine pills?” The golden core stage demon witch, who had been following behind, asked in surprise. Lin An had practiced his pin refining skills under Qian Yi’s guidance, and he immediately answered proudly, “Of course. I’m an alchemist.” The golden core stage demon witch was instantly suspicious. In the cultivation world, cultivators who focused on refining pills normally didn’t have strong combat abilities. After all, refining pills took too much time. However, the goat-horned demon’s eyes lit up when he heard Lin An’s reply. He quickly said, “That’s great. You can be our alchemist’s apprentice. With an alchemist’s apprentice, the success rate of refining pills will definitely increase. Who knows, you might even succeed.” After the goat-horned demon spoke, he pulled Lin An and rushed towards a house in the distance. Lin An and the other three demon creatures quickly arrived in front of the small house. The front door of the house was spotlessly clean, and the outer walls were painted white. It looked like an ordinary human house. However, the many carrots hanging under the eaves added a foreign flavor to the small house. The alchemist that the goat horned demon had mentioned was a rabbit-eared girl who was about eight years old. She looked like the typical little sister next door, obedient and cute. After a brief nod, Lin An and the rabbit-eared girl immediately entered the alchemy room. The room was very spacious, and there were many medicinal materials and wooden shelves on the walls. In the middle of the alchemy room, was a bronze alchemy furnace. The cauldron had three legs, and its surface was carved with dense runes. It gave off a mysterious and ancient aura, and it was clear that the alchemy furnace had bonded with many of its previous owners. Lin An was eager to try it. He looked at the rabbit-eared girl and said, “Why don’t you let me try out my alchemy first?” The rabbit-eared girl responded in surprise, “You know alchemy too?” In an instant, the expressions of the three onlooking creatures changed. The golden core stage demon witch hurriedly interjected and said, “Damned monkey! Don’t do anything rash. Alchemy is not something to be trifled with.” “I know. It’s precisely because it can’t be trifled with that I want to step up and prove my skills.” “All right then. Let the monkey refine it first,” the rabbit-eared girl immediately conceded. However, when the three onlooking creatures heard this, they were immediately scared out of their wits. Alchemy wasn’t a craft to be trifled with. Not to mention, the ingredients used to concoct the pills were very expensive, and once an alchemist failed to control the cauldron’s temperature, they could only concoct a useless pill. The rabbit-eared girl was looking to concoct a two-star medicinal pill. However, if the cauldron exploded, then the impact of the explosion could destroy a small part of the tribe. Therefore, when the rabbit-eared girl was refining pills, at least one nascent soul stage demon had to stand guard outside. If there were any mistakes in the alchemy, they could immediately control the damage with their cultivation. Otherwise, the alchemist would have already died. Now that the rabbit-eared girl had actually agreed to let Lin An refine the pills first, the other creatures were naturally afraid. The nascent soul stage demon witch immediately glared at Lin An. “Damned monkey! Don’t mess around!” After everyone expressed their doubts, Lin An had no option but to give up on showing off his alchemy skills and let the rabbit-eared girl have the first try. The rabbit-eared girl walked to the alchemy furnace and waved her small hand lightly. Instantly, a flame rose from the bottom of the furnace. Beside the alchemy furnace, there were over ten sets of neatly arranged medicinal ingredients. The rabbit-eared girl randomly picked up one ingredient and was about to throw it into the alchemy furnace. “Wait, what are you doing? The medicinal herbs need to be cleared of impurities first, or else, the success rate of the pill will be very low.” Lin An hurriedly opened his mouth and interrupted her. Immediately, the rabbit-eared girl had a confused look on her face. The three onlooking creatures were also stunned for a moment, and then, they furrowed their brows. “Monkey, don’t cause trouble. Your only job is to control the fire properly,” the golden core stage demon witch scolded Lin An through gritted teeth. The nascent soul stage demon witch also looked at Lin An and said, “Monkey, these pills are really important to me. I don’t have time to waste anymore. Tomorrow, I’m going to the lightning pool of the myriad clans. Can you stop interfering?” The other creatures actually thought that Lin An was causing trouble, and he instantly became furious. Could it be that they were brainless? They couldn’t even understand such a little logic. The rabbit-eared girl wanted to throw the medicinal ingredients into the pot and stew them randomly. She didn’t care about the order, the purity, or the dosage of the ingredients. Lin An felt that it would be a miracle if the success rate of the pill was high. At that moment, the rabbit-eared girl, who had fallen into confusion after Lin An spoke, suddenly blinked her eyes as she exclaimed in shock, “He seems to be right! I’ve reflected on it carefully, and removing the impurities first should be able to increase the success rate to a certain extent.” The three creatures besides them were stunned, and they all stared at Lin An. He immediately smiled in relief. No wonder Qian Yi had chosen him as her personal disciple. He was really smart. However, the rabbit-eared girl’s next sentence made the smile on Lin An’s face disappear. “But I don’t know that method. Moreover, we don’t have many medicinal herbs in our hands right now, so we won’t be able to carry out any experiments.” Even though the rabbit-eared girl didn’t know his method, Lin An was certain about his earlier point. He immediately wanted to speak, but the three other creatures had obviously been paying close attention to his actions. Just as he opened his mouth, their warning eyes glared at him. “Don’t worry. I’ve always been one hundred percent successful in everything I do. There won’t be a problem if you listen to me.” Since he could see the success rate of his every action, Lin An’s words were completely true. However, in the ears of the three creatures, they immediately turned into boasting. “How can there be a one hundred percent success rate in this world? A one hundred percent success rate is something that even a nine-star alchemist wouldn’t dare to say. You’re only at the peak of the golden core stage, but you think you are already stronger than those alchemists who are far above you?” “What if you fail?” Instantly, Lin An replied with little thought, “If I fail, I’ll swallow feces and commit suicide!” The three creatures were instantly embarrassed. “If I fail, I’ll swallow feces and commit suicide?” The monkey was quick-witted, and it seemed that he was confident in his abilities. Considering the various miracles that Lin An had shown along the way, the nascent soul stage demon witch decided to give him a chance. “In that case, I’ll let you try it once, but only once.” “Leader, you can’t do that!” The goat horned demon immediately advised. “Yes, if he can’t control the heat...;” The golden core stage demoness also expressed her worry. However, the nascent soul stage demoness firmly maintained her judgment, “Monkey, if you discover that the pill furnace is unstable, I’ll tell you to stop. You have to stop immediately. Can you do that?” Abruptly, Lin An bragged, “Absolutely, no problem. I’m famous for being stable when refining pills, and I’m also famous for being cautious.” “Then you can start.” The nascent soul stage demon witch nodded as she gave Lin An her approval. “Wait, if there’s a punishment for failure, what’s the reward for success?” Lin An asked. Instantly, the other creatures rolled their eyes. It would be good enough if Lin An didn’t blow up the furnace. Why was he concerned about a reward? Couldn’t he tell that his chances of successfully refining the pills were extremely thin? “Damned monkey! If you want to refine the pills, then hurry up. As long as you succeed, everything will be fine.” Thus, under the creatures’ solemn gazes, Lin An held the medicinal herbs in his hands and walked towards the alchemy furnace. He gently closed his eyes and let out a deep breath. When he opened his eyes again, his expression became tense and serious. In the next moment, Lin An turned his head and asked the alchemist, “Oh right, are these ingredients used to refine the spirit-nourishing pill or the vitality-consolidating pill? Let me see the formula for refining the pill.” ...; The surrounding demon and demonesses immediately felt a headache, and their expressions turned extremely helpless. “This monkey is really here to cause trouble, isn’t he?” “He doesn’t even know the formula; how could he possibly refine it?” “Forget it. You must pay attention to the changes in the pill furnace later, you must be vigilant enough.” At that time, Lin An had already received the pill formula from the rabbit-eared girl, and he quickly studied it. He then stood in front of the pill furnace, took a deep breath, and grabbed the spiritual medicine in his hand. Whoosh! Lin An threw the spiritual medicine up and simultaneously waved a wisp of mana, lifting all the spiritual ingredients into the air and placing them separately. “Huh? What’s this for?” The other demons asked in surprise as they retreated towards the door. Although the creatures didn’t know how to refine pills, they had observed the rabbit-eared girl in the past when she refined pills, but they had never seen her try Lin An’s technique. Whoosh! Lin An flipped his left hand upwards, and a yellow-red flame suddenly appeared in his palm. He had chosen to use the dark flame transformation technique to activate the yellow-red flame instead of directly using the black-and-white ashen flames. The scorching yellow-red flame roasted the surrounding space until it was slightly distorted. Suddenly, Lin An used his mana to capture a stalk of spiritual medicine and directly threw it into the yellow-red flame. Instantly, the other creatures present in the room cried out in shock. “This...; What is he doing?” “The temperature of the flames is so high that even refined iron can evaporate instantly. Won’t the spiritual medicine stalk burn to ashes?” However, in the next moment, they were once again dumbfounded. The yellow-red flame engulfed the entire stalk of the spiritual medicine, but the stalk remained completely unharmed. Lin An deliberately controlled the temperature of the flame close to the spiritual medicine and began refining it. The process required a very high level of soul power. If an alchemist’s soul power was insufficient, the spiritual medicine could be burned at any time. Once the spiritual medicine burned, there would be no way to remedy it. Fortunately, after his experience in the tower of trials, Lin An’s soul power was already comparable to that of the Ruoshui Empress. Since he was only refining a two-star medicinal pill, Lin An could easily control the yellow-red flame. Chi! A stream of excess water evaporated from the spiritual stalk before it began to melt, turning from a solid to a liquid. At the same time, the impurities in the spiritual herb were burned into a black mist that slowly rose and evaporated. Not long after, the entire spiritual herb turned into a drop of sparkling green liquid elixir. It slowly rotated in the yellow-red flame and emitted rays of light that symbolized its essence. Lin An used his mana to maintain the green liquid elixir’s buoyancy in the air. Afterward, he took a second stalk of spiritual medicine and began to process it in the same way. Once he had repeated the process a few times, Lin An was satisfied that he had obtained all the ingredients necessary for refining a set of vitality consolidating pills. Six differently colored spiritual elixirs calmly floated beside Lin An, and the creatures in the room were stunned. They had never seen such an alchemy method before, but it didn’t seem out of place at all. The rabbit-eared girl’s eyes sparkled with excitement. She felt that Lin An’s alchemy method was too magical, and she couldn’t help but feel a trace of respect for him. Then, with a wave of his hand, Lin An lifted the cauldron’s lid and placed the six portions of essence into it. After he put back the lid, the runes on the cauldron began to glow. Waves of rune power surged into the cauldron and continuously squeezed and attacked the six portions of essence. The scene was similar to a blacksmith forging a thousand hammers. Before long, the six different medicinal powers completely fused together, turning into a bubble the size of a baby’s fist that had a muddy milky white color. Weng! A long sound spread far away from the alchemy furnace. The runes on the cauldron instantly became even more resplendent, turning into a powerful energy that rushed into the center of the alchemy furnace. With a muffled sound, the milky-white bubbles were dispersed, turning into ten light spots of the same size that scattered in the alchemy furnace. Once they were in the alchemy furnace, the ten light spots spun rapidly and gradually turned into solid states. In an instant, waves of rich medicinal fragrance gradually spread out. Lin An opened the cauldron’s lid and extended his large hand. Immediately, ten milky-white pills flew out of the alchemy furnace. Each pill was round and full, and they all emitted a rich medicinal fragrance. The creatures present were stunned, and their faces were filled with shock and astonishment! “Ten pills!” “Ten pills?” “How is this possible!” “The maximum number of pills that can be refined from a portion of medicinal ingredients is ten. However, there always is a loss during the refining process. Those who can refine five pills are the grandmasters of the alchemy world. He is only in the golden core stage; how can he refine ten pills! Moreover, even if five pills are formed, the quality of the pills is usually uneven. How is it possible that all the pills are perfectly round and full even when ten portions were formed? Their quality and appearance are flawless.” “This kind of pill formation rate is simply unprecedented!” The creatures in the room exclaimed repeatedly in disbelief! The rabbit-eared girl was even more stunned. The shock in her heart was indescribable. How could a being like Lin An exist? His combat strength was already so strong, yet he could also refine pills perfectly? Was there anything he couldn’t do? “This milky-white vitality fortifying pill is of the highest quality! The condition of the pill he refined is a hundred times better than mine!” The rabbit-eared girl looked at the milky-white vitality fortifying pill and was inexplicably shocked. Even a layman could tell that the pills had been refined to the highest quality. However, even if all the pills had been well refined, they were still second-grade pills after all. Lin An couldn’t help but feel that the effects of consuming the pills were too weak. Lin An immediately searched the success rate system’s storage space to see if there were any pill formulas of higher quality. After a brief search, he found two pill formulas. One of them was a grade three pill that specialized in treating lightning injuries. Without hesitation, Lin An quickly refined it. Bang! He lifted the cauldron’s lid, and a muffled sound rang out, attracting the curiosity of the four creatures around him. Suddenly, a seven-colored cloud rose from the cauldron. At the same time, blue electric arcs flashed through the cloud like a small thundercloud. “What...; What is this thing?” “Am I seeing things? Why is there such a phenomenon?” The rabbit-eared alchemist was stunned. “Is this the dan cloud phenomenon?” She was so shocked that her voice trembled as she gazed at the cloud. The medicinal herb in her hand fell to the ground with a thud, and she looked at Lin An in disbelief. Once a dan cloud phenomenon appeared, it meant that the pill that had been refined was a top-grade medicinal pill. In the alchemist profession, pills were classified according to grades, and there were different grades depending on the quality of the pill. With the rabbit-eared girl’s current strength, if she was lucky, she could only refine a mid-grade fortifying pill. However, the fortifying pill that Lin An had just refined was a high-grade pill. After the rabbit-eared girl exclaimed out in surprise, the other creatures were instantly shocked. “A high-grade, grade three pill is even more precious than a four-star pill. Doesn’t that mean that his alchemy skills are comparable to those of a four-star alchemist?” “How is this possible? A peak golden core stage four-star alchemist!” Instantly, everyone gazed at Lin An in awe. However, the nascent soul stage demon witch seemed to have thought of something, and her expression froze. She quickly pulled Lin An out of the pill refining room and entered the small forest outside to find a quiet place. After standing still, she looked around cautiously and said with a serious expression, “Monkey, let’s go to the lightning pool now. We can’t wait any longer!” After a brief pause, the nascent soul stage demon witch continued, “There are definitely traitors in our tribe, but I still don’t know who they are. If the traitors reveal the news that we have successfully refined a supreme-grade pill, in a few days, all the other tribes will attack our tribe. Even the human army might be drawn here! For your safety, and the survival of our tribe, we have to head to the lightning pool immediately. With our tribe’s mighty figures there, we’ll definitely be able to protect you.” Lin An didn’t care much about his safety. He had a lot of treasures in his arsenal. Even if he had to face enemies all over the world, he was confident that he could find a way to survive. However, if a disaster were to happen, and the nascent soul stage demon witch’s tribe was wiped out, then Lin An would definitely be troubled. Therefore, he immediately agreed to the nascent soul stage demon witch’s request, and they immediately set off. At that time, Lin An also learned that the nascent soul stage demon witch actually had a human name, Su Peibai. She also revealed that there was a restriction within the area of the lightning pool, and the creatures inside couldn’t use spells. Additionally, there was a barrier set up on the outside to guard against intruders. According to Su Peibai, if non-demons crossed the barrier, they would attract the backlash of the entire lightning pool. Although the demon race had gradually declined over the years, humans had never breached the lightning pool holy land. Lin An suddenly felt a little guilty. He didn’t know whether the mask on his face would be able to pass through the identification mechanism of the so-called lightning pool. [Ding! According to the system’s estimation, this restriction runs through the entire lightning pool area. As long as the host steps inside the area, the probability of being discovered will be 100%.] A notification from the success rate system instantly rang in Lin An’s ear, but his heart was also greatly chilled. However, another notification immediately popped up on the virtual screen in front of Lin An’s eyes. [Ding! According to the system’s estimation, as long as the host temporarily seals his cultivation, he can use the acting mask to avoid the lightning pool’s restriction. The probability of being discovered will be reduced to 1%!] Just as Lin An was feeling dejected, the success rate system immediately delivered some positive news. His eyes lit up, and he hurriedly looked for a treasure that could seal his cultivation in the success rate system’s storage space. “We can go in now!” Lin An casually said to Su Peibai after he had used the treasure. Afterward, the two of them headed towards the entrance of the lightning pool. Lin An passed through the barrier undetected, and his body felt nothing strange. After he was inside the lightning pool area, he saw a multitude of demons. All kinds of strange-looking creatures were resting around the lighting pool as they waited for the lightning tribulation sacrificial ceremony that would take place the next day. Lin An also saw the reason why the place was called the lightning pool. In the middle of the demon-populated area, there was an enormous pool. Inside the pool, violent lightning bolts interweaved, and the electric arcs were so dense that they condensed into a liquid state. This was the origin of the pool’s name. At first glance, Lin An felt his scalp go numb. He thought that even an infant transformation stage powerhouse would be killed instantly if they entered the pool. As time passed, the number of foreign demon tribes around the thunder pool increased, and as the night gradually arrived, countless stars appeared in the sky. At that moment, a strange-looking demon man suddenly walked in front of Lin An and Su Peibai. From its neck to its tail, it had the body of a dog, but its head was in the shape of a human. “Su Peibai, our leader asked me to give you a message. Once daybreak arrives, you can’t activate the power in the lightning pool. You can only transcend your own nascent soul heavenly tribulation. Otherwise, we can’t guarantee your tribe’s safety.” With that, the human-headed dog turned around and left with a loud laugh. Su Peibai was so angry that her entire body trembled. However, she couldn’t make a move in the lightning pool area, or else the lightning pool would kill her. She tried hard to suppress the anger in her heart and took a deep breath to control her emotions. ...; After a few hours, the sky gradually brightened, and the time for the lightning tribulation sacrificial ceremony arrived. Suddenly, a bolt of lightning crashed from the sky and struck the lightning pool. The violent lightning bolts surged crazily, and the crackling sounds echoed in the surrounding area. For a moment, it seemed as if the nearby space would be torn apart. However, in the next moment, the lightning bolts interweaved and formed a huge altar that spanned across the sky above the lightning pool. All the creatures raised their heads and looked up, their faces full of respect and solemnity! “The lightning tribulation sacrificial ceremony, that only happens once every hundred years, is finally coming!” “I wonder which unparalleled genius will emerge this time!” “In terms of strength, I’m afraid it will be Su Peibai and the Sky Demon King.” “I think Su Peibai is better. I saw that she has already cultivated to the great circle of the nascent soul stage. With her advantage in the lightning tribulation ritual, she should be able to trigger the six heavenly tribulations!” “Yeah, besides her cultivation of the great circle of the nascent soul stage, she can also trigger two heavenly tribulations. That’s eight heavenly tribulations in total! It seems that she could take over the demon emperor’s throne.” “Not necessarily. The strength of the Sky Demon King is also quite formidable.” The lightning tribulation ritual had been activated. He could already use spells. Su Peibai directly soared into the sky and rushed onto the lightning altar. Seeing this scene, everyone immediately began to discuss. “Ah? What’s going on? Why is Su Peibai the first one to go up?” “The altar is still not stable. The first person to go up might suffer from the additional pressure of the heavenly tribulation. The gains don’t make up for the losses!” “Strange. Doesn’t she know that it’s not worth it to be the first person to go through the heavenly tribulation? If she’s unlucky and encounters the pressure of the heavenly tribulation, she might die from it!” While everyone was confused, Su Peibai was already standing on the altar. She closed her eyes tightly and took a deep breath. Then, she began to release the suppression of her realm to trigger the heavenly tribulation. Boom! The sky was high and the clouds were wide. A bolt of lightning as thick as an arm suddenly struck down. “Ding! Congratulations to host for obtaining a lucky drop and activating your physique, Hell King Purgatory Form!” Lin An was stunned. ‘What was this? Su Peibai transcended the lightning tribulation but I obtained a lucky drop? Could it be that there was something special about this opportunity to transcend the lightning tribulation in this place?’ What exactly was this situation? Lin An quickly checked on the so-called Hell King Purgatory Form. There was only a simple introduction: After reaching the mastery stage, one would be immortal for eternity. With a raise of one’s hand, one could tear through the void! Boom! At this moment, a loud sound came from the sky. In front of the violent and destructive power of the heavenly lightning, Su Peibai’s body appeared very petite. The huge lightning bolt struck her body and almost sent her flying. With the help of the medicinal pill that was placed in her mouth to treat the injuries from the lightning, she was able to withstand the lightning tribulation in the end. Soon, five bolts of lightning struck her body. Su Peibai’s face turned extremely pale until there was no color on her face. It was as if she had been severely injured. Boom! At this moment, the sixth bolt of lightning descended. That ferocious and terrifying lightning bolt was like an ancient giant flood dragon. It opened its terrifying mouth and charged toward Su Peibai. The lightning bolt arrived and struck Su Peibai’s body heavily, sending her flying like a kite with a broken string. She flew out from the altar and fell to the ground. Lin An’s eyelids twitched. He was about to release the seal on his cultivation and rush over to save her. But before he could make a move, Su Peibai, who was in the air, suddenly steadied herself and landed steadily on the ground. Without saying a word, she walked in front of Lin An with a pale face. As soon as she opened her mouth, she spat out a mouthful of blood. Lin An quickly supported Su Peibai. He immediately took out the tier-three pill that he wanted to use to treat lightning injuries and stuffed one into her mouth. “Treat your injuries well. Leave the rest to me.” Su Peibai looked at Lin An seriously for a few seconds before nodding slightly. Lin An then helped her sit down on the ground and began to meditate to recover. This time, her injuries were very serious! Lin An felt that someone was looking in his direction. He stood up and looked back. The other party was a group of strange-looking alien races. Only two men were more normal. One of the men had a king-like aura between his brows. He looked like the Sky Demon King that Su Peibai had mentioned. He was also at the great circle of the nascent soul stage. As long as he let go of the suppression, he would be able to attract the heavenly tribulation. The people behind him looked over with gloating smiles. Not long after, the Sky Demon King stepped out. Under the cheers of the crowd, he leaped into the sky and stepped into the lightning altar. “Wow, the Sky Demon King is about to undergo his tribulation!” “I didn’t expect that the two people we had high hopes for would appear one after another!” “It’s a pity that Su Peibai was too anxious to be the first to appear. She was injured by the unstable pressure of the heavenly tribulation and didn’t activate the lightning pool!” “Now, the position of the new Demon Emperor will most likely belong to the Sky Demon King.” The spectators exclaimed. Boom! A bolt of lightning from the heavenly tribulation landed on the Sky Demon King’s muscular body. He forcefully withstood it and the aura of a nascent soul stage cultivator filled the entire area. Boom! Boom! Boom! Another three bolts of lightning from the heavenly tribulation did not cause much damage to the Sky Demon King. “This is the fourth heavenly tribulation. The Sky Demon King is too powerful. He can actually withstand the fourth heavenly tribulation with his physical body!” “The Sky Demon King is mighty!” “Our clan’s new Demon Emperor is about to be born!” Everyone was impressed by the Sky Demon King’s spirit and shouted loudly. The members of the Heavenly Demon Tribe looked at each other and smiled. “It seems like the Sky Demon King can withstand the fifth heavenly tribulation too. The key is to see if he can trigger the sixth heavenly tribulation!” Everyone’s eyes were focused on the altar and they revealed an extremely expectant look. However, they didn’t see that Lin An had already quietly stepped forward and stood below the altar. Lin An pointed to the sky and shouted, “The tribulation is coming!” In the next moment, the entire sky changed color. Dark clouds covered the sky and strong winds howled. Streaks of majestic and terrifying lightning flashed through the clouds like giant dragons. The tribulation hadn’t arrived yet but the aura had arrived first. This terrifying aura was already countless times more horrifying than the heavenly tribulation that Su Peibai and the Sky Demon King had experienced! Rumble! The sky was filled with dark clouds. Thick lightning flashed within the dark clouds, dancing like dragons and snakes. In an instant, everyone was dumbfounded. Their faces were filled with shock. Some people’s legs were even trembling. Their faces were pale as they were frightened by this heavenly lightning. “What’s going on? Is this...; is this still the heavenly tribulation that a nascent soul stage cultivator has to go through?” “It can’t be. How could a nascent soul stage cultivator survive such a terrifying disturbance?” “No! This heavenly tribulation wasn’t triggered by the Sky Demon King! It was the monkey!” “How is this possible? How could a mere aurous core stage cultivator trigger such a heavenly tribulation?” “No, it seems to be triggered by the monkey! I saw it just now.” “It’s too scary. That monkey has done so many heinous things. How could he attract the wrath of the heavens?” “Heavens, I feel like I can’t hold on anymore. My legs feel like kneeling down.” “The monkey is dead for sure. I think even a nascent soul stage powerhouse wouldn’t be able to hold on.” “This is only the first tribulation! Everyone knows that each tribulation is stronger than the last. Even if he managed to escape this time, the next tribulation will definitely take his life!” “This is a hopeless situation!” Everyone discussed in awe. They looked at Lin An with sympathy and there was no longer any mockery. Su Peibai was also stunned. She looked at this scene in disbelief. Other than shock, her heart was also filled with despair! She didn’t want Lin An to die at all. It was just that in front of such a terrifying heavenly tribulation, she deeply felt her powerlessness and insignificance. A layer of mist unconsciously appeared in her eyes, “It’s me...; It’s me who harmed him. I shouldn’t have brought him here for the lightning tribulation sacrifice. I shouldn’t have brought him into this mess...;” He had a rich understanding of the Scripture of No Beginning that he cultivated, and he was already mentally prepared for this kind of situation. Thus, he wasn’t shocked. Lin An hurriedly took out the unused magic treasures from the system space and let his Eastern Emperor Bell devour them all. The quality of the Eastern Emperor Bell began to rapidly increase. Boom! In an instant, the dark clouds in the sky came crashing down heavily. The power of the lightning in the clouds was almost at its peak, bringing with it an extremely dangerous aura. Every demon felt a wave of suffocation. Lin An hurriedly unsealed the tool that sealed his cultivation base and fed it to the Eastern Emperor Bell as well. He knew that this heavenly tribulation could not be underestimated and his expression became extremely grave. Just the first bolt of tribulation lightning was already so terrifying. One didn’t need to think to know how exaggerated the subsequent bolts of tribulation lightning would be. Boom! The first bolt of tribulation lightning poured down from the sky like a waterfall. The first bolt of tribulation lightning finally descended! A terrifying aura that seemed like it was going to destroy the world directly shocked everyone present! “It’s over, this monkey is dead for sure!” “I’ve lived for more than 400 years but I’ve never seen such a terrifying lightning tribulation.” “This has attracted the envy of the heavens, which is why the heavens would send such a terrifying lightning tribulation to take him in. What kind of talent is this!” “The monkey is really too monstrous.” Countless demons were sighing and sympathizing with Lin An. Meanwhile, the members of the Heavenly Demon Tribe were gloating over his misfortune. Su Peibai, on the other hand, had a sorrowful expression on her face. She felt as if he had lost all hope. However, Lin An’s figure still stood in the same spot. He was like a tall and sturdy mountain peak, towering over the heavens and earth. Boom! The indescribable power of lightning poured over Lin An’s body, causing the surrounding space to shake slightly. However, he did not move at all. The defensive power of the East Emperor Bell after it had been upgraded gave him a lot of confidence. However, this scene fell into the eyes of the demons outside the altar. Under the cover, they could not see his situation clearly. They only felt that he had been swallowed by the surging lightning. “It’s over, haha, the monkey is dead!” The tribe of the Sky Demon King laughed loudly. However, in the next moment, the smiles of the demons froze on their faces. Majestic lightning scattered on the altar and Lin An’s figure appeared there in perfect condition. Not only was he still alive but he was also unscathed! “Hmph, what can a mere heavenly tribulation do to me?” Lin An stood proudly, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand pointing straight at the sky. His unbridled laughter resounded in everyone’s ears. Everyone present was shocked and dumbfounded! The sword in Lin An’s hand pointed at the sky as he looked down on the lightning tribulation with a domineering aura. The pressure that erupted shocked everyone present. “How...; How is this possible? He managed to block it?” “He actually managed to block it! He actually managed to block that earth-shattering and terrifying heavenly tribulation?” “How terrifying! How terrifying!” All the demons present were moved. Their faces were filled with shock and astonishment. Su Peibai looked at this scene in disbelief and shock. “This...; This monkey actually has such strength!” “I’m afraid that even I wouldn’t be able to withstand the lightning tribulation just now! But he was actually unharmed!” “He’s really powerful. It’s unbelievable!” The Sky Demon King had already escaped from the lightning altar long before Lin An’s heavenly tribulation began. Now, he was also shocked by this heavenly tribulation and was even more shocked by Lin An’s imposing manner. Because of this, he became even more determined to get rid of Lin An! However, there were also people who began to doubt the authenticity of Lin An’s heavenly tribulation amidst their shock. “It’s impossible for the monkey to withstand that kind of heavenly tribulation. He must have been too lucky to survive!” “That’s right. From the perspective that we didn’t see, that heavenly tribulation must have missed and didn’t pour all its power into him.” “Let’s just watch. This second heavenly tribulation will only be stronger than the first heavenly tribulation. Even if it misses, just the residual power will be able to wipe out the monkey until not a single hair is left!” Boom! A loud sound came from the sky. The power of the second lightning tribulation would only increase as compared to the first lightning tribulation. The dark clouds seemed to have formed a vast abyss in the sky. Many lightning clouds were continuously gathering. As they churned and boiled, they turned pitch-black and looked even heavier. However, Lin An still stood firmly in the center of the altar. His expression didn’t change and he didn’t waver at all. “Ding! The power of the lightning tribulation has been detected. The refinement of the Hell King Purgatory Form has begun. One percent of the current power of the lightning tribulation has been successfully absorbed.” The sound of the system notification immediately stunned Lin An but a smile immediately appeared on his face. It was a good opportunity to refine his physique. Boom! The second lightning tribulation finally descended! It was like countless waterfalls falling from the sky. The rain of lightning instantly flooded the entire altar. Lin An had nowhere to hide but he didn’t want to find cover either. His body stood on the spot like a mountain, holding the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand. He directly used his physical body to withstand the heavenly thunder. “What’s going on? Why didn’t he take any measures?” “He actually didn’t use any skills to counteract the power of the lightning tribulation? He’s practically throwing his life away!” Everyone below the altar was astonished and they cried out repeatedly. Boom! The second lightning tribulation filled the entire altar like water. Lin An’s figure also disappeared from everyone’s sight within the lightning tribulation! However, after the majestic lightning receded, Lin An’s resolute and tall figure still stood there! He had once again survived without a scratch! “This...; How is this possible!” “What’s going on? Am I seeing things?” “Am I seeing things or is the world going crazy? Why...; Why isn’t he hurt at all?” Everyone was dumbfounded. They thought that the second lightning tribulation would definitely take Lin An’s life but he didn’t even use any spells. He directly used his physical body to withstand the lightning tribulation and he actually withstood it without any damage at all! “Ding! The Hell King’s Purgatory Form has been tempered. The lightning attribute has been absorbed by 5%!” On the altar, Lin An heard the system notification ringing in his ears and a smile appeared on his face. After the upgrade of the Eastern Emperor Bell, coupled with the Devil Seal Vital Energy technique, the strength of his body had increased. The second bolt of lightning didn’t do any damage to him at all. Instead, it became the nourishment for the Hell King’s Purgatory Form. The hearts of many people below the altar started to tremble and their gazes towards Lin An became fearful and bitter. Boom! The thunder clouds in the sky churned and became even more violent. The third lightning tribulation started to brew. Boom! In the midst of the shocked and gloomy atmosphere, the third lightning tribulation in the sky started to move. It was as if water had poured over a mountain of gold. As if it had reached the bottom of the blue sea, the third lightning tribulation was even more powerful than the first two combined. The third lightning tribulation descended again but, this time, it started to be crazily devoured by Lin An! After the first two refinements of the Hell King’s Purgatory Form, it began to absorb the lightning tribulation on its own. It was like a dry sponge touching water and it absorbed the lightning tribulation in a frenzy. “Ding! The refinement of the Hell King’s Purgatory Form is complete. The lightning attribute has accumulated to 10%!” After the third lightning tribulation had completely disappeared, the altar regained its calm, and everyone below the stage fell into silence. Only the thunder clouds in the sky were still boiling. The violent aura getting more and more intense! Lin An could feel the power of lightning coursing through his body. Each of his meridians contained the rich power of the lightning attribute and the muscles of his entire body were clearly defined and full of explosive power. Rumble! At this moment, a deafening explosion erupted in the sky. Some people looked over when they heard the sound, their faces were filled with terror. “Quick, look! The heavenly tribulation has changed! Wrath of the Heavens!” “Purple. Purple! How...; How could this be? There really is such a lightning tribulation in this world?” “How is this possible? This scene, which only existed in ancient lightning tribulations, actually reappeared today!” “A purple Heaven! Purple heavenly divine lightning! Purple heavenly divine lightning!” Many white-haired elders recognized this purple lightning tribulation. They were extremely moved and shocked. The lightning in the sky, which was like a giant dragon, flipped in the clouds. The lightning had actually turned into a pure purple color. The lightning, which did not have any mixed colors, carried a supreme divine might that could destroy the heavens and earth, making people tremble in fear. Heavenly punishment! This wasn’t the lightning tribulation, this was a punishment from the Heavens! “Heaven is angry!” “It’s over, Heaven is angry and people are suffering. All of us will be buried with them today. It’s over, it’s over!” “I’m afraid even the altar can’t withstand this heavenly power.” Many demons were terrified. Their faces turned pale as they scrambled to kneel down. They worshipped Heaven wholeheartedly and kowtowed to the heavens, hoping that Heaven would show mercy and let them escape from the heavenly punishment. Su Peibai’s face was also pale. Before the Heaven’s wrath, she felt a deep sense of powerlessness and fear. She had never thought that the monkey would actually cause such a disaster. However, the thin figure on the altar did not show the slightest bit of fear or wavering. At this moment, she finally understood that Lin An’s strength was far beyond her imagination. Meanwhile, the Sky Demon King and many of his subordinates were already dumbfounded. Some of them were so scared that their faces turned pale and their bodies trembled. Purple heavenly divine lightning, this was Heaven’s punishment. This was the wrath of the gods! Was this monkey transcending the tribulation or was he dragging everyone down with him? The heavens finally sent down his punishment. Along with the suffocating Heaven’s Might, four purple heavenly divine lightning bolts descended at the same time! On the altar, four terrifying purple heavenly divine lightning bolts scattered all over the ground. The scattered purple lightning bolts were like thin worms, happily drilling into his body. At this moment, the Hell King’s Purgatory Form was completely activated, greedily absorbing the terrifying power of the four bolts of purple heavenly divine lightning. The entire scene fell into silence, and everyone was stunned! Lin An, who was standing in the middle of the purple heavenly divine lightning being washed away by the terrifying power, looked like a god or a demon. They couldn’t help but feel fear and hesitation. Their hearts trembled in fear. “How...; How could this be?” “That is the genuine purple heavenly lightning. It comes from the supreme divine power recorded in the ancient records but it can’t break him?” Everyone was shocked. How could someone do such a thing? “Ding! The Hell King’s Purgatory Form has been tempered. The lightning attribute has been accumulated and absorbed by 45%!” The system notification rang in Lin An’s mind. The purple heavenly lightning had allowed the lightning attribute of the Hell King’s Purgatory Form to receive a huge benefit. It was only half a step away from completion. Meanwhile, Lin An felt that his physical body had become incomparably powerful. It was as if his entire body was emitting a brilliant glow. This tribulation was truly satisfying. Boom! A muffled sound rang out in the sky and the suffocating thunderclouds began to slowly dissipate. Everyone raised their heads and looked over. They were instantly stunned. “The heavenly tribulation has ended?” “What, what’s going on? It ended just like that?” Su Peibai let out a long sigh of relief. Her tensed heart also relaxed at once. “There will definitely be good fortune after surviving such a disaster.” “It’s finally over. After this tribulation, the monkey will become even stronger.” “Now that it’s over, it can be considered to be a thrilling experience.” “I don’t know how he managed to survive. He was actually able to fight even more bravely under such a terrifying heavenly tribulation!” She sighed in her heart with joy on her face. After all, she was the one who brought the monkey here. She could benefit from such an amazing performance. Boom! At this moment, a loud sound came from below the altar. It was as if another lightning tribulation had arrived and a violent aura suddenly swept over. Lin An was stunned for a moment. He looked in the direction of the sound and saw that the power of the lightning in the lightning pool below was rapidly increasing! The majestic and turbulent aura was like a ferocious beast that was waiting for a human to be eaten in the lightning pool. He quickly reacted and realized that he had already fed the Eastern Emperor Bell the mask! Although under the cover of the lightning altar, the demons were still unable to discover that he was a human, the lightning pool was able to identify him. As soon as the heavenly tribulation ended, the lightning pool couldn’t wait to destroy Lin An, the intruder. Lin An quickly checked his system space, wanting to find a tool, but all the tools had already been eaten by the Eastern Emperor Bell. Fortunately, he found that all the tools he had drawn could be exchanged in the exchange function, so he quickly used the lucky draw money to exchange for a pretend mask. Only then did he relax. “Why is the lightning pool so noisy? What’s going on?” “It can’t be. He just passed the purple heavenly lightning tribulation and he’s already trying to trigger the lightning pool?” “But, but this is too unusual. Look, the entire lightning pool is in chaos!” “How is this possible? From ancient times until now, only our ancestors could trigger the entire lightning pool! How can the monkey do this?” Boom! At this moment, the nine lightning pools finally exploded. The lightning that had been dormant for countless years almost turned into liquid, entangling and transforming into a few lightning dragons that surged towards Lin An on the altar. Following that, a loud explosion shook the heavens and earth. Lin An and the entire altar were immediately submerged by the thick lightning. In an instant, endless lightning surged into every inch of Lin An’s skin like a flood, sweeping through every single meridian in his body. This sudden surge of power made him feel as if he was about to explode. The meridians in his body felt as if they were being stabbed by countless sharp knives and his skin felt as if it was about to start cracking! Buzz! An ear-piercing sound of thunder suddenly rang out from his palm. Boundless bolts of lightning spun wildly and finally converged into a blazing bolt of lightning! “Ding! The Hell King’s Purgatory Form has been refined. Lightning attribute has been accumulated and absorbed by 58%!” “Ding! Hell King’s Purgatory Form has been refined. Lightning attribute has been absorbed by 60%!” “Ding! Hell King’s Purgatory Form has been refined. Lightning attribute has been absorbed by 68%!” ...; The neverending energy was refining his body crazily, becoming stronger and stronger. At the same time, the demons below the altar were all stunned. They stared at the altar that was covered by the lightning pool, not knowing what to say. They thought that the lightning pool would make the monkey suffer a great loss. However, they didn’t expect that the monkey would just scream at the beginning and then seemed to be fine? This...;? “Strange, look! The power of the lightning pool is weakening!” A monster noticed something and cried out. All the monsters looked at the altar when they heard the sound. They were surprised. “What’s going on? It seems that a part of the power of lightning is losing?” “That’s not right. The power of our lightning pool is eternal. How can it be lost?” “It seems like that monkey is absorbing the power of the lightning pool! Oh my heavens, how did that guy do it?” “The Sky Demon King has completely lost this time. The position of the Demon Emperor belongs to that monkey!” Everyone started to discuss and Su Peibai’s face was already filled with smiles. She looked at the Sky Demon King with an ice-cold expression. With the power of Lin An who was about to become the Demon Emperor, she said to the Sky Demon King in a low voice. “Sky Demon King! My friend is about to become the next Demon Emperor. I will give you one last chance to return my sister. Otherwise...;” She did not say the rest of her words. However, the Sky Demon King could imagine what would happen if he was targeted by the next Demon Emperor. His expression immediately changed. He was quiet for a moment before he clenched his teeth and spoke unwillingly, “The lightning tribulation ritual has ended. Your sister will naturally appear at the entrance of the lightning pool!” At this moment, Lin An, who was on the altar, had almost sucked the lightning pool dry. His body became incomparably tough. His muscles seemed to have undergone countless tempering and there would occasionally be a flash on the surface of his skin. “Ding! Congratulations to the Host for completing the refinement of the Hell King’s Purgatory Form. You have accumulated 100% of the lightning attribute and obtained the ability to control lightning.” In the next moment, Lin An immediately sensed that everything within a radius of a few hundred miles that contained the lightning attribute could be controlled by him. Lin An was overjoyed. He didn’t expect to have such a harvest on this trip. Just as he was rejoicing, he suddenly heard a clamor coming from below. “Look at that monkey. He has already absorbed all the power in the lightning pool.” “What if the lightning pool is unable to recover after a hundred years? How are our descendants going to hold the lightning tribulation sacrifice again?” “This monkey is impetuous and doesn’t think about our tribe at all. He doesn’t have the right to be the Demon Emperor!” Lin An finally understood what these people were arguing about after listening for a long time. It turned out that they were using this as an excuse to stop Lin An from becoming the new Demon Emperor. He sneered and threw the lightning in his hand at the clamoring crowd. Boom! In an instant, the power of lightning exploded in front of the demons. An invisible wave of air pushed them to the ground. At the same time, the lightning spread out and engulfed everyone. The lightning filled their bodies and the demons screamed in pain. Lin An controlled the lightning. As long as he didn’t let the lightning escape, the lightning would bind them tightly and make them suffer. Screams of pain rang out beside the lightning pool. More than ten demons cried out in pain and struggled on the ground. No matter what spell they used, they couldn’t escape the torture of the lightning. The lightning spun faster and faster, and the sharp sound of thunder became more and more ear-piercing. Most of the demons present felt a chill in their hearts and couldn’t help but retreat. In the end, the violent power instantly tore apart the bodies of a few of the demons, leaving only a cloud of blood mist on the ground. “Monkey, you’re courting death!” Those demons were all from the Sky Demon King’s tribe. After they were killed by Lin An, he roared angrily and charged straight at Lin An. Lin An smiled coldly. What he wanted was to provoke the Sky Demon King into making a move. After all, between the Sky Demon King and Su Peibai’s positions, the two sides were enemies. It wasn’t his style to ignore his enemies. A ball of lightning appeared in his hand and he threw it straight at the Sky Demon King. The Sky Demon King’s expression changed immediately. His pupils contracted rapidly and he hurriedly used a spell to block in front of him. Bang! The ball of lightning exploded the Sky Demon King’s blocking spell. Even his entire body was sent flying. Like a kite with a broken string, he fell from afar and crashed into the ground, creating a crater. This scene immediately shocked the other non-humans present. Initially, they thought that if the Sky Demon King made a move, Su Peibai would definitely come out to protect Lin An. However, in the end, there was no need for her to make a move at all. Lin An only used one move to send the Sky Demon King flying and heavily injure him! Was this level of strength really only at the peak of the aurous core stage? It was simply unbelievable. It wasn’t until night fell and the lightning tribulation sacrificial ceremony ended that the protective barrier outside the lightning pool was opened. Lin An, Su Peibai, and the others left together. At the entrance of the lightning pool, Su Peibai’s sister was also brought back safe and sound. After returning to Su Peibai’s tribe, Su Peibai told him that he would have to ascend the throne in the demon city two days later and take over as the new Demon Emperor. Lin An was a little conflicted. He was only here to watch the show. How did he become the new Demon Emperor? Then would he return to the Jiuxiao Sect? And what about his master, Qian Yi? But he immediately thought it through. The only bond between the Jiuxiao Sect and him was just Qian Yi. It was fine if he didn’t go back to that place! He might as well go to the demon city and take a look first. It would be another matter if he ascended the throne or not. The next morning, under the leadership of Su Peibai, Lin An followed a few powerhouses from Su Peibai’s tribe and all of them set off for the demon city. It was worth mentioning that after passing the aurous heavenly tribulation, Lin An had already successfully stepped into the nascent soul stage. He had also obtained a big upgrade gift pack and obtained four nascent soul advancement pills. Now, he was already at the fourth stage of the intermediate stage of the nascent soul stage. He had leveled up four times in one night. This speed could be said to be monstrous! When they arrived at the demon city, it was already evening. The sky was gradually turning yellow. However, the demon city was not as prosperous and wealthy as they had imagined. Instead, it was extremely dilapidated. From afar, it looked more like a relic. This was the current position of the demon race in the Cangyun Continent. The few elders of the demon race were immediately filled with emotions. They shook their heads and said. “Haa, our race has already declined to this point.” “I can’t remember how many years ago. At that time, I was still young and had witnessed how prosperous and rich this demon city was. Even the current Ghana Empire didn’t much compare.” “It’s a pity that the battle back then...; Cough!” In the end, the few elders sighed and didn’t speak anymore. Su Peibai stood outside the city. Her face was filled with solemnity and reserve as if she was imagining the glory of the demon city back then. At a time like this, even Lin An was affected by the vicissitudes of time. There was a hint of sadness on his face. “Let’s start the preparations. The coronation ceremony will be held early tomorrow morning.” After Su Peibai said this, she led everyone towards the imperial palace. At this time, many unfamiliar faces had already arrived in the demon city, all of them were here for the coronation ceremony. ...; At the entrance of the palace, there was a demon standing. Seeing Lin An and his group walk over, he immediately sneered, “A stinky monkey with a red butt. What ability does he have to become the Demon Emperor of our demon race?” His voice was neither loud nor soft but it fell right into the ears of everyone here, including the passersby. Instantly, many people’s faces were filled with an intrigued expression. Su Peibai’s eyes also turned cold. She knew that there would definitely be people who would be unconvinced by Lin An’s ascension, and she had to beat down the questioning voice completely. Thus, she furrowed her brows and shouted, “Hiding your head and showing your tail! Show your true appearance and speak!” That person walked out from the shadow that concealed his figure. It was an old man with wings on his back. He stood still and sneered, “What. Did I say something wrong? How can a mere fourth-level nascent soul stage lead our clan to prosperity?” The passersby were all shocked. “Eagle King!” “I didn’t expect him to come to the coronation ceremony.” “He is deliberately provoking the new Demon Emperor.” “The new Demon Emperor has yet to take the throne and someone is already showing off. It seems that something bad is going to happen today.” “Moreover, there are quite a few tribes who haven’t come to the demon city. Could it be that there will be internal strife in our tribe?” The passersby started to discuss in low voices, their faces filled with worry. The demon race was currently weak. If there were any more internal strife, it would probably take hundreds of years for them to recover their strength. It was even more likely that their foundations would be damaged and there would be no hope of recovery from it. Lin An glanced at the elder calmly and couldn’t help but sneer, “A mere level eight nascent soul cultivator actually has the courage to say such things to me?” The old man laughed, “Haha, level eight of the nascent soul stage is far more qualified than you to sit in that position!” Immediately, many passersby were in an uproar. The Eagle King even said such things. It seemed that he was really going to shed all pretense of cordiality with Lin An today. Lightning suddenly appeared under Lin An’s feet. His body suddenly turned into a shadow and appeared outside the hall in the blink of an eye. Slap! Immediately, a crisp slap rang through the air. The Eagle King was sent flying to the ground and a large chunk of his cheek swelled up. His face filled with shock. The passersby were all stunned. They didn’t even see how Lin An had attacked. Their hearts were filled with shock. With the strength of a level four nascent soul, he was actually able to send a level eight nascent soul King flying in an instant? Following that, Lin An’s palm landed on the Eagle King. Everyone present was dumbfounded. The feathers on the Eagle King’s wings were scattered all over the ground but the level eight nascent soul stage Eagle King didn’t even have the ability to resist. “The Eagle King was beaten up?” “He couldn’t even fight back!” “The new Demon Emperor is too powerful! A level four nascent soul stage cultivator was actually able to beat up a level eight nascent soul stage cultivator without being able to fight back?” Everyone was shocked. The Eagle King curled up on the ground and shivered. He was really scared of being beaten. He was shocked. This monkey was only at level four of the nascent soul stage but why did it feel like he was comparable to a nascent soul stage cultivator? Whoosh! At this moment, the sound of air being torn apart came from the street. Looking up, he saw an arrow flying toward him, followed by a sky full of flying feathers. Suddenly, panic-stricken screams rang out in the city. “Not good! Demonic Beasts! Demonic Beast Army! The Demonic Beast Army is here!” Immediately, the faces of all the demons changed dramatically. The atmosphere of panic instantly filled the whole place. “How did the Demonic Beast Army know that we were here?” “There’s a traitor among us. He exposed our tracks!” “That’s right. Our clan has been living a low-key life for so many years and has always been peaceful. If someone hadn’t tipped them off, there wouldn’t have been so many demonic beasts here by coincidence.” “What a vicious heart! He colluded with his former enemy to harm his compatriots. Who exactly is it!” In the demon city, many demons were shocked and furious. “We can’t just sit around and wait for death!” At this moment, an old demon suddenly stood out from the crowd and shouted, “If we continue to stay here, we will only have one thought. We might as well kill our way out of the encirclement of demonic beasts and fight our way out of death!” Soon after, these words began to spread throughout the city, and madness appeared in the eyes of most of the people. Even a rabbit would bite when it was anxious, not to mention that there were so many demons who had suffered for so many years. Now that they were forced into a desperate situation by the Demonic Beast Army, they all had the urge to fight to the death. ...; At this moment, outside the main hall on the first floor of the tower, more and more demonic beasts were gathering. Wherever the Demonic Beast Army went, the ground would crack and dust would fly up into the air. In the main hall, the demons activated the tower’s defensive formation. As they saw the increasing number of demonic beasts outside, although their faces were a little pale, they still remained steadfast in their hearts. Once this formation was activated, it completely blocked the connection with the outside world. The attacks from the outside world could not enter. Even if they were inside the defensive formation, they would not be able to attack the enemies outside. Roar! At this moment, a few aurous core stage demonic beasts let out a roar. They leaped up and waved their sharp claws to strike the light screen. However, the tower formation was still as bright as ever and did not waver in the slightest. Everyone was overjoyed when they saw this and their confidence grew stronger and stronger. Swoosh! At this moment, a few muffled sounds suddenly came from the sky. A few shadows flew out from the group of demonic beasts and landed outside the tower. The leader was a burly man. He looked no different from a human but his body exuded a powerful aura. He was actually a nascent soul stage powerhouse. He expressionlessly looked at the tower’s array formation with a cold gaze. After looking at it for a while, the corners of his mouth curled into a disdainful smile. Behind him were a few huge demonic beasts. They had playful smiles on their faces as they stared at the demon clan in the main hall. Su Peibai looked at the man with a serious expression. Even though she had successfully transcended the heavenly tribulation and was only half a step away from the nascent soul stage, she could still feel how terrifying the pressure emitted by the man was. In the nascent soul stage, being just half a step away from the nascent soul stage meant the gap in strength was like an insurmountable chasm! Moreover, it was precisely because there was such a new Demonic Beast Lord in this area that the Demonic Beast Army dared to attack the Demon City so recklessly. At this moment, the Demonic Beast Army was still outside the city. This nascent soul stage Beast King led the vanguard army and charged over. He wanted to execute the decapitation tactic and get rid of the new Demon Emperor first. The nascent soul stage demonic beast glanced at the array formation and said mockingly, “A mantis trying to stop a chariot. You don’t know how to measure your strength. Do you think you can stop me with just this little thing?” As soon as he finished speaking, a powerful pressure surged out from his body and spread out instantly. It surged into the main hall through the array formation. Boom! The numerous demons in the great hall one after another tremble. The faces were pale. The imposing manner instantly weakened. The light of the defensive array suddenly dimmed down. The nascent soul stage Demonic Beast Lord raised his head and roared. The 60,000 strong Demonic Beast Army outside the city suddenly surged forward. Amidst the deafening roars, they charged ferociously toward the defense formation of the demon tower. Boom! Boom! Boom! The entire defense formation of the tower was immediately knocked down by the Demonic Beast Army. One by one, the demonic beasts used their horns, claws, and even their scales to fiercely knock against the defense formation. The defense formation of the tower became weaker and weaker. The faces of the demons in the main hall also turned deathly pale. Previously, they had an extremely firm belief but, under the fierce collision of so many demonic beast armies, it was already gone. Boom! Another fierce collision caused the entire tower to shake violently. This was a sign that the entire defensive formation was about to be broken! “Hahahaha...;” Right at this moment, a hearty laughter suddenly rang out from the main hall. Everyone present was stunned and turned their heads to look. Lin An walked down the stairs and looked at the Demonic Beast Lord outside the hall with a face full of disdain. He had spent some time setting up the spell formation on the second floor of the tower. Now, he was finally done. The Demonic Beast Lord’s gaze also landed on Lin An. After sizing him up, his face was instantly filled with ridicule and playfulness. Then, he saw Lin An pull out a cannon from somewhere and point the muzzle at him. The entire hall instantly fell silent! Everyone stared blankly at the seemingly ordinary cannon that Lin An brought out. They were all dumbfounded. Cannon? What was the point of bringing something like this out at a time like this? In the main hall, many of the members of the demon race, whose faces were filled with surprise and joy after seeing Lin An, suddenly froze on the spot. Almost at the same time, an uneasy premonition arose in everyone’s hearts. Someone swallowed their saliva and looked at Lin An. They asked uneasily, “Your...; Your Highness, you’ve been preparing upstairs for two hours. Could it be that it’s to forge this cannon?” After they asked this question, everyone’s gaze fell on Lin An. Even Su Peibai was no exception. This kind of cannon was used by ordinary mortals in battle. Its power might be very strong to ordinary mortals but it was just a battlefield in the mortal world. On the battlefield of cultivators, things like cannons were completely useless! Therefore, the uneasiness in their hearts was as if they were suffocating. If this new Demon Emperor really spent two hours building a cannon, then they would really be angered to the point of vomiting blood. However, Lin An revealed a look of admiration towards that person. He patted the pitch-black body of the cannon and smiled, “Oh, you’re quite smart. This emperor is just as you said!” Everyone felt their vision go black and they almost fainted from anger. In a time of life and death, you actually used two hours to build such a cannon? You are crazy! “Ha, I didn’t expect that we would die so laughably!” An elder of the demon race smiled bitterly. He felt that he had lost all his strength and slid down the wall to sit down. The gloomy atmosphere instantly filled the entire hall. “If I had known earlier, I would have rushed out. Even if I died at the mouth of a demonic beast, it would still be better than dying in such a sullen manner.” “Yeah, at least I wouldn’t have suffered such a huge blow before I died.” “Haa, forget it. Forget it. This is the fate of our race. Our entire life is so ominous.” “Today, we have so many tribal kings here. After the fall of the Demon City, I’m afraid that the demon race will no longer have any hope of revival.” Su Peibai also looked at Lin An and asked with a hint of anticipation, “You must have prepared other methods, right?” Lin An felt very strange and scratched his head. “No, with such a group of demonic beasts, is there a need to prepare other methods? Prepare to follow me and kill everyone!” Su Peibai’s face instantly turned pale. Was there really only this cannon? It was over! And what happened in the hall, even the Demonic Beast Lords outside almost laughed out loud when they saw it. “Haha, Your new Demon Emperor is really an interesting monkey. I was originally worried about how to break the array, but I didn’t expect you to immediately destroy your morale? Hahahahaha...;” The demonic beast horde leader laughed out loud, his face full of ridicule. Lin An immediately responded with a sneer, “Shut down the array for me!” In an instant, the expressions of the many demons present, including Su Peibai, changed drastically. “Shut down the formation? Demon Emperor, what are you doing? Are you going to kowtow and beg for mercy?” “No, I won’t surrender. I’d rather die in battle!” “If you want to kneel, you cowards, go and kneel yourself. This old man’s reputation has been spotless all my life. How can it be ruined today!” All the demons spoke up angrily. Su Peibai’s face was also full of shock as she exclaimed, “Damn monkey, are you crazy? Do you know what you’re talking about?” Even though they knew that they could no longer hold on, no one wanted to stop the formation. Because this action meant that they had surrendered. Even if they were to die, it was impossible for them to surrender to the demonic beasts. Lin An was instantly dumbfounded by everyone’s reaction, “What are you guys thinking? I’m not the kind of person who’s afraid of death!” “Then, then what do you mean by that?” Su Peibai asked in astonishment. Lin An pointed at the enemies outside the hall and asked in bafflement...; “If you guys don’t release the formation, how am I going to blast those idiots?” “Uh...;” At that moment, everyone in the hall finally understood that Lin An didn’t want to surrender but to fight back. Alright, although this move was very foolish, at least he had some backbone! Even before he died, he should have risen up and resisted! Boom! The demon race had shut down the spell formation. There wasn’t much point in expending mana to maintain the spell formation. No matter how much they delayed what they had to face, they had to face it in the end! Outside the main hall, the leader of the demonic beasts saw that Lin An had actually ordered someone to shut down the spell formation and even threatened to fire a cannon at him. He instantly burst into laughter. The few nascent soul stage demonic beasts behind him were also amused by Lin An’s actions. “This monkey is really funny. He actually wants to use the cannon from the human world to deal with our Demonic Beast Army?” “With this kind of cannon, I’m afraid it’s not even qualified to scratch our itch!” “These demonic beasts are really too slow-witted. Hahahahaha...;” Lin An looked at them with a mocking smile on his face. He took out a supreme-grade spirit stone from the system space and stuffed it into the groove on the body of the cannon. Then, he clasped his hands together. His ten fingers were like shadows as he quickly formed seals. At the same time, he used his divine will to increase the power of the divine might cannon to its maximum. Whoosh! In the next moment, a golden light blossomed from his hands. He brought with him a majestic golden light as he slammed it onto the body of the cannon. Bang! The body of the cannon, which was made of refined iron, immediately let out a trembling sound. In the next moment, all the runes on the body of the cannon shone brightly and released a dazzling golden light. It gradually blazed, as if it had condensed into a brilliant sun that lit up the entire world. Divine might like the sea suddenly spread out! The Demonic Beast Lord let out a surprised cry and frowned. For some unknown reason, an uneasy feeling suddenly appeared in the depths of its heart, as if a crisis was about to arrive. Boom! Right at this moment, the divine might cannon loaded with supreme-grade spirit stones suddenly exploded with a huge golden beam of light. The Demonic Beast Lord didn’t have the time to react before a beam of light with an earth-shattering aura suddenly crossed the empty space and struck his chest. Violent energy completely exploded with the Demonic Beast Lord at the center. The light and heat spread out, and the shock wave followed closely. All the demonic beasts in this area were overturned. Boom! A terrifying formless airwave formed a circle of ripples in the air, and a strong gale spread in all directions. A few nascent soul stage demonic beasts didn’t have the time to dodge, and they were instantly affected by the explosion. They were blown into pieces. Not even their corpses were left behind. The Demonic Beast Lord was also blasted away, creating a huge crater in the distance. His blood splattered on the ground. In the main hall, all the demons were scared silly. Almost everyone had their mouths agape and their faces were filled with shock! With just one shot, several nascent soul stage demonic beasts were crushed and over a thousand aurous core stage demonic beasts were destroyed. Even one Demonic Beast Lord was blasted into an unknown state of life and death! The entire demon city extended out from the entrance of the main hall. The golden light beam created a ravine that led to the bottom of the city wall in the distance. Wherever this shot went, all living things were annihilated. Everything ceased to exist. The entire main hall was silent. The demons were completely dumbfounded and could not come back to their senses for a long time. Because this scene was far beyond their imagination. This ultimate attack was comparable to a nascent soul stage powerhouse. Was it really something that could be achieved with just a cannon and a top-grade spirit stone? “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle, obtaining 2,692 lucky draw coins!” “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle, obtaining 1,360 lucky draw coins!” “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle, obtaining 120 lucky draw coins!” ...; “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining a lucky drop. You have obtained a nascent soul advancement pill +2!” The system notifications kept ringing in Lin An’s ears. He had killed more than a thousand demonic beasts of all levels and he had obtained an astonishing amount of lucky draw coins. The most amazing thing was the lucky drop of two nascent soul advancement pills. After entering the nascent soul stage, each level required a vast amount of cultivation time and this one-shot increase in level...; No one knew how many people couldn’t achieve this even after decades of hard work. Everyone came back to their senses and looked at Lin An. They opened their mouths but couldn’t say anything. After living for so many years, they had never experienced such ups and downs. First, they were surrounded by an army of demonic beasts. Under the protection of a nascent soul stage cultivator, it was almost equivalent to certain death. However, this new Demon Emperor, who was only in the nascent soul stage, actually displayed his heroic nature in the vast ocean. He unleashed his magic treasure, destroying the heavens and earth, crushing everything in his path, completely changing the battle situation. This...; seemed to have turned into a crushing defeat? It was hard to imagine, this was really too hard to imagine! Everyone’s hearts were filled with awe. However, after the awe, every demon’s eyes shone with a strong radiance! Following that, they all knelt down towards Lin An. “We pay our respects to the new Demon Emperor. Our Emperor will rule the Jianghu for thousands of generations!” Many demons shouted in unison, including the leaders of the various tribes. Their voices reverberated throughout the land, shaking the heavens and earth. They had already been subjugated by Lin An. Their eyes were filled with respect and worship! Roar! However, at this moment, the remaining tens of thousands of demonic beasts began to roar furiously. Where the Demonic Beast Lord fell, the demonic beasts retreated, leaving a wide-open space. Lin An’s heart trembled. He had long expected that although the divine might cannon was powerful, its effect was limited. Even if it could unleash an attack comparable to a nascent soul stage powerhouse, it would not be enough to insta-kill the Demonic Beast Lord. Immediately, Lin An started to form seals with his hands again. However, at that moment, a shadow rushed out from the Demonic Beast Army and soared into the sky. It exploded with terrifying pressure and instantly suppressed the entire demon city. The person who soared into the sky was none other than the Demonic Beast Lord. At this moment, there was a huge wound on his chest, and he was bleeding profusely. His eyes were filled with fury as he looked at Lin An. The Demonic Beast Lord’s voice was filled with fury as he roared at the Demonic Beast Army below, “Kill them all! Turn them into meat paste and seize that cannon for me!” In an instant, tens of thousands of demonic beast armies began to charge. The demonic beasts that tore the sky and earth apart let out earth-shattering roars as they charged towards the tower formation. The expressions of the many demon tribes in the hall changed drastically as they cried out in alarm. “Protect His Highness the Demon Emperor!” Bang! Bang! Bang! Instantly, eight divine might cannons crashed heavily into the hall. The entire hall fell into a dead silence! Nine divine might recharged cannons! The entire nine cannons! Everyone’s eyes were wide open and they were completely dumbfounded! Just one cannon was enough to heavily injure a first-level nascent soul stage cultivator but Lin An actually took out nine of them! This...; was simply heaven-defying! Everyone was dumbstruck, feeling extremely incredulous. Bang! Bang! Bang! The nine divine might cannons emitted a series of trembling sounds. The runes on the cannons also emitted a golden light. Boom! In the next moment, the blazing golden light beam expanded explosively and shot out in nine different directions, emitting a dazzling light. The demonic beasts that were rushing over were instantly destroyed one after another. In just a few minutes, there were only a few demonic beasts left. “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained 132 lottery coins!” “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained 137 lottery coins!” “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have obtained 172 lottery coins!” ...; “How dare you!” The leader of the Demonic Beasts was enraged. He roared loudly and his eyes were about to explode. Boom! The immense pressure of the nascent soul stage brought with it a terrifying killing intent. It instantly pressed down like a huge mountain. The faces of the few aurous core stage demons in the main hall instantly turned pale. Blood flowed out of the corners of their mouths and they suddenly collapsed to the ground. Although the other nascent soul stage cultivators did not go as far as this, they still needed to focus their minds to fight. They did not dare to be the slightest bit careless. However, there was one person who was different from the rest! There was a spot of green among the thousands of flowers. Mount Tai collapsed in front of him, but its color did not change. He had his hands behind his back. His sleeves fluttered in the wind and he had a smile on his face. Only when there was a big event could one see that the quietness on his body was fully displayed. Lin An’s face was full of disdain. The power of his soul was comparable to that of an expert at the level of the Ruoshui Emperor. A mere first level of the nascent soul stage made it look as easy as sprinkling water. The many demons in the main hall were all shocked. The new Demon Emperor was actually able to act so casually under the pressure of a nascent soul stage cultivator. He was simply too powerful! Chi! A streak of lightning appeared under Lin An’s feet. His figure suddenly soared into the air. The Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword at his waist was unsheathed. He held it and charged towards the Demonic Beast Lord. The Demonic Beast Lord’s expression changed. He endured his injuries and quickly flew across the sky. Pu! Almost at the same time, the demonic beast horde leader spat out a mouthful of blood. His recovery was interrupted and he had to pay a price for it. “Ha!” The demon beast horde leader roared. Accompanied by a majestic true energy, his long hair fluttered even though there was no wind. With a wave of his palms, it suddenly transformed into a huge sea of fire. It formed a vortex in front of him, twisting in the void. Boom! The huge sea of fire that the Demonic Beast Lord had turned into a huge golden sun, bringing with it a hot and violent wave of air as it suddenly attacked. “Go to hell, monkey!” The Demonic Beast Lord laughed maniacally as he followed behind the golden sun. He then shot out two black horns from the epicenter. Shoo! The two horns shot out of the wind at an extremely fast speed. “Not good! Demon Emperor, be careful!” “That Demonic Beast Lord’s true form is a bull. The two horns have already been refined into his natal artifact. Not only are they indestructible, but they are also extremely powerful. You must not take them head-on!” “Monkey, use your movement technique to dodge!” All the demons shouted in unison, their faces filled with anxiety. They thought that the Demonic Beast Lord’s strength would be greatly reduced when it was heavily injured, but they didn’t expect it to be so strong. However, Lin An sneered. “Comparing strength? Haha, I’ve never been afraid of anyone.” “Black and White Ashen Flames Transformation!” Lin An had almost forgotten how long it had been since he had used this move! After activating this move to increase his strength, Lin An swung the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword and slashed at the two horns of the Demonic Beast Lord. The horns instantly shattered and exploded into a pile of dust that slowly fell from the sky! At the same time, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s momentum did not decrease. It brought with it an ominous blood-red light and directly tore apart the golden sun. It brought with it a fierce and forceful force as it headed straight for the Demonic Beast Lord. “How is this possible?” The Demonic Beast Army leader cried out in shock. His expression changed drastically and he was hit by the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword’s forceful force. He once again spat out a mouthful of blood. This time, he was really injured. The two bull horn awls were his natal magic tools, and they were extremely tough. However, they were cut into dust by Lin An’s sword. Furthermore, they were also injured by the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, which instantly caused his heart meridian to be heavily injured! This mouthful of blood was the blood of his heart! The Demonic Beast Lord clutched his chest and looked at Lin An with a pale face. His eyes were filled with shock and fear! No matter what, he couldn’t understand how a mere nascent soul stage cultivator could have such power! He was the Demonic Beast Lord of a generation and was also an overlord among the demonic beasts of the five nations. His cultivation level had reached the nascent soul stage. However, when he faced Lin An now, he actually felt a sense of fear! Meanwhile, the main hall below also fell into silence at this time. All the demons were dumbfounded. They originally thought that Lin An would suffer a great loss under the Demonic Beast Leader’s natal magic item but, in the end, those two indestructible bull horns were actually slashed apart by a sword? What kind of power was this? How did a nascent soul stage cultivator achieve such explosive power? Everyone couldn’t help but swallow their saliva. The strength of this new Demon Emperor seemed to be far from being as simple as an ordinary nascent soul stage cultivator! Chi! Two balls of flames of different colors suddenly rose between Lin An’s palms. Black and white ashen flames! The eyelids of the Demonic Beast Lord immediately twitched violently. He became extremely uneasy. He felt the two strange flames up close. One was cold and the other was hot. The violent aura contained within made him feel even more terrified. Faintly, he already had the intention to retreat! He had a vague feeling that if he didn’t run now, he wouldn’t be able to escape anymore! The Demonic Beast Lord’s expression finally changed, and he shouted at the tens of thousands of demonic beasts below, “Retreat quickly!” Then, without hesitation, he used his movement technique, turned his head, and fled at high speed! “Monkey, when this King recovers from his injuries, I’ll definitely come back and exterminate your entire clan!” The Demonic Beast Lord may have felt that running away like this was too shameful, and after flying for a few hundred meters, he suddenly turned around and said something fierce. Lightning flashed under Lin An’s feet and he instantly rushed toward the Demonic Beast Army leader. At the same time, he fiercely flung his wrist forward. The black and white ashen flames in his palm suddenly floated out and crossed the distance between them, directly rushing in front of the Demonic Beast Army leader. The Demonic Beast Army leader was frightened by the speed of the black and white ashen flames. He panicked and turned around, wanting to run away. However, the majestic fire lotus gradually blazed in his eyes and slowly blossomed. Boom! A monstrous wave of air followed by flames instantly spread out in all directions. The black and white ashen flames suddenly exploded and pounced onto the body of the Demonic Beast Army leader. He was immediately devoured by the terrifying flames. “Ding! Congratulations to the host for winning the battle. You have received a lottery reward of +100.” “Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a lucky drop. You have received a mysterious grand gift bag. Do you want to open it?” Two consecutive system notifications rang in Lin An’s ears. At the same time, below the main hall, the many demons looked at the sea of fire in the sky that was almost burning red. They were already dumbfounded. “The Demonic Beast Lord...; is dead?” “He...; He was killed by His Highness the Demon Emperor just like that?” “He didn’t even leave a corpse behind. He was completely engulfed by the flames...;” Everyone muttered in disbelief. At this moment, all the demons felt a wave of joy and ecstasy! Because the figure that killed the Demonic Beast Lord was the new Emperor of their demon race. A new Demon Emperor who could lead them to greatness! ...; After the coronation ceremony, Lin An followed Su Peibai back to her tribe. The demon city was already in ruins. After the battle yesterday, no one could live there anymore. As a result, Su Peibai’s tribe changed its name and became the Demon Emperor tribe. After this incident, Lin An still planned to go to the Ghana Empire’s imperial city to take a look. It was not a good idea to stay here. Moreover, he was not interested in being the Demon Emperor. Before he set off, he checked his system space and discovered that after the battle that day, Lin An had already accumulated more than five thousand lottery coins. He could be considered very wealthy. However, what Lin An was concerned about now was the mysterious grand gift bag that he had dropped when he killed the Demon Beast Overlord. After thinking for a moment, he had a thought and let the system open the grand gift bag. Whoosh! A few rays of light streaked across the gift bag and flew into the box. At the same time, the system’s notification sounded. “Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a new flame: eight desolate destruction flame!” Eight Desolate Destruction Flame: Can transform into a pair of enormous flame wings, increasing flying speed. With the addition of a new flame, Lin An’s profound flame transformation could increase its power even more. Moreover, after obtaining the flame wings, it meant that Lin An would be able to achieve a qualitative leap in his original speed. It could be said that his speed was unparalleled! Lin An’s face lit up with joy. With a thought, he immediately absorbed the eight desolate destruction flame into his body. Boom! After his body felt a wave of heat, Lin An saw a ball of black flame that was slightly lighter than the black flame in his dantian. It and the black and white ashen flame slowly floated in his dantian, each occupying a piece of precious space and not interfering with each other. After that, Lin An left the nine divine might cannons to the Demon Emperor tribe and left a letter to Su Peibai. Then, in the fresh and slightly chilly morning breeze, he spread out his newly acquired flaming wings and flew away. With a muffled “Boom,” Lin An spread his wings like a great roc and suddenly shot into the sky like a cannonball. The pair of flaming wings on his back seemed to be born with him. He was very skilled in controlling them. Facing the direction of the rising sun, his figure gradually turned into a black dot and disappeared from the horizon. ...; Originally, Lin An was about six to seven days away from the imperial city. However, after possessing the pair of flaming wings, he only used one day and one night to be able to see the imperial city from afar. Looking from the sky, the entire imperial city was at least the size of dozens of football fields. The streets were extremely spacious, and the top of the imperial palace shone with a brilliant golden light. There was a faint majestic and powerful aura that enveloped the surroundings. Lin An’s body flashed with a glow, and in the next moment, he turned into a gentle, handsome youth and appeared on a small road in the outskirts of the imperial city. Not far ahead, there was a teahouse. There were many guests, and some of the young men and women were dressed luxuriously. They seemed to be well-read and reasonable as if they were from a prestigious family. These ten or so young people had gathered in a small teahouse. Something important must have happened. A loud noise came from outside the teahouse. A weak scholar was arguing with a group of brawny men sitting at the tea table. There were five or six people sitting at the burly man’s table. All of them were at the aurous core stage but the weak scholar was alone. He was only at the third level of the foundation establishment stage. When the other young people in the teahouse saw this scene, they all ignored it. Some of them even showed a gloating smile. “This East City Academy is famous for having a lot of trash. They actually dared to send people here. Aren’t they afraid of making a fool of themselves?” “Look at him, he looks like he’s about to cry from fright, haha!” “Ignore him. Hurry up and finish your food and go to the city to stay. Tomorrow morning, we still have to attend the gathering personally hosted by Madam Li. We can’t be late.” “Madam Li is hosting a banquet, so the princess will naturally attend. If anyone can stand out at the gathering and leave a good impression on the princess, it will be a great benefit for the selection of the prince consort in a few day’s time!” Lin An’s gaze fell on the weak scholar in front of him, and he muttered to himself, “Looking at this silly fellow. He’s quite pitiful. I might as well help him vent his anger and find out what happened in the imperial city recently.” At this moment, the weak scholar had already left the burly man’s table in embarrassment and walked to the side. Lin An walked up to him and said, “The people at that table were so rude to you, how can we let it go so easily? Why don’t I help you vent your anger? Then the two of us can find a place to sit down and have a cup of tea and chat?” “Ah?” The weak scholar was shocked and quickly waved his hand, “No need. Those people have very high cultivation levels and are quite unreasonable. It’s better if we don’t offend them too much. Why don’t we travel together now and find a place to rest in the city?” Lin An waved his hand and said with an unfathomable expression, “We are all loyal to each other. Your matter is my matter. I must vent my anger!” Before they could finish their sentence, a few mocking laughter came from behind them. “Hehe, where did this arrogant kid come from?” “He must be no better than the people from the East City Academy. They’re all useless!” “He’s only at the foundation establishment stage. A newborn calf isn’t afraid of a tiger!” They couldn’t detect Lin An’s cultivation level. They thought that he was just like that weak scholar. Lin An turned around and saw two men and two women strolling over. Both of them were dressed like scholars, but they also looked like they were rich. When the weak scholar saw them, he looked away and lowered his head. He didn’t dare to look them in the eye and reminded Lin An in a low voice. “Let’s go. These are the disciples of the Sacred City Academy.” The Sacred City Academy was an academy directly under the name of the Emperor of the Ghana Empire. Those who could enter were all of extraordinary talent and they would definitely become nobles in the imperial court after they came out. “Wait for the good show!” Lin An turned around and walked towards the table of strong men. Only the weak scholar and the two men and two women from the Sacred City Academy were left standing on the spot with blank expressions. Was...; was that kid’s brain damaged? Or did he not want his life? He actually dared to go? “Hehe, that kid is dead for sure!” Looking at Lin An’s figure walking over, a man from the Sacred City Academy sneered. “I thought he was pretty good-looking but I didn’t expect him to be such an arrogant guy!” Everyone shook their heads. The weak scholar was scared out of his wits. He didn’t expect his brother to be so fierce. By the time he reacted, Lin An had already arrived at the table of the few strong men. ...; “Brother Lin, Madam Li is hosting a banquet by Daming Lake this time. It’s really a brilliant performance! In a place like Daming Lake, it’s really a place full of poetry.” The next day, on the way to Daming Lake, the weak scholar was introducing the scenery of Daming Lake to Lin An. He completely treated Lin An as a foreigner. Very soon, the two of them arrived at their destination. The water of Daming Lake was jade-green and beautiful. There was a curved jade bridge on the lake that led to a mansion in the middle of the lake. That was Madam Li’s courtyard. Today’s gathering was different from the past. There were many more people attending. The reason was that the Princess of the Ghana Empire might be attending the banquet today. The young talents of the various academies rushed over one after another, wanting to see the princess and at the same time, hoping to leave a good impression on her. When Lin An and the weak scholar arrived here, there was already a long line by the lakeside. Those who walked into the villa at the center of Daming Lake all held a golden invitation card in their hands. Lin An immediately understood something and asked the weak scholar if he could enter without an invitation card. “Brother Lin, it’s very troublesome without a golden invitation card. You have to go to the entrance to answer three questions and then ask three questions that will trouble everyone present. Only then can you enter. However, there is one advantage. As long as you pass this test, you can become a guest of honor. In the future, you can attend the banquet at any time without a golden invitation card.” There was no other choice but to go and take a look. Just as the two of them arrived at the entrance of the villa, they were immediately stopped by a few young boys and girls who looked like students. “Please line up!” Lin An said, “I’m here to answer the questions and pass the test!” The students said in astonishment, “Are you sure you want to pass the test? If you fail, even if you have a gold sticker, you won’t be able to attend the banquet!” “To be honest, I’m here to challenge all kinds of difficult knowledge. As for whether I can attend the party or not, I don’t really care!” Lin An said seriously. After the students heard this, they were immediately filled with respect! So this young master was here for knowledge. He was truly admirable! This was a true student. The female student’s impression of Lin An immediately increased. She pointed to a wooden plaque covered in a red cloth beside the door. “The three questions for today’s challenge are already on the list. Young Master can answer them on his own but there is a time limit for each question. You need to answer them within ten breaths, otherwise, it will be considered a failure.” At this moment, a student walked out with a gong and knocked hard. Clang! The sound reverberated throughout the entire Daming Lake! All the students were shocked and looked over. “The gong in Madam Li’s side garden has sounded?” “Has someone passed the test again? Ever since Young Master Zhang of the Sacred City Academy failed a year ago, no one has passed the test again!” “Who is going to pass the test this time? Could it be Young Master Wu, the leader of the four great scholars in the capital?” “This is a rare sight. Let’s quickly take a look...;” By Daming Lake, countless students were alarmed and looked towards the entrance of the villa. The weak scholar felt the gazes from all around him and could not help but shrink his body, feeling a little timid. Originally, he only wanted to take the gold stick in and find a corner to sit down and eat something. After the banquet was over, he would have completed his mission. But now, with the sound of the gong, he couldn’t hide even if he wanted to. “Young Master, please begin!” At this moment, a female errand girl said to Lin An. Lin An nodded in response. His expression became serious as he walked towards the wooden plaque covered with a red cloth. Everyone was stunned when they saw Lin An approach. “Eh? Why is he a youth in white? This person looks so unfamiliar. He doesn’t seem to be from the imperial city.” “Look, he seems to be from the East City Academy. Could he be a student from the East City Academy? Do they have the guts to challenge Madam Li’s questions?” “They really don’t know the immensity of heaven and earth. Where did the people from the East City Academy get the qualifications?” “Could it be that they didn’t receive Madam Li’s invitation, so they came to challenge the questions?” “Hahaha, that’s very possible!” After a moment of shock, many people burst into laughter, thinking that this was a farce. A nameless junior just came out to impress the crowd. Many people sighed with disappointment on their faces and shook their heads. “What a pity. I had thought that some genius was preparing to pass the test.” “It’s difficult. Even Young Master Zhao has failed. I’m afraid that no one in the imperial city will easily try again.” “Indeed. After all, the risk and reward are not proportional. The reward for winning is of no use to us and, if we lose, we don’t know how long we will be laughed at.” “If that’s the case, the dedication of this youth in white despite knowing that he can’t pass the challenge is really worth learning from, hahaha...;” A joyous atmosphere rose by the Daming Lake. The weak scholar lowered his head even more. He really wanted to find a hole to hide in and didn’t dare to see anyone. Lin An strode in front of the wooden plaque and raised his hand to pull the red cloth. The red cloth was immediately lifted by him and flew high into the sky before slowly falling down. After the red cloth was lifted, there were a few lines of golden words written on the wooden board. Lin An looked at it and was a little stunned. Was his mind racing? He even looked at it and was amused. This question was too simple. The question was: “It takes 15 minutes for one person to eat a bowl of rice, so how long does it take for eight people to eat eight bowls of rice?” Thinking that the first question was to warm up, Lin An didn’t care and wrote down the answer: “15 minutes.” The second question was: “After one exam, two people handed in the exact same exam paper. After the head examiner discovered it, he didn’t think that they cheated. What’s the reason?” After reading this question, everyone was shocked. They handed in the exact same exam paper, but the head examiner didn’t think that they cheated? Was there even a need to think about it? The examiner must have been bribed! However, before they could speak, Lin An had already written the answer: “Because they handed in a blank test paper.” The third question was...; “How to turn ice into water at the fastest speed.” Once this question was written, everyone was stunned. If ice turned into water, they naturally had to use fire element spells. However, it was a little difficult to do it at the fastest speed. After all, everyone practiced different fire element spells. “This question...; is difficult!” “There are too many factors to consider. There can’t be a standard answer to this question, right?” “He’s going to fail this time. Last year, one of the four great scholars, Young Master Zhao, failed in this test.” “Hehe, let’s see how he can solve this question now!” “He can’t solve it. There’s no way to solve this question. Madam Li is extremely talented. Ever since she started to set this test, no one has been able to complete it. After all, it’s not that easy to become Madam Li’s guest.” Everyone turned their heads to look at Lin An, their faces filled with ridicule and mockery. Lin An wrote his answer: “Remove two drops of water.”[1] Only then did everyone hit their heads and suddenly understood. They sighed in their hearts. It was such a simple question. Why didn’t they think of it earlier? “Hahaha, what a handsome young man. I’ve really broadened my horizons today!” At this moment, a silver bell-like, charming and moving laughter rang out from the villa. Madam Li slowly walked out. On her beautiful face, there was a seductive smile. Her eyes were always full of charm and her gaze was completely fixated on Lin An. All the scholars present were instantly shocked, Madam Li had actually been startled by this white-clothed young man and had personally made a move! That white-clothed youth would definitely soar in the future. Since he was so valued by Madam Li, he definitely had a bright future ahead of him. Instantly, many people revealed looks of envy mixed with jealousy. “Young Master, since you’ve already passed the three questions, then let’s continue the next round. This time, it’s your turn to ask three questions. If no one answers correctly within ten breaths, then you’ll win.” Madam Li spoke softly, her eyes shining as she smiled. Lin An didn’t give up and asked the first question, “Everyone, what if you come to the banquet today and realize that the golden invitation has been dropped?” Everyone was stunned when they heard this question. Then, everyone sneered in disdain. “If the golden invitation is dropped, then you can only admit that you’re unlucky and go home.” “No, the correct answer should be to ask Madam Li to get another one.” “Wrong, the correct answer should be like what he did today, to pass the test!” Everyone said all the answers in ten breaths and then looked at Lin An with a face full of ridicule. Madam Li was also slightly stunned. She obviously didn’t expect Lin An to ask such a simple question but she vaguely felt that it wasn’t quite right. Sure enough, Lin An announced his correct answer. “I dropped the golden invitation. I’ll just pick it up.” The entire venue fell silent. No one had expected such an answer. It was really the same answer as Madam Li’s question. The second question was...; “Aunt Wang’s neighbor is Dopey. Dopey went to work at Aunt Wang’s son’s place. Aunt Wang’s son asked where Dopey was living now, and Dopey was severely injured after answering. May I ask why?” Many people were dumbfounded after hearing this. The third question was...; “There is a part of the body. Some people are hard, some are soft. Adults are longer, children are shorter. Some people are hairy and some people are hairless. May I ask, which part of the body is this?” All the scholars were dumbfounded. ...; “Young Master, three questions have been answered. From today onwards, you are my guest. Please come in!” At this moment, Madam Li looked at Lin An and invited him into the villa. The charming and seductive gaze in her eyes seemed to be intentionally or innately flirtatious towards Lin An at all times! Lin An walked into the villa and passed through a tree-lined path. His eyes suddenly lit up and he was stunned by the decoration of the villa! The courtyard in front of him was very spacious. The ground was paved with pebbles and the black and white colors formed a huge ink painting on the ground. Lin An quickly arrived at the loft. There was a huge curtain opposite the door, and behind the curtain was the hall. There were already many scholars in the hall, and they were all sitting on cushions, chatting happily. After Lin An appeared, everyone’s gazes swept over. Seeing that he was a stranger, they didn’t pay much attention to him and continued to chat with their friends. [1] Removing two short strokes from the character for ice makes it turn into a character for water.「冰」→「水」 Lin An didn’t mind. He found a random place to sit down and closed his eyes to rest. More and more people came. After everyone had arrived, Young Master Zhao, one of the four great scholars of the capital, suddenly stood up and asked, “Madam Li, may I know who is the person who solved the question?” When the scholars who had been in the hall heard this, their expressions changed and they were extremely shocked. What? Someone solved the problem! ...; Lin An looked over and saw a blue-robed scholar with a cold expression on his face. He thought to himself, ‘This should be the Young Master Zhao who couldn’t solve the problem a year ago. Seeing that I’ve solved the problem today, is he embarrassed and wants to make trouble for me?’ Humph, a defeated opponent was nothing to be afraid of. The blue-robed scholar met Lin An’s gaze. “Although you’ve solved the problem, it only means that you’re extraordinary. However, you’re just a little smart and ultimately unable to show your face. If you really think that you’re talented, do you dare to spar with me in the way of poetry!” As soon as he finished speaking, the entire hall suddenly became noisy. “You’re right. How can being a little smart be compared to great wisdom?” “In the entire world, only Young Master Zhao’s classic poems and Young Master Wu’s absolute poems can be remembered for centuries.” However, Lin An was still sitting on the futon, eating his own snacks, and had no intention of paying attention to that person at all. Young Master Zhao’s gaze swept over again and he sneered, “Could it be that no one here is the person who solved the question? Or perhaps...; they’re afraid?” Everyone looked at Lin An, their faces filled with schadenfreude and disdain. “That kid, why are you still sitting there pretending to be deaf and dumb?” “You’re really arrogant. How outrageous. It’s your honor for Young Master Zhao to exchange poems with you, yet you still dare to pretend not to hear it?” “Hurry up and stand up. If you’re afraid, you can say it. Young Master Zhao will definitely not make things difficult for you!” Many scholars began to mock him. Sigh! Lin An glanced at them calmly. “I’ve been looking for an opponent in my life but I can’t get one. If I can accept any random challenge, then how can I have enough time in my life?” Random? Everyone’s eyes widened in shock. They couldn’t believe what they had just heard. Young Master Zhao was one of the four great talents in the capital. At the foot of the imperial city, how many young talents were gathered together? To be able to stand out among so many talents, what kind of person was he? A person like him would definitely enter the imperial court in the future, hold a high position, and rise to great heights. But now, this guy who appeared out of nowhere actually called Young Master Zhao a nobody? He was simply arrogant to the extreme! Young Master Zhao’s eyes suddenly turned cold and his expression was gloomy. His gaze was fixed on Lin An. Madam Li was also slightly stunned when she heard this. She clearly didn’t expect Lin An to actually say such arrogant words. It was common for scholars to be arrogant, but Lin An said it so frankly as if his literary talent was truly extraordinary and unrivaled in the world. “Hehe. What an arrogant person!” Young Master Zhao sneered and said in a deep voice. “Full of damage, a modest benefit. A modest gentleman should be as gentle as jade! Today, this Young Master will send these words to you. I hope you can benefit from it!” When these words were said, everyone present was stunned. “Full of damage, a modest benefit. Young Master Zhao is indeed a genius!” “That’s right, a modest gentleman is as gentle as jade, this is what a scholar should look like!” “That kid is full of boasting but he doesn’t dare to face him head-on. He must be a good-for-nothing who has no ink in his stomach. Young Master Zhao is too lazy to argue with him, he’s a truly modest gentleman.” Madam Li’s eyes also lit up. Her gaze falling on Young Master Zhao, eyes full of appreciation. Lin An heard this and a smile appeared on his face. He raised his teacup and took a sip. “As the saying goes, it’s impolite not to reciprocate. Since Young Master Zhao has sent me a message, I shall return the favor with a poem!” Everyone was stunned. Send a poem? Young Master Zhao was nicknamed the King of Poetry and was undefeatable in the world. How dare a nameless scholar like you mention a poem in front of Young Master Zhao? Isn’t that just showing off in front of an expert? Aren’t you overestimating yourself? Everyone broke into laughter and looked at Lin An with a face full of ridicule. A scholar shook his head and said, “Young Master Zhao can read a thousand words at the age of three, read poems from ancient times to modern times at the age of five, and received the title of King of Poetry from the Emperor of the Ghana Empire at the age of ten with his poems. Yet, you actually dare to say such words here and want to gift Young Master Zhao a poem? You’re simply overestimating yourself like a firefly competing with the bright moon!” When Young Master Zhao heard Lin An’s words, he couldn’t help but laugh as he shook his head and jeered. “Since you wish to gift me a poem, then I am all ears!” Once these words were said, everyone started to praise him again. “As expected of the King of Poetry, Young Master Zhao. Your bearing is indeed extraordinary. You are truly a high-class person!” “This is a truly humble gentleman. You really have the bearing of a great master!” ...; Lin An raised his eyes to look at Young Master Zhao. “Young Master Zhao, just now, you said that I was full of losses and that I benefited from being humble. You were scolding me for being arrogant, right? But, although what you said is right, it doesn’t apply to everyone.” Lin An put down the teacup, picked up the folding fan, and pretended to wave it. “Zi Wen has profound knowledge. He has learned the heavenly insight. “He is leisurely swimming in the lotus curtain and humbly practicing the jade routine. “He is the most benevolent of all, Zhou Pu Yu. “He is careful and sincere, and he can guard against any crisis.” This was from the Song Dynasty’s Jian Yu Chang’s “Feng He Imperial System Reading the History of the Five Dynasties and Jin.” As he used history as a mirror to advise others to be humble, he got rid of the boring preaching and went to a higher level in terms of education. More importantly, they had never heard of this poem before! They immediately thought that it was made by Lin An on the spot and they were stunned. But who was Young Master Zhao? He was one of the four great scholars of the capital, and the title of “King of Poetry” was not undeserved. After suffering this loss, he naturally would not let it go. It was impossible for him to swallow his anger in front of so many scholars. He immediately stood up and pretended to be magnanimous as he cupped his hands towards Madam Li. “Today, we are here to meet friends with poems. I wonder if Madam Li can come up with a topic to let everyone present compose poems on the spot?” Everyone immediately sucked in a breath of cold air! Writing poems on the spot was what Young Master Zhao was best at! Back then, Young Master Zhao was able to compose poems in front of the Ghanaian Emperor in ten steps. It was once a legend in the capital. Today, it was actually by chance that they could witness Young Master Zhao’s famous stunts? Everyone immediately revealed looks of anticipation and surprise. Many people had long heard of Young Master Zhao’s feat of composing poems in front of the Ghanaian Emperor in ten steps. Today, they heard that Young Master Zhao was actually going to compose poems on the spot again. That was a historic moment! Madam Li was slightly stunned when she heard this. In the past, everyone would take out their own poems and read each other’s poems. But now, Young Master Zhao wanted to write a poem. It was obvious that he wanted to steal the limelight back. “No matter what question Madam Li comes up with, I will definitely write a poem in ten steps!” Young Master Zhao was already prepared. He had a confident smile on his face as he looked at Madam Li with a deep gaze. Such literary talent and confidence were truly admirable. One had to know that a scholar’s talent and foundation were the most tested when writing poems. If one didn’t have unparalleled talent, who would dare to boast that they could write a poem in ten steps? Immediately, Madam Li opened her mouth and said, “Good, it is inevitable that everyone would have such elegance. I will come up with a question today!” After saying this, she raised her head and looked at the sky outside the house. At this time, the sky was gray and dark clouds covered the sky. It seemed like it was going to rain. Madam Li smiled slightly and said, “Now that it is the beginning of spring, everyone, look at the dark clouds in the sky. Perhaps the first spring rain this year will come in a few days. How about we use spring rain as the topic?” Everyone heard this. Spring rain? This kind of poem singing about spring had to be done every year. Everyone was already familiar with it, so it wasn’t difficult at all! However, the more easy the topic was, the more one could see the difference between different people. Using it at this time was just the right moment. “...;” Moreover, Young Master Zhao had completed the poem in ten steps, so the difficulty was still there. As for Lin An, when he heard that it was about spring rain, he was instantly overjoyed. Among the poems he had come across since he was young, any one of them was a classic sentence from ancient times! However, almost the moment Madam Li finished her question, Young Master Zhao took the first ten steps to compose a poem! The first step caused everyone’s expressions to change. “This...;” “I didn’t expect Young Master Zhao to be so confident!” Madam Li was also moved. The question had just been asked, but Young Master Zhao immediately began to compose a poem. Such confidence was worthy of his title as the King of Poetry! Young Master Zhao’s eyes were filled with confidence and his lips curved into a confident smile. He looked up at the cloudy sky and took a second step: “The spring rain is as fine as dust.” He then took the third step. “The willow outside the building is yellow and wet.” Before everyone’s thoughts could keep up with Young Master Zhao’s rhythm, he took the fourth step. Then, he took the fifth step. The sixth step. The seventh step! “Wind invites the embroidered curtain to go.” Everyone held their breaths. There was only one sentence left! Their eyes were fixed on Young Master Zhao’s feet. There were only three steps left. Could he make the last sentence within three steps? In fact, the smile on Young Master Zhao’s face had already explained everything. He took a deep breath and took the last three steps. “Through the window.” Ten steps in total. A five-character poem was completed! Clap! Clap! Clap! Clap! The crowd burst into an uproar! The applause of the scholars resounded throughout the building. “Good poem. Good poem!” “As expected of the King of Poetry. It’s already not easy to complete a poem with ten steps but he can still make it to such a level. I’m impressed, I’m impressed!” “The spring rain is as fine as dust, and the willow outside is yellow and wet. This is an exquisite painting!” “Young Master Zhao’s eyes have already traveled through time and space. The rain has yet to fall, and he has already painted such a beautiful scene for us. It is as if we have seen it with our own eyes!” All the scholars present said with respect from the bottom of their hearts. “The title of King of Poetry is indeed worthy of its name. I really have a feast for my eyes today.” Even Madam Li’s body trembled as her eyes moved with admiration. “Young Master Zhao’s poem is truly a famous line from ancient times!” “Pft!” However, an untimely sound suddenly rang out in the loft. It was Lin An, who was drinking tea, who suddenly spat out the tea in his mouth with a strange expression on his face! How could this be called a unique line? These country bumpkins really hadn’t seen the world! Naturally, his action of spitting out water attracted everyone’s attention. Young Master Zhao also suddenly glared over. A cold light flashed in his eyes as he sneered, “What? Could it be that this brother looks down on this poem of mine?” Lin An stretched out his hand to wipe the tea from his mouth and smiled indifferently. “It’s alright. It’s just so-so. There’s nothing to look down on!” When he said this, everyone felt the corners of their mouths twitch. Not looking down on it? His tone was so arrogant! The quality of this poem was definitely top-notch even in the entire imperial city. Moreover, it was written in ten steps. He was able to come up with such an exquisite and talented poem in such a short period of time, yet he still dared to say that it was not bad? Young Master Zhao was also angered by him and laughed. “Since that’s the case, then let us appraise the masterpieces under our feet!” “Then of course we’ll let you appraise them, no, admire them!” Lin An narrowed his eyes and laughed in his heart. A student snorted coldly, “Young Master Zhao just finished a poem in ten steps. Even if you can really produce a poem, you still can’t compare to Young Master Zhao’s talent!” “Hehe, you said that a poem in ten steps can be called a poem?” Lin An suddenly sneered, “This can also be called a poem?” “What...; What did you say?” “Ridiculous, this is simply ridiculous, how dare you spout nonsense here!” “Ten steps into a poem is nothing to you, do you think you can become a poem in seven steps?” Everyone was furious, this time they were truly speaking up for Young Master Zhao. Young Master Zhao was able to obtain such a masterpiece in ten steps, how dare you call this a piece of trash? Bang! Suddenly, a muffled sound rang out. Lin An flicked his wrist and flicked away the folding fan in his hand. The surface of the fan swayed gently, and his sleeves fluttered in the wind. He looked unrestrained and unruly! He straightened his body and looked out of the window. He laughed out loud, “Others laugh at me for being too crazy, but I laugh at others for not being able to see through me!” Everyone was shocked when they heard this. Many people were dumbfounded. Madam Li also widened her eyes and looked at him in shock. Young Master Zhao’s expression suddenly froze. The smile on his face also froze at this moment! “Others laugh at me for being too crazy, but I laugh at others for not being able to see through me.” This sentence perfectly hit back at everyone, stunning everyone. Then, Lin An took a step forward and, in the hall where a pin drop could be heard, he recited the first step, the first poem. “The good rain knows the season, “when spring happens. “It sneaks into the night with the wind, “dampening things silently.” Everyone’s heart suddenly stopped beating and their pupils rapidly contracted! My god, this was a five-word poem, and all four lines could be called quatrains. Each sentence was more brilliant than Young Master Zhao’s! Young Master Zhao was also stunned. These four quatrains completely defeated the poem he had just recited! Almost at the same time as everyone was shocked, Lin An took a second step without the slightest hesitation and recited: “A thousand-mile-long bird’s cry is reflected in the green, “water village mountain and city wall’s wine flag’s wind. “The Southern Dynasty’s 480 temples, “how many towers in the misty rain.” Everyone present sucked in a breath of cold air. This...;! ...; This was actually a seven-character poem and it was also a classic sentence! Dong! Lin An took his third step. “In spring sleep, I don’t feel the dawn, “I hear birds chirping everywhere. “The sound of wind and rain comes at night, “how much do you know when the flowers fall.” Everyone was already scared silly and their faces were filled with an expression of being deceived. It was actually another five-character poem! At the same time, Lin An took his fourth step and the corners of his mouth curled up. “White egret flying in front of Daming Lake, peach blossom flowing water, fat chuatsi fish. “Green Ruo Li, green straw raincoat, the wind and rain don’t need to return.” Everyone once again sucked in a breath of cold air. This was actually a poem! And it really came out of his mouth. One step into a poem, and even every sentence was a classic! The rest of everyone’s time passed in numb shock. Lin An took the last two steps without stopping. Each and every one of the ancient poems came from his experiences in junior high and high school. As long as it was related to the spring rain, even if it was a Song Dynasty poem, he would be able to recite it fluently. By the time he finished the ten steps, Lin An had finished reciting the ten classic ancient poems. Everyone’s faces were filled with shock. The shock in their hearts was indescribable and their minds were completely immersed in those poems that were filled with endless aftertastes. The entire hall was silent that even the sound of each other’s breathing could be heard. The rain...; At this moment, a cool breeze blew, and a drizzle started to fall from the sky. Spring rain...;! ...;finally arrived. This was the first spring rain since the Ghana Empire entered spring! Some people had already slowly recovered from Lin An’s ten ancient poems but their eyes were still dull as they looked at the drizzle outside the house. However, at this time, Lin An walked alone to the door and gently extended his palm. Patter! A few drops of rain fell from the sky and landed on his palm, wetting it. Lin An gently raised his wrist and closed his fingers in the air. Ding...; In an instant, the raindrops in the sky and earth outside the house instantly stopped in mid-air, as if time had been silenced. Lin An stepped out of the door, like a passerby strolling in the still world. Under everyone’s gaze, that figure left far away. The entire attic was silent, completely silent! Everyone was shocked, shocked by the concept conveyed by Lin An’s silent and shocking figure! “Ding! Luck drops obtained, [King of Kings, Gut-Piercing!]” As the system notification sounded, Lin An felt a ray of light enter his mind and his knowledge was once again expanded! And in the loft hall, after Lin An left, there was silence! Everyone was deeply immersed in Lin An’s departing figure and their hearts were extremely shocked! “I didn’t expect that Brother Lin would be able to gain so many life insights from just a spring rain.” At this moment, there were already people who recognized Lin An. His name had already been known by everyone. “Looks like we’ve all wronged Brother Lin. Although he looks wild and uninhibited, he’s actually a talented person with a true nature!” “Others laugh at me for being too crazy, but I laugh at others for not being able to see through me. These words are indeed the portrayal of his life. Before this, I didn’t understand him but now I think I might have understood!” “That’s right. Although he’s a very arrogant person, those ten poems just now were truly the greatest poems of all time! We can’t stand him because we don’t understand his realm!” “These poems have made me gain a lot. I feel like I’ve touched a bottleneck. After going back and going into closed-door cultivation for a few days, I think I’ll be able to break through the bottleneck. Brother Lin is really talented!” More and more scholars spoke from a fair position, acknowledging Lin An’s talent. These ten poems had convinced all the students. No one dared to say that these ten poems were not good and respect was emitted from the bottom of their hearts. Even Young Master Zhao stood rooted to the ground with a blank expression. Even though there were millions of disbelief and unwillingness in his heart, he still couldn’t say a single word that would taint those ten poems. He could not find a single flaw in those ten ancient poems. This meant that he had lost the battle just now and was utterly defeated! Madam Li was even more shocked and completely dumbfounded. She had never seen such a handsome man with extraordinary literary talent and unruly personality. His entire body was filled with an alluring charm! Lin An’s carefree, serious, and impassioned expression just now was etched in her mind for a long time, making it difficult for her to forget. However, in this loft, the only person who had always maintained his composure was probably the head of the capital’s four great scholars, Mister Wu. His specialty was paired. Although Mister Wu was surprised by Lin An’s performance, he didn’t show any expression at all. He expressionlessly placed the teacup in his hand on the table! The sound of the teacup landing on the table instantly broke the atmosphere in the loft! Mister Wu said indifferently, “To write ten poems in ten steps, such a ridiculous thing cannot be true. This person might have already written these poems. It was just a coincidence that he pretended to write them today. Moreover, whether those poems were all created by him is still doubtful.” The scholars all acted as if they had come to a realization! Mister Zhao, who was originally unwilling to accept this, immediately reacted after hearing these words. That’s right, to be able to compose ten poems in ten steps, and each of them was a classic, this was simply too absurd. How could someone be able to compose ten poems in ten steps, and each of them was a quatrain? This was definitely impossible! “Young Master Wu is right. With that Lin An’s character, it’s hard for me to believe that those poems were composed by him!” “That’s true. Everyone, think about it carefully. The artistic conception of each poem is different. How can a person change ten different states of mind in just ten steps! And in such a short period of time, he actually had so many life insights?” “Lin An is arrogant and pompous. I also think that those poems were definitely not written by him. They must have been plagiarized!” “Indeed, this is more like his doing!” Immediately, many scholars stood out to criticize him. However, the group of scholars who had praised Lin An earlier frowned and objected, “Everyone, that’s not true. If those poems were not written by Lin An, the classics of those poems should have spread far and wide. Then why have we never heard of them before?” “That’s right, Lin An has a weird personality. Sometimes he’s serious, sometimes he’s arrogant. Isn’t it fitting for him to write ten poems with different artistic conception within ten steps?” “Without evidence, we can’t just rely on our own imagination to deny the creation of others!” “That’s exactly what he said!” With everyone having their own opinions, the hall started to become noisy again. Madam Li sat in a corner. Seeing the group of scholars arguing, she couldn’t help but frown. “Everyone, there’s no need to argue anymore. Today is just a poetry meeting between friends, not people meeting between friends!” After saying this, some people felt ashamed and quickly shut their mouths. After all, scholars looked down on each other. Seeing that Lin An could write so many classic poems in such a short time, these scholars naturally had some jealousy. They were full of nonsense that Lin An didn’t write the poems himself. However, without any evidence, it was just a figment of one’s imagination. It could only be a mouth full of sour arguments. It was not until Madam Li shouted that some people realized their state of mind and immediately felt ashamed. Seeing that the scholars were no longer making noise, Madam Li’s expression eased a little. She lazily leaned against the screen and said indifferently. “Let’s continue with the banquet. Is there anyone else here who wants to take out their poems to appreciate?” Then, no one dared to say anything at Madam Li’s words. All of them lowered their heads. Some of the scholars had originally prepared a few works that they were proud of but they didn’t dare to take them out now. After all, the jewel was in front. With Lin An’s ten poems pressed down here, who would dare to take out their own little things to make a fool of themselves? With the poems they wrote, if Lin An’s ten poems were not there, they could still shamelessly flatter each other. But now, as long as you took them out, you would unconsciously compare them with Lin An. If you compared them, who would still have the interest to flatter each other. The scene was too ugly! Right now, even the King of Poetry, Young Master Zhao, lowered his head and pretended to be in deep thought. He did not reply to Madam Li’s question. If he had such a conflict with someone on a normal day, even if he was defeated, he would still try his best to catch up. He would rack his brains and inspiration to write a poem that surpassed the other party’s. But now, under the suppression of Lin An’s ten poems that could be said to have reached the end of the path of poetry, Mister Zhao lowered his arrogant head for the first time. He did not even have the courage to write another poem. Fortunately, Lin An left after finishing his poems. Otherwise, it was hard to imagine how awkward the attic would be under Lin An’s gaze! Seeing that everyone was silent, a trace of disappointment flashed across Madam Li’s eyes. She glanced outside the room and the disappointment in her heart was indescribable. With Lin An’s departure, apart from the amazement of the ten poems, there was also the incomparable regret in the heart of the beauty! She sighed lightly and her beautiful eyes turned towards the silent Young Master Wu. Only then did the corners of her mouth finally reveal a trace of a smile. With Lin An gone, it was fortunate that there was still the head of the capital’s four great scholars. Perhaps this young master could bring other surprises. Thinking of this, she opened her mouth and said, “Since everyone doesn’t want to talk about poetry anymore, why don’t we play couplets and spar with each other to relax a little!” Couplets? Everyone’s eyes lit up and their interest was piqued! They definitely wouldn’t be able to bring out the poetry but if it was couplets, then they would have a chance to display their skills. When it came to couplets, everyone’s gaze naturally couldn’t leave Young Master Wu, the head of the capital’s four great scholars. They all knew that couplets were Young Master Wu’s strong point and his title was the King of Couplets. However, Young Master Wu was indifferent by nature. He never liked to take the initiative to make couplets and always liked to make couplets. Therefore, when Madam Li said couplets, everyone was a little eager to try. Anyway, after the question was set, it would be normal if Young Master Wu matched it. After all, he was the King of Couplets, and the leader of the four great scholars in the capital. However, if they could make it difficult for Young Master Wu, then his name would definitely shake the capital. Who wouldn’t like to win without losing? Thus, everyone became active. No matter what, they could more or less show their faces in the field of couplets to increase their fame in the capital’s talent circle. However, just as the scholars were rubbing their fists and preparing to show off their meticulously prepared skills. Lin An’s figure appeared at the entrance of the hall again. He even had a sly smile on his face. “Eh, I heard that everyone wants to play couplets? To be honest, what I’m best at isn’t poetry but couplets!” Everyone turned their heads and was speechless. Big Brother, what are you doing? Didn’t you already leave? Then why did you come back? And poetry isn’t what you’re best at? Then what were you doing just now? Lin An’s return and departure made many of the scholars present feel extremely unhappy. Someone who could casually throw out ten ancient famous lines and say that what they were best at wasn’t composing poems? Then they simply couldn’t live! Of course, those who doubted and thought that Lin An’s poems were plagiarized sneered. Just when they were worried that they wouldn’t be able to get their hands on your braids, you came back to die? Couplets couldn’t be plagiarized. After all, the changes were too big and the test was to display their true talent on the spot! Therefore, at this moment, Young Master Wu’s originally cold and frosty eyes had a hint of mockery in them. He believed that under the true test of couplets, one could uncover Lin An’s true colors! “Master Lin, where did you go just now? I thought you left without saying goodbye!” At this moment, Madam Li opened her mouth with a smile. Her beautiful eyes were filled with undisguised admiration for Lin An. Lin An said with a serious smile, “I was in a hurry to pee just now, so I went to relieve some pressure.” “Hehe. Young Master Lin is really sincere,” Madam Li said with a reserved smile. All the scholars present stared with their eyes wide open, their hearts burning with jealousy! Madam Li’s mature beauty could be said to be unparalleled in the capital. Many scholars would involuntarily use her as a casting material during the long night. However, due to Madam Li’s status, no one dared to touch her at all! Now that they saw that Madam Li did not hide her admiration for Lin An, many people felt as if their goddess had married someone else. Their hearts were filled with jealousy and hatred. Even Young Master Wu could not help but have a cold look in his eyes. Lin An, on the other hand, appeared calm and collected. Under everyone’s gaze, he stood beside Madam Li with an extraordinary bearing. Young Master Zhao looked at the crowd with disdain and said, “Everyone, let’s start pairing. There’s no need to pay attention to some laymen.” Hearing this, everyone came back to their senses and nodded. After all, their original intention today was to attend the banquet and not to have any personal grudges with anyone. Madam Li looked at Lin An curiously. She only felt that the temperament on his body was extremely handsome and charming! Since they were going to pair the couplets, a scholar stood up first and said confidently. “I had a sudden epiphany a few days ago, and I suddenly had a realization. Today, I shall use it as bait!” He paused for a moment and said confidently, “Heaven and earth, rain and wind, continent and sky, mountain flowers and sea trees, and red sun against the sky!” Everyone was stunned when this couplet appeared. Immediately, they furrowed their brows and began to ponder. The profoundness of this pair was that although it appeared simple and loose, and there seemed to be many things that could be aligned, each sentence had its own style. Originally, some of the scholars who were confident in their talents had intended to stand up and show off. However, when they heard the specific contents of this pair, they immediately stopped and shook their heads, smiling bitterly. When he saw that everyone present had a difficult expression on their faces, the corners of Young Master Wu’s mouth curled up. He did not even think about it and directly replied, “Yes.” “River against Han, green against red, Uncle Rain against Duke of Thunder, smoke tower against snow cave, Moon Palace against Heaven Palace!” All the scholars were shocked and immediately praised, “Wonderful! Wonderful!” “As expected of Young Master Wu, he actually thought of the second couplet so quickly!” “This pair is really wonderful!” The scholar who came up with the first half of the couplet also nodded his head and cupped his hands together. “Young Master Wu is indeed talented. I am ashamed to be inferior to you. I really made a fool of myself just now!” Young Master Wu smiled faintly and did not respond. He was filled with a sense of superiority! “The spring is against the stone, the stem is against the branch, the wind is against the string, the mountain pavilion is against the water pavilion, and the parrot is against the cormorant.” Right at this moment, Lin An, who was standing at the door, responded faintly. Everyone was stunned for a moment and they were all shocked. Damn, this guy really knew how to pair! Seeing that Lin An followed Mister Wu closely and finished the second half of the couplet, and it was so neat, all the scholars were stunned. Mister Zhao was also stunned. He originally thought that this Brother Lin’s poetry writing was only at the peak of poetry writing, but he didn’t expect that he really knew how to pair. Moreover, the couplet was so neat. Madam Li’s eyes were filled with joy. She had never seen such an all-rounder in poetry writing! Young Master Wu’s expression changed slightly. He knew that he had met his match and immediately said in a cold voice, “Odd pair or only pairs, the sea against the Yangtze River, the golden plate against the jade cup, the precious candle against the silver song.” Everyone’s eyes widened. Young Master Wu had actually written the first verse? It seemed that Young Master Wu was going to compete with Lin An. Thus, everyone’s gazes were locked onto Lin An. They wanted to see if this all-rounder who could recite poems and write everything could compete with another. Lin An only smiled slightly. He didn’t think that Young Master Wu’s first verse was difficult at all. “Red against white, there is no one, Bugu against the lifting pot, hairy spine against the feather fan, Heavenly Palace against the Imperial Capital.” Everyone’s faces began to change in shock! In such a short time, Lin An had met again. His strength was not inferior to Young Master Wu at all! Young Master Wu became anxious and suddenly stood up. “Door against door, path against street, branches against roots, cock against wave, phoenix bun against phoenix hairpin.” Lin An was not in a hurry. He took a sip of tea and smiled. “Diligence against thrift, cleverness against obedience, waterside pavilion against mountain house, ice peach against snow lotus root, leaky arrow against more card.” After that, the two almost did not stop and began to fight each other. All the scholars present were dumbfounded. Even the student who had written the first half of the couplet did not expect that he would be able to write so many second halves of the couplet! An ordinary scholar would have racked his brains to read even the first half of the couplet. However, these two people actually opened their mouths and spoke one after another. After they finished speaking, they would immediately follow up with the next half of the couplet. They did not stop at all. This could not help but make people sigh. The gap between people was really like a chasm. It was just right in front of everyone. At this point, it was already impossible to tell who was facing whom. Lin An and Young Master Wu continued to kill each other. In the end, Young Master Wu finally laughed coldly. “The difficulty of just saying this line is too small. Even if we fight until tomorrow, we won’t be able to determine the winner. I’ll come up with a couplet. Do you dare to come up with a couplet?” As soon as these words were said, everyone was shocked! Young Master Wu was going to take the initiative to attack? Oh my god, this was a rare sight in a hundred years. After so many years in the imperial city, who had ever seen Young Master Wu take the initiative to make a couplet? Now, he was finally going to make a move? Many people’s eyes were filled with excitement and gratitude. They were actually lucky enough to see this peak-level battle against the sub-worlds in their lives! Lin An only smiled faintly. “Why wouldn’t I dare?” Why wouldn’t I dare? It was just a few words but, behind him, everyone seemed to see the great being known as the god of couplets opening his eyes. This was the unparalleled confidence that stood at the peak of this path! Master Wu said in a clear voice, “One village, two miles, a total of three teachers. You don’t know the four books, five classics, and six righteousness. You actually dare to teach seven, eight, or nine children. Very daring!” “Good!” Before Lin An could say anything, someone had already begun to cheer. Master Wu’s first verse was clearly mocking Lin An! However, Lin An shook his head and said, “Ten families, nine paupers. You’ve gathered eight, seven, six, five, and four cents, yet you’re still half-hearted and low-class!” Everyone immediately sucked in a breath of cold air. This guy could actually come up with such a neat second verse in such a short time. Moreover, in this second half, he actually scolded Mister Wu for being obscene. Anger appeared on Mister Wu’s face as he said coldly, “In the picture, the dragon doesn’t roar nor the tiger does. This little errand boy is laughable!” This was clearly mocking Lin An as a little errand boy who was only fit to carry his shoes! Lin An didn’t become angry and replied calmly, “In the chessboard, the carriage has no wheels and horses have no reins. If you call out general, be on your guard!” “The orioles and swallows are green and red, harmonious and harmonious everywhere!” “Rain, wind, wind, flowers, leaves, and every day of the year!” “Ten thoughts, thinking of the country, thinking of the country!” “Eight eyes, admiring the flowers, admiring the moon, admiring the fragrance of autumn!” ...; The intense battle between the two caused an uproar among the scholars present. “Wonderful, wonderful!” Many of the scholars present were already convinced by Lin An and cheered in shock! “Such an intense confrontation, I’ve never seen it before in my life!” “It’s truly unrestrained and carefree!” At this moment, Young Master Wu’s expression froze and he said in a trembling voice, “I’m a high-class mighty figure, displaying the courage of a tiger.” Lin An’s eyes narrowed slightly. “You’re despicable, showing half a turtle head.” “You’re impudent!” Young Master Wu finally couldn’t hold it in anymore and rebuked angrily! “How dare I!” Lin An still treated these words as a pair, his face full of smiles. Master Wu was so angry that his face flushed red and the veins on his forehead bulged. He pointed at Lin An and said angrily, “I was originally paired with you, and you actually dared to insult me?” “You were originally a pig head, and I actually didn’t see through you!” “Now I’m not paired with you!” Master Wu was about to go crazy from anger. Lin An smiled faintly, “I’m going against you now!” Everyone in the attic was dumbfounded. Young Master Wu, the leader of the four great scholars of the capital, was actually so furious? Master Zhao was also shocked. Only Madam Li was slightly stunned. She was very surprised that this Young Master Lin could defeat Young Master Wu completely in terms of couplets! Moreover, people with discerning eyes could already see that this Lin An was obviously deliberately provoking Young Master Wu. While he was going against the couplets, he didn’t forget to set up the other party’s mentality. Lin An was clearly even more unfathomable! Clap clap clap clap...; Under the lead of a scholar, the other scholars who had long changed their views of Lin An also followed. The entire hall instantly erupted into thunderous applause. “Good, Brother Lin’s talent is simply awe-inspiring!” “I didn’t expect Brother Lin to be so versatile. Previously, we were still suspecting that Brother Lin’s poems were fake. Now it seems that we’ve misunderstood!” “That’s right. After today, the title of the top four scholars in the capital will probably belong to Brother Lin!” The entire hall was filled with praise and appreciation. Apart from some scholars who still couldn’t stand Lin An, most of the people gathered around, wanting to make friends with Lin An. After all, with Lin An’s talent, in their eyes, he was already someone they wanted to curry favor with. Today, he had shone so brilliantly at Madam Li’s banquet. Presumably, Lin An’s name would soon spread throughout the entire capital. If they could make friends with him, even if it was just a few words, it would be enough for them to brag about in the future. Over here, while everyone was having a great time. A girl rushed over and whispered a few words into Madam Li’s ear. Madam Li nodded her head lightly. After a moment of silence, she said to the crowd, “Everyone, the princess is not feeling well today. I’m afraid she won’t be able to come to the banquet.” Hearing this, many scholars were stunned. Most of the people attending the banquet were here to see the princess. If the princess didn’t come, then the banquet would lose its meaning. Many people couldn’t help but look disappointed. Lin An was also slightly stunned. Madam Li couldn’t help but sigh when she saw everyone’s reaction when they learned that the princess wasn’t coming, as well as everyone’s mood that had suddenly dropped. “Everyone, I also feel unwell. Why don’t we end the banquet here?” Most of the scholars had already lost the mood to stay. Seeing that Madam Li had spoken, they cupped their hands and left in groups. Many people invited Lin An to have tea with them again, but Lin An rejected them on the spot. How could he have time to play with a group of scholars. ...; The next day, Lin An’s name caused a huge uproar in the capital! The students who came out from Madam Li’s banquet told vividly about what had happened yesterday. One spread to ten, ten spread to a hundred. In just one night, Lin An’s name had spread throughout the entire imperial city! Of course, the most widespread were the poems and couplets written by Lin An yesterday. “Good rain knows the season...; This is really a good poem. That Lin An is definitely a great scholar!” “There’s also the phrase ‘wind and rain come at night.’ It’s simply amazing!” “I didn’t expect so many classics to be completed in just ten steps. Such talent is truly admirable!” “It’s not just admiration. Even us scholars would feel inferior in front of him!” “Actually, what struck me the most was the phrase ‘people laugh at me for being too crazy, I laugh at others for not being able to see through me.’ This phrase really benefited me a lot.” Many talented and beautiful women, from the commoners to the nobles and cultivators, were all talking about Lin An’s ten poems from yesterday! Lin An’s current popularity made him have to disguise himself to go out, otherwise, he would be blocked by an endless stream of fans. Therefore, Lin An could only find a tool to change his appearance in the lottery machine. He disguised himself as an itinerant cultivator and went out to watch the fun. According to Lin An’s information, the princess was going to launch an event to recruit a prince consort in the Imperial Palace tomorrow. Therefore, he wanted to check out the situation. He didn’t want to be the prince consort, so he just wanted to watch the fun. This trip still managed to gather some useful information. There would be a training ground for the prince consort recruitment event tomorrow. There were three stages in total. The first stage would be the literary test, the second stage would be the martial arts test, and the third stage would be the court test. The contents of the court test required lots to be drawn, so it could be considered as a test of luck, if one drew a simple test, one would naturally be able to pass it smoothly. However, one of the test contents was too powerful, so the training ground was set up. The next day. Lin An rushed to the imperial palace early in the morning. The royal family’s marriage invitation was a big deal. Even though Lin An tried his best to wake up early, there was already a sea of people outside the imperial palace. Other than the cultivators who came to register, there were also many onlookers. The line was very long, and it seemed to move a little slowly. If one wanted to queue up to enter the trial ground, they would probably wait until noon. When they entered the arena, many cultivators who had queued up early in the morning were already waiting for the start of the trial. Suddenly, waves of exclamations sounded from not far away, followed by the commotion of the crowd outside the palace. It was very noisy, and it was hard to hear what the commotion was about. Lin An turned his head and saw that the palace doors were wide open. A few teams walked in under the protection of the imperial guards. “Look, the disciples of the three great sects of the Cangyun Continent are here!” Someone with experience immediately shouted. “I’ve long heard that the people from the three great sects will come to participate in the consort selection. I didn’t expect so many people to come.” “As expected, not only is everyone’s cultivation level strong, but they’re also all good-looking talents!” “The leader of the team is the Langya Sword Sect. The leader that’s the white-clothed swordsman should be the legendary descendant of the god of swords, Ye Changkong!” “That’s right. The Crimson Shadowless Sword that he carried was personally bestowed by the sect master of the Langya Sword Sect. It can kill people without leaving a trace!” “His cultivation shouldn’t be underestimated either. He’s already at the third level of the nascent soul realm at such a young age!” The white-clothed swordsman leading the Langya Sword Sect attracted the discussion of the crowd. Apart from the Langya Sword Sect, the other two sects also sent people over. The disciples were all extraordinarily valiant and their temperaments were unique. Everyone entered with their heads held high and their chests puffed out. They naturally received the envious and respectful gazes of the other cultivators and scholars. Before long, there were already piles of people entering the palace. The disciples from the various great sects and the students from the famous academies all had their own waiting areas. In addition, the designated areas provided for the various great sects also provided tea and fruit drinks. People like Lin An, who came alone and didn’t have any status, naturally had to stay where they were. Dong! Drums sounded both inside and outside the palace. It was deafening and made people’s blood boil. Under the shrill voice of a eunuch, the first round of the competition began. Everyone present also straightened their bodies, eager to give it a try. Boom! At this moment, a muffled sound was heard from the training ground. The barrier of the formation flickered slightly, and nine entrances were opened. Brilliant light flickered, and they each led to ninety-nine and eighty-one battle platforms! “Everyone, please line up and enter the arena. The formation will randomly send you to the battle platform. The person who matches up will be your opponent!” The eunuch stood in front of the throne room and shouted shrilly, his voice reverberating through more than half of the imperial palace! A ray of multicolored light suddenly shot into the sky and turned into an imperial edict in the air above the palace. The densely packed golden boys showed the rules of the first stage to everyone present: One, if all three battles cannot be won, eliminated! Two, all three battles cannot use the same type of weapon! Three, the opponent’s life must not be harmed! ...; The entire crowd burst into an uproar after seeing these requirements. Everyone was shocked. These requirements seemed to be a little too harsh! The most ridiculous thing was the second condition. Most of the people present were sword cultivators. Other than sword techniques, they could also play with their saber techniques. If they couldn’t use their sabers, they could only use their bare hands! The other cultivators who only knew how to play with unorthodox weapons were even more dumbfounded. They couldn’t even bring out the second type of weapon! As for the disciples from the various major sects, they were all slightly involved in all kinds of weapons and martial arts. After all, they were from an academic sect, so they were able to bring out all kinds of weapons and polearms. So these people didn’t panic at all! Lin An’s dao heart was as clear as a mirror to this sect, and he sneered in his heart, “This kind of rule is clearly meant to eliminate those freelance martial artists!” Lin An casually found one of the nine entrances and entered. He didn’t particularly care about who his opponent was. To put it bluntly, none of the young people present were worthy of Lin An’s attention! Lin An retrieved a sword from the system space that he had drawn two days ago when he had nothing better to do. After entering, there was already a person holding a sharp knife and spear waiting on the stage. There was a guard under each stage who was in charge of supervising, and Lin An was no exception. Seeing that the two of them had confirmed their weapons, the guard took out a notebook, asked for their names, and recorded them down. Then, he said expressionlessly, “Let the match begin!” Whoosh! Just as the sound of the match starting rang out, the spear cultivator immediately rushed towards Lin An, the spear in his hand sweeping towards Lin An. Lin An was extremely calm. The long blade in his hand suddenly slashed forward! Clang! Metal and stone vibrated. Sparks flew! The cultivator’s voice suddenly changed drastically. With just one slash, his entire palm was forcefully split open, and fresh blood flowed out! The spear cultivator instantly flew into a rage out of humiliation. Holding the long spear in his hand, he immediately unleashed a sweeping move. The corners of Lin An’s mouth curled up and the long blade in his hand slashed down once again! The blade cut through the air and landed heavily on the ground! This wasn’t a profound move at all. It completely relied on the strength of his physical body to concentrate his power into an instant explosion. After Lin An cultivated the Hell King’s Purgatory Form, his physical body and strength had long been strengthened. This slash was even more powerful than before! Clang! The long spear and the blade clashed heavily together! However, the long spear in the cultivator’s hand broke in an instant. At the same time, he was sent flying by a huge force. He spat out a mouthful of blood and his body was like a kite with a broken string. He fell out of the battle stage and fainted on the spot! The imperial guard below the stage immediately widened his eyes and his face was filled with shock! He found it hard to believe that Lin An actually had such powerful strength on this stage where his cultivation was restricted. As he smoked, he sent the cultivator flying with a slash. Even the long spear was cut in half! With such strange strength, was this guy even human? The imperial guard was slightly stunned, but he didn’t have time to think too much. He hurriedly took out a talisman and sent the unconscious long spear cultivator out. As soon as the cultivator disappeared, the teleportation effect on the stage immediately took effect. Whoosh! A white light flashed across the stage and, soon after, a proud man dressed in white with a long sword in his hand appeared in front of Lin An! The imperial guard raised his head and looked over. He was instantly stunned and exclaimed in surprise, “Descendant of the God of Swords, Ye Changkong!” At the same time, countless gazes outside the arena were also focused on Lin An’s arena. But their focus was on the descendant of the God of Swords, Ye Changkong! This peerless prodigy who was known as the most dazzling future star of the Langya Sword Sect in recent years, the descendant of the God of Swords, had finally entered the arena! The Crimson Shadowless Sword in his hand was personally refined by the sect master of the Langya Sword Sect, killing without a trace! In addition to his powerful strength and sword techniques, it could be said that he was the most powerful candidate to compete for the husband of the bride at this marriage gathering. Therefore, the moment he appeared, he immediately attracted the attention of everyone present. This was the treatment of a proud son of heaven, attracting the attention of tens of thousands of people! Everyone had long been filled with anticipation towards his sword technique and strength! “Ye Changkong’s sword technique foundation is basically solid. Now, even if he doesn’t use his true essence energy, his sword technique is still at perfection. Winning three consecutive victories is simply a piece of cake.” “Pity those who became his opponents. I’m afraid the ones who lost won’t have any ability to parry. Looks like that kid is the first person with extremely bad luck.” “Eh, that kid seems to have already won one round?” “What a pity. If he hadn’t met Ye Changkong, he might have continued to win until he cleared the stage.” Everyone shook their heads one after another, feeling sorry for Lin An. On the Langya Sword Sect’s side, a few disciples who hadn’t participated in the trial sat at the side, a cold smile appearing on their lips. “Hehe, guess how many moves Senior Brother Ye will use to win the competition?” “Do you even need to guess? One move is enough!” “That’s right. With Senior Brother Ye’s sword technique, even if he is unable to use the power of true essence, he is still one of the best in the Cangyun Continent!” “That brat will definitely lose within three moves!” “Hehe, I guess it’s within two moves!” A few disciples discussed casually. No one thought that Ye Changkong would lose. The only thing they could guess was whether Lin An would be defeated within a few moves or surrender on the spot! “Lin An, you’re already in the second round. Please change your weapon!” The Imperial Guard reminded from below the stage. The next moment, Lin An’s spiritual sense moved and he took out a sharp sword from his system inventory. His gaze swept towards ye Changkong and an austere killing intent that was like the sharp edge of a sword instantly surged through his entire body! Using a sword? He actually dared to use a sword in front of the descendant of the God of Swords? Everyone present was stunned. The imperial guards below the stage were even more dumbfounded. “Has he gone crazy? Doesn’t he know that Ye Changkong is most skilled in sword techniques?” “Regardless of cultivation level, among the five nations, the only one who dares to use a sword in front of Ye Changkong is his father, the God of Swords!” “Could it be that that kid has never heard of the name of the descendant of the God of Swords, Ye Changkong? Hahaha, what a country bumpkin.” “This person is hopeless!” Everyone present shook their heads. Some mocked, some sympathized, and some looked on coldly! On the Langya Sword Sect’s side, a few disciples were also slightly stunned before they immediately laughed out in an absurd manner. “This unfamiliar kid...; Hehe. He really doesn’t know death!” “Senior Brother Ye doesn’t care about the rules at all. Look at Senior Brother Ye’s expression. Could it be that his killing intent has been provoked by this provocation?” “If he really killed someone, I’m afraid that the Fire Emperor wouldn’t do anything to Senior Brother Ye. In fact, for the sake of the friendship of the Langya Sword Sect, he would even cover for Senior Brother Ye!” “Haha, there’s nothing we can do about it. Who asked our Senior Brother Ye to be so outstanding!” ...; The people on the other side were also stunned. The Hundred Flower Valley people from the three great sects were all looking at Lin An on the martial arts stage in shock! “Look at this person’s figure. Why is he exactly the same as the disciple that our sect is looking for in the trial tower?” “Indeed, I happened to be present that day and witnessed that historic scene!” “Elder, do we need to step out and dissuade him? And also ask if he is the person we are looking for?” A disciple looked at the old man beside him and asked in a low voice. The old man frowned slightly and shook his head. “There is no need for that for now. If it is him, then it is impossible for him to lose to Ye Changkong!” The few Hundred Flower Valley disciples could not help but open their mouths slightly when they heard this but, in the end, they did not say anything. The gazes of everyone present were all focused on the battle stage. Everyone was paying attention to Ye Changkong’s battle. A battle where they couldn’t use their true essence and could only rely on their martial arts to win! The corners of Lin An’s mouth curled up and his finger lightly flicked the blade of the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword. Buzz! The sharp sword let out a slight tremble and the sound of the sword rang out slightly. Swish! A cold light flashed through Ye Changkong’s eyes. He had already taken the initiative to attack! The Crimson Shadowless Sword in his hand was extremely fast. Even without the activation of his true energy, it still disappeared without a trace in everyone’s eyes. If it was anyone else, they would definitely be shocked by this stance. Such a fast sword was actually very strange! However, in Lin An’s eyes, who was holding the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword in his hand, this sword was clearly seen by him! Buzz! Lin An narrowed his eyes slightly and the sword in his hand also let out a sword chime as it pierced straight towards Ye Changkong! When everyone saw this scene, they were instantly shocked! “Does he not want to live anymore? He didn’t even make a move and just charged forward?” “This is crazy!” Everyone’s eyes widened. They didn’t know just how strong the sword in Lin An’s hand was! They also didn’t know that offense was the best defense! Lin An easily reached forward and could break all sword techniques in the world! Clang! Sparks suddenly appeared in the air and the metallic sound seemed as if it wanted to tear everyone’s eardrums apart. Ye Changkong’s sword was completely blocked by Lin An! Moreover, it wasn’t Lin An who blocked him but that the sword intent of this sword was indomitable. It was so extreme that Ye Changkong felt fear and had no choice but to change his move at the last minute. This descendant of the God of Swords turned his attack into defense and blocked this sword while simultaneously retreating explosively! Swish! Ye Changkong pointed his sword towards the ground. His palm was numb and his shocked eyes suddenly stared at Lin An. On the side of the Langya Sword sect, the expressions of several disciples, including the leader of the group, instantly changed! As members of a sword sect, they had an extremely deep understanding of sword techniques. They could see that Ye Changkong was at a disadvantage with that sword attack just now! Lin An let out a long laugh, grabbed the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword, and charged straight at Ye Changkong! Not good! Ye Changkong felt the unusualness of the green sword in front of him and his expression suddenly changed. He raised his long sword to block in front of him and, at the same time, his figure rapidly retreated! However, Lin An’s physical body was now in the Hell King’s Purgatory Form, and his strength had long surpassed that of an ordinary person. His speed was also extremely fast! In just an instant, the Nine Nether Weeping Blood Sword suddenly slashed down! This sword attack didn’t have any techniques at all. There was only one thing to pay attention to, and that was to break ten thousand techniques with a single force! No matter how many techniques one had, in the face of absolute, violent power, they would all appear pale and powerless! Clang! A metallic sound reverberated from the battle stage and spread far away! Ye Changkong had almost no strength to resist at all. Suddenly, a “crack” sound was heard from his wrist. Intense pain immediately rose from his arm and pierced through his entire body! His arm was actually fractured! Ye Changkong’s entire body was blasted flying and directly fell out of the martial arts stage. The Crimson Shadowless Sword in his hand was covered with cracks! At the same time, a trail of blood flowed out from the corner of his mouth. In front of this violent energy, it was the first time that he saw his own insignificance! This battle was his loss! Ever since he started cultivating, other than his father, the God of Swords, it was the first time that he felt that he had lost! The entire place was silent, so quiet that one could hear a pin drop! Everyone’s eyes were wide open. Their faces were filled with shock and awe! They found it hard to believe, hard to accept, that the descendant of the God of Swords, Ye Changkong, had actually lost just like that! And he had lost so clearly and cleanly. They had only exchanged two rounds and he had already been sent flying by Lin An just like that! So it turned out that a true battle between experts was not one where they fought back and forth for hundreds of rounds. The true strength could be determined with just one exchange. “How...; how is this possible?” A disciple of the Langya Sword Sect said with a trembling voice. All along, Ye Changkong had been the object of their reverence. The descendant of the God of Swords for the generation had unparalleled sword techniques but, now, he had already lost in two rounds! All of a sudden, the glorious image of the descendant of the God of Swords who would not fail in the hearts of the dozen or so Langya Sword Sect disciples collapsed with a bang! “How did this happen?” “How did Ye Changkong fall?” Everyone present was also shocked and extremely confused! Up until now, they still couldn’t understand how Lin An won. The imperial guards were still in shock, but they could only smile bitterly as they took out a talisman and slapped it on the heavily injured Ye Changkong, sending him out of the training field! Ye Changkong, the descendant of the God of Swords and the elite prodigy of the Langya Sword Sect, one of the three great sects, was defeated just like that! He didn’t even pass the first stage and lost just like that! It was all because he met someone...; Lin An! This was beyond the expectations of many people and it was also beyond the expectations of the eunuch who was singing outside the throne room. As the emperor’s personal eunuch, this steward knew many secrets that ordinary people didn’t know. As far as he knew, the emperor did not really randomly recruit the prince consort this time. Instead, he had already chosen a few heaven’s favored sons as the best candidates. For example, the head of the capital’s four great scholars, Young Master Wu. For example, the descendant of the God of Swords of the Langya Sword Sect, Ye Changkong! These two were the candidates that the emperor valued the most, and Young Master Wu was placed first. Unfortunately, he was defeated by a scholar named Lin An the day before yesterday. Even if he didn’t lose his reputation, he still lost the right to become the emperor’s son-in-law! Therefore, the emperor placed the first place on Ye Changkong. But now, Ye Changkong couldn’t even pass the first round! This scared the old eunuch to death. After seeing Ye Changkong being sent out of the arena, he immediately turned around and ran back to the throne room. ...; In the arena, Lin An had already finished the first trial. After defeating Ye Changkong, he entered the third trial. In the end, before he could even think about what weapon to use, his opponent immediately chose to give up and surrender the moment he stepped onto the stage. There was nothing he could do. Fighting against a monster that defeated Ye Changkong in two moves was simply courting death! That Xiushi was very smart. He surrendered and ran away as soon as he got on the stage. Lin An was very helpless and won all three rounds. Moreover, because his opponent surrendered, he became the first person to advance. However, just as he was about to rest for a while, an old eunuch suddenly ran out from the throne room and shouted at the top of his voice. “The Emperor has arrived!” In an instant, everyone present was stunned. They turned around and looked at the throne room on the stone steps. Even the cultivators who were still fighting on the martial arts stage stopped, their faces full of shock! In the next moment, a majestic figure dressed in a flaming dragon robe strode out of the throne room! The supreme aura of the emperor instantly spread out! Everyone’s expression changed. Countless people inside and outside the palace knelt on the ground. Following that, the immortal cultivators bowed one after another. Lin An raised his head to look. He saw a middle-aged man in the center of everyone’s field of vision. He was dressed in a bright yellow dragon robe embroidered with flames. His body was cold and his chest was wide and broad. With every move he made, he gave off a natural and domineering aura that shook the world! This was the ruler of the Ghanaian Empire, Ji Mingwu! The emperor’s expression was calm, and his eyes were as deep as a valley. Beside the Ghanaian Emperor stood a beautiful woman. She was the main character of this trial, the Flaming Sun Princess. At this moment, the Ghanaian emperor already had a decision in his heart. Since Ye Changkong had been defeated, then he would see if this new kid could be roped into the imperial palace and become the prince consort. The Ghanaian Emperor believed that as long as he promised wealth, power, status, and even beauty, there was no talent that he could not rope in. With these talents in the fire nation, it would not be a problem for him to dominate the Cangyun Continent in the future. As Lin An continued to absorb mana, the mana in his body also continued to grow and purify. Finally, Lin An’s sea of vital energy couldn’t take it anymore. It began to take the initiative to wash away the aurous core. The boundless sea of qi had the aurous core suspended above it. At this moment, the aurous core had already changed its appearance and had completely turned into a glazed color. It was like a peerless gem. Any priceless jewelry would lose its color in front of it. At this moment, the glazed aurous core was being washed away by the boundless sea of qi. Once. Twice. Three times. ...; Ten thousand times. ...; One hundred thousand times. ...; One million times. ...; Kacha. A sound came from somewhere. Kacha. Kacha. Kacha. The sound was even louder as if some jade item had exploded. Looking around, it turned out to be the glazed aurous core in the middle of the sea of qi! At this time, the aurous core had long lost its original peerless quality. Its beautiful body was full of cracks as if a light blow would immediately shatter it. The sea of qi was still holding on. After an unknown amount of time, Lin An’s aurous core finally couldn’t hold on any longer. It exploded in the boundless sea of qi. Countless fragments fell into the boundless sea of qi. The sea of qi that had obtained the aurous core fragment rose again. The entire sea of qi world was filled with huge waves that were hundreds of millions of meters long. They swept around wantonly, making the entire world seem like it was the end of the world! At this moment, Lin An also felt extremely pained. The blood in his body surged and his sea of qi swelled as if he would explode and die at any moment. Just as he was about to give up, the imprint that his master had left on his forehead lit up. Then, it instantly turned into an endless stream of energy that poured out from his entire body, firmly suppressing his sea of qi. At this moment, on top of his sea of qi, the original position of the aurous core. If one looked closely, one would discover that a small person was being nurtured. That’s right, this was Lin An’s nascent soul! The growth rate of the nascent soul was very fast and, before long, it had grown to the size of a palm. In the blink of an eye, it had grown into a normal man. If one looked carefully, there was Lin An’s shadow between the man’s brows! The man seemed to have waited long enough. His eyes suddenly opened. In an instant, the entire sea of qi quieted down. None of them dared to act rashly. The man waved his hand again, and the boundless sea of qi obediently rushed towards the man’s hand. At first, the speed was not fast and the amount was not large. But as time passed, the speed became faster and faster. Finally, the boundless sea of qi flowed backward and entered the man’s body. And the man who had obtained the sea of qi had finally awakened! A smile appeared on his face. A corona of sunlight appeared behind his head as he sat cross-legged in the air. Not long after, the man seemed to have finished preparing. A boundless light suddenly bloomed behind him, lighting up the pitch-black sea of qi like a divine kingdom in the sky. The nascent soul was finally formed! Lin An exploded with a powerful aura. This aura made the originally flowing sea of qi even more violent. The old man and the emperor who were observing from outside seemed to have seen something and their expressions instantly changed. Their bodies were unable to withstand this terrifying pressure and they continuously retreated. ...; After entering the nascent soul stage, Lin An’s absorbing power increased once again. The amount of primordial spirit liquid below was visibly decreasing. At the same time, in the west of this place, ten thousand meters away, there was a huge country. Within the capital, countless terrifying auras circled back and forth. The strength displayed was a hundred times stronger than that of Ghana. However, such a powerful country was beginning to disappear at this moment. No, it was not a country but all the land, trees, walls, animals, and people! “What happened?” The terrifying aura echoed unwillingly and, not long after, there was no sound! “Damn it, what is this thing? I am already at the Mahayana stage, why would it disappear?” Another terrifying voice sounded. “Could this be the inhumanity of heaven and earth, treating all things as dogs?” A terrifying voice said in despair. “No, no. No, I’m not willing. I’m not willing! I spent countless years to reach my current state, why, why would you do this to me!” Another terrifying voice sounded but it still couldn’t resist the destruction. At the same time, everything in this country was playing out across the country. Countless powerhouses from holy lands, sect leaders, and the foundation of the country were all disappearing irreversibly. ...; What Lin An didn’t know in the outside world was that as he absorbed the primordial spirit liquid, his advancement was extremely fast. The nascent soul stage was the final barrier of the Scripture of No Beginning. Once he crossed it, there would be a great path ahead. Nascent soul initial stage Nascent soul intermediate stage Nascent soul peak stage. Boom! With a loud sound, the nascent soul broke through the leaving aperture stage. Leaving aperture initial stage. Leaving aperture intermediate stage. Leaving aperture peak stage. With a loud sound, Lin An broke through the leaving aperture stage once again and was distracted. ...; Leveling up like flowing water, Lin An completely felt this sentence at this moment. The most amazing thing was that the Scripture didn’t need to stabilize one’s cultivation level at all. No matter how fast one broke through, there wouldn’t be the slightest bit of weakness. ...; And all over the world, many places were undergoing terrifying changes. Finally, this change came to the Ghana Empire. At this moment, on a jade-green hill in Lin An’s sect, an extremely beautiful woman who had just passed out suddenly woke up. Looking at everything that was disappearing, she couldn’t help but mutter, “Has it finally begun? My disciple?” Then, she waved her hand, leaving behind this piece of green land. At this moment, a middle-aged man hurriedly walked in and shouted, “Emperor! Emperor, it’s bad! The Empire is disappearing!” “What?”Ji Mingwu asked in disbelief, “Who is it? Who dares to invade my empire?” “No, no! No, it’s the Heavens!” The man fiercely bit his tongue and said calmly, “The heavens and earth are devouring us. More than a dozen cities have already been devoured!” “What?”Ji Mingwu panicked and hurriedly ran outside. At this moment, the old man felt something. Could it be here? He didn’t dare to be sure but the seed of doubt had already been planted. As time passed, Lin An finally broke through the void interpretation and arrived at the Mahayana. In an instant, a terrifying aura spread out, causing the old man outside to kneel on the ground without any resistance. And the devouring of the outside world had reached its final stage. Countless countries and countless people had vanished into thin air. Ji Mingwu brought the Flaming Sun Princess and a group of geniuses to guard the main hall. As they watched the devouring approach, they could not help but shed tears! “Are you naive enough to forget us?” As Ji Mingwu’s voice fell, the geniuses gradually disappeared one by one, finally arriving in front of Ji Mingwu. Ji Mingwu disappeared. The Flaming Sun Princess disappeared. The Ghana Empire disappeared! The sea of vitality disappeared! At this moment, the entire world belonged to Lin An alone, and there was still a little bit of primordial spirit liquid. As he absorbed the last bit of primordial spirit liquid, the last bit of primordial spirit liquid also disappeared! And his cultivation level also broke through and reached the tribulation! He suddenly opened his eyes. As his cultivation level increased, he already understood everything. Then the system gave him the last hint. [Break through the Thunder Tribulation, find the way forward 100%] ...;